	Leslie Nielsen
 
 
Leslie William Nielsen, OC (11 February 1926 28 November 2010)    was a Canadian and naturalized American actor and comedian.     Nielsen appeared in more than one hundred films and 1,500 television programs over the span of his career, portraying more than 220 characters.    Born in Regina, Saskatchewan, Canada, Nielsen enlisted in the Royal Canadian Air Force and worked as a disc jockey before receiving a scholarship to Neighborhood Playhouse. Making his television debut in 1948, he quickly expanded to over 50 television appearances two years later. Nielsen made his film debut in 1956, and began collecting his roles in dramas, westerns, and romance films between the 1950s and the 1970s. Nielsen's performance in the films Forbidden Planet and The Poseidon Adventure received positive reviews as a serious actor, although he is primarily known for his comedic roles during the 1980s and the early 1990s.Although Nielsen's acting career crossed a variety of genres in both television and films, his deadpan delivery in Airplane! marked a turning point in his career, one that would make him, in the words of film critic Roger Ebert, "the Olivier of spoofs."    Nielsen enjoyed further success with The Naked Gun film series, based on an earlier short-lived television series Police Squad! in which he also starred. Nielsen's portrayal of comedic characters seemingly oblivious to (and complicit in) their absurd surroundings gave him a reputation as a comedian.    In the final years of his life, Nielsen appeared in numerous spoof and parody films, many of which were met poorly by critics, but performed well in box office and home media releases. Nielsen married four times and had two daughters from his second marriage. Nielsen was recognized with a variety of awards throughout his career, and was inducted into the Canada and Hollywood Walks of Fame.
Early life
Nielsen was born on 11 February 1926 in Regina, Saskatchewan.    His mother, Mabel Elizabeth (née Davies), was a Welsh immigrant, and his father, Ingvard Eversen Nielsen, was a Danish-born Constable in the Royal Canadian Mounted Police.         Nielsen had two brothers; his older brother, Erik Nielsen (1924–2008), was Deputy Prime Minister of Canada from 1984 to 1986.  Ingvard was a troubled man who beat his wife and sons, and Leslie longed to escape. As soon as he graduated from high school at 17, he joined the Royal Canadian Air Force, even though he was legally deaf (he wore hearing aids most of his life).    His half-uncle, Jean Hersholt, was an actor best known for his portrayal of Dr. Christian in the long-running radio series of the same name and the subsequent television series and films.     In a 1994 Boston Globe article, Nielsen explained, "I did learn very early that when I would mention my uncle, people would look at me as if I were the biggest liar in the world. Then I would take them home and show them 8-by-10 glossies, and things changed quite drastically. So I began to think that maybe this acting business was not a bad idea, much as I was very shy about it and certainly without courage regarding it. My uncle died not too long after I was in a position to know him. I regret that I had not a chance to know him better." Nielsen spent several years living in Fort Norman (now Tulita), Northwest Territories where his father was stationed with the Royal Canadian Mounted Police.       At the age of 17, following his graduation from Victoria Composite High School in Edmonton, Nielsen enlisted in the Royal Canadian Air Force and was trained as an aerial gunner during the latter part of World War II (but was too young to be fully trained or sent overseas).    He worked briefly as a disc jockey at a Calgary, Alberta radio station, before enrolling at the Lorne Greene Academy of Radio Arts, Toronto.     While studying in Toronto, Nielsen received a scholarship to the Neighborhood Playhouse. He noted, "I couldn't refuse, but I must say when you come from the land of the snow goose, the moose and wool to New York, you're bringing every ton of hayseed and country bumpkin that you packed. As long as I didn't open my mouth, I felt a certain security. But I always thought I was going to be unmasked: 'OK, pack your stuff.' 'Well, what's the matter?' 'We've discovered you have no talent; we're shipping you back to Canada.'"  He moved to New York City for his scholarship,  studying theater and music at the Neighborhood Playhouse, while performing in summer stock theatre.  Afterward, he attended the Actors Studio,    until making his first television appearance in 1948 on an episode of Studio One, alongside Charlton Heston,    for which he was paid US$75. 
Career
Early career 
Nielsen's career began in dramatic roles on television during what is known as "Television's Golden Age",  appearing in almost 50 live programs in 1950 alone.  Nielsen reported that for his salary that there "  was very little gold, we only got $75 or $100 per show."    His distinctive voice narrated several documentaries and commercials but, with a handful of exceptions, his early work as a dramatic actor was uneventful.  Hal Erickson of Allmovie noted, "...much of Nielsen's early work was undistinguished; he was merely a handsome leading man in an industry overstocked with handsome leading men."    In 1956 he made his feature film debut in the Michael Curtiz-directed musical film The Vagabond King.  In the Seattle Post-Intelligencer, Nielsen pointed out that he remembers Curtiz as "a sadist, a charming sadist, but a sadist".  Nielsen would go on to call this film "The Vagabond Turkey".  Though the film was not a box office success, Nielsen caught the eye of producer Nicholas Nayfack who offered him an audition for a role in the science fiction film Forbidden Planet, resulting in Nielsen being signed to a long-term contract by Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer (MGM).  
Forbidden Planet became an instant success,    and roles in other MGM films such as Ransom! (1956), The Opposite Sex (1956) and Hot Summer Night (1957) followed.  In 1957 he won the lead role opposite Debbie Reynolds in the romantic comedy Tammy and the Bachelor, which, as a Chicago Tribune critic wrote in 1998, made people consider Nielsen as both a dramatic actor and a handsome romantic lead.  However, dissatisfied with the quality of the films he was offered, calling the studios "  a Tiffany, which had forgotten how to make silver", Nielsen left MGM, but not before auditioning for the role of Messala in the 1959 historical piece Ben-Hur. Stephen Boyd was eventually given the role.     After leaving the studios, Nielsen landed the lead role in the Disney miniseries The Swamp Fox, as American Revolutionary War hero Francis Marion.  In a 1988 interview he reflected on the series, stating, "That was a great experience, because the Disney people didn't do their shows like everyone else, knocking out an episode a week.   We only had to do an episode a month, and the budgets were extremely high for TV at that time. We had location shooting rather than cheap studio backdrops, and very authentic costumes."  Eight episodes were produced and aired between 1959 and 1961.   His television appearances include parts in Justice, Alfred Hitchcock Presents, The Virginian, and The Wild Wild West. In 1961, he was the lead in a taut Los Angeles police drama called The New Breed. He guest starred in a 1964 episode of Daniel Boone with Fess Parker and, in a minor but credited role, Jay Silverheels. In 1968, he had a major role in the pilot film for the popular police series Hawaii Five-O, and later appeared in one of the seventh season episodes. In 1969, he had the leading role as a police officer in The Bold Ones: The Protectors.In 1972, Nielsen appeared as the ship's captain in the all-star disaster epic The Poseidon Adventure. He also starred in the William Girdler-directed 1977 action film Project: Kill. His last dramatic role before portraying mainly comedy roles was the 1979 Canadian disaster film City on Fire in which he played a corrupt mayor. In 1980, he guest starred as Sinclair on the CBS miniseries The Chisholms.
Airplane! and The Naked Gun 
Nielsen's supporting role in 1980's Airplane! was a major watershed in his career. The ethos of the movie, a parody of dramatic disaster films such as Zero Hour! and Airport, is largely based on building a comedy around actors who were then known exclusively for their dramatic roles (other stars included Robert Stack, Peter Graves, and Lloyd Bridges). Nielsen was the movie's linchpin, his deadpan delivery contrasting with the continual absurdity surrounding him. When asked, "Surely you can't be serious?", he responds with a curt, "I am serious. And don't call me Shirley." In several interviews he later reflected on the significance of the comedic line: "I thought it was amusing, but it never occurred to me that it was going to become a trademark. It's such a surprise...the thing comes out, people say, 'What did he say?!'"    Nielsen also stated that he was "...pleased and honored that [he] had a chance to deliver that line."  The comedic exchange was at #79 on the American Film Institute's AFI's 100 Years...100 Movie Quotes.    The American Film Institute also included the film in its list of the top ten comedy films of all time.   
Critics praised the film, which also proved to be a success with audiences.    The film's directors, Jim Abrahams, David Zucker, and Jerry Zucker, chose Nielsen for the role based on his ability to play "a fish in water", stating that "You could have cast funny people and done it with everybody winking, goofing off, and silly...we wanted people to be oblivious to the comedy."  For Nielsen, Airplane! marked a shift from dramatic roles to a new focus on deadpan comedy. When it was suggested that his role in Airplane! was against type, Nielsen protested that he had "always been cast against type before," and that comedy was what he always really wanted to do.   The directors, interested in the success of the new comedy, decided to bring a similar style of comedy to television, casting Nielsen in the lead role in their new series, Police Squad!. The series introduced Nielsen as Frank Drebin, the stereotypical police officer modeled after serious characters in earlier police TV series.Police Squads opening sequence was based on the 1950s cop show M Squad, (which starred Lee Marvin), which opened with footage of a police car roving through an after-dark urban setting with a big band playing a jazz theme song in the background. The voice-over and the show's organization into "acts" with an epilogue was homage to Quinn Martin police dramas including The Fugitive, The Streets of San Francisco, Barnaby Jones, The F.B.I., and Cannon. Much like in Airplane!, Nielsen portrayed a serious character whose one-liners appeared accidental next to the pratfalls and sight gags around him. Although the show was quickly canceled, lasting only six episodes after being juggled between time slots, Nielsen received an Emmy Award  nomination for Outstanding Lead Actor in a Comedy Series.   Non-comedic roles included Prom Night (1980) and Creepshow (1982), both horror films. His last dramatic role was as Allen Green, a violent john killed in self-defense by Barbra Streisand's prostitute character, Claudia Draper, in Martin Ritt's courtroom drama Nuts (1987).Six years after the cancellation of Police Squad!, its directors decided to make a feature length version for theaters. Titled The Naked Gun: From the Files of Police Squad!. The film returned Nielsen to his role as Frank Drebin. It involved a comical scheme of a ruthless drug kingpin using hypnosis in an attempt to assassinate Queen Elizabeth II. Drebin, like the doctor in Airplane!, seemed unaware of the absurdity around him even when unintentionally contributing toward it. Nielsen later said in an interview that he had done many of his own stunts, "You have an idea of how you're going to do something, and it's your vision... unless you do it, it really doesn't stand a chance."  This movie grossed over $78 million at the box office and was well received by critics.       Ebert's 3½–star review (out of four) noted, "You laugh, and then you laugh at yourself for laughing."   The Naked Gun spawned two sequels: The Naked Gun 2½: The Smell of Fear (1991) and Naked Gun 33⅓: The Final Insult (1994). Naked Gun 2½ grossed more than the original, with $86,930,400, while Naked Gun 33⅓ grossed $51,132,600 in receipts.       Nielsen remained open to the prospects of acting in a fourth Naked Gun film, although he doubted that it would ever be produced—"I don't think so," he said in 2005. "If there hasn't been one by now, I doubt it. I think it would be wonderful."   Nielsen briefly appeared on the World Wrestling Federation program in the summer of 1994 on WWF Monday Night Raw; capitalizing on his Frank Drebin character, Nielsen (and George Kennedy) were hired as "super-sleuths" to unravel the mystery of The Undertaker who had disappeared at January's Royal Rumble event. At SummerSlam 1994, in a Naked Gun parody, they were hot on the case (in fact, they were literally standing on a case). Although they did not actually find The Undertaker, the case had been closed (the literal case had been shut) and thus, they solved the mystery.   
Later comediesNielsen attempted a variety of similar roles with none achieving the prominence of Frank Drebin. These films mostly emulated the style of The Naked Gun series with varying degrees of critical and commercial success: many were panned by critics and most performed poorly. In 1986, Nielsen played against recent type as a dramatic (and unsympathetic) character in the comedy, Soul Man. In 1990, Nielsen also appeared as a Frank Drebin-style character in a series of advertisements in the United Kingdom for Red Rock Cider.Although The Naked Gun series parodied police dramas in general, Nielsen's later parody films focused on specific targets. Critics panned Repossessed (1990) and 2001: A Space Travesty (2001), parodies of The Exorcist and 2001: A Space Odyssey, respectively. Both films attempted the absurdist comedy Nielsen is recognized for, but were poorly received.       Even a leading role in a Mel Brooks comic horror parody, Dracula: Dead and Loving It, failed to generate much box office excitement, although it did gain somewhat of a following on its later release to video. Both 1996's Spy Hard and 1998's Wrongfully Accused, a parody of James Bond films and The Fugitive, respectively, received more popularity on home video but were not well received by critics.      His attempt at children's comedies met with additional criticism. Surf Ninjas (1993) and Mr. Magoo (1997) faced scathing reviews. Several critics were disappointed that Nielsen's role in Surf Ninjas was only "an extended cameo" and film critic Chris Hicks recommended that viewers "...avoid any comedy that features Leslie Nielsen outside of the Naked Gun series."       Jeff Miller of the Houston Chronicle panned Mr. Magoo, a live action remake of the 1950s cartoon, by saying, "I'm supposed to suggest how the film might be better but I can't think of anything to say other than to make the film again."   Nielsen's first major slapstick success since The Naked Gun came in a supporting role in Scary Movie 3 (2003). His appearance as President Harris proved popular enough for a second appearance in its sequel, Scary Movie 4 (2006). This became the first time Nielsen reprised a character since his appearances as Frank Drebin. In one scene, Nielsen appeared almost fully nude, and one critic referred to the scene as putting "the 'scary' in Scary Movie 4."   Nielsen also hosted a series of instructional golf videos beginning with 1993's Bad Golf Made Easier. The videos were not serious, instead combining absurdist comedy with golf techniques. The series were popular enough to spawn two additional sequels, Bad Golf My Way (1994) and Stupid Little Golf Video (1997). Nielsen also co-wrote a fictional autobiography titled The Naked Truth. The book portrayed Nielsen as a popular actor with a long history of prestigious films.
Final years
Even in his eighties, Nielsen continued to have an active career. He performed serious roles on screen and stage (such as his one-man theatre show Darrow, in which he played Clarence Darrow), as well as providing voice-overs and on-camera appearances for commercials; cartoons like Zeroman where he had the leading role/voice; children's shows, such as Pumper Pups, which he narrated, in addition to comedic film roles. The sibling relationship with his elder brother, the Honourable Erik Nielsen, a former Deputy Prime Minister of Canada, served as the premise of an HBO mockumentary entitled The Canadian Conspiracy in which Leslie Nielsen appeared, along with other prominent Canadian-born media personalities. He was a celebrity contestant on CBS's Gameshow Marathon, where he played The Price Is Right, Let's Make a Deal, Beat the Clock, and Press Your Luck for charity. Beginning in February 2007, Nielsen began playing a small role as a doctor in the humorous yet educational television show Doctor*Ology. The show chronicles real-life medical techniques and technology, and airs on the Discovery Channel. In an interview, Nielsen admitted his admiration for the doctors on the show: "There are any number of things that you think about when you ponder if you hadn't been an actor, what would you be, and I've always said I'd like to be an astronaut or a doctor. I have such admiration for doctors. I just don't know how you go around to thank them enough for coming up with the world's most remarkable new discoveries."   In 2007, Nielsen starred in the drama Music Within. In 2008, he portrayed a version of Uncle Ben for Superhero Movie, a spoof of superhero films. He then appeared in the 2008 parody film An American Carol, which David Zucker directed, produced, and co-wrote. He appeared in the 2009 parody Stan Helsing. Nielsen portrayed the Doctor in the Spanish horror comedy Spanish Movie,  a spoof comedy like Scary Movie, but making fun of popular Spanish films. Nielsen appeared in over 100 films and 1,500 television programs over the span of his career, portraying over 220 characters.      
Personal life Nielsen married four times: Monica Boyar (1950–1956), Alisande Ullman (1958–1973), Brooks Oliver (1981–1983) and Barbaree Earl (2001–2010).       Nielsen had two daughters from his second marriage, Maura and Thea Nielsen. Nielsen was a fan of golf, and he often played it in his free time.    Nielsen joked about his view on golf, "I have no goals or ambition. I do, however, wish to work enough to maintain whatever celebrity status I have so that they will continue to invite me to golf tournaments."  Nielsen's interest in the sport led him to star in several comedic instructional films.Nielsen stated in several interviews that he had a few medical problems such as hearing impairment.    He was legally deaf and wore hearing aids for most of his life.  Because of this impairment, he publicly supported the Better Hearing Institute.   
DeathIn November 2010, Nielsen was admitted to a Fort Lauderdale, Florida hospital for treatment of pneumonia. On 28 November, Doug Nielsen, Nielsen's nephew, announced to the CJOB radio station that Nielsen had died in his sleep, due to complications from pneumonia, around 5:30 pm EST, surrounded by family and friends.          He was interred in Fort Lauderdale's Evergreen Cemetery. As a final bit of humor, Nielsen chose "Let 'er Rip" as his epitaph. 
AchievementsAmong his numerous awards, in 1995 Leslie Nielsen received UCLA's Jack Benny Award for his comedic roles.  In 1988, he became the 1,884th personality to receive a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame at 6541 Hollywood Blvd.    In 2001 he was inducted into Canada's Walk of Fame.    The following year he was made an Officer of the Order of Canada, although he was also a naturalized U.S. citizen.  With his American status, he maintained his Canadian heritage: "There's no way you can be a Canadian and think you can lose it ... Canadians are a goodly group. They are very aware of caring and helping."  On 19 May 2005, during the centennial gala of his birth province, Saskatchewan, Leslie Nielsen was introduced to HM Queen Elizabeth II.   In 1997, a Golden Palm Star on the Palm Springs, California, Walk of Stars was dedicated to him. On 20 February 2002, Nielsen was named an honorary citizen of West Virginia and an "Ambassador of Mountain State Goodwill". Nielsen visited the state many times to speak and visit friends.  In 2003, in honor of Nielsen, Grant MacEwan College named its school of communications after him.    Also in 2003, the Alliance of Canadian Cinema, Television and Radio Artists awarded him the ACTRA Award of Excellence. 
Filmography
Films

Year Film Role Other notes 
1955  The Battle of Gettysburg  Narrator   
1956  Ransom!  Charlie Telfer  Film debut, as an actor 
Forbidden Planet  Commander John J. Adams   
The Vagabond King  Thibault   
The Opposite Sex  Steve Hilliard   
1957  Hot Summer Night  William Joel Partain   
Tammy and the Bachelor  Peter Brent   
1958  The Sheepman  Col. Stephen Bedford / Johnny Bledsoe   
1960  Route 66 (TV series)    
1964  See How They Run  Elliot Green  First television movie. 
Night Train to Paris  Alan Holiday   
1965  Dark Intruder  Brett Kingsford   
Harlow  Richard Manley   
1966  The Plainsman  Col. George Armstrong Custer   
Beau Geste  Lieutenant De Ruse   
1967  Code Name: Heraclitus  Fryer   
The Reluctant Astronaut  Major Fred Gifford   
Gunfight in Abilene  Grant Evers   
Rosie!  Cabot Shaw   
1968  How to Steal the World  General Maximilian Harmon  The Man from U.N.C.L.E. film. 
Counterpoint  Victor Rice   
Dayton's Devils Frank Dayton   
Companions in Nightmare  Dr. Neesden   
1969  Trial Run  Jason Harkness   
Deadlock  Lieutenant Sam Danforth   
How to Commit Marriage  Phil Fletcher   
Change of Mind  Sherrif Webb   
1970  Night Slaves  Sherrif Henshaw   
The Aquarians  Official   
Hauser's Memory Joseph Slaughter   
1971  Incident In San Francisco  Lieutenant Brubaker   
Four Rode Out  Mr. Brown   
They Call It Murder Frank Antrim   
1972  The Poseidon Adventure  Captain Harrison   
1973  ...And Millions Die!  Jack Gallagher   
Snatched  Bill Sutting   
Amanda Fallon  Mr. Cummings   
The Return of Charlie Chan Alexander Hadrachi   
1975  Can Ellen Be Saved  Arnold Lindsey   
Threshold: The Blue Angels Experience  Narrator   
1976  Grand Jury  John Williams   
Project Kill  Jonathan Trevor   
Brinks: The Great Robbery  Agent Norman Houston   
1977  Sixth and Main  John Doe   
Day of the Animals  Paul Jenson   
Viva Knievel!  Stanley Millard   
The Kentucky Fried Movie  Man in Feel-O-Rama Movie  Uncredited cameo; Feel-O-Rama segment. 
The Amsterdam Kill  Riley Knight   
1978  Little Mo  Nelson Fisher   
1979  Institute for Revenge  Counselor Hollis Barnes   
The Albertans  Don MacIntosh   
Riel  Major Crozier   
City on Fire  Mayor William Dudley   
1980  OHMS  Governor   
Airplane!  Dr. Rumack  First comedy role. 
Prom Night  Mr. Raymond Hammond   
1981  A Choice of Two  Unknown   
1982  Twilight Theater  Various Characters   
Foxfire Light  Reece Morgan   
Wrong Is Right  Mallory   
Creepshow  Richard Vickers  Something To Tide You Over segment. 
1983  Prime Time  Unknown   
The Night the Bridge Fell Down  Paul Warren   
Cave-In!  Joseph 'Joe' Johnson   
The Creature Wasn't Nice (Spaceship)  Capt. Jamieson   
1985  Murder Among Friends  Unknown   
Reckless Disregard  Bob Franklin   
Blade in Hong Kong  Harry Ingersoll   
Striker's Mountain  Jim McKay   
1986  The Patriot  Admiral Frazer   
Soul Man  Mr. Dunbar   
1987  Nightstick  Thad Evans   
Nuts   Allen Green  Final non-comedy role. 
Home Is Where the Hart Is  Sherrif Nashville Schwartz   
1988  Dangerous Curves  Greg Krevske   
The Railway Dragon  Narrator  First animated film. 
The Naked Gun: From the Files of Police Squad!  Lt. Frank Drebin  First starring role. 
1990  Repossessed  Father Jebedaiah Mayii   
1991  All I Want for Christmas Santa Claus  Family holiday film. 
The Naked Gun 2½: The Smell of Fear  Lt. Frank Drebin   
Chance of a Lifetime  Lloyd Dixon   
1993  Digger  Arthur Evrensel   
Surf Ninjas  Colonel Chi   
1994  S.P.Q.R.: 2,000 and a Half Years Ago  Lucio Cinico   
Naked Gun 33⅓: The Final Insult  Lt. Frank Drebin   
1995  Mr. Willowby's Christmas Tree  Willowby's butler   
Rent-a-Kid  Harry Haber   
Dracula: Dead and Loving It  Count Dracula   
1996  Spy Hard  Dick Steele, Agent WD-40   
1997  Mr. Magoo  Mr. Magoo  
1998  Safety Patrol  Mr. Penn   
Family Plan  Harry Haber   
Harvey  Dr. Chumley   
Wrongfully Accused  Ryan Harrison   
1999  Pirates 4-D  Captain Lucky  4D Cinema Show presented at various Busch Gardens amusement parks. 
2000  Santa Who?  Santa Claus   
2001: A Space Travesty  Marshal Richard 'Dick' Dix   
2001  Camouflage  Jack Potter   
Kevin of the North (Chilly Dogs)  Clive Thornton   
2002  Men with Brooms  Gordon Cutter   
2003  Scary Movie 3  President Harris   
Noël Noël  English Narrator   
2006  Scary Movie 4  President Harris   
2007  Music Within  Bill Austin   
2008  Superhero Movie  Uncle Albert   
An American Carol  Grampa / Himself   
Slap Shot 3: The Junior League  Mayor of Charlestown   
2009  Spanish Movie  Doctor   
Stan Helsing  Kay   
2011  Stonerville  Producer   
2012  The Waterman Movie  Ready Espanosa  Voice acting  

Television 

Year Title Role Other Notes 
1953  Jukebox Jury  Himself   
1958–1961  Alfred Hitchcock Presents  Lloyd Ashley & DA Rudolph Cox  Two episodes 
1959  The Swamp Fox  Colonel Francis Marion   
1960  Thriller  Alan Patterson (lead role) Episode "The Twisted Image" 
1960, 1964 Wagon Train  Jeremy Dow, Brian Conlin Two episodes 
1960  The Untouchables  Tom Sebring Episode "Three Thousand Suspects" 
1961  The New Breed  Lt. Price Adams  Regular 
1963  Channing  Professor Paul Stafford  Single episode 
1963–1964  The Fugitive (TV series)  Martin C. Rowland & Harold Cheyney Two episodes 
1964  Your First Impression  As himself  Single episode 
1964  The Alfred Hitchcock Hour Steven Grainger  Single episode 
1964–1969  The Virginian  Ben Stratton  Five episodes 
1965 Voyage to the Bottom of the Sea  Capt. Wayne Adams  One episode "The Creature" 
1965   Peyton Place  Vincent and Kenneth Marham (twins)  19 episodes 
1967  Bonanza  Sheriff Paul Rowan  One episode 
1968  The Man from U.N.C.L.E.  General Maximillian Harmon  Single episode "The Seven Wonders of the World Affair Pt 1 & 2" 
1969  The Bold Ones: The Protectors  Deputy Police Chief Sam Danforth  Seven episodes 
1969–1974  Hawaii Five-O  Brent & Colonel Faraday  Two episodes 
1971–1975  Columbo  Peter Hamilton & Geronimo  Two episodes 
1971  Bearcats!  Col. Ted Donovan  Single episode 
1971  Night Gallery  The Phantom, Col. Dennis Malloy  Two episodes: "Phantom of What Opera?" and "A Question of Fear" 
1973  M*A*S*H  Col. Buzz Brighton  Episode "The Ringbanger" 
1973–1974  The Streets of San Francisco  Ofc. Joe Landers, Insp. John T. Connor, & Big Jake Wilson  Three episodes 
1974  Cannon  Eric Strauss  Single episode 
1974  Kojak  Michael Hagar  Single episode "Loser Takes All" 
1975  Kung Fu  Vincent Corbino  Four episodes 
1975–1976  S.W.A.T.  Larry Neal/Vince Richie  Three episodes 
1979  Backstairs at the White House  Ike Hoover  Three episodes 
1980  The Littlest Hobo  Mayor Chester Montgomery  Episode "Romiet and Julio" 
1982  Police Squad!  Det. Frank Drebin  Nominated for an Emmy Award 
1984  Shaping Up  Buddy Fox   
1985–1986  Murder, She Wrote  Captain Daniels & David Everett  Two episodes 
1987  Highway to Heaven  Richard R. Benson   
1988  Who's the Boss?  Max   
1988  Day By Day  Jack Harper  One episode, nominated for an Emmy Award 
1989  Saturday Night Live  Himself  Single episode 
1992  The Golden Girls  Lucas Hollingsworth  Series finale 
1993  Herman's Head  God  Single episode 
1994–1999  Due South  Sgt. Buck Frobisher  Four episodes 
1994–1996, 2001–2002  Katie and Orbie  Narrator   
1995  Mr. Willowby's Christmas Tree  Mr. Willowby's Butler, Baxter  Television Christmas special 
2000  Santa Who?  Santa Claus  Television film 
2001  Liocracy  Terrence Brynne McKennie   
2003  Chilly Beach  Santa Claus  Single episode 
2004  Zeroman  Les Mutton / Zeroman   
2007  Doctor*Ology  Himself, Host   
Lipshitz Saves the World  Lipshitz's mentor  Pilot 
Robson Arms  Cado Vasco  

Video

1993: Bad Golf Made Easier
1994: Bad Golf My Way
1997: Stupid Little Golf Video
1997: National Geographic Video: The Savage Garden
Nielsen also appeared in a promotional video for Layman Allen's mathematics game called "Equations" and in the Seaworld San Antonio Summer Nights 4-D show "Pirates 4-D".


Writing

1993: The Naked Truth


References 
External links 
 
 

 
CBC Digital Archives – Leslie and Erik Nielsen laugh it up
  
DEFAULTSORT






























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Josquin des Prez
Josquin des Prez [Josquin Lebloitte dit Desprez] ( ; c. 1450/1455 – 27 August 1521), often referred to simply as Josquin, was a Franco-Flemish composer of the Renaissance. He is also known as Josquin Desprez and Latinized as Josquinus Pratensis, alternatively Jodocus Pratensis, although he himself expressed his preferred spelling of his name, Josquin des Prez, in an acrostic in his motet Illibata Dei virgo nutrix.   He was the most famous European composer between Guillaume Dufay and Palestrina, and is usually considered to be the central figure of the Franco-Flemish School. Josquin is widely considered by music scholars to be the first master of the high Renaissance style of polyphonic vocal music that was emerging during his lifetime.During the 16th century, Josquin gradually acquired the reputation as the greatest composer of the age, his mastery of technique and expression universally imitated and admired. Writers as diverse as Baldassare Castiglione and Martin Luther wrote about his reputation and fame; theorists such as Heinrich Glarean and Gioseffo Zarlino held his style as that best representing perfection.  He was so admired that many anonymous compositions were attributed to him by copyists, probably to increase their sales.  More than 370 works are attributed to him;  it was only after the advent of modern analytical scholarship that some of these mistaken attributions have been challenged, on the basis of stylistic features and manuscript evidence. Yet in spite of Josquin's colossal reputation, which endured until the beginning of the Baroque era and was revived in the 20th century, his biography is shadowy, and we know next to nothing about his personality. The only surviving work which may be in his own hand is a graffito on the wall of the Sistine Chapel, and only one contemporary mention of his character is known, in a letter to Duke Ercole I of Ferrara. The lives of dozens of minor composers of the Renaissance are better documented than the life of Josquin. Josquin wrote both sacred and secular music, and in all of the significant vocal forms of the age, including masses, motets, chansons and frottole. During the 16th century, he was praised for both his supreme melodic gift and his use of ingenious technical devices. In modern times, scholars have attempted to ascertain the basic details of his biography, and have tried to define the key characteristics of his style to correct misattributions, a task that has proved difficult, as Josquin liked to solve compositional problems in different ways in successive compositions—sometimes he wrote in an austere style devoid of ornamentation, and at other times he wrote music requiring considerable virtuosity.  Heinrich Glarean wrote in 1547 that Josquin was not only a "magnificent virtuoso" (the Latin can be translated also as "show-off") but capable of being a "mocker", using satire effectively.  While the focus of scholarship in recent years has been to remove music from the "Josquin canon" (including some of his most famous pieces) and to reattribute it to his contemporaries, the remaining music represents some of the most famous and enduring of the Renaissance. Sherr, p. 10. 
Life

Birth and early careerLittle is known for certain of Josquin's early life. Much is inferential and speculative, though numerous clues have emerged from his works and the writings of contemporary composers, theorists, and writers of the next several generations. Josquin was born in the area controlled by the Dukes of Burgundy, and was possibly born either in Hainaut (modern-day Belgium), or immediately across the border in modern-day France, since several times in his life he was classified legally as a Frenchman (for instance, when he made his will). Josquin was long mistaken for a man with a similar name, Josquin de Kessalia, born around the year 1440, who sang in Milan from 1459 to 1474, dying in 1498. More recent scholarship has shown that Josquin des Prez was born around 1450 or a few years later, and did not go to Italy until the early 1480s.Around 1466, perhaps on the death of his father, Josquin was named by his uncle and aunt, Gilles Lebloitte dit Desprez and Jacque Banestonne, as their heir. Their will gives Josquin's actual surname as Lebloitte. According to Matthews and Merkley, "des Prez" was a nickname. According to an account by Claude Hémeré, a friend and librarian of Cardinal Richelieu whose evidence dates as late as 1633, and who used the records of the collegiate church of Saint-Quentin,  Josquin became a choirboy at Saint-Quentin, probably around 1460, and was in charge of its music. Doubt has been cast on the accuracy of Hémeré's account, however. Macey et al., §1.  He may have studied counterpoint under Ockeghem, whom he greatly admired throughout his life: this is suggested both by the testimony of Gioseffo Zarlino and Lodovico Zacconi, writing later in the 16th century, and by Josquin's eloquent lament on the death of Ockeghem in 1497, Nymphes des bois/Requiem aeternam, based on the poem by Jean Molinet.  All records from Saint-Quentin were destroyed in 1669; however the cathedral there was a center of music-making for the entire area, and in addition was an important center of royal patronage. Both Jean Mouton and Loyset Compère were buried there, and it is certainly possible that Josquin acquired his later connections with the French royal chapel through early experiences at Saint-Quentin.The first definite record of his employment is dated 19 April 1477, and it shows that he was a singer at the chapel of René, Duke of Anjou, in Aix-en-Provence. He remained there at least until 1478. No certain records of his movements exist for the period from March 1478 until 1483, but if he remained in the employ of René he would have transferred to Paris in 1481 along with the rest of the chapel. One of Josquin's early motets, Misericordias Domini in aeternum cantabo, suggests a direct connection with Louis XI, who was king during this time. In 1483 Josquin returned to Condé to claim his inheritance from his aunt and uncle, who may have been killed by the army of Louis XI in May 1478, when they besieged the town, locked the population into the church, and burned them alive. Macey et al.,  . 
MilanThe period of 1480 to 1482 has puzzled biographers: some contradictory evidence exists, suggesting either that Josquin was still in France, or was already in the service of the Sforza family, specifically with Ascanio Sforza, who had been banished from Milan and resided temporarily in Ferrara or Naples. Residence in Ferrara in the early 1480s could explain the Missa Hercules dux Ferrariae, composed for Ercole d'Este, but which stylistically does not fit with the usual date of 1503–4 when Josquin was known to be in Ferrara. Alternatively it has been suggested that Josquin spent some of that time in Hungary, based on a mid-16th century Roman document describing the Hungarian court in those years, and including Josquin as one of the musicians present. In either 1483 or 1484 Josquin is known to have been in the service of the Sforza family in Milan. While in their employ, he made one or more trips to Rome, and possibly also to Paris; while in Milan he made the acquaintance of Franchinus Gaffurius, who was maestro di cappella of the cathedral there. He was in Milan again in 1489, after a possible period of travel; but he left that year.
RomeFrom 1489 to 1495 Josquin was a member of the papal choir, first under Pope Innocent VIII, and later under the Borgia pope Alexander VI. He may have gone there as part of a singer exchange with Gaspar van Weerbeke, who went back to Milan at the same time. While there, he may have been the one who carved his name into the wall of the Sistine Chapel; a "JOSQUINJ" was recently revealed by workers restoring the chapel. Since it was traditional for singers to carve their names into the walls, and hundreds of names were inscribed there during the period from the 15th to the 18th centuries, it is considered highly likely that the graffiti is by Josquin – and if so, it would be his only surviving autograph.  Josquin's mature style evolved during this period; as in Milan he had absorbed the influence of light Italian secular music, in Rome he refined his techniques of sacred music. Several of his motets have been dated to the years he spent at the papal chapel.
Departure from Rome; Milan and FranceAround 1498 Josquin most likely re-entered the service of the Sforza family, on the evidence of a pair of letters between the Gonzaga and Sforza families.  He probably did not stay in Milan long, for in 1499 Louis XII captured Milan in his invasion of northern Italy and imprisoned Josquin's former employers. Around this time Josquin most likely returned to France, although documented details of his career around the turn of the 16th century are lacking. Prior to departing Italy he most likely wrote one of his most famous secular compositions, the frottola El grillo, as well as In te Domine speravi ("I have placed my hope in you, Lord"), based on Psalm 30. The latter composition may have been a veiled reference to the religious reformer Girolamo Savonarola, who had been burned at the stake in Florence in 1498, and for whom Josquin seems to have had a special reverence; the text was the Dominican friar's favorite psalm, a meditation on which he left incomplete in prison prior to his execution. Some of Josquin's compositions, such as the instrumental Vive le roy, have been tentatively dated to the period around 1500 when he was in France. A motet, Memor esto verbi tui servo tuo ("Remember thy promise unto thy servant"), was, according to Heinrich Glarean writing in the Dodecachordon of 1547, composed as a gentle reminder to the king to keep his promise of a benefice to Josquin, which he had forgotten to keep. According to Glarean's story, it worked: the court applauded, and the king gave Josquin his benefice. Upon receiving it, Josquin reportedly wrote a motet on the text Benefecisti servo tuo, Domine ("Lord, thou hast dealt graciously with thy servant") to show his gratitude to the king. 
FerraraJosquin probably remained in the service of Louis XII until 1503, when Duke Ercole I of Ferrara hired him for the chapel there.  One of the rare mentions of Josquin's personality survives from this time. Prior to hiring Josquin, one of Duke Ercole's assistants recommended that he hire Heinrich Isaac instead, since Isaac was easier to get along with, more companionable, was more willing to compose on demand, and would cost significantly less (120 ducats vs. 200). Ercole, however, chose Josquin. While in Ferrara, Josquin wrote some of his most famous compositions, including the austere, Savonarola-influenced Miserere,  which became one of the most widely-distributed motets of the 16th century; the utterly contrasting, virtuoso motet Virgo salutiferi;  and possibly the Missa Hercules Dux Ferrariae, which is written on a cantus firmus derived from the musical letters in the Duke's name, a technique known as soggetto cavato.Josquin did not stay in Ferrara long. An outbreak of the plague in the summer of 1503 prompted the evacuation of the Duke and his family, as well as two thirds of the citizens, and Josquin left by April of the next year, possibly also to escape the plague. His replacement, Jacob Obrecht, died of the plague in the summer of 1505,  to be replaced by Antoine Brumel in 1506, who stayed until the disbanding of the chapel in 1510.
Retirement to Condé-sur-l'EscautJosquin went directly from Ferrara to his home region of Condé-sur-l'Escaut, southeast of Lille on the present-day border between Belgium and France, becoming provost of the collegiate church of Notre-Dame on 3 May 1504, a large musical establishment that he headed for the rest of his life. Sherr, p. 16.  While the chapter at Bourges Cathedral asked him to become master of the choirboys there in 1508, it is not known how he responded, and there is no record of his having been employed there; most scholars presume he remained in Condé. During the last two decades of his life, Josquin's fame spread abroad along with his music. The newly-developed technology of printing made wide dissemination of his music possible, and Josquin was the favorite of the first printers: one of Petrucci's first publications, and the earliest surviving print of music by a single composer, was a book of Josquin's masses which he printed in Venice in 1502. This publication was successful enough that Petrucci published two further volumes of Josquin's masses, in 1504 and 1514, and reissued them several times. On his death-bed Josquin asked that he be listed on the rolls as a foreigner, so that his property would not pass to the Lords and Ladies of Condé.  This bit of evidence has been used to show that he was French by birth. Additionally, he left an endowment for the performance of his late motet, Pater noster/Ave Maria, at all general processions in the town when they passed in front of his house, stopping to place a wafer on the marketplace altar to the Holy Virgin. Pater noster may have been his last work. 
Music

OverviewJosquin lived during a transitional stage in music history. Musical styles were changing rapidly, in part owing to the movement of musicians between different regions of Europe.  Many northern musicians moved to Italy, the heart of the Renaissance, attracted by the Italian nobility's patronage of the arts; while in Italy, these composers were influenced by the native Italian styles, and often brought those ideas with them back to their homelands. The sinuous musical lines of the Ockeghem generation, the contrapuntal complexity of the Netherlanders, and the homophonic textures of the Italian lauda and secular music began to merge into a unified style; indeed Josquin was to be the leading figure in this musical process, which eventually resulted in the formation of an international musical language, of which the most famous composers included Palestrina and Lassus. Noble, Grove (1980) Josquin likely learned his craft in his home region in the North, in France, and then in Italy when he went to Milan and Rome. His early sacred works emulate the contrapuntal complexity and ornamented, melismatic lines of Ockeghem and his contemporaries, but at the same time he was learning his contrapuntal technique he was acquiring an Italianate idiom for his secular music: after all, he was surrounded by Italian popular music in Milan. By the end of his long creative career, which spanned approximately 50 productive years, he had developed a simplified style in which each voice of a polyphonic composition exhibited free and smooth motion, and close attention was paid to clear setting of text as well as clear alignment of text with musical motifs. While other composers were influential on the development of Josquin's style, especially in the late 15th century, he himself became the most influential composer in Europe, especially after the development of music printing, which was concurrent with the years of his maturity and peak output. This event made his influence even more decisive than it might otherwise have been.Many "modern" musical compositional practices were being born in the era around 1500. Josquin made extensive use of "motivic cells" in his compositions, short, easily-recognizable melodic fragments which passed from voice to voice in a contrapuntal texture, giving it an inner unity. This is a basic organizational principle in music which has been practiced continuously from approximately 1500 until the present day. Josquin wrote in all of the important forms current at the time, including masses, motets, chansons, and frottole. He even contributed to the development of a new form, the motet-chanson, of which he left at least three examples. In addition, some of his pieces were probably intended for instrumental performance.Each area of his output can be further subdivided by form or by hypothetical period of composition. Since dating Josquin's compositions is particularly problematic, with scholarly consensus only achieved on a minority of works, discussion here is by type.
Masses
Josquin wrote towards the end of the period in which the mass was the predominant form of sacred composition in Europe. The mass, as it had developed through the 15th century, was a long, multi-section form, with opportunities for large-scale structure and organization not possible in the other forms such as the motet. Josquin wrote some of the most famous examples of the genre, most using some kind of cyclic organization.He wrote masses using the following general techniques, although there is considerable overlap between techniques in individual compositions:

cantus firmus mass, in which a pre-existing tune appeared, mostly unchanged, in one voice of the texture, with the other voices being more or less freely composed;
paraphrase mass, in which a pre-existing tune was used freely in all voices, and in many variations;
parody mass, in which a pre-existing multi-voice song appeared in whole or in part, with material from all voices in use, not just the tune;
soggetto cavato, or solmization mass, in which the tune is drawn from the syllables of a name or phrase (for example "la sol fa re mi" — A, G, F, D, E — based on the syllables of Lascia fare mi ("leave me alone", a phrase used by an unknown patron, in a context around which much legend has arisen).
canon, in which an entire mass is based on canonic techniques, and no pre-existing material has been identified. 

Most of these techniques, particularly paraphrase and parody, become standardized during the first half of the 16th century; Josquin was very much a pioneer, and what was perceived as mixing of these techniques by later observers was actually the process by which they were created. Josquin was fond of canonic techniques, as were many other composers of his generation, and canon appears in all of his masses, sometimes to the exclusion of other structural devices.
Cantus-firmus massesPrior to Josquin's mature period, the most common technique for writing masses was the cantus firmus, a technique which had been in use already for most of the 15th century. It was the technique that Josquin used earliest in his career, with the Missa L'ami Baudichon, possibly his first mass.  This mass is based on a secular – indeed ribald – tune similar to "Three Blind Mice". That basing a mass on such a source was an accepted procedure is evident from the existence of the mass in Sistine Chapel part-books copied during the papacy of Julius II (1503 to 1513). Josquin's most famous cantus-firmus masses are the two based on the L'homme armé tune, which was the favorite tune for mass composition of the entire Renaissance. The earlier of the two, Missa L'homme armé super voces musicales, is a technical tour-de-force on the tune, containing numerous mensuration canons and contrapuntal display. It was by far the most famous of all his masses.  The second, Missa L'homme armé sexti toni, is a "fantasia on the theme of the armed man."  While based on a cantus firmus, it is also a paraphrase mass, for fragments of the tune appear in all voices. Technically it is almost restrained, compared to the other L'homme armé mass, until the closing Agnus Dei, which contains a complex canonic structure including a rare retrograde canon, around which other voices are woven. 
Paraphrase massesThe paraphrase technique differs from the cantus-firmus technique in that the source material, though it still consists of a monophonic original, is embellished, often with ornaments. As in the cantus-firmus technique, the source tune may appear in many voices of the mass.Several of Josquin's masses feature the paraphrase technique, and they include some of his most famous work. The relatively early Missa Ave maris stella, which probably dates from his years in the Sistine Chapel choir, paraphrases the Marian antiphon of the same name; it is also one of his shortest masses.  The late Missa de Beata Virgine paraphrases plainchants in praise of the Virgin Mary; it is a Lady Mass, a votive mass for Saturday performance, and was his most popular mass in the 16th century.  By far the most famous of Josquin's masses using the technique, and one of the most famous mass settings of the entire era, was the Missa pange lingua, based on the hymn by Thomas Aquinas for the Vespers of Corpus Christi. It was probably the last mass that Josquin composed.  This mass is an extended fantasia on the tune, using the melody in all voices and in all parts of the mass, in elaborate and ever-changing polyphony. One of the high points of the mass is the et incarnatus est section of the Credo, where the texture becomes homophonic, and the tune appears in the topmost voice; here the portion which would normally set "Sing, O my tongue, of the mystery of the divine body" is instead given the words "And he became incarnate by the Holy Ghost from the Virgin Mary, and was made man." 
Parody masses, masses on popular songsIn parody masses, the source material was not a single line, but an entire texture, often of a popular song. Several works by Josquin fall loosely into this category, including the Missa Fortuna desperata, based on the three-voice song Fortuna desperata (possibly by Antoine Busnois); the Missa Malheur me bat (based on a chanson variously ascribed to Obrecht, Ockeghem, or, most likely, Abertijne Malcourt);  and the Missa Mater Patris, based on a three-voice motet by Antoine Brumel. The Missa Mater Patris is probably the first true parody mass to be composed, for it no longer contains any hint of a cantus firmus.  Parody technique was to become the most usual means of mass composition for the remainder of the 16th century, although the mass gradually fell out of favor as the motet grew in esteem.
Masses on solmization syllablesThe earliest known mass by any composer using this method of composition – the soggetto cavato – is the Missa Hercules Dux Ferrariae, which Josquin probably wrote in the early 1480s for the powerful Ercole I, Duke of Ferrara. The notes of the cantus firmus are drawn from the musical syllables of the Duke's own name: Re – Ut – Re – Ut – Re – Fa – Mi – Re.  Another mass using this technique is the Missa La sol fa re mi, based on the musical syllables contained in "Lascia fare mi" ("leave me alone!"). The story, as told by Glareanus in 1547, was that an unknown aristocrat used to order suitors away with this phrase, and Josquin immediately wrote an "exceedingly elegant" mass on it as a jab at him. 
Canonic masses
Canonic masses came into increasing prominence in the latter part of the 15th century. Early examples include Ockeghem's famous Missa prolationum, consisting entirely of mensuration canons, the Missa L'homme armé of Guillaume Faugues, whose cantus firmus is presented in canon at the descending fifth, and the Missa [Ad fugam] of Marbrianus de Orto, based on freely composed canons at the fifth between superius and tenor. Josquin makes use of canon in the Osanna and Agnus Dei III of the Missa L'homme armé sexti toni, throughout the Missa Sine nomine, and in the final three movements of the Missa De beata virgine. The Missa L'homme armé super voces musicales incorporates mensuration canons in the Kyrie, Benedictus, and Agnus Dei II. 
MotetsJosquin's motet style varied from almost strictly homophonic settings with block chords and syllabic text declamation to highly ornate contrapuntal fantasias, to the psalm settings which combined these extremes with the addition of rhetorical figures and text-painting that foreshadowed the later development of the madrigal. He wrote many of his motets for four voices, an ensemble size which had become the compositional norm around 1500, and he also was a considerable innovator in writing motets for five and six voices.  No motets of more than six voices have been reliably attributed to Josquin.
Almost all of Josquin's motets use some kind of compositional constraint on the process; they are not freely composed.  Some of them use a cantus firmus as a unifying device; some are canonic; some use a motto which repeats throughout; some use several of these methods. The motets that use canon can be roughly divided into two groups: those in which the canon is plainly designed to be heard and appreciated as such, and another group in which a canon is present, but almost impossible to hear, and seemingly written to be appreciated by the eye, and by connoisseurs. Josquin frequently used imitation, especially paired imitation, in writing his motets, with sections akin to fugal expositions occurring on successive lines of the text he was setting. An example is his setting of Dominus regnavit (Psalm 93), for four voices; each of the lines of the psalm begins with a voice singing a new tune alone, quickly followed by entries of other three voices in imitation. Reese, p. 249 In writing polyphonic settings of psalms, Josquin was a pioneer, and psalm settings form a large proportion of the motets of his later years. Few composers prior to Josquin had written polyphonic psalm settings.  Some of Josquin's settings include the famous Miserere, written in Ferrara in 1503 or 1504 and most likely inspired by the recent execution of the reformist monk Girolamo Savonarola,  Memor esto verbi tui, based on Psalm 119, and two settings of De profundis (Psalm 130), both of which are often considered to be among his most significant accomplishments.  
Chansons and instrumental compositions 
In the domain of secular music, Josquin left numerous French chansons, for from three to six voices, as well as a handful of Italian secular songs known as frottole, as well as some pieces which were probably intended for instrumental performance. Problems of attribution are even more acute with the chansons than they are with other portions of his output: while about 70 three and four-voice chansons were published under his name during his lifetime, only six of the more than thirty five- and six-voice chansons attributed to him were circulated under his name during the same time. Many of the attributions added after his death are considered to be unreliable, and much work has been done in the last decades of the 20th century to correct attributions on stylistic grounds. Josquin's earliest chansons were probably composed in northern Europe, under the influence of composers such as Ockeghem and Busnois. Unlike them, however, he never adhered strictly to the conventions of the formes fixes – the rigid and complex repetition patterns of the rondeau, virelai, and ballade – instead he often wrote his early chansons in strict imitation, a feature they shared with many of his sacred works.  He was one of the first composers of chansons to make all voices equal parts of the texture; and many of his chansons contain points of imitation, in the manner of motets. However he did use melodic repetition, especially where the lines of text rhymed, and many of his chansons had a lighter texture, as well a faster tempo, than his motets.Inside of his chansons, he often used a cantus firmus, sometimes a popular song whose origin can no longer be traced, as in Si j'avoye Marion.  Other times he used a tune originally associated with a separate text; and still other times he freely composed an entire song, using no apparent external source material. Another technique he sometimes used was to take a popular song and write it as a canon with itself, in two inner voices, and write new melodic material above and around it, to a new text: he used this technique in one of his most famous chansons, Faulte d'argent ("The problem with money"), a song sung by a man who wakes in bed with a prostitute, broke and unable to pay her.Some of his chansons were doubtless designed to be performed instrumentally. That Petrucci published many of them without text is strong evidence of this; additionally, some of the pieces (for example, the fanfare-like Vive le roy) contain writing more idiomatic for instruments than voices. Josquin's most famous chansons circulated widely in Europe. Some of the better known include his lament on the death of Ockeghem, Nymphes des bois/Requiem aeternam; Mille regretz (the attribution of which has recently been questioned);  Plus nulz regretz; and Je me complains.In addition to his French chansons, he wrote at least three pieces in the manner of the Italian frottola, a popular Italian song form which he would have encountered during his years in Milan. These songs include Scaramella, El grillo, and In te domine speravi. They are even simpler in texture than his French chansons, being almost uniformly syllabic and homophonic, and they remain among the most frequently sung portions of his output.
Motet-chansonsWhile in Milan, Josquin wrote several examples of a new type of piece developed by the composers there, the motet-chanson. These compositions were texturally very similar to 15th century chansons in the formes fixes mold, except that unlike those completely secular works, they contained a chant-derived Latin cantus-firmus in the lowest of the three voices. The other voices, in French, sang a secular text which had either a symbolic relationship to the sacred Latin text, or commented on it.  Josquin's three known motet-chansons, Que vous madame/In pace, A la mort/Monstra te esse matrem, and Fortune destrange plummaige/Pauper sum ego, are similar stylistically to those by the other composers of the Milan chapel, such as Loyset Compère and Alexander Agricola.
InfluenceJosquin's fame lasted throughout the 16th century, and indeed increased for several decades after his death. Zarlino, writing in the 1580s, was still using examples from Josquin in his treatises on composition; and Josquin's fame was only eclipsed after the beginning of the Baroque era, with the decline of the pre-tonal polyphonic style. During the 18th and 19th centuries Josquin's fame was overshadowed by later Roman School composer Palestrina, whose music was seen as the summit of polyphonic refinement, and codified into a system of composition by theorists such as Johann Fux; however, during the 20th century, Josquin's reputation has grown steadily, to the point where scholars again consider him "the greatest and most successful composer of the age."   According to Richard Sherr, writing in the introduction to the Josquin Companion, addressing specifically the shrinking of Josquin's canon due to correction of misattributions, "Josquin will survive because his best music really is as magnificent as everybody has always said it was." Since the 1950s Josquin's reputation has been boosted by the increasing availability of recordings, of which there are many, and the rise of ensembles specializing in the performance of 16th century vocal music, many of which consider Josquin's output to be at the heart of their repertoire. 
Media 
Works listThe difficulties in compiling a works list for Josquin cannot be overstated. Because of his immense prestige in the early sixteenth century, many scribes and publishers did not resist the temptation of attributing anonymous or otherwise spurious works to Josquin. The German editor Georg Forster summed up the situation admirably in 1540 when he wrote, "Now that Josquin is dead, he is putting out more works than when he was alive."  Thus, the authenticity of many of the works listed below is disputed.
Masses

Missa Ave maris stella (Rome, 1486–1495) (4 voices)
Missa D'ung aultre amer (4 voices; authorship questioned by Jeremy Noble)
Missa de Beata Virgine (around 1510) (4 voices in parts I–II, 5 voices in parts III–V)
Missa Di dadi (=N'aray je jamais) (4 voices; authorship doubted by some scholars)
Missa Faisant regretz (4 voices)
Missa Fortuna desperata (4 voices)
Missa Gaudeamus (4 voices)
Missa Hercules Dux Ferrariae (Ferrara, 1503/04) (4 voices, 6 in Agnus III)
Missa La sol fa re mi (4 voices)
Missa L'ami Baudichon (4 voices)
Missa L'homme armé sexti toni (4 voices, 6 in Agnus III)
Missa L'homme armé super voces musicales (4 voices)
Missa Malheur me bat (4 voices, 6 in Agnus III)
Missa Mater patris (4 voices; authorship doubted by some scholars)
Missa Pange lingua (Condé, around 1514) (4 voices)
Missa Sine nomine (4 voices; canonic mass, originally titled "Missa Ad fugam")

Doubtful works:

Missa Ad fugam (4 voices)
Missa da pacem (4 voices)
Missa Une musque de Biscaye (4 voices)


Mass fragmentsOf questionable authenticity, with the exception of the Credo De tous biens playne:

Credo Chascun me crie (= Des rouges nez)
Credo De tous biens playne
Credo Vilayge (II)
Credo [Quarti toni] (canonic)
Gloria De beata virgine
Sanctus De passione
Sanctus D'ung aultre amer
Credo Vilayge (I)
Credo La belle se siet (probably Robert de Févin)


Motets

Absalon, fili mi (4vv) (attribution has been challenged; possibly Pierre de La Rue)
Absolve, quaesumus, Domine/Requiem aeternam (6vv) (attribution has been challenged)
Alma redemptoris mater;
Alma redemptoris mater / Ave regina caelorum;
Ave Maria, gratia plena ... benedicta tu (4vv);
Ave Maria, gratia plena ... Virgo serena (Milan 1484/85); 
Ave munda spes, Maria (not in first complete works edition)
Ave nobilissima creatura
Ave verum corpus natum
Benedicta es, caelorum regina
Christum ducem, qui per crucem (4vv)
De profundis clamavi (4vv) (possibly middle-period composition: attribution has been questioned)
De profundis clamavi (5vv) (late composition)
Domine exaudi orationem meam
Domine, ne in fuore tuo (4vv)
Domine, non secundum peccata nostra (2-4vv; for Rome)
Ecce, tu pulchra es, amica mea
Factum est autem
Gaude virgo, mater Christi
Homo quidam fecit cenam magnam
Honor, decus, imperium
Huc me sydereo descendere jussit Olympo (5vv)
Illibata Dei virgo nutrix
In exitu Israel de Aegypto
In illo tempore assumpsit Jesus doudecim disciplus
Iniquos odio habui (4vv, only tenor part survives)
In principio erat Verbum (authenticity has been questioned) 
Inviolata, integra et casta es, Maria
Jubilate Deo omnis terra
Liber generationis Jesu Christi
Magnificat quarti toni (attributed to Josquin on stylistic grounds)
Magnificat terii toni (attributed to Josquin on stylistic grounds)
Memor esto verbi tui
Miserere mei Deus (Ferrara, 1503)
Misericordias Domini in aeternum cantabo (France, 1480/83)
Missus est Gabriel angelus ad Mariam Virginem
Mittit ad virginem
Monstra te esse matrem
O admirabile commercium (part of a 5-motet cycle)
O bone et dulcissime Jesu
O Domine Jesu Christe (part of a Passion setting in 5 sections)
O virgo prudentissima
O virgo virginum
Pater noster, qui es in caelis (Condé, 1505–1521)
Planxit autem David
Praeter rerum seriem
Qui edunt me adhuc
Qui habitat in adiutorio altissimi
Qui velatus facie fuisti (part of a Passion setting in 6 sections)
Salve regina (4vv)
Salve regina (5vv, 1502)
Stabat Mater
Tu lumen, tu splendor
Tu solus qui facis mirabilia
Usquequo Domine oblivisceris me (attrib on stylistic grounds; only part survives)
Ut Phoebi radiis
Veni, sancte spiritus (also attrib to Forestier)
Victimae paschali laudes
Virgo prudentissima
Virgo salutiferi (Ferrara, 1504/05)
Vultum tuum deprecabuntur (7-part Passion cycle) (1480s)


Motet-chansons

A la mort / Monstra te esse matrem
Fortune destrange plummaige/Pauper sum ego
Que vous madame / In pace in idipsum


Chansons

A l'heure que je vous
A l'ombre d'ung buissonet, au matinet (3vv)
Adieu mes amours
Adieu mes amours (6vv or 7vv)
Baisé moy, ma doulce amye (4vv)
Belle, pour l'amour de vous
Bergerette savoyenne
Cela sans plus
Comment peult haver joye
Cueur langoreulx
De tous biens plaine (3vv)
De tous biens plaine (4vv)
Douleur me bat
Du mien amant
Dulces exuviae
En l'ombre d'ung buissonet tout, au long (3vv)
En l'ombre d'ung buissonet tout, au long (4vv)
Entré je suis en grant pensée (3vv)
Entré je suis en grant pensée (4vv)
Fama malum
Faulte d'argent
Fors seulement (only one of six voice parts survives)
Fortuna d'un gran tempo
Helas madame
Ile fantazies de Joskin
Incessament livré suis à martire
Je me complains
Je n'ose plus
Je ris et si ay larme
Je sey bien dire
La belle se siet
La Bernardina
La plus de plus
Le villain [jaloux]
Ma bouche rit et mon cueur pleure
Mille Regretz (4 voices)
Mon mary m'a diffamée
N'esse pas ung grant desplaisir
Nymphes des bois (written for the death of Johannes Ockeghem)
Nymphes, nappés / Circumdederunt me
Parfons regretz
Petite camusette;
Plaine de dueil
Plus n'estes ma maistresse
Plus nulz regretz (written between 1508 and 1511, commemorating the 1507 Treaty of Calais);
Plusieurs regretz
Pour souhaitter
Quant je vous voye
Qui belles amours a
Recordans de my signora
Regretz sans fin;
Se congié prens
Si j'ay perdu mon amy (3vv)
Si j'ay perdu mon amy (4vv)
Tant vous aimme Bergeronette
Tenz moy en voz bras
Une mousque de Biscaye;
Vive le roy (instrumental piece, written for Louis XII)
Vous l'arez, s'il vous plaist
Vous ne l'arez pas
textless (4vv)


Frottole

El Grillo
In te Domine speravi per trovar pietà
Scaramella va alla guerra


References and further reading

Atlas, Allan W., ed. Renaissance Music: Music in Western Europe, 1400–1600. New York: Norton, 1998. ISBN 0-393-97169-4.
Blackburn, Bonnie J. "Masses Based on Popular Songs and Solmization Syllables". The Josquin Companion, edited by Richard Sherr, 51–88. Oxford and New York: Oxford University Press, 2000. ISBN 0-19-816335-5
Brown, Howard M. "Chanson" The New Grove Dictionary of Music and Musicians, ed. Stanley Sadie. London, Macmillan, 1980. (20 vol.) ISBN 1-56159-174-2.
Charles, Sydney R. Josquin des Prez: A Guide to Research. New York and London: Garland Publishing, Inc., 1983.
Clutterham, Leslie. "Dating Josquin's Enigmatic Motet Illibata Dei virgo nutrix". Choral Journal 38, no. 3 (October 1997): 9–14. Online version as "Auobiographical  [ sic   Constructions in Josquin's Motet Illibata Dei virgo nutrix: Evidence for a Later Dating]" (Accessed 8 May 2012).
Duffin, Ross W., ed. A Josquin Anthology. Oxford University Press, 1999. ISBN 0-19-353218-2.
Elders, Willem, ed. New Josquin Edition, 30 vols. Utrecht: Koninklijke Vereniging voor Nederlandse Muziekgeschiedenis, 1987- . ISBN 978-90-6375-051-0.
Elders, Willem, and and Frits de Haen, eds. Proceedings of the International Josquin Symposium, Utrecht 1986 . Utrecht: Vereniging voor Nederlandse Muziekgeschiedenis, 1986. ISBN 90-6375-148-6.
Fallows, David. Josquin. Turnhout: Brepols Publishers, 2009, ISBN 978-2-503-53065-9.
Gleason, Harold, and Warren Becker. Music in the Middle Ages and the Renaissance. Bloomington, Indiana: Frangipani Press, 1981. ISBN 0-89917-034-X.
Godt, Irving. "Motivic Integration in Josquin's Motets." Journal of Music Theory, 21, 2 (Autumn, 1977): 264–92.
Higgins, Paula. "The Apotheosis of Josquin des Prez and Other Mythologies of Musical Genius". Journal of the American Musicological Society, 57, 3 (Autumn, 2004): 443–510.
Lowinsky, Edward E., ed. Josquin des Prez. London: Oxford University Press, 1976.
Macey, Patrick. Bonfire Songs: Savonarola's Musical Legacy. Oxford: Clarendon Press. 1998. ISBN 0-19-816669-9.
   
Matthews, Lora, and Paul Merkley. "Josquin des Prez". The Journal of Musicology (Summer 1998).  
Merkley, Paul. "Josquin Desprez in Ferrara". The Journal of Musicology 18, 4 (2001): 544–83.
Milsom, John. "Motets for Five or More Voices". In The Josquin Companion, edited by Richard Sherr, 281–320. Oxford and New York: Oxford University Press, 2000. ISBN 0-19-816335-5
Noble, Jeremy. "Josquin Desprez (works)" The New Grove Dictionary of Music and Musicians, ed. Stanley Sadie. London, Macmillan, 1980. (20 vol.) ISBN 1-56159-174-2.
Pietschmann, Klaus. "Ein Graffito von Josquin Desprez auf der Cantoria der Sixtinischen Kapelle" Die Musikforschung vol. 52 no. 2 (1999), pp. 204–207.
Reese, Gustave. Music in the Renaissance. New York: W. W. Norton, 1954. ISBN 0-393-09530-4.
Reese, Gustave. "Josquin Desprez (biography)" The New Grove Dictionary of Music and Musicians, ed. Stanley Sadie. London, Macmillan, 1980. (20 vol.) ISBN 1-56159-174-2.
Reese, Gustave, Jeremy Noble, Lewis Lockwood, Jessie Ann Owens, James Haar, Joseph Kerman, and Robert Stevenson. The new Grove High Renaissance Masters: Josquin, Plaestrina, Lassus, Byrd, Victoria. The Composer Biography Series; The New Grove Dictionary of Music and Musicians. London: Macmillan Publishers, 1980–84. ISBN 0-393-30093-5.
Sherr, Richard, ed. The Josquin Companion. Oxford: Oxford University Press, 2000. ISBN 0-19-816335-5.
Wegman, Rob C. "Who Was Josquin?" In The Josquin Companion, edited by Richard Sherr, 21–50. Oxford and New York: Oxford University Press, 2000. ISBN 0-19-816335-5


Notes 
Recordings

1993 – Renaissance-polyfonie in Brugge. The Songbook of Zeghere van Male.. Capilla Flamenca. Eufoda 1155. Contains a recording of O intemerata and Mille regretz.
1996 – Pierre de la Rue . Missa Alleluia. Music at the Burgundy Court. Capilla Flamenca. Eufoda 1232. Contains a recording of Gaude Virgo and Huc me sidereo by Josquin des Prez
1996 – Oh Flanders Free. Music of the Flemish Renaissance: Ockeghem, Josquin, Susato, De la Rue. Capilla Flamenca. Alamire LUB 03, Naxos 8.554516. Contains a recording of El grillo, Guillaume se va chaufer and Kyrie from Missa la sol fa re mi by Josquin des Prez
1998 – Margarete – Maximilian I. Musik um 1500. Capilla Flamenca with La Caccia, Schola Cantorum Cantate Domino Aalst, Schola Gregoriana Lovaniensis. ORF Shop CD 265 (2 CDs). Contains a recording of Adieu mes amours by Josquin des Prez.
2000 – Magic. Flanders Recorder Quartet and friends. Contains a recording of Mille Regretz and Scaramella by Josquin des Prez.
2002 – Pierre de la Rue: Missa de septem doloribus. Capilla Flamenca and Psallentes. MEW 0207. Contains a recording of Stabat mater by Josquin des Prez.
2005 – Dulcis Melancholia. Biographie musicale de Marguerite d’Autriche. Capilla Flamenca. MEW 0525. Contains a recording of Belle pour l'amour de vous, Plus nulz regretz and Que vous madame / In pace by Josquin Desprez.
2007 – Désir D'aymer. Love Lyrics Around 1500: From Flanders To Italy. Capilla Flamenca. Eufoda 1369. Contains a recording of Baisés moy (4 voices and 6 voices) and O venus bant by Josquin des Prez.
2007 – Salve Mater Salve Jesu. Chant and Polyphony From Bohemia Around 1500. Capilla Flamenca and Schola Gregoriana Pragensis, with Barbara Maria Willi. KTC 1346. Contains a recording of Qui velatus facie fuisti by Josquin des Prez.
2007 – Music for the Soul Lumina Vocal Ensemble conducted by Anna Pope - LVE 001. Contains a recording of the Agnus Dei from the Missa da pace and the Agnues Dei from the Missa L'homme armee by Josquin des Prez.
2007 – Mediaeval Magic Lumina Vocal Ensemble conducted by Anna Pope - LVE 002. Contains a recording of Praeter rerum seriem by Josquin des Prez.
2009 – Lay a garland Lumina Vocal Ensemble conducted by Anna Pope - LVE 003. Contains a recording of Absalon, fili mi attributed to Josquin des Prez.


External links

 
 
Free access to high-resolution images of manuscripts containing works by Josquin from Digital Image Archive of Medieval Music
 
 
 
Josquin biography and discography
Listen to free recordings of compositions from Umeå Akademiska Kör.
Motet Ave Maria as interactive hypermedia (Shockwave required) at the BinAural Collaborative Hypertext

   
 
DEFAULTSORT



 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Larry Bird
 
 
 
Larry Joe Bird (born December 7, 1956) is an American former NBA basketball player, coach, and team president. Drafted into the NBA sixth overall by the Boston Celtics in 1978, Bird started at small forward and power forward for thirteen seasons, spearheading one of the NBA's most formidable frontcourts that included center Robert Parish and forward Kevin McHale. Bird was a 12-time NBA All-Star and was named  the league's Most Valuable Player (MVP) three times. He played his entire professional career for Boston, winning three NBA championships.Due to chronic back problems, he retired as a player in 1992.  He was a member of the Dream Team that won the gold medal at the 1992 Summer Olympics. Bird was voted to the NBA's 50th Anniversary All-Time Team Larry Bird summary NBA.com.  in 1996 and inducted into the Naismith Memorial Basketball Hall of Fame  in 1998. He served as head coach of the Indiana Pacers from 1997 to 2000. In 2003, he assumed the role of president of basketball operations for the Pacers, and he held that position until 2012.  In addition to being part of the 50–40–90 Club, he is the only person in NBA history to be named Most Valuable Player, Coach of the Year, and Executive of the Year.   
Early lifeLarry Bird was born in West Baden, Indiana, the son of Georgia (née Kerns) and Claude Joseph "Joe" Bird.    He grew up in both West Baden and the adjacent town French Lick, which earned him the nickname "the Hick from French Lick" in his professional basketball career.    Bird recalled how his mother would make do on the family's meager earnings: "If there was a payment to the bank due, and we needed shoes, she'd get the shoes, and then deal with them guys at the bank. I don't mean she wouldn't pay the bank, but the children always came first."    According to Bird, his being poor as a child "motivates me to this day".  He sometimes was sent to live with his grandmother due to the family's struggles. The Bird family's struggle with poverty was compounded by the alcoholism and personal difficulties of Joe Bird, who likely suffered from post-traumatic stress disorder from serving in the Korean War.  Joe Bird committed suicide on February 3, 1975, when Larry was 18 years old. Bird started for French Lick/West Baden's high school team, Springs Valley High School, where he left as the school's all-time scoring leader.    Bird's high school coach, Jim Jones, was a key factor to Bird's success. "Jonesie", as Bird called him, would come help Bird and his friends practice any day of the week.  Bird would often go to the gym early, shoot between classes, and stay late into the evening.
Collegiate careerBird received a scholarship to play college basketball for Bob Knight and the Indiana University Hoosiers in 1974.  However, he was overwhelmed by the size of the campus and number of students and was not mentally ready for this stage of life; according to Bird, "it didn't take long to realize that I was out of my cocoon."  Bird was also treated poorly by an established IU star, Kent Benson; as Bird recalled, the other upperclassmen of the team treated him well.  He dropped out of Indiana after 24 days, disappointing his mother. Magic & Bird: A Courtship of Rivals. HBO, 2010.  Bird returned home to French Lick where he enrolled in the nearby Northwood Institute before dropping out and getting a job with the Street Department (the department picked up garbage, repaired roads, removed snow, mowed lawns, etc.) for a year.  He played AAU basketball for Hancock Construction  and, after that year, decided to enroll at Indiana State University in Terre Haute, where he was coached by Bob King.King suffered a stroke prior to the 1978–79 season and assistant Bill Hodges, who had persuaded Bird to return to college basketball,  was promoted to head coach. Before Bird, the Sycamores had never been to the Division I NCAA tournament;  he led the team to the NCAA championship game in 1979, his senior season, only to lose to the Michigan State University Spartans, who were led by his future NBA rival, Earvin "Magic" Johnson. The Sycamores finished the season 33–1. That year, Bird won the USBWA College Player of the Year, Naismith and Wooden Awards, given to the year's top male college basketball player. After his three seasons at Indiana State, he left as the fifth-highest scorer in NCAA history. Bird finished his collegiate career with an average of 30.3 points per game. In 2007, he was voted as one of the Missouri Valley Conference men's basketball 50 greatest players. 
NCAA career statistics
  
|-
| style="text-align:left;"| 1976–77
| style="text-align:left;"| Indiana State
| 28 || ... || 36.9 || .544 || ... || .840 || 13.3 || 4.4 || ... || ... || 32.8
|-
| style="text-align:left;"| 1977–78
| style="text-align:left;"| Indiana State
| 32 || ... || ... || .524 || ... || .793 || 11.5 || 3.9 || ... || ... || 30.0
|-
| style="text-align:left;"| 1978–79
| style="text-align:left;"| Indiana State
| 34 || ... || ... || .532 || ... || .831 || 14.9 || 5.5 || ... || ... || 28.6
|-
| style="text-align:left;"| 
| style="text-align:left;"| Career Larry Bird, basketball-reference.com. Retrieved March 20, 2010. 
| 94 || ... || ... || .533 || ... || .822 || 13.3 || 4.6 || ... || ... || 30.3
|-
 
1979–1981: Immediate impactThe Boston Celtics selected the 6'9", 220-pound Bird 6th overall in the 1978 NBA Draft,   even though they were uncertain whether he would enter the NBA or remain at Indiana State to play his senior season. Bird ultimately decided to play his final college season, but the Celtics retained their exclusive right to sign him until the 1979 NBA Draft, because of the NBA's "junior eligible" rule (allowing a collegiate player to be drafted when the player's original "entering" class was graduating and giving them one calendar year to sign them, even if they went back to college).  Shortly before that deadline, and after bitter contract negotiations, Bird agreed to sign with the Celtics, inking a 5 year $3.25 million contract which made him, at the time, the highest-paid rookie in the history of the NBA.   Shortly afterwards, the NBA draft eligibility rules were changed to prevent teams from drafting players before they were ready to sign.  The rule is called the Bird Collegiate Rule.Bird's impact on the Celtics was immediate. The Celtics were 29–53 during the 1978–79 season, but with Bird the team improved to 61–21 in the 1979–80 season, posting the league's best regular season record. Bird's collegiate rival, Magic Johnson, also had entered the NBA in 1979, joining the Los Angeles Lakers. In 1980, despite a strong rookie season from Johnson, Bird was named the league's Rookie of the Year and was voted onto the Eastern Conference All-Star team (an honor he would receive for each of his 12 full seasons in the NBA). For the 1980 season, Bird led the Celtics in scoring (21.3 points/game), rebounding (10.4 rebounds/game), steals (143), and minutes played (2,955) and was second in assists (4.5 assists/game) and three-pointers (58). Though Boston was beaten by the more athletic Philadelphia 76ers in the Eastern Conference finals that year, Bird's addition to the team had renewed the promise of Celtic glory.Following Bird's first season, the Celtics acquired center Robert Parish and the 3rd pick in the 1980 NBA Draft via a trade with the Golden State Warriors (in exchange for the 1st and 13th picks in the draft). After the Warriors took Joe Barry Carroll with the 1st pick and the Utah Jazz chose Darrell Griffith second, the Celtics selected University of Minnesota power forward Kevin McHale. With Bird at small forward, the additions of Parish and McHale gave Boston one of the most formidable frontcourts in the history of the NBA. The three would anchor the Celtics throughout Bird's career.In his second season, Bird led the Celtics into the playoffs, where they faced off for a second consecutive year with Julius Erving's Philadelphia 76ers. Bird helped the Celtics overcome a 3–1 deficit by winning the last three games by two, two, and one point margins, propelling them into the NBA Finals, where they defeated the Houston Rockets in six games with Bird averaging 15.3 points on .419 shooting, 15.3 rebounds and 7.0 assists per game.  It would be the first of three championships in Bird's career, as well as the first of his five Finals appearances.
1982–1987: MVPs, championships and the rivalry with Magic Johnson 
The additions of Bird and Johnson rejuvenated the NBA, which had suffered from low attendance and minimal television interest through much of the 1970s. Immediately upon their entry into the league, the two players became repeating presences in the NBA Finals. Johnson's Lakers won the championship in 1980, Bird's Celtics captured the NBA title in 1981, and Johnson's Lakers wrested it back in 1982. Bird and Johnson first dueled in the 1979 NCAA title game; as professional basketball players, they would face off numerous times during the 1980s, including the NBA Finals of 1984, 1985 and 1987. Lakers versus Celtics, and specifically Bird versus Magic, quickly became one of the greatest rivalries in the history of basketball.In 1984, the Celtics defeated the Lakers in a seven-game Finals, winning game seven 111–102.  Bird averaged 27.4 points on .484 shooting and 14 rebounds a game during the series,  earning the award of Finals Most Valuable Player (MVP). Bird was also named the league regular season MVP for that year.  In 1985, however, the Lakers avenged the loss, defeating the Celtics in game 6 of the Finals in the Boston Garden. In a losing effort against Los Angeles, Bird averaged 23.8 points on .449 shooting, 8.8 rebounds and 5.0 assists per game.  That year, the NBA again named Bird the league MVP. On  , in a game played between the Celtics and Atlanta Hawks at the University of New Orleans Lakefront Arena in New Orleans, Louisiana, Bird scored a career high 60 points in a tremendous shooting display.  Bird scored all 19 of his points in the third quarter without the aid of a free throw; instead, he scored on jump shots from 20 feet and out.  Bird scored Boston's last sixteen points in the game.  In the fourth quarter, he made a fadeaway three-point shot while being fouled.  He was not given continuation and the basket was not allowed (instead it was ruled a non-shooting foul and he received two free throws).  Bird's 59th and 60th points were scored on a 17-foot jump shot at the buzzer.  For the game, Bird officially shot 22 of 36 from the field, 1 of 4 from three-point range, and 15 of 16 from the free throw line.Boston would have another great season the next year, with help from another Hall of Famer, Bill Walton. Walton, whose up and down career had been plagued by foot injuries, was looking for a team, and after having been turned down by the Lakers called Celtics president and general manager Red Auerbach in a last-ditch effort to close out his career on an upswing. Because of Walton's reputation for being injury prone, Auerbach was initially unwilling to take a risk on him, but Bird, who happened to be in Auerbach's office at the time of Walton's call, urged him to sign Walton, saying that if Walton felt he was healthy enough to play, it was all Bird needed to hear.With Walton backing up Kevin McHale and Robert Parish, the Celtics would return to the finals in 1986, albeit not against Johnson and the Lakers, who lost in the Western Conference Finals to the Houston Rockets. The 1986 Celtic team, which finished the regular season 67–15 and defeated the Rockets in six games, is generally considered to be the best of Bird's career. Bird again was named the Finals' MVP for that year, averaging 24 points on .482 shooting, 9.7 rebounds and 9.5 assists per game for the series.  He also won his third consecutive league MVP award,  a feat matched only by the great Celtic center Bill Russell and the dominant Wilt Chamberlain, who played for Philadelphia and Los Angeles.In 1987, the Celtics made their last Finals appearance of Bird's career, fighting through difficult series against the Milwaukee Bucks and Detroit Pistons but as they reached the NBA Finals, the Celtics, hampered by devastating injuries, lost to a dominant Lakers team which had won 65 games during the season. The Celtics ended up losing to the Lakers in six games, with Bird averaging 24.2 points on .445 shooting, 10 rebounds and 5.5 assists per game in the championship series.  The Celtics would fall short in 1988 losing to the Pistons in 6 games in the Eastern Conference Finals as the Pistons made up from the heartbreak the previous season. Between them, Bird and Johnson captured eight NBA championships during the 1980s, with Magic getting five and Bird three. During the 1980s, either Boston or Los Angeles appeared in every NBA Finals.  Throughout the 1980s, contests between the Celtics and the Lakers—both during the regular season and in the Finals—attracted enormous television audiences. The first regular season game between the Celtics and the Lakers in the 1987–88 season proved to be a classic with Magic Johnson banking in an off balance shot from near the three-point line at the buzzer for a 115–114 Lakers win at Boston Garden.  The historical rift between the teams, which faced each other several times in championship series of the 1960s, fueled fan interest in the rivalry. Not since Bill Russell squared off against Wilt Chamberlain had professional basketball enjoyed such a marquee matchup. The apparent contrast between the two players and their respective teams seemed scripted for television: Bird, the introverted small-town hero with the blue-collar work ethic, fit perfectly with the throwback, hard-nosed style of the Celtics, while the stylish, gregarious Johnson ran the Lakers' fast-paced "Showtime" offense amidst the bright lights and celebrities of Los Angeles. A 1980s Converse commercial for its "Weapon" line of basketball shoes (endorsed by both Bird and Johnson) reflected the perceived dichotomy between the two players. In the commercial, Bird is practicing alone on a rural basketball court when Johnson pulls up in a sleek limousine and challenges him to a one-on-one match.Despite the intensity of their rivalry, Bird and Johnson became friends off the court. Their friendship blossomed when the two players worked together to film the Converse commercial, which depicted them as archenemies. Johnson appeared at Bird's retirement ceremony on February 4, 1993 and emotionally described Bird as a "friend forever".
1988–1992: Waning years 
In 1988, Bird had the best statistical season of his career, but the Celtics failed to reach the NBA Finals for the first time in five years, losing to the Pistons in six games during the Eastern Conference Finals. Bird started the 1988–89 season, but ended his season after six games to have bone spurs surgically removed from both of his heels. He returned to the Celtics in 1989, but debilitating back problems and an aging Celtic roster prevented him from regaining his mid-1980s form. Nonetheless, through the final years of his career, Bird maintained his status as one of the premier players in the game. He averaged over 20 points, 9 rebounds and 7 assists a game in his last three seasons with the Celtics, and shot better than 45% from the field in each. Bird led the Celtics to playoff appearances in each of those three seasons.Bird's body, however, continued to break down. He had been bothered by back problems for years, and his back became progressively worse. After leading the Celtics to a 29–5 start to the 1990–91 season, he missed 22 games due to a compressed nerve root in his back, a condition that would eventually lead to his retirement. He had off-season surgery to remove a disc from his back, but his back problems continued and he missed 37 games during the 1991–92 season.  His past glory would be briefly rekindled, however, in a game that season in which he scored 49 points in a double-overtime victory over the Portland Trail Blazers. During the 1992 Eastern Conference semi-finals against the Cleveland Cavaliers, Bird missed four of the seven games in the series due to those recurring back problems.
In the summer of 1992, Bird joined Magic Johnson, Michael Jordan and other NBA stars to play for the United States basketball team in that year's Olympics in Barcelona, Spain. It was the first time in America's Olympic history that the country sent professional basketball players to compete. The "Dream Team" won the men's basketball gold medal.Following his Olympic experience, on August 18, 1992, Bird announced his retirement as an NBA player. He finished his career with averages of more than 24 points, 10 rebounds and 6 assists per game, while shooting 49.6% from the field, 88.6% from the free throw line and 37.6% from three-point range. Following Bird's departure, the Celtics promptly retired his jersey number 33.In 1989, Bird published his autobiography, Drive: The Story of My Life with Bob Ryan. The book chronicles his life and career up to the 1989 NBA season.
NBA career after retirement 


The Celtics employed Bird as a special assistant in the team's front office from 1992 until 1997. In 1997, Bird accepted the position of coach of the Indiana Pacers and said he would be on the job for no more than three years. Despite having no previous coaching experience, Bird led the Pacers to a 58–24 record—the franchise's best as an NBA team at the time—in the 1997–98 season, and pushed the Bulls to seven games in the Eastern Conference finals.  He was named the NBA Coach of the Year for his efforts, becoming the only person in NBA history to have won both the MVP and Coach of the Year awards.  He then led the Pacers to two consecutive Central Division titles in 1999 and 2000, and a berth in the NBA finals in 2000.Bird resigned as Pacers coach shortly after the end of the 2000 season, following through on his initial promise to coach for only three years. In 2003, he returned as the Pacers' President of Basketball Operations, overseeing team personnel and coaching moves, as well as the team's draft selections.  Bird promoted David Morway to general manager in 2008, but Bird still had the final say in basketball matters. After the 2011–2012 NBA season, Bird was named NBA Executive of the Year.On June 27, 2012, a day before the 2012 NBA Draft, Bird and the Pacers announced that they would be parting ways later that summer. Bird said health issues were among the reasons for his leaving.  Donnie Walsh has been named to replace him. 
Head coaching record  
|-
| style="text-align:left;"|IND
| style="text-align:left;"| 
|82||58||24||.707|| style="text-align:center;"|2nd in Central||16||10||6||.625
| style="text-align:center;"|Lost in Conf. Finals
|-
| style="text-align:left;"|IND
| style="text-align:left;"| 
|50||33||17||.660|| style="text-align:center;"|1st in Central||13||9||4||.692
| style="text-align:center;"|Lost in Conf. Finals
|-
| style="text-align:left;"|IND
| style="text-align:left;"| 
|82||56||26||.683|| style="text-align:center;"|1st in Central||23||13||10||.565
| style="text-align:center;"|Lost in NBA Finals
|- class="sortbottom"
| style="text-align:left;"|Career
| ||214||147||67||.687|| ||52||32||20||.615
 
Legacy In 1999, Bird ranked No. 30 in ESPN's SportsCentury's 50 Greatest Athletes of the 20th century.For the 2008 NBA Finals, which featured a rematch of the Celtics-Lakers rivalry, Bird appeared in a split-screen advertisement with Magic Johnson (as part of the "There Can Only Be One" campaign which had played throughout the 2008 NBA Playoffs but to that point only featured players from the two teams competing in a given series) discussing the meaning of rivalries.Bird was widely considered one of Red Auerbach's favorite players. He considered Bird to be the greatest basketball player of all time.  Auerbach was so enamored with the player that he drafted him out of Indiana State and waited a year before Bird was eligible to suit up for the Celtics.  During his introductory press conference, after Auerbach's contentious negotiations with agent Bob Woolf, Bird announced he "would have played for free."  This was after Woolf asked for the most lucrative contract in NBA history, to which Auerbach was quick to point out that Bird had not played a game in the NBA yet. Bird is the only person to be named an MVP, Coach of the Year, and Executive of the Year in the NBA. 
Player profileBird, a versatile wing man who played the power forward and small forward positions, is considered one of the greatest players of all time, to which his twelve All-Star team nominations are a testament. The sharpshooting Bird made his name stepping up his performance in critical situations, and is credited with a long list of dominating games, buzzer beaters and clutch defensive plays. He won two NBA Finals MVP and three regular-season MVP awards. He won them all in a row, a feat only shared by Bill Russell and Wilt Chamberlain.Bird possessed an uncanny and unparalleled ability to anticipate and react to the strategies of his opponents. His talent for recognizing the moves of opponents and teammates prompted his first coach with the Celtics, Bill Fitch, to nickname him "Kodak", because he seemed to formulate mental pictures of every play that took place on the court.Bird scored 24.3 points per game in his career on a high .496 field goal average, a stellar .886 free throw average (9th best all-time) and a 37.6 percentage on three-point shots. Bird was also a good rebounder (10.0 rebound career average) and an excellent playmaker (6.3 assist career average). His multidimensional game made him a consistent triple-double threat; Bird currently ranks fifth all-time in triple-doubles with 59, not including the 10 he recorded in the playoffs. Bird's lifetime player efficiency rating (PER) is 23.5, 18th all-time, a further testament to his all around game.  Additionally, he is the only 20, 10, 5 player in NBA history (points, rebounds, assists per game) with a lifetime PRA rating (points + rebounds + assists per game) of 40.6, which is 8th all-time.  Bird was the first player in NBA history to shoot 50% or better on field goals, 40% on three-pointers, and 90% on free-throws in a single NBA season while achieving the league minimum for makes in each category. Bird accomplished this feat twice and is second only to Steve Nash for seasons in the 50–40–90 Club.Bird is also remembered as an excellent defender. While he was neither fast nor quick-footed, and could not always shut down an individual player one-on-one, he consistently displayed a knack for anticipating the moves of his opponent, allowing him to intercept passes and create turnovers. His 1,556 career steals ranks 27th all-time.  Unspectacular but effective defensive moves, such as jumping into a passing lane to make a steal or allowing his man to step past and drive to the hoop, then blocking the opponent's shot from behind, were staples of Bird's defensive game. In recognition of his defensive abilities, Bird was named to three All-Defensive Second Teams.Bird's humble roots were the source of his most frequently used moniker, "The Hick From French Lick". Other observers called him "The Great White Hope".  He has also acquired the nickname "Larry Legend". Bird's competitive nature often emerged in nearly constant trash-talking on the court. Some notable examples follow:

During the three-point shooting contest on All-Star Weekend 1986, Bird entered the locker room, looked around without saying a word, then finally said, "I want all of you to know I am winning this thing.  I'm just looking around to see who's gonna finish up second." He won the shooting contest.
During one game on Christmas Day against the Indiana Pacers, before the game Bird told Chuck Person that he had a Christmas present waiting for him. During the game, when Person was on the bench, Bird shot a three-pointer on the baseline right in front of Person. Immediately after releasing the ball, Bird said to Person, "Merry f*%#ing Christmas!", and then the shot went in.  This was no doubt inspired by Person (nicknamed the "Rifleman") stating prior to the game that "The Rifleman is Coming, and He's Going Bird Hunting."
Reggie Miller recalled his encounter with Larry Bird's legendary trash talking ability in his book I Love Being the Enemy. Reggie tried to disrupt Larry's concentration when he was shooting free throws late in a game. Larry glared at him, made the first free throw and said, "You got to be kidding me. Rook, I'm the best shooter in the league right now. In the league. Understand? And you're up here trying to say something?"    Then Larry buried the second free throw.
Late in a tied game against the Seattle SuperSonics, Bird told Supersonics forward Xavier McDaniel, who was guarding him, “I’m going to get [the ball] right here and I am going to bury it in your face.”  As McDaniel remembers it, he responded by saying, “I know, I’ll be waiting.”  After a timeout, Bird made two baseline cuts, then posted in the exact spot he had indicated to McDaniel, paused, turned, and made it in his face.  He finished up the sequence by telling McDaniel, “I didn’t mean to leave two seconds on the clock.”  
On November 9, 1984, Bird was ejected along with Julius Erving in the third quarter after an on court scuffle. At the point of both ejections, Bird had outscored Erving 42 to 6. During the game, Bird had continuously informed Erving of their tallies with every chance he got to score. Bird denies this stating that it was teammate "M.L. (Carr) talking trash from the bench" during that game.  Eventually a shoving match ensued, then swings taken by both players, and finally a bench-clearing brawl.


NBA career statistics  

† NBA championship 
 Led the league   
 
Regular season 
|-
| style="text-align:left;"|  
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 82 || 82 || 36.0 || .474 || .406 || .836 || 10.4 || 4.5 || 1.7 || 0.6 || 21.3
|-
|  style="text-align:left; background:#afe6ba;"|  †
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 82 || 82 || 39.5 || .478 || .270 || .863 || 10.9 || 5.5 || 2.0 || 0.8 || 21.2
|-
| style="text-align:left;"|  
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 77 || 58 || 38.0 || .503 || .212 || .863 || 10.9 || 5.8 || 1.9 || 0.9 || 22.9
|-
| style="text-align:left;"|  
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 79 || 79 || 37.7 || .504 || .286 || .840 || 11.0 || 5.8 || 1.9 || 0.9 || 23.6
|-
|  style="text-align:left; background:#afe6ba;"|  †
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 79 || 77 || 38.3 || .492 || .247 || style="background:#cfecec;"| .888 || 10.1 || 6.6 || 1.8 || 0.9 || 24.2
|-
| style="text-align:left;"|  
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 80 || 77 || style="background:#cfecec;"| 39.5 || .522 || .427 || .882 || 10.5 || 6.6 || 1.6 || 1.2 || 28.7
|-
|  style="text-align:left; background:#afe6ba;"|  †
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 82 || 81 || 38.0 || .496 || .423 || style="background:#cfecec;"| .896 || 9.8 || 6.8 || 2.0 || 0.6 || 25.8
|-
| style="text-align:left;"|  
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 74 || 73 || style="background:#cfecec;"| 40.6 || .525 || .400 || style="background:#cfecec;"| .910 || 9.2 || 7.6 || 1.8 || 0.9 || 28.1
|-
| style="text-align:left;"|  
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 76 || 75 || 39.0 || .527 || .414 || .916 || 9.3 || 6.1 || 1.6 || 0.8 || 29.9
|-
| style="text-align:left;"|  
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 6 || 6 || 31.5 || .471 || ... || .947 || 6.2 || 4.8 || 1.0 || 0.8 || 19.3
|-
| style="text-align:left;"|  
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 75 || 75 || 39.3 || .473 || .333 || style="background:#cfecec;"| .930 || 9.5 || 7.5 || 1.4 || 0.8 || 24.3
|-
| style="text-align:left;"|  
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 60 || 60 || 38.0 || .454 || .389 || .891 || 8.5 || 7.2 || 1.8 || 1.0 || 19.4
|-
| style="text-align:left;"|  
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 45 || 45 || 36.9 || .466 || .406 || .926 || 9.6 || 6.8 || 0.9 || 0.7 || 20.2
|- class=sortbottom
| style="text-align:left;" colspan=2| Career 
| 897 || 870 || 38.4 || .496 || .376 || .886 || 10.0 || 6.3 || 1.7 || 0.8 || 24.3
|-
 
Playoffs 
|-
| style="text-align:left;"| 1980
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 9 || 9 || 41.3 || .469 || .267 || .880 || 11.2 || 4.7 || 1.6 || 0.9 || 21.3
|-
|  style="text-align:left; background:#afe6ba;"| 1981†
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 17 || 17 || 44.1 || .470 || .375 || .894 || 14.0 || 6.1 || 2.3 || 1.0 || 21.9
|-
| style="text-align:left;"| 1982
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 12 || 12 || 40.8 || .427 || .167 || .822 || 12.5 || 5.6 || 1.9 || 1.4 || 17.8
|-
| style="text-align:left;"| 1983
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 6 || 6 || 40.0 || .422 || .250 || .828 || 12.5 || 6.8 || 2.2 || 0.5 || 20.5
|-
|  style="text-align:left; background:#afe6ba;"| 1984†
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| style="background:#cfecec;"| 23 || style="background:#cfecec;"| 23 || 41.8 || .524 || .412 || .879 || 11.0 || 5.9 || 2.3 || 1.2 || 27.5
|-
| style="text-align:left;"| 1985
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 20 || 20 || 40.8 || .461 || .280 || .890 || 9.1 || 5.8 || 1.7 || 1.0 || 26.0
|-
|  style="text-align:left; background:#afe6ba;"| 1986†
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 18 || 18 || 42.8 || .517 || .411 || .927 || 9.3 || 8.2 || 2.1 || 0.6 || 25.9
|-
| style="text-align:left;"| 1987
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| style="background:#cfecec;"| 23 || style="background:#cfecec;"| 23 || style="background:#cfecec;"| 44.1 || .476 || .341 || .912 || 10.0 || 7.2 || 1.2 || 0.8 || 27.0
|-
| style="text-align:left;"| 1988
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 17 || 17 || 44.9 || .450 || .375 || .894 || 8.8 || 6.8 || 2.1 || 0.8 || 24.5
|-
| style="text-align:left;"| 1990
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 5 || 5 || 41.4 || .444 || .263 || .906 || 9.2 || 8.8 || 1.0 || 1.0 || 24.4
|-
| style="text-align:left;"| 1991
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 10 || 10 || 39.6 || .408 || .143 || .863 || 7.2 || 6.5 || 1.3 || 0.3 || 17.1
|-
| style="text-align:left;"| 1992
| style="text-align:left;"| Boston
| 4 || 2 || 26.8 || .500 || .000 || .750 || 4.5 || 5.3 || 0.3 || 0.5 || 11.3
|- class=sortbottom
| style="text-align:left;" colspan=2| Career 
| 164 || 162 || 42.0 || .472 || .321 || .890 || 10.3 || 6.5 || 1.8 || 0.9 || 23.8
|-
 
Career stats

Regular season:
Games: 897Win-Lost: 660-237Points: 21791Rebounds: 8974Assist: 5695
Playoffs:
Games: 164Win-Lost: 99-65Points: 3897Rebounds: 1683Assist: 1062
All-star games:
Games: 10Win-Lost: 8-2Points: 134Rebounds: 79Assist: 41
40 point games
Regular season

Number Points Win/Lost Opponent Home/Away Date Minutes   played FGM FGA 3PM 3PA FTM FTA Rebounds Assists Steals Blocks 
1 60 Win Atlanta Hawks Neutral       43 22 36 1 4 15 16 7 3 0 0 
2 53 Win Indiana Pacers Home    21 30 0  11 11     
3 50 Lost Dallas Mavericks Away   40 18 33 4 7 10 11 11 5 1 0 
4 50 Win Atlanta Hawks Home   39 19 25 1 1 11 12 13 7 0 0 
5 49 Win Washington Bullets Home   43 20 30 0 4 9 9 8 6 4 0 
6 49 Win Phoenix Suns Away   43 17 27 3 6 12 12 12 7 0 2 
7 49   Win Portland Trail Blazers Home   54 19 35 2 8 9 10 14 12 4 1 
8 48 Win Atlanta Hawks Home   42 20 32 0 2 8 9 14 5 1 1 
9 48 Win Portland Trail Blazers Home   45 17 28 2 5 12 12 10 7 3 1 
10 48 Win Houston Rockets Home   43 17 32 0 2 14 15 15 7 2 0 
11 47   Lost Milwaukee Bucks Home    15 31 1  16 17 14    
12 47 Win Detroit Pistons Home   39 17 31 0 0 13 13 12 2 2 0 
13 47   Win Portland Trail Blazers Away   49 21 34 3 3 2 3 14 11 1 2 
14 47 Win New York Knicks Home   38 22 34 0 1 3 5 7 8 4 0 
15 47   Win Washington Bullets Away   53 19 29 1 2 8 10 8 7 2 0 
16 46 Win Orlando Magic Away   44 19 33 1 3 7 8 8 10 1 0 
17 45 Lost Phoenix Suns Away    19  3  4 4     
18 45 Win Indiana Pacers Away   45 18 31 1 3 8 11 12 5 5 0 
19 45 Win Charlotte Hornets Home   44 18 28 0 0 9 9 8 8 2 5 
20 44 Lost Houston Rockets Away   44 17 27 1 2 9 10 15 3 2 2 
21 44 Win Portland Trail Blazers Home   44 17 35 1 5 9 9 11 8 1 0 
22 44 Win Chicago Bulls Home   40 19 29 0 0 6 6 10 3 1 1 
23 43 Win Cleveland Cavaliers Neutral       29 17 24 5 6 4 4 8 3 3 0 
24 43 Win Portland Trail Blazers Home   46 17 30 1 4 8 9 10 8 2 1 
25 43 Win New Jersey Nets Home   39 16 29 2 4 9 9 15 6 2 0 
26 43 Win Denver Nuggets Home   44 14 26 3 6 12 13 8 13 2 2 
27 42 Win Philadelphia 76ers Home       30 17 23 1 1 7 7 7 3  
28 42 Win Seattle SuperSonics Home   46 15 28 2 5 10 10 12 5 3 3 
29 42 Win Indiana Pacers Home   42 15 24 2 2 10 10 20 5 3 2 
30 41 Win Detroit Pistons Home    17  4  3 3     
31 41 Win Portland Trail Blazers Home    15 27 1  10 10 14    
32 41   Win Atlanta Hawks Away   40 15 27 2 4 9 11 7 6 3 2 
33 41   Win Chicago Bulls Away   46 17 29 1 1 6 6 7 7 3 1 
34 41 Win Golden State Warriors Home   43 15 24 3 6 8 10 10 5 2 0 
35 41 Win New York Knicks Home   44 17 30 3 3 4 4 6 5 3 0 
36 41 Win Philadelphia 76ers Home   43 15 21 1 2 10 10 10 4 0 0 
37 40 Win Detroit Pistons Neutral        18  0  4 5     
38 40 Win Dallas Mavericks Away   44 16 20 0  8 8 10 9 0 1 
39 40 Lost Denver Nuggets Away   46 14 28 0 2 12 13 9 6 0 0 
40 40 Win New Jersey Nets Home   46 15 28 3 7 7 8 7 7 1 0 
41 40 Win Atlanta Hawks Home   39 14 24 3 7 9 10 12 5 2 1 
42 40 Win New Jersey Nets Home   42 17 27 3 5 3 4 8 13 2 0 
43 40 Lost Denver Nuggets Home   40 16 25 0 5 8 8 13 1 2 1 
44 40 Win Portland Trail Blazers Away   40 18 27 1 2 3 4 13 5 2 0 
45 40 Win Seattle SuperSonics Home   46 17 27 2 5 4 4 11 10 1 2 
46 40 Win Utah Jazz Home   41 16 30 1 2 7 7 8 5 2 0 
47 40 Win Miami Heat Home   40 14 23 2 5 10 10 6 9 1 0 

Playoffs

Number Points Win/Lost Opponent Home/Away Date Minutes   played FGM FGA 3PM 3PA FTM FTA Rebounds Assists Steals Blocks 
1 43 Win Detroit Pistons Home   43 17 33 0 1 9 9 13 5 1 0 
2 42 Win Detroit Pistons Home   40 14 26 0 1 14 15 10 6 0 1 
3 42   Win Milwaukee Bucks Away   56 13 23 3 5 13 15 7 8 0 2 
4 40 Win Cleveland Cavaliers Home   43 14 25 1 2 11 12 7 3 3 2 
5 40 Win Milwaukee Bucks Home   44 13 23 1 1 13 13 11 7 4 1 

Game-winners
Regular season

Number Points Win/Lost Opponent Home/Away Date Minutes   played FGM FGA 3PM 3PA FTM FTA Rebounds Assists Steals Blocks 
1 28 Win Denver Nuggets Away    13    2 2     
2 25 Win Detroit Pistons Home    11    3 3     
3 20   Win Philadelphia 76ers Away   40 7 22   6 6 15 7   
4 38 Win Phoenix Suns Away    14 25   9 9     
5 13 Win Cleveland Cavaliers Home    6 11 1  0 0     
6 48 Win Portland Trail Blazers Home    17 28 2  12 12     
7 32 Win Detroit Pistons Home    11 23 1  9 9     
8 47   Win Portland Trail Blazers Away   49 21 34 3 3 2 3 14 11 1 2 
9 27 Win Seattle SuperSonics Away   41 10 19 3 3 4 5 8 6 1 0 
10 29 Win Cleveland Cavaliers Home   43 11 17 2 6 9 10 13 7 2 0 
11 47   Win Washington Bullets Away   53 19 29 1 2 8 10 8 7 2 0 
12 39 Win Dallas Mavericks Away   40 16 25 2 4 5 6 10 6 3 0 
13 27 Win Chicago Bulls Away   38 12 24 0 1 3 4 9 6 0 0 
14 10 Win Philadelphia 76ers Home   35 5 11 0 0 0 0 6 8 1 1 
15 27 Win Los Angeles Clippers Home   39 11 22 1 3 4 4 5 5 2 0 

Playoffs

Number Points Win/Lost Opponent Home/Away Date Minutes   played FGM FGA 3PM 3PA FTM FTA Rebounds Assists Steals Blocks 
1 23 Win Philadelphia 76ers Home    8    6 7     
2 34 Win Cleveland Cavaliers Away   42 11 17 0 1 12 14 14 7 1 0 

Career highs
Regular season

Stat High Opponent Date 
Points, game 60 Atlanta Hawks   
Points, half   37 Atlanta Hawks   
Points, quarter   24 vs. Indiana Pacers   
Points without a   free throw, quarter   19 Atlanta Hawks   
Consecutive points   16 Atlanta Hawks   
Field goal percentage    
Field goals made 22 Atlanta Hawks   
Field goals made 22 vs. New York Knicks   
Field goals made, half   15 Atlanta Hawks   
Field goals made, half   15 vs. Washington Bullets   
Field goals made, quarter   10 vs. Indiana Pacers   
Field goals made, quarter   10 vs. Washington Bullets   
Field goal attempts 36 Atlanta Hawks   
Field goal attempts 36 vs. Chicago Bulls   
Field goal attempts, half   23 Atlanta Hawks   
Free throws made, none missed    
Free throws made, one missed 16—17 vs. Milwaukee Bucks   
Free throws made 16 vs. Milwaukee Bucks   
Free throw attempts    
Three-point field goals made 7 vs. Dallas Mavericks   
Three-point field goals made 7 vs. Indiana Pacers   
Three-point field goal attempts 10 three times 
Rebounds 21 at Philadelphia 76ers   
Rebounds 21 at Los Angeles Lakers   
Rebounds 21 at Denver Nuggets   
Rebounds 21   at Washington Bullets   
Offensive rebounds    
Defensive rebounds 18 at Chicago Bulls   
Defensive rebounds 18 vs. Indiana Pacers   
Assists 17 at Golden State Warriors   
Assists 16 vs. Cleveland Cavaliers   
Steals 9 at Utah Jazz   
Steals 8   at New Jersey Nets   
Steals 8 vs. New Jersey Nets   
Blocked shots    
Turnovers 10 at New York Knicks   
Minutes played    

Playoffs

Stat High Opponent Date 
Points 43 vs. Detroit Pistons   
Points, half   30 vs. Detroit Pistons   
Points, quarter   24 vs. Atlanta Hawks   
Field goal percentage    
Field goals made 17 vs. Detroit Pistons   
Field goals made 16 vs. New York Knicks   
Field goals made, quarter   10 vs. Atlanta Hawks   
Field goal attempts 33 vs. Detroit Pistons   
Free throws made, none missed 14—14 vs. Milwaukee Bucks   
Free throws made, one missed 14—15 vs. Detroit Pistons   
Free throws made 14 vs. Milwaukee Bucks   
Free throws made 14 vs. Detroit Pistons   
Free throws made, half   12 vs. Detroit Pistons   
Free throw attempts 15 vs. Milwaukee Bucks   
Free throw attempts 15 vs. Los Angeles Lakers   
Free throw attempts 15 at Los Angeles Lakers   
Free throw attempts 15 vs. Detroit Pistons   
Free throw attempts 15 at Milwaukee Bucks   
Three-point field goals made 5 at Milwaukee Bucks   
Three-point field goal attempts 6 vs. Milwaukee Bucks   
Three-point field goal attempts 6 at Milwaukee Bucks   
Rebounds 21 at Philadelphia 76ers   
Rebounds 21 vs. Houston Rockets   
Rebounds 21 vs. Houston Rockets   
Rebounds 21   at Los Angeles Lakers   
Offensive rebounds    
Defensive rebounds 19 at Philadelphia 76ers   
Assists 16 vs. New York Knicks   
Assists, half 11 vs. New York Knicks   
Steals 5 vs. Houston Rockets   
Steals 5 at Houston Rockets   
Steals 5 at New York Knicks   
Steals 5 vs. Detroit Pistons   
Blocked shots    
Turnovers 10 vs. Chicago Bulls   
Minutes played 56   at Milwaukee Bucks   

In popular culture

Bird has appeared in three movies, Blue Chips, released in 1994 by Paramount, the Warner Brothers film Space Jam with Michael Jordan and Bill Murray in 1996, and Celtic Pride with Dan Aykroyd, Daniel Stern, and Damon Wayans, which was also released in 1996. 
Bird's likeness has appeared in several video games. In One on One: Dr. J vs. Larry Bird, Bird plays opposite Julius Erving in a game of one-on-one. A sequel, Jordan vs Bird: One on One, was a 1988 basketball video game. In 2011, Bird was featured on the cover of NBA 2K12, alongside Magic Johnson and Michael Jordan. Bird is also playable character in the revamped NBA Jam. 
The band Dispatch has a song called "Just Like Larry" about Larry Bird, who is their hometown hero from his days as a member of the Boston Celtics. 
In a phone commercial when Larry Bird tells Tweety Bird that they are not related, Tweety not only comments on them having the same last name but that they "look an awful lot alike".
Larry Bird and Magic Johnson wrote a book together (with Jackie MacMullan) titled When The Game Was Ours.
In a commercial during Super Bowl XLIV, Dwight Howard and LeBron James challenge each other at trick shots for a McDonald's lunch. After they finish, clapping is heard, then the camera pans to the crowd and Bird says "Great show, guys. Thanks for lunch." Howard and James share a confused look. Howard asks, "Who was that?" James replies, "I have no idea." This refers to a McDonald's commercial from 1991 in which Bird and Michael Jordan have a trick shot contest, in which the winner got the lunch and the loser had to watch the winner eat. 
In October 2005, a man in Oklahoma City, Eric James Torpy, was convicted of shooting with intent to kill and robbery. He asked that his sentence be changed from 30 years imprisonment to 33 so that it would match Bird's jersey number. His request was granted. 
Twitter's logo is named Larry in honor of Larry Bird. 


See also 

List of National Basketball Association career scoring leaders
List of National Basketball Association career rebounding leaders
List of National Basketball Association career assists leaders
List of National Basketball Association career steals leaders
List of National Basketball Association career turnovers leaders
List of National Basketball Association career playoff scoring leaders
List of National Basketball Association career playoff rebounding leaders
List of National Basketball Association career playoff assists leaders
List of National Basketball Association career playoff steals leaders
List of National Basketball Association career playoff turnovers leaders
List of National Basketball Association career playoff free throw scoring leaders
List of National Basketball Association players with most points in a game
List of National Basketball Association players with most steals in a game
List of NCAA Division I men's basketball players with 2000 points and 1000 rebounds
List of National Basketball Association season minutes leaders


References 
Further reading

 
 


External links 
 

 
 
 
Sportscentury's 30th greatest athlete of all time provided by ESPN.com
NBA.com: Where Legends Are Born
NBA History
CNN/Sports Illustrated: A Player for the Ages
1979 Oscar Robertson Trophy USBWA College Player of the Year
Videos of Larry Bird on mReplay.com
Larry Bird Statistics
Indiana Basketball Hall of Fame profile

 
  
DEFAULTSORT






















 
 
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Puyi
 
 
 Puyi (Wade-Giles: Pu-i; 7 February 1906 – 17 October 1967), of the Manchu Aisin Gioro clan, was the last Emperor of China, and the twelfth and final ruler of the Qing Dynasty. He ruled as the Xuantong Emperor (Wade-Giles: Hsuan-tung Emperor) from 1908 until his abdication on 12 February 1912. From 1 to 12 July 1917 he was briefly restored to the throne as a nominal emperor by the warlord Zhang Xun. In 1934 he was declared the Kangde Emperor (Wade-Giles: Kang-te Emperor) of the puppet state of Manchukuo by the Empire of Japan, and he ruled until the end of the Second Sino-Japanese War in 1945. After the People's Republic of China was established in 1949, Puyi was a member of the Chinese People's Political Consultative Conference from 1964 until his death in 1967. Puyi's abdication in 1912 marked the end of millennia of dynastic rule in China and thus he is known throughout the world by the sobriquet "The Last Emperor".
Names and titles
NamesPuyi's name is romanised in English as either Puyi (in Hanyu Pinyin) or Pu-i (in Wades-Giles). This naming is in accordance with the Manchu tradition of avoiding the use of a person's clan name and given name together,  but is in complete contravention of Chinese tradition, whereby the given name of a ruler was considered taboo and ineffable. Using a former emperor's personal name (or even using a Chinese character from the name) was a punishable offence under traditional Chinese law. However after Puyi lost his imperial title in 1924, he was officially styled Mr. Puyi (Wade-Giles: Mr. Pu-i;  ) in Chinese and Mr. Fugi (溥儀先生; Fugi Sensei) in Japanese. His clan name Aisin Gioro ( ) was seldom used.Puyi also adopted Chinese style names — his zi (字; courtesy name) was Yaozhi (Wade-Giles: Yao-chih;  ), and his hao (號; pseudonym) was Haoran (Wade-Giles: Hao-jan;  ).Puyi is also known to have used a Western given name, Henry¹, which was chosen by his English language teacher, a Scotsman named Reginald Johnston.  
TitlesWhen he ruled as Emperor of the Qing Dynasty from 1908 to 1912 and during his brief restoration in 1917, Puyi's era name was Xuantong (Wade-Giles: Hsuan-tung), so he was known as the Xuantong Emperor (Wade-Giles: Hsuan-tung Emperor;  ) during those two periods of time.As Puyi was also the last ruling Emperor of China, he is widely known as The Last Emperor ( ) in China and throughout the rest of the world. Some refer to him as The Last Emperor of the Qing Dynasty ( ).Due to his abdication, Puyi is also known as Xun Di (Wade-Giles: Hsun Ti;  ) or Fei Di (Wade-Giles: Fei Ti;  ). Sometimes a Qing ( ) is added in front of the two titles to indicate his affiliation with the Qing Dynasty.When Puyi ruled the puppet state of Manchukuo from 1934 to 1945, his era name was Kangde (Wade-Giles: Kang-te), so he was known as the Kangde Emperor (Wade-Giles: Kang-te Emperor;  ) during that period of time.
Ancestry
Paternal side
Puyi's great-grandfather was the Daoguang Emperor (r. 1820–1850), who was succeeded by his fourth son, the Xianfeng Emperor (r. 1850–1861).      Puyi's paternal grandfather was Yixuan, Prince Chun (1840–1891), the seventh son of the Daoguang Emperor and a younger half-brother of the Xianfeng Emperor. The Xianfeng Emperor was succeeded by his only son, who became the Tongzhi Emperor (r. 1861–1875).   The Tongzhi Emperor died at the age of 18 without a son, and was succeeded by the Guangxu Emperor (r. 1875–1908), son of 1st Prince Chun and Lady Yehenara Wanzhen (younger sister of Empress Dowager Cixi). The Guangxu Emperor died without an heir.   Puyi, who succeeded the Guangxu Emperor, was the eldest son of Zaifeng, Prince Chun, who was born to Yixuan, Prince Chun and his second concubine Lady Lingiya (1866–1925). Lady Lingiya used to be a maid in the residence of Yixuan. Born a Han Chinese, her original family name was Liu (劉), and this was changed to the Manchu clan name Lingiya when she became the concubine of Yixuan. Zaifeng was therefore a younger half-brother of the Guangxu Emperor and the first in line to succession after Guangxu.   Puyi was in a branch of the Aisin Gioro clan with close ties to Empress Dowager Cixi, who was from the Yehenara clan. Cixi's niece, who later became Empress Dowager Longyu (1868–1913), was married to the Guangxu Emperor.Puyi had a younger full brother, Pujie (1907–1994), who married a cousin of Emperor Hirohito, Lady Hiro Saga. The rules of succession were changed to allow Pujie to succeed Puyi, who had no children.    Puyi's last surviving younger half-brother Puren (b. 1918) has adopted the Chinese name Jin Youzhi and currently still lives in China. In 2006 Jin Youzhi filed a lawsuit in regards to the rights to Puyi's image and privacy. The lawsuit claimed that those rights were violated by the exhibit "China's Last Monarch and His Family". Puyi's second cousin,  Pu Xuezhai (溥雪齋), was a musician who played the guqin, and an artist of Chinese painting. 
Maternal sidePuyi's mother was Youlan (1884–1921), the daughter of Ronglu (1836–1903), a statesman and general from the Guwalgiya clan. Ronglu was one of the leaders of the conservative faction in the Qing court, and a staunch supporter of Empress Dowager Cixi; Cixi rewarded his support by marrying his daughter, Puyi's mother, into the imperial family.The Guwalgiya clan was regarded as one of the most powerful Manchu clans in the Qing Dynasty. Oboi, an influential military commander and statesman who was a regent during the Kangxi Emperor's reign, was from the Guwalgiya clan.   
Chart showing the ancestors of Puyi 
  
 
Biography
Emperor of China (1908–1912)
Chosen by Empress Dowager Cixi on her deathbed,  Puyi became emperor at the age of 2 years and 10 months in December 1908 after the Guangxu Emperor died on 14 November. Titled the Xuantong Emperor (Wade-Giles: Hsuan-tung Emperor), Puyi's introduction to the life of an emperor began when palace officials arrived at his family residence to take him. The toddler Puyi screamed and resisted as the officials ordered the eunuch attendants to pick him up.    His father, Prince Chun, became Prince-Regent (摄政王). During Puyi's coronation in the Hall of Supreme Harmony, the young emperor was carried onto the throne by his father. Puyi was so frightened by the scene before him and the deafening sounds of ceremonial drums and music that he started crying. His father could do nothing except to quietly comfort him, "Don't cry, it'll be over soon."Puyi's wet nurse, Wen-Chao Wang, was the only one who could console him, and therefore she accompanied him to the Forbidden City. Puyi did not see his biological mother, Princess Consort Chun, for the next seven years. He developed a special bond with Wen-Chao Wang and credited her with being the only person who could control him. She was sent away when he was eight years old. After Puyi married, he would occasionally bring her to the Forbidden City, and later Manchukuo, to visit him. After his special government pardon in 1959, he visited her adopted son and only then learned of her personal sacrifices to be his nurse. Puyi's upbringing was hardly conducive to the raising of a healthy, well-balanced child. Overnight, he was treated as a god and unable to behave as a child. The adults in his life, except for his wet-nurse Wen-Chao Wang, were all strangers, remote, distant, and unable to discipline him. Wherever he went, grown men would kneel down in a ritual kowtow, averting their eyes until he passed. Soon the young Puyi discovered the absolute power he wielded over the eunuchs, and he frequently had them beaten for small transgressions. 
Eunuchs and the Household DepartmentQuotation of Puyi:   
 After his marriage, Puyi began to take control of the palace. He described "an orgy of looting" taking place that involved "everyone from the highest to the lowest". According to Puyi, by the end of his wedding ceremony, the pearls and jade in the empress's crown had been stolen.  Locks were broken, areas ransacked, and on June 27, 1923, a fire destroyed the area around the Palace of Established Happiness. Puyi suspected it was arson to cover theft. The emperor overheard conversations among the eunuchs that made him fear for his life. In response, he evicted the eunuchs from the palace.  His next plan of action was to reform the Household Department; the officials of which he appointed became so wealthy from theft and graft that they were able to run their own businesses outside the palace. 
AbdicationPuyi's father, Prince Chun, served as a regent until 6 December 1911 when Empress Dowager Longyu took over in the face of the Xinhai Revolution. Empress Dowager Longyu endorsed the "Imperial Edict of the Abdication of the Qing Emperor" (清帝退位詔書) on 12 February 1912, following the Xinhai Revolution, under a deal brokered by Yuan Shikai (a general of the Beiyang Army) with the imperial court in Beijing and the Republicans in southern China.    Signed with the new Republic of China, Puyi was to retain his imperial title and be treated by the government of the Republic with the protocol attached to a foreign monarch. This was similar to Italy's Law of Guarantees (1870) which accorded the Pope certain honors and privileges similar to those enjoyed by the King of Italy.    Puyi and the imperial court were allowed to remain in the northern half of the Forbidden City (the Private Apartments) as well as in the Summer Palace. A hefty annual subsidy of four million silver taels was granted by the Republic to the imperial household, although it was never fully paid and was abolished after just a few years.
The Articles of Favourable Treatment of the Great Qing Emperor after his AbdicationThe document is dated 26 December 1914. 

After the abdication of the Great Qing Emperor, his title of dignity is to be retained by the Republic of China with the courtesies which it is customary to accord to foreign monarchs.
After the abdication of the Great Qing Emperor, he will receive from the Republic of China an annual subsidy of 4,000,000 silver taels. After the reform of the currency this amount will be altered to $4,000,000 (max.).
After the abdication of the Great Qing Emperor, he may, as a temporary measure, continue to reside in the Palace (in the Forbidden City), but afterwards he will remove himself to the Summer Palace. He may retain his bodyguard.
After the abdication of the Great Qing Emperor, the temples and mausoleums of the imperial family with their appropriate sacrificial rites shall be maintained in perpetuity. The Republic of China will be responsible for the provision of military guards for their adequate protection.
As the Chong Mausoleum (崇陵) of the late Emperor Dezong (the Guangxu Emperor) has not yet been completed, the work will be carried out according to the proper regulations (relating to imperial tombs). The last ceremonies of sepulture will also be observed in accordance with the ancient rites. The actual expenses will all be borne by the Republic of China.
The services of all the persons of various grades hitherto employed in the Palace may be retained; but in future no eunuchs are to be added to the staff.
After the abdication of the Great Qing Emperor, his private property will be safeguarded and protected by the Republic of China.
The imperial guard corps as constituted at the time of the abdication will be placed under the military control of the War Office of the Republic of China. It will be maintained at its original strength and will receive the same emoluments as heretofore.


Brief restoration (1917)In 1917 the warlord Zhang Xun restored Puyi to the throne from July 1 to July 12.    Zhang Xun ordered his army to keep their queues to display loyalty to the emperor. During that period of time, a small bomb was dropped over the Forbidden City by a Republican plane, causing minor damage.  This is considered the first aerial bombardment ever in East Asia. The restoration failed due to extensive opposition across China, and the decisive intervention of another warlord, Duan Qirui.   Puyi was expelled from the Forbidden City in 1924 by the warlord Feng Yuxiang.   
Residence in Tianjin (1924–1932)Following his expulsion from the Forbidden City, Puyi spent a few days at the house of his father Prince Chun, and then temporarily resided in the Japanese embassy for a year and a half.  In 1925, he moved to the Quiet Garden Villa in the Japanese Concession in Tianjin.    During this period, Puyi and his advisers Chen Baochen, Zheng Xiaoxu and Luo Zhenyu discussed plans to restore Puyi as Emperor. Zheng and Luo favoured enlisting assistance from external parties, while Chen opposed the idea. In September 1931 Puyi sent a letter to Jirō Minami, the Japanese Minister of War, expressing his desire to be restored to the throne.  He was visited by Kenji Doihara, head of the espionage office of the Japanese Kwantung Army, who proposed establishing Puyi as head of a Manchurian state. In November 1931, Puyi and Zheng Xiaoxu traveled to Manchuria to complete plans for the puppet state of Manchukuo. The Chinese government ordered Puyi's arrest for treason, but was unable to breach the Japanese protection.  Chen Baochen returned to Beijing where he died in 1935.   
Ruler of Manchukuo (1932–1945)On 1 March 1932, Puyi was installed by the Japanese as the ruler of Manchukuo, a puppet state of the Empire of Japan, under the reign title Datong (Wade-Giles: Ta-tung; 大同). In 1934, he was officially crowned the emperor of Manchukuo under the reign title Kangde (Wade-Giles: Kang-te; 康德). He was constantly at odds with the Japanese in private, though submissive in public. He resented being "Head of State" and then "Emperor of Manchukuo" rather than being fully restored as a Qing Emperor. Puyi lived in a palace (now the Museum of the Imperial Palace of the Manchu State) in this period. At his enthronement he clashed with Japan over dress; they wanted him to wear a Manchukuo-style uniform whereas he considered it an insult to wear anything but traditional Manchu robes. In a typical compromise, he wore a Western military uniform to his enthronement  (the only Chinese emperor ever to do so) and a dragon robe to the announcement of his accession at the Temple of Heaven. Puyi's younger full brother Pujie, who married Lady Hiro Saga, a distant cousin to the Japanese Emperor Hirohito, was proclaimed heir apparent. The marriage had been politically arranged by Shigeru Honjō, a general of the Kwantung Army. Puyi thereafter would not speak candidly in front of his brother and refused to eat any food provided by Hiro Saga. Puyi was forced to sign an agreement that if he himself had a male heir, the child would be sent to Japan to be raised by the Japanese. 
From 1935 to 1945 Kwantung Army senior staff officer Yoshioka Yasunori (吉岡安則)    was assigned to Puyi as Attaché to the Imperial Household in Manchukuo. He acted as a spy for the Japanese government, controlling Puyi through fear, intimidation, and direct orders.  There were many attempts on Puyi's life during this period, including a 1937 stabbing by a palace servant.  During Puyi's reign as Emperor of Manchukuo, his household was closely watched by the Japanese, who increasingly took steps toward the full Japanisation of Manchuria, to prevent him from becoming too independent. He was feted by the Japanese populace during his visits there, but had to remain subservient to Emperor Hirohito.  It is unclear whether the adoption of ancient Chinese styles and rites, such as using "His Majesty" instead of his real name, was the product of Puyi's interest or a Japanese imposition of their own imperial house rules.During these years, Puyi began taking a greater interest in traditional Chinese law and religion  (such as Confucianism and Buddhism), but this was disallowed by the Japanese. Gradually his old supporters were eliminated and pro-Japanese ministers put in their place.  During this period Puyi's life consisted mostly of signing laws prepared by Japan, reciting prayers, consulting oracles, and making formal visits throughout his state.   
Later life (1945–1967)
At the end of World War II, Puyi was captured by the Soviet Red Army on 16 August 1945 while he was in an airplane fleeing to Japan.    The Soviets took him to the Siberian town of Chita. He lived in a sanatorium, then later taken to Khabarovsk near the Chinese border.In 1946, he testified at the International Military Tribunal for the Far East in Tokyo,    detailing his resentment of how he had been treated by the Japanese.When the Chinese Communist Party under Mao Zedong came to power in 1949, Puyi was repatriated to China after negotiations between the Soviet Union and China.       Except for a period during the Korean War, when he was moved to Harbin, Puyi spent ten years in the Fushun War Criminals Management Centre in Liaoning province until he was declared reformed. Puyi came to Peking in 1959 with special permission from Chairman Mao Zedong and lived the next six months in an ordinary Peking residence with his sister before being transferred to a government-sponsored hotel. He voiced his support for the Communists and worked at the Peking Botanical Gardens. At the age of 56, he married Li Shuxian, a hospital nurse, on  30 April 1962, in a ceremony held at the Banquet Hall of the Consultative Conference. He subsequently worked as an editor for the literary department of the Chinese People's Political Consultative Conference, where his monthly salary was around 100 yuan,    an office in which he served from 1964 until his death.With encouragement from Chairman Mao Zedong and Premier Zhou Enlai, and openly endorsed by the Chinese government, Puyi wrote his autobiography Wo De Qian Ban Sheng ( ; translated in English as From Emperor to Citizen) in the 1960s together with Li Wenda, an editor of Peking's People Publishing Bureau. In the Oxford University edition of the book, in the chapter I Refuse to Admit My Guilt, he made this statement regarding his testimony at the Tokyo war crimes trial:    
 I now feel very ashamed of my testimony, as I withheld some of what I knew to protect myself from being punished by my country. I said nothing about my secret collaboration with the Japanese imperialists over a long period, an association to which my open capitulation after September 18, 1931 was but the conclusion. Instead, I spoke only of the way the Japanese had put pressure on me and forced me to do their will.  I maintained that I had not betrayed my country but had been kidnapped; denied all my collaboration with the Japanese; and even claimed that the letter I had written to Jirō Minami was a fake.    I covered up my crimes in order to protect myself.  
Death and burial
Mao Zedong started the Cultural Revolution in 1966, and the youth militia known as the Red Guards saw Puyi, who symbolised Imperial China, as an easy target of attack. Puyi was placed under protection by the local public security bureau, although his food rations, salary, and various luxuries, including his sofa and desk, were removed.  Puyi became affected physically and emotionally. He died in Peking of complications arising from kidney cancer and heart disease on 17 October 1967 at the age of 61. In accordance with the laws of the People's Republic of China at the time, Puyi's body was cremated. His ashes were first placed at the Babaoshan Revolutionary Cemetery, alongside those of other party and state dignitaries. (This was the burial ground of imperial concubines and eunuchs prior to the establishment of the People's Republic of China.)In 1995, as a part of a commercial arrangement, Puyi's widow transferred his ashes to a new commercial cemetery in return for monetary support. The cemetery is located near the Western Qing Tombs,   southwest of Peking, where four of the nine Qing emperors preceding him are interred, along with three empresses and 69 princes, princesses and imperial concubines.   
FamilyQuotation of Puyi: 
 
The Pedigree of the Qing House flow chart can be found in Puyi's autobiography. 
SiblingsPuyi had three younger brothers:

Pujie (1907–1994), Puyi's only full brother, courtesy name Junzhi (俊之), English name William. He married Tangshixia (唐石霞; courtesy name Yiying 怡瑩), divorced later. He married Hiro Saga and had two daughters. He had a minor role in the government of Manchukuo.
Puqi ( ; 1915–1918), died before he turned three years old.
Puren ( ; b. 1918), changed his name to Jin Youzhi. He married Jin Yuting (金瑜庭) and had three sons and two daughters.

Puyi had seven younger sisters, only the first three were his full sisters:

Yunying ( ; 1909–1925), married Empress Wanrong's older brother Runliang (潤良), had no children.
Yunhe ( ; 1911–2001), changed her name to Jin Xinru (金欣如). She married Zheng Guangyuan (鄭廣元) and had a son and three daughters.
Yunying ( ; 1913–1992), changed her name to Jin Ruixiu (金蕊秀), English name Lily. She married Empress Wanrong's younger brother Runqi (潤麒) and had two sons and a daughter.
Yunxian ( ; 1914–2003), changed her name to Jin Yunxian (金韞嫻). She married Zhao Qifan (趙琪璠) and had a son and a daughter.
Yunxing ( ; 1917–1998), changed her name to Jin Ruijie (金蕊潔). She married Wan Jiaxi (萬嘉熙) and had three sons and a daughter.
Yunyu ( ; 1919–1982), changed her name to Pu Yunyu (溥韞娛), courtesy name Ruile (蕊樂). She married Wanyan Ailan (完顏愛蘭) and had a son and four daughters.
Yunhuan ( ; 1921–2004), infant name Ji (姞), changed her name to Jin Zhijian (金志堅), courtesy name Ruihan (蕊莟), pseudonym Biyue (璧月). She married Qiao Hongzhi (喬宏志) and had two sons and a daughter.


Spouses

Wanrong (1906–1946), married Puyi in 1922, was his Empress.
Wenxiu (1909–1953), married Puyi in 1922, was his Consort Shu (淑妃).
Tan Yuling (1920–1942), married Puyi in 1937, was his Concubine Xiang (祥貴人).
Li Yuqin (1928–2001), married Puyi in 1943, was his Concubine Fu (福貴人).
Li Shuxian (1925–1997), married Puyi in 1962.

Quotation of Puyi (referring only to his first four wives): Pu Yi 1988, p 310 
 

In detail

:In 1921, it was decided by the Dowager Consorts (the four widows of the emperors before Puyi) that it was time for the 15 year old Puyi to be married, although court politics dragged the complete process (from selecting the bride, up through the wedding ceremony) out for almost two years. Puyi saw marriage as his coming of age benchmark, when others would no longer control him. He was given four photographs to choose from. Puyi stated they all looked alike to him, with the exception of different clothing. He chose Wenxiu. Political factions within the palace made the actual choice as to whom Puyi would marry. The selection process alone took an entire year. 
WanrongPuyi's second choice for his wife was Wanrong, a Daur. She married Puyi in 1922 and became his Empress. Her father, Rong Yuan (榮源), was a Minister of Domestic Affairs. She was considered beautiful and came from a wealthy family. By Puyi's own account, he abandoned Wanrong in the bridal chamber and went back to his own room.  He maintained that she was willing to be a wife in name only, in order to carry the title of Empress. The couple's relationship was good initially, and Puyi showed preference over Wenxiu for Wanrong and displayed trust in her. However after Wenxiu left in 1931, Puyi blamed Wanrong and stopped speaking to her and ignored her presence.  She became addicted to opium, and eventually died in a prison in Yanji, Jilin after being arrested by Chinese Communist soldiers.   
WenxiuPuyi's first choice for his wife was Wenxiu, from the Erdet (鄂爾德特) clan. She married Puyi in 1922. Although she was Puyi's first choice, the Four Dowager Consorts felt that Wenxiu came from an unacceptable impoverished family and was not beautiful enough to be Empress, so they told the court officials to ask Puyi to choose again. The second time Puyi chose Wanrong, who became Empress, while Wenxiu was designated as Consort Shu (淑妃). Puyi and Wenxiu divorced in 1931. Puyi awarded her a house in Beijing and $300,000 in alimony, to be provided by the Japanese.  In his autobiography, Puyi stated her reason for the divorce was the emptiness of life with him in exile, her desire for an ordinary family life, and his own inability to see women as anything but slaves and tools of men. Puyi related that she never re-married, became a primary school teacher, and died in 1953. 
Tan YulingPuyi's third wife, Tan Yuling, was a Manchu of the Tatara (他他拉) clan. She married Puyi in 1937 at the age of 16 on the recommendation of the daughter of Yulang (毓朗), a beile. She was designated as Puyi's Concubine Xiang (祥貴人). Puyi married her as "punishment" for Wanrong, and, "...because a second wife was as essential as palace furniture." She was also a wife in name only. She became ill in 1942 with typhoid, which the Japanese doctor said would not be fatal. After the doctor's consultation with Attaché to the Imperial Household Yasunori Yoshioka, Tan Yuling suddenly died. Puyi became suspicious of the circumstances when the Japanese immediately offered him photographs of Japanese girls for marriage.  Puyi posthumously granted her the title Noble Consort Mingxian (明賢貴妃).
Li YuqinIn 1943 Puyi married his fourth wife, a 15-year-old student named Li Yuqin, who was a Han Chinese from Changchun, Jilin. She was designated as Puyi's Concubine Fu (福貴人).  In February 1943, school principal Kobayashi and teacher Fujii of the Nan-Ling Girls Academy took ten girl students to a photography studio for portraits. Three weeks later, the school teacher and the principal visited Li Yuqin's home and told her Puyi ordered her to go to the Manchukuo palace to study. She was first taken directly to Yasunori Yoshioka who thoroughly questioned her. Yoshioka then drove her back to her parents and told them Puyi ordered her to study at the palace. Money was promised to the parents. She was subjected to a medical examination and then taken to Puyi's sister Yunhe and instructed in palace protocol.    Two years later when Manchukuo collapsed, Li Yuqin shared a train with Empress Wanrong, who was experiencing opium withdrawal symptoms at the time. They were both arrested by the Soviets and sent to a prison in Changchun. Li Yuqin was released in 1946 and sent back home. She worked in a textile factory while she studied the works of Karl Marx and Vladimir Lenin. In 1955 she began visiting Puyi in prison. After applying to the Chinese authorities for a divorce, the government responded on her next prison visit by showing her to a room with a double bed and ordered her to reconcile with Puyi, and she said the couple obeyed the order. She divorced Puyi in May 1957. She later married a technician, and had two sons.    During the Cultural Revolution she became a target for attack by the Red Guards because she used to be Puyi's concubine. She died of liver problems in 2001.
Li ShuxianIn 1962 under the arrangement of Zhou Enlai, Puyi married his fifth and last wife, Li Shuxian, a nurse of Han Chinese ethnicity. They had no children. She died of lung cancer in 1997.  Li Shuxian recounted that they dated for six months before the marriage, and she found him to be, "...a man who desperately needed my love and was ready to give me as much love as he could."   
Bibliography
By Puyi

The autobiography of Puyi – ghost-written by Li Wenda. The title of the Chinese book is usually rendered in English as From Emperor to Citizen. The book was re-released in China in 2007 in a new corrected and revised version. Many sentences which had been deleted from the 1964 version prior to its publication were now included.
    – original
    – translation


By others

 
Johnston, Reginald Fleming (1934, 2008). Twilight in the Forbidden City. Soul Care Publishing. ISBN 978-0-9680459-5-4
 
Puyi's fifth wife Li Shuxian. Memories of their life together were ghost written by Wang Qingxian. An English version translated by Ni Na was published by China Travel and Tourism Press.
 
Companion to Bernardo Bertolucci's film of the same name.


Portrayal in media
Film

The Last Emperor (Chinese title 火龍, literally means Fire Dragon), a 1986 Hong Kong film directed by Li Han-hsiang. Tony Leung Ka-fai played Puyi.



The Last Emperor, a 1987 film directed by Bernardo Bertolucci. John Lone played the adult Puyi.



Aisin-Gioro Puyi (愛新覺羅·溥儀), a 2005 Chinese documentary film on the life of Puyi. Produced by CCTV, it was part of a series of ten documentary films about ten historical persons.



The Founding of a Party, a 2011 Chinese film directed by Huang Jianxin and Han Sanping. Child actor Yan Ruihan played Puyi.



1911, a 2011 historical film directed by Jackie Chan and Zhang Li. The film tells of the founding of the Republic of China when Sun Yat-sen led the Xinhai Revolution to overthrow the Qing Dynasty. The five year old Puyi is played by child actor Su Hanye. Although Puyi's time on screen is short, there are significant scenes showing how the emperor was treated at court before his abdication at the age of six.   


Television

The Misadventure of Zoo, a 1981 Hong Kong television series produced by TVB. Adam Cheng played an adult Puyi.



Modai Huangdi (末代皇帝; literally means The Last Emperor), a 1988 Chinese television series based on Puyi's autobiography From Emperor to Citizen, with Puyi's brother Pujie as a consultant for the series. Chen Daoming starred as Puyi.



Feichang Gongmin (非常公民; literally means Extraordinary Citizen), a 2002 Chinese television series directed by Cheng Hao. Dayo Wong starred as Puyi.



Ruten no Ōhi — Saigo no Kōtei (流転の王妃·最後の皇弟; Chinese title 流轉的王妃), a 2003 Japanese television series about Pujie and Hiro Saga. Wang Bozhao played Puyi.



Modai Huangfei (末代皇妃; literally means The Last Imperial Consort), a 2003 Chinese television series. Li Yapeng played Puyi.


See also 

Dynasties in Chinese history
List of monarchs who lost their thrones in the 20th and 21st centuries
List of heads of regimes who were later imprisoned
 
Notes¹ Aisin-Gioro is the clan's name in Manchu, pronounced Àixīn Juéluó in Mandarin; Pǔyí is the Chinese given name as pronounced in Mandarin.
References 
External links 

 
Royalty.nu: Extended Bio
TIME: Last Emperor's Humble Occupation
Li Xin, Pu Yi's Widow Reveals Last Emperor's Soft Side
Pu Ru (溥儒), Pu Yi's cousin, accomplished Chinese brush painter and calligrapher
 
 
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
  
DEFAULTSORT




















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Lee Teng-hui
 
 
  
Lee Teng-hui ( ; born 15 January 1923), sometimes called the "father of Taiwan's democracy",   is a politician of the Republic of China (commonly known as Taiwan). He was the President of the Republic of China and Chairman of the Kuomintang (KMT) from 1988 to 2000. He presided over major advancements in democratic reforms including his own re-election which marked the first direct presidential election for the Republic of China.  The first native Taiwanese to become ROC president and KMT chairman, Lee promoted the Taiwanese localization movement and led an aggressive foreign policy to gain diplomatic allies. Critics accused him of betraying the party he headed, secret support of Taiwanese independence, and involvement in corruption (black gold politics).After leaving office Lee was expelled from the KMT for his role in founding the pro-independence Taiwan Solidarity Union (TSU), which forms part of the Pan-Green Coalition alongside Taiwan's Democratic Progressive Party. (Lee is considered the "spiritual leader" of the TSU.) Lee has been outspoken in support for Taiwanese independence though not necessarily a formal declaration.
Early life and education

 
Lee was born to a Hakka family    in the rural farming community of Sanzhi (Sanshi-kyō), Taipei County (Taihoku, now New Taipei City), Taiwan. As a child, he often dreamed of traveling abroad, and became an avid stamp collector. Growing up during the Japanese rule of Taiwan, he developed a strong affinity for Japan. His father was a middle-level Japanese police aide, and his brother joined police academy and soon volunteered as for the Imperial Japanese Navy and died in Manila.  Lee—one of only four Taiwanese students in Taipei high school class—graduated with honors and was given a scholarship to Japan's Kyoto Imperial University. During his school days, he learned kendo and busido.  A lifelong collector of books, Lee was heavily influenced by Japanese thinkers like Nitobe Inazo and Nishida Kitaro in Kyoto. In 1944 he too volunteered for service in the Imperial Japanese Army and became a second lieutenant officer of an anti-aircraft gun in Taiwan. He was ordered back to Japan in 1945 and participated in the clean-up after the great Tokyo firebombing of March, 1945. Lee stayed in Japan after the surrender and graduated from Kyoto Imperial University in 1946.After World War II, after the Republic of China took over Taiwan, Lee enrolled in the National Taiwan University, where in 1948 he earned a bachelor's degree in agricultural science. Lee joined the Communist Party of China (CPC) in September 1946, apparently briefly. He participated in the 228 Incident during this time.  According to Wu Ketai, who inducted Lee into the Communist Party, the KMT was aware that Lee had been a Communist, but deliberately destroyed the records when Lee was promoted to the vice-presidency to protect his image.  In a 2002 interview Lee himself admitted that he had been a communist. In that same interview Lee said that he has strongly opposed communism for a long time because he understands the theory well and knows that it is doomed to fail.  Lee stated that he joined the Communist out of hatred for the KMT. In 1953, Lee received a master's degree in agricultural economics from the Iowa State University in the United States. Lee returned to Taiwan in 1957 as an economist with the Joint Commission on Rural Reconstruction (JCRR), an institution sponsored by the U.S. and aimed at modernizing Taiwan's agricultural system and at land reform. During this period, he also worked as an adjunct professor in the Department of Economics at National Taiwan University and taught at the Graduate School of East Asian Studies at National Chengchi University.In the mid-1960s Lee returned to the United States, and earned a PhD in agricultural economics from Cornell University in 1968. Lee's doctoral dissertation, Intersectoral Capital Flows in the Economic Development of Taiwan, 1895–1960  (published as a book under the same name) was honored as the year's best doctoral thesis by the American Association of Agricultural Economics and remains an influential work on Taiwan's economy during the Japanese and early KMT periods.Lee encountered Christianity as a young man and in 1961 was baptised. For most of the rest of his political career, despite holding high office, Lee has made a habit of giving sermons at churches around Taiwan, mostly on apolitical themes of service and humility.Lee speaks Mandarin, Taiwanese, Japanese and English.
Rise to powerShortly after returning to Taiwan, Lee joined the KMT in 1971 and was made a cabinet minister without portfolio responsible for agriculture.In 1978 Lee was appointed Mayor of Taipei, where he solved water shortages and improved the city's irrigation problems. In 1981, he became governor of Taiwan Province and made further irrigation improvements.As a skilled technocrat, Lee soon caught the eye of President Chiang Ching-kuo as a strong candidate to serve as Vice President. Chiang sought to move more authority to the bensheng ren (residents on Taiwan before 1949 and their descendants) instead of continuing to promote  waisheng ren (mainland Chinese immigrants who arrived in Taiwan after 1949 and their descendants) as his father had. President Chiang nominated Lee to become his Vice President. Lee was formally elected by the National Assembly in 1984.
PresidencyChiang Ching-kuo died in January 1988 and Lee succeeded him as President. The "Palace Faction" of the KMT, a group of conservative mainlanders headed by General Hau Pei-tsun, Premier Yu Kuo-hwa, and Education Minister Lee Huan, was deeply distrustful of Lee Teng-hui and sought to block his accession to the KMT chairmanship and sideline him as a figurehead. With the help of James Soong—himself a member of the Palace Faction—who quieted the hardliners with the famous plea "Each day of delay is a day of disrespect to Ching-kuo," Lee was allowed to ascend to the chairmanship unobstructed. At the KMT party congress of July 1988, Lee named 31 members of the Central Committee, 16 of whom were --bensheng ren: for the first time, bensheng ren held a majority in what was then a powerful policy-making body.As he consolidated power during the early years of his presidency, Lee allowed his rivals within the KMT to occupy positions of influence: when Yu Guo-hwa retired as premier in 1989, he was replaced by Lee Huan, who was succeeded by Hau Pei-tsun in 1990. At the same time, Lee made a major reshuffle of the Executive Yuan, as he had done with the KMT Central Committee, replacing several elderly waisheng ren with younger bensheng ren, mostly of technical backgrounds. Fourteen of these new appointees, like Lee, received Ph.D.s in the United States. Prominent among the appointments were Lien Chan as foreign minister, and Shirley Kuo as finance minister.1990 saw the arrival of the Wild Lily student movement on behalf of full democracy for Taiwan. Thousands of Taiwanese students demonstrated for democratic reforms. The demonstrations culminated in a sit-in demonstration by over 300,000 students at Memorial Square in Taipei. Students called for direct elections of the national president and vice president and for a new election for all legislative seats. On 21 March Lee welcomed some of the students to the Presidential Building. He expressed his support of their goals and pledged his commitment to full democracy in Taiwan. The moment is regarded by supporters of democracy in Taiwan as perhaps his finest moment in office. Gatherings recalling the student movement are regularly held around Taiwan every 21 March.In May 1991 Lee spearheaded a drive to eliminate the Temporary Provisions Effective During the Period of Communist Rebellion, laws put in place following the KMT arrival in 1949 that suspended the democratic functions of the government. In December 1991 the original members of the Legislative Yuan, elected to represent mainland China constituencies in 1948, were forced to resign and new elections were held to apportion more seats to the bensheng ren. The elections forced Hau Pei-tsun from the premiership, a position he was given in exchange for his tacit support of Lee. He was replaced by Lien Chan, then an ally of Lee.The prospect of the first island-wide democratic election the next year, together with Lee's June 1995 visit to Cornell University, sparked the Third Taiwan Strait Crisis. The previous eight presidents and vice presidents of the ROC had been elected by the members of the National Assembly. For the first time the President of the ROC would be elected by majority vote of Taiwan's population. The People's Republic of China conducted a series of missile tests in the waters surrounding Taiwan and other military maneuvers off the coast of Fujian in response to what Communist Party leaders described as moves by Lee to "split the motherland." The PRC government launched another set of tests just days before the election, sending missiles over the island to express its dissatisfaction should the Taiwanese people vote for Lee. The military actions disrupted trade and shipping lines and caused a temporary dip in the Asian stock market. Ironically, the 1996 missile launches boosted support for Lee instead.On 23 March 1996, Lee became the first popularly elected ROC president with 54% of the vote. Many people who worked or resided in other countries made special trips back to the island to vote. In addition to the president, the governor of Taiwan Province and the mayors of Taipei and Kaohsiung (as leaders of provincial level divisions they were formerly appointed by the president) became popularly elected.Lee, in an interview that same year, expressed his view that a special state-to-state relationship existed between Taiwan and mainland China that all negotiations between the two sides of the Strait needed to observe.Lee, observing constitutional term limits he had helped enact, stepped down from the presidency at the end of his term in 2000. That year Democratic Progressive Party candidate Chen Shui-bian won the national election with 39% of the vote in a three-way race. Chen's victory marked an end to KMT rule and the first peaceful transfer of power in Taiwan's new democratic system.Supporters of rival candidates Lien Chan and James Soong accused Lee of setting up the split in the KMT that had enabled Chen to win. Lee had promoted the uncharismatic Lien over the popular Soong as the KMT candidate. Soong had subsequently ran as an independent and was expelled from the KMT. The number of votes garnered by both Soong and Lien would have accounted for approximately 60% of the vote while individually the candidates placed behind Chen. Protests were staged in front of the KMT party headquarters in Taipei. Fuelling this anger were the persistent suspicions following Lee throughout his presidency that he secretly supported Taiwan independence and that he was intentionally sabotaging the Kuomintang from above.  Lee resigned his chairmanship on 24 March and was expelled as a party member in December of the same year. KMT officials expressed dissatisfaction with efforts to "localize" the KMT and his tacit support of the new Chen administration.Since leaving office Lee and the new party he went on to found, the TSU, have generally supported "green" causes in Taiwan. Lee continues to travel, make speeches, campaign for TSU candidates, and offer independent-minded commentary on Taiwan politics. Lee Teng-Hui University in Taiwan is named after him.
TaiwanizationLee Teng-hui, during his term as president, supported Taiwanization.  The Taiwanization movement has its roots in the home rule and independence groups founded during the Japanese era and sought to put emphasis on Taiwan as the center of people's lives as opposed to China or Japan. During the Chiang regime, China was promoted as the center of an ideology that would build a Chinese national outlook in a people who had once considered themselves Japanese subjects. Taiwan was often relegated to a backwater province of China in the KMT-supported history books. People were discouraged from studying local Taiwanese customs, which were to be replaced by mainstream Chinese customs. Lee sought to turn Taiwan into a center rather than an appendage. This shift was widely supported in Taiwan and found expression in Taiwanese literature movement. He further stated that he believed a Chinese identity and a Taiwanese identity were ultimately incompatible, a notion controversial in the KMT, even among those members who generally supported Taiwanization.
After the presidencySince resigning the chairmanship of the KMT, Lee has campaigned actively on behalf of pan-green coalition candidates and opposed candidates of his former party who took pro-unification positions during the 2004 presidential elections. He has stated a number of political positions and ideas which he did not mention while he was President, but which he appeared to have privately maintained.Lee has publicly supported the Name Rectification Campaigns in Taiwan and proposed changing the name of the country from the Republic of China to the Republic of Taiwan. He generally opposes unlimited economic ties with mainland China, though he supports trade.Lee has also stated that he believes that Taiwan cannot avoid being assimilated into the People's Republic of China unless it completely rejects its historical Chinese identity and that he believes that it is essential that Taiwanese unite and develop a unified and separate identity other than the Chinese one. Furthermore, in reference to Mainlanders, he believes that to be truly Taiwanese, one must assume a "New Taiwanese" identity.He dismisses both the notion that the strategy will trigger an invasion by the Chinese government and the notion that Taiwan benefits economically by developing economic ties with China. He argues the People's Republic of China is a paper tiger and both its military strength and economic strength have been far overestimated. Lee asserts that when presented with a united and assertive Taiwan, Taiwan will receive support from the international community and also from the United States and that the PRC will be obliged to back down. He also believes that the PRC economy is doomed to collapse and that unlimited integration with the PRC economy, on the part of Taiwan or any country, is unwise.During the 2004 Presidential campaign, President Chen Shui-bian publicly campaigned with Lee Teng-hui and developed a campaign platform, including a call for a new constitution adopted by referendum, which could be interpreted as an opportunity to make the symbolic changes which Lee supports. There was concern in the United States and in the People's Republic of China that Chen would be supportive of Lee's positions, a belief which was reinforced by Lee's own actions while President and by Lee's public statements that Chen Shui-bian agreed with him.The concern shared between the United States and the People's Republic of China was the possible unilateral change of the cross-strait status quo by President Chen, leading to a public rebuke of Chen from the United States President George W. Bush in December 2003. It is believed that this rebuke in part was intended to challenge the notion, which Lee had advanced, that American support of Taiwan was unconditional.  After his close election in March 2004, Chen moved to distance himself from Lee, by stating explicitly that his regime's constitutional reforms would not rename "The Republic of China" to Taiwan. The difference in the two leader's positions was further highlighted by Chen's stated intent to establish greater economic links with China.In February 2007 Lee shocked the media when he announced that he has never backed Taiwanese independence, when he was widely seen as the spiritual leader of the movement.  Lee also said that he supported opening up trade and tourism with China, a position he had opposed before. Lee later explained that Taiwan already enjoys de facto independence and that political maneuvering over details of expressing it is counterproductive. He maintains that "Taiwan should seek 'normalization' by changing its name and amending its constitution." 
Japanese supportLee enjoys a warm relationship with the people and culture of Japan. Lee often assures Taiwanese audiences that Japan will support Taiwan if it formally announces its Taiwan independence. Taiwan was colonized by Japan from 1895 to 1945 and natives of the island who grew up in that period, such as Lee, attended schools where Japanese language, songs, and stories were taught. Lee's father was a low-level Japanese police aide; his older brother died serving in the Imperial Japanese Navy in World War II and is listed in Yasukuni Shrine in Tokyo. During his youth Lee had a Japanese name,  .  Lee speaks fondly of his upbringing and his teachers and has been welcomed in visits to Japan since leaving office. Lee's admiration and enjoyment of all things Japanese has been the target of criticism from both the Pan-Green Coalition and Pan-Blue Coalition in Taiwan, as well as from mainland China, due to the anti-Japanese sentiment formed during and after World War II.In August 2001, Lee said of Junichiro Koizumi's controversial visit to Yasukuni shrine, "It is natural for a premier of a country to commemorate the souls of people who lost their lives for their country". In 2002, Lee remarked "the Senkaku Islands are the territory of Japan."         In November 2004, Lee became the first former president of a country known to participate in cosplay.    The cosplay was centered on  ,  a hawkish principal of a boarding school in the Japanese manga   (Weekly Shōnen Jump). His cosplay interest and eponymous "school" called "輝!李塾" was mentioned on his personal website, beginning in late 2004. This manga comic was a comedy centered on a fictitious reform school for contemporary boys, modelled under the Imperial Japanese Army.In a May 2007 trip to Japan, Lee visited the  Yasukuni Shrine to pay tribute to his older brother. Controversy rose because the Shrine also enshrines World War II Class A criminals among the other soldiers.  He is also expected to receive the first Shimpei Goto award,  named after the former Japanese colonial governor of Taiwan, and to give a speech on 7 June regarding the global situation and visited Yasukuni shrine again after 2007.     During the 2012 China anti-Japanese demonstrations, on September 13, 2012, Lee remarked "The Senkaku islands were Japanese territory in the past and are still so at present." 
IndictmentOn 30 June 2011, Lee, along with former KMT financier Liu Tai-Ying were indicted on graft and money-laundering charges and accused of embezzling US$7.79 million in public funds. 
CancerIn late 2011, Lee underwent surgery to remove colon adenocarcinoma, the most common form of colon cancer. Doctors are hopeful the stage II tumor was detected early. 
See also 

President of the Republic of China
History of the Republic of China
Politics of the Republic of China
Special state-to-state relations
Kuomintang


References 
External links

Biography from Office of the President, ROC
Friends of Lee Teng-Hui Association
Lee Teng-Hui Academy
America and Taiwan, 1943–2004
Cornell University Magazine Profile
[1]
[2]

 
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
   
DEFAULTSORT





















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Pierre Schaeffer
 Pierre Henri Marie Schaeffer ( English pronunciation:   ; 14 August 1910 – 19 August 1995)  was a French composer, writer, broadcaster, engineer, musicologist and acoustician. His innovative work in both the sciences—particularly communications and acoustics—and the various arts of music, literature and radio presentation after the end of World War II, as well as his anti-nuclear activism and cultural criticism garnered him widespread recognition in his lifetime.Amongst the vast range of works and projects he undertook, Schaeffer is most widely and currently recognized for his accomplishments in electronic and experimental music,  at the core of which stands his role as the chief developer of a unique and early form of avant-garde music known as musique concrète.      The genre emerged out of Europe from the utilization of new music technology developed in the post-Nazi Germany era, following the advance of electroacoustic and acousmatic music.Schaeffer's writings (which include written and radio-narrated essays, biographies, short novels, a number of musical treatises and several plays)   "Schaeffer taught electronic composition at the Paris Conservatory from 1968 until 1980. His writings include novels, short stories, and essays, as well as theoretical works in music, such as À la recherche d’une musique concrète (1952; 'In Search of a Concrete Music”'), Traité des objets musicaux (1966; 'Treatise on Musical Objects'), and the two-volume Machines à communiquer (1970–72; 'Machines for Communicating')."        are often oriented towards his development of the genre, as well as the theoretics and philosophy of music in general.     Today, Schaeffer is considered one of the most influential experimental, electroacoustic and subsequently electronic musicians, having been the first composer to utilize a number of contemporary recording and sampling techniques that are now used worldwide by nearly all record production companies.    His collaborative endeavors are considered milestones in the histories of electronic and experimental music.
Life
Early life and education
Schaeffer was born in Nancy in 1910.  His parents were both musicians (his father a violinist; his mother, a singer),      and at first it seemed that Pierre would also take on music as a career. However his parents discouraged his musical pursuits from childhood and had him educated in engineering.  He studied at several universities in this inclination, the first of which was Lycée Saint-Sigisbert located in his hometown of Nancy. Afterwards he moved westwards in 1929 to the École Polytechnique in Paris      and finally completed his education in the capital at the École supérieure d'électricité, in 1934.     Schaeffer received a diploma in radio broadcasting from the École Polytechnique.  He may have also received a similar qualification from the École nationale supérieure des télécommunications, although it is not verifiable as to whether or not he ever actually attended this university.   
First experimentations and work in broadcasting and engineering; marriage and fatherhood
Later in 1934 Schaeffer entered his first employment as an engineer, briefly working in telecommunications in Strasbourg.     In 1935 he began a relationship with a woman named Elisabeth Schmitt, and later in the year married her and with her had his first child, Marie-Claire Schaeffer.  He and his new family then officially relocated to Paris where he joined the Radiodiffusion Française (now called Radiodiffusion-Télévision Française; French for "French Radio and Television Broadcasting") in 1936 and began his work in radio broadcasting and presentation.  It was there that he began to move away from his initial interests in telecommunications and to pursue music instead, combining his abilities as an engineer with his passion for sound. In his work at the station, Schaeffer experimented with records and an assortment of other devices—the sounds they made and the applications of those sounds—after convincing the radio station's management to allow him to use their equipment. This period of experimentation was significant for Schaeffer's development, bringing forward many fundamental questions he had on the limits of modern musical expression. In these experiments, Pierre tried playing sounds backwards, slowing them down, speeding them up and juxtaposing them with other sounds,  all techniques which were virtually unknown at that time.  He had begun working with new contemporaries whom he had met through RTF, and as such his experimentation deepened. Schaeffer's work gradually became more avant-garde, as he challenged traditional musical style with the use of various devices and practices. A unique variety of electronic instruments—ones which Schaeffer and his colleagues created, using their own engineering skills—came into play in his work, like the chromatic, sliding and universal phonogenes, Francois Bayle's Acousmonium and a host of other devices such as gramaphones and some of the earliest tape recorders.     "Musique concrète was an experimental technique that combined pre-recorded sounds ­ natural as well as musical ­ to make musical compositions. Using only the earliest tape recorders, sounds were edited, played backwards and speeded up and down to create fascinating ‘sound-scapes’. Pierre Henry was a prolific composer of musique concrète and collaborated with Schaeffer on many compositions. Luciano Berio and Steve Reich are also key figures in musique concrète composition. Karlheinz Stockhausen combined electronic and concrète sounds to become a leader of avant-garde music making." 
Beginnings of writing career
In 1938 Schaeffer began his career as a writer, penning various articles and essays for the Revue Musicale, a French journal of music. His first column, Basic Truths, provided a critical examination of musical aspects of the time.A known ardent Catholic, Schaeffer began to write minor religiously-based pieces, and in the same year as his Basic Truths he published his first novel: Chlothar Nicole — a short Christian novel.
Club d'essai & the origin of musique concrète
By that time in his life,  Schaeffer had co-founded La Jeune France, which had interests in theatre and the visual arts, as well as in music and certain aspects of mysticism. In 1942, he created the Studio d'Essai (later known as the Club d'Essai), which played a role in the activities of the French resistance during World War II, and later became a center of musical activity. It was from d'Essai that he successfully recorded his first work, which itself appeared on Dix ans d'essais radiophoniques du Studio au Club d'Essai: 1942–1952, a compilation of his personal concrète, along with many other artists' experimental pieces, released later in his life—1953.  The compilation has since become valued as a notable publication of the experimental music genre. With the rise of nuclear power after World War II, Pierre became a notable activist in the anti-nuclear movement, one of the main factors associated with his personal life other than his work in the field of music.
Groupe de Recherche de Musique Concrète
In 1949, Schaeffer met the percussionist-composer Pierre Henry, with whom he collaborated on many different musical compositions, and in 1951, he founded the Groupe de Recherche de Musique Concrète (GRMC) in the French Radio Institution. This gave him a new studio, which included a tape recorder. This was a significant development for Schaeffer, who previously had to work with phonographs and turntables to produce music. Schaeffer is generally acknowledged as being the first composer to make music using magnetic tape. His continued experimentation led him to publish À la Recherche d'une Musique Concrète (French for "In Search of a Concrete Music") in 1952, which was a summation of his working methods up to that point. His only opera, Orphée 53 ("Orpheus 53"), premiered in 1953.Schaeffer left the GRMC in 1953 and reformed the group in 1958 as the Groupe de Recherche Musicale[s] (GRM) (at first without "s", then with "s"), where he briefly mentored the young Jean Michel Jarre, among other students. His last "etude" (study) came in 1959: the "Study of Objects" (Etudes aux Objets).In 1954 Schaeffer founded traditional music label Ocora ("Office de Coopération Radiophonique") alongside composer, pianist and musicologist Charles Duvelle, with a worldwide coverage in order to preserve African rural soundscapes. Ocora also served as a facility to train technicians in African national broadcasting services. Today, it is still run by Duvelle.In 1988, Schaeffer appeared in a New York Times article on the 1988 Spitak earthquake. Schaeffer had led a 498-member rescue team in Leninakan to help find survivors in the aftermath of the quake.
Later life & death
Schaeffer became an associate professor at the Paris Conservatoire from 1968 to 1980 after creating a "class of fundamental music and application to the audiovisual."   He suffered from Alzheimer's disease later in his life, and died from the condition in Aix-en-Provence in 1995. He was 85 years old.Schaeffer was thereafter remembered by many of his colleagues with the title, "Musician of Sounds".
Legacy
Musique concrète   The term musique concrète (French for "real music", literally "concrete music"), which was coined by Schaeffer in 1948,  can be misunderstood as simply referring to music made from "real-world" audibles or other naturally occurring sounds that do not include an instrumental/human interface. While this aspect of musique concrète is a major factor according to how Schaeffer had developed it, it should predominantly be seen as a term describing more than simply the recording and manipulation of everyday noises. In a broader sense, the phrase embodies new sensibilities of musical expression and entails a reconceptualized framework for the long-established "organized" sound of the world, one that does not rely on familiar descriptors of rhythm and timbre, or tone and tempo. Schaeffer believed traditionally classical (or as he called it, "serious") music begins as an abstraction (musical notation) that is later produced as audible music. Musique concrète, by contrast, strives to start with the "concrete" sounds that emanate from base phenomena and then abstracts them into a composition. The term musique concrète is then, in essence, the breaking down of the structured production of traditional instruments, harmony, rhythm, and even music theory itself, in an attempt to reconstruct music from the bottom up.From the contemporary point of view, the importance of Schaeffer's musique concrète is threefold. He developed the concept of including any and all sounds into the vocabulary of music. At first he concentrated on working with sounds other than those produced by traditional musical instruments. Later on, he found it was possible to remove the familiarity of musical instrument sounds and abstract them further by techniques such as removing the attack of the recorded sound. He was among the first musicians to manipulate recorded sound for the purpose of using it in conjunction with other sounds in order to compose a musical piece. Techniques such as tape looping and tape splicing were used in his research, often comparing to sound collage. The advent of Schaeffer's manipulation of recorded sound became possible only with technologies that were developed after World War II had ended in Europe. His work is recognized today as an essential precursor to contemporary sampling practices. Schaeffer was among the first to use recording technology in a creative and specifically musical way, harnessing the power of electronic and experimental instruments in a manner similar to Luigi Russolo, whom he admired and from whose work he drew inspiration.Furthermore, he emphasized the importance of "playing" (in his terms, jeu) in the creation of music. Schaeffer's idea of jeu comes from the French verb jouer, which carries the same double meaning as the English verb play: 'to enjoy oneself by interacting with one's surroundings', as well as 'to operate a musical instrument'. This notion is at the core of the concept of musique concrète, and reflects on freely improvised sound, or perhaps more specifically electroacoustic improvisation, from the standpoint of Schaeffer's work and research.
Influences on music 
Pierre's aforementioned student in GRM, Jean Michel Jarre, went on to great international success in his own musical career. Jarre's 1997 album, Oxygene 7-13, is dedicated to Schaeffer. Pierre Henry also made a tribute to the man, composing his Écho d'Orphée, Pour P. Schaeffer alongside him for Schaeffer's last work and second compilation, L’Œuvre Musicale. His other notable pupils include Joanna Bruzdowicz, Bernard Parmegiani, Micheline Coulombe Saint-Marcoux, Armando Santiago, Elzbieta Sikora.
Research legacy 
The writers Martial Robert and Carlos Palombini have mentioned Schaeffer frequently in their works, and have penned a number of books on or referring to his life and legacy. Schaeffer being a writer himself, he coauthored several works with a number of his colleagues, such as Sophie Brunet, Marc Pierret and Michel Chion, among others. Today Schaeffer's work is still being published.
Many of Schaeffer's works have become rarities. As recently as 2006 a coauthored work of his, Sur les traces de Pierre Schaeffer, was published post-mortem.
OtherToday, in his honor, the Qwartz Electronic Music Awards has named several of its past events after Schaeffer. Pierre himself was a prize winner at the awards more than once.
Works
MusicAll of Schaeffer's musical compositions (concrète or otherwise) were recorded before the advent of the CD, either on cassettes or a more archaic form of magnetic tape (therefore the term "discography" cannot be appropriately used here; rather his music in general). Mass-production for his work was limited at best, and each piece was, by Schaeffer's terms, intended to be released foremost as an exposé to the masses of what he believed was a new and somewhat revolutionizing form of music. The original production of his marketed work was done by the "Groupe de Recherches Musicales" (a.k.a. GRM; now owned and operated by INA or the Institut National de l'Audiovisuel), the company which he initially had formed around his creations. Other music was broadcast live (Pierre himself being notable on French radio at the time) and/or done in live "concert". Some individual tracks even found their way into the use of other artists, with Pierre's work being fronted in mime performances and ballets. Now after his death, various musical production companies, such as Disques Adès and Phonurgia Nova have been given rights to distribute his work.Below is a list of Schaeffer's musical works, showing his compositions and the year(s) they were recorded.

Concertino-Diapason (1948; collaboration with J.J. Grünewald)
Cinq études de bruits (1948)
Suite pour 14 instruments (1949)
Variations sur une flûte mexicaine (1949)
Bidule en ut (1950; collaboration with Pierre Henry)
La course au kilocycle (1950; radio score, collaboration with Pierre Henry)
L'oiseau r.a.i. (1950)
Symphonie pour un homme seul (1950; collaboration with Pierre Henry; revised versions in 1953, 1955, and 1966 (Henry))
Toute la lyre (1951; pantomime, collaboration with Pierre Henry. Also known as Orphée 51)
Masquerage (1952; film score)
Les paroles dégelées (1952; music for a radio production)
Scènes de Don Juan (1952; incidental music, collaboration with Monique Rollin)
Orphée 53 (1953; opera)
Sahara d'aujourd'hui (1957; film score, collaboration with Pierre Henry)
Continuo (1958; collaboration with Luc Ferrari)
Etude aux sons animés (1958)
Etude aux allures (1958)
Exposition française à Londres (1958; collaboration with Luc Ferrari)
Etude aux objets (1959)
Nocturne aux chemins de fer (1959; incidental music)
Phèdre  (1959; incidental music)
Simultané camerounais (1959)
Phèdre (1961)
L'aura d'Olga (1962; music for a radio production, collaboration with Claude Arrieu)
Le trièdre fertile (1975; collaboration with Bernard Durr)
Bilude (1979)


Broadcasted narrativesApart from his published and publicized music, Schaeffer conducted several musical (and specifically musique concrète-related) presentations via French radio. Although these broadcasts contained musical pieces by Schaeffer they cannot be adequately described as part of his main line of musical output. This is because the radio "essays", as they were appropriately named, were mainly narration on Schaeffer's musical theories philosophies rather than compositions in and of themselves.Schaeffer's radio narratives include the following:

The Shell Filled With Planets (1944)
Cantata to Alsace (1945)
An Hour of the World (1947)
From Claudel to Brangues (1953)
Ten Years of Radio Essays by the Studio at Club Essay: 1942-1952 (1955)


Selected bibliography  Schaeffer's literary works span a range of genres, both in terms of fiction and non-fiction. He predominantly wrote treatises and essays, but also penned a film review and two plays. An ardent Catholic, Schaeffer wrote Chlothar Nicole (French: Clotaire Nicole; published 1938)—a Christian novel or short story—and Tobias (French: Tobie; published 1939) a religiously-based play.
Fiction
Novels and short stories

Chlothar Nicole (1938)
The Guardian of The Volcano (1969)
Prelude, Chorale and Fugue (1981)


Plays

Tobie (1939)
Secular Games (1946)


Non-fiction

America, We Ignore You (1946)
The Non-Visual Element of Films (1946)
In Search of a Concrete Music (1952)
Music and Acoustics (1967)


References 
Further reading

Dalibor Davidović, Nikša Gligo, Seadeta Midžić, Daniel Teruggi, and Jerica Ziherl (eds.) (2011). Proceedings of the International Conference Pierre Schaeffer: mediArt, with a foreword by Ivo Malec, papers by Daniel Teruggi, François Bayle, Jocelyne Tournet-Lammer, Dieter Kaufmann, Francisco Rivas, Seadeta Midžić, Marc Battier, Brian Willems, Leigh Landy, Cedric Maridet, Hans Peter Kuhn, Tatjana Böhme-Mehner, Jelena Novak, Martin Laliberté, Suk-Jun Kim, Darko Fritz, Stephen McCourt, Biljana Srećković, and Elzbieta Sikora. Rijeka: Muzej moderne i suvremene umjetnosti. ISBN 978-953-6501-78-6.
   
   
 


External links 
 

PierreSchaeffer.com — Official website
Le Groupe de Recherches Musicales at the Institut national de l'audiovisuel  
Club d'Essai — Unofficial website of Club d'Essai  
Les Machines à Communiquer — Unofficial website by French historian Elizabeth Antebiel  
Pierre Schaeffer at the online alumni community of the École Polytechnique  
Pierre Schaeffer at the Electronic Music Foundation
 
Pierre Schaeffer at Last.fm
Pierre Schaeffer at BBC Music
Pierre Schaeffer at Discogs
Pierre Schaeffer at Artistdirect

 
  
 
DEFAULTSORT



























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Juliette Binoche
 
 Juliette Binoche ( ; born 9 March 1964) is a French actress, artist and dancer. She has appeared in more than 40 feature films, been recipient of numerous international accolades, is a published author and has appeared on stage across the world. Coming from an artistic background, she began taking acting lessons during adolescence. After performing in several stage productions, she was propelled into the world of auteurs Jean-Luc Godard (Hail Mary, 1985), Jacques Doillon (Family Life, 1985) and André Téchiné, who made her a star in France with the leading role in his 1985 drama Rendez-vous. Her sensual performance in her English-language debut The Unbearable Lightness of Being (1988), directed by Philip Kaufman, launched her international career.She sparked the interest of Steven Spielberg, who offered her several parts including a role in Jurassic Park which she declined, choosing instead to join Krzysztof Kieślowski on the set of Three Colors: Blue (1993), a performance for which she won the Venice Film Festival Award for Best Actress and a César. Three years later Binoche gained further acclaim in Anthony Minghella's The English Patient (1996), for which she was awarded an Academy Award and a BAFTA for Best Supporting Actress in addition to the Best Actress Award at the 1997 Berlin Film Festival. For her performance in Lasse Hallström's romantic comedy Chocolat (2000) Binoche was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Actress.During the 2000s she maintained a successful, critically acclaimed career, alternating between French and English language roles in both mainstream and art-house productions. In 2010 she won the Best Actress Award at the Cannes Film Festival for her role in Abbas Kiarostami's Certified Copy making her the first actress to win the European "best actress triple crown".Throughout her career Binoche has intermittently appeared on stage, most notably in a 1998 London production of Luigi Pirandello's Naked and in a 2000 production of Harold Pinter's Betrayal on Broadway for which she was nominated for a Tony Award. In 2008 she began a world tour with a modern dance production in-i devised in collaboration with Akram Khan. Affectionately referred to as "La Binoche"  by the French press, her other notable performances include: Mauvais Sang (1986), Les Amants du Pont-Neuf (1991), Damage (1992), The Horseman on the Roof (1995), Code Unknown (2000), Caché (2005), Breaking and Entering (2006) and Flight of the Red Balloon (2007).
Early lifeBinoche was born in Paris, the daughter of Jean-Marie Binoche, a director, actor, and sculptor, and Monique Stalens, a teacher, director, and actress.  Her mother is of Polish descent. Her maternal Polish Catholic grandparents were imprisoned at Auschwitz because they were considered to be intellectuals by the Nazi occupiers.  She also has French, Flemish, Brazilian, and Moroccan ancestry.  When her parents divorced in 1968, four year old Binoche and her sister Marion were sent to a provincial boarding school. Inside the Actors Studio; Lipton, James; 27 October 2002; season 9, episode 2  During their teens, the Binoche sisters spent their school holidays with their maternal grandmother, not seeing either parent for months at a time. Binoche has stated that this perceived parental abandonment had a profound effect on her. She was not particularly academic L'Année Juliette; Première, September 1995; iss 222, p 83; (French language)  and in her teenage years she began acting at school in amateur stage productions. At 17, she directed and starred in a student production of the Eugène Ionesco play, Exit the King. She studied acting at the Conservatoire National Supérieur d'Art Dramatique (CNSAD), but quit after a short time as she disliked the curriculum.  In the early 1980s, she found an agent through a friend and joined a theater troupe with which she toured France, Belgium and Switzerland under the pseudonym "Juliette Adrienne".  Around this time she began lessons with the famed acting coach Vera Gregh. Her first professional screen experience was as an extra in the three part TF1 television series Dorothée, danseuse de corde (1983) directed by Jacques Fensten, which was followed by a similarly small role in the provincial television film Fort bloque directed by Pierrick Guinnard. Following this Binoche secured her first feature film appearance with a minor role in Pascal Kané's Liberty Belle (1983). Her role required just two days on set, but was enough to inspire Binoche to pursue a career in film. 
Career

1984–1991
Binoche's early films would see her established as a French star of some renown.  In 1983, she auditioned for the female lead in Jean-Luc Godard's' controversial Hail Mary, a modern retelling of the Virgin birth.  Godard requested a meeting with Binoche having seen a photo of her taken by her boyfriend of the time. Juliette Binoche: The First Act, Brody, Richard; The New Yorker, 10 March 2011; Retrieved 18 April 2011  She has said that she spent six months on the set of the film in Geneva, although her role in the final cut is contained to only a few scenes.   Further supporting roles followed in a variety of French films: Annick Lanoë's Les Nanas was to give Binoche her most noteworthy role to date, playing opposite established stars Marie-France Pisier and Macha Meril, in a mainstream comedy. Juliette Binoche. Die unnahbare Schöne; Blum, Katerina; Wilhelm Heyne Verlag, 1995; ISBN 3-453-08129-3; p 76; (German language)  However, she has stated that the experience was not particularly memorable or influential. L'Année Juliette; Première, September 1995; iss 222, p 84; (French language)  She gained more significant exposure in Jacques Doillon's critically acclaimed Family Life, which cast her as the volatile teenage step-daughter of Sami Frey's central character. This film was to set the tone of her early career.  Doillon has commented that in the original screenplay her character was written to be 14 years old, he was so impressed with Binoche's audition he changed the character's age to 17 to allow her take the role.  In April 1985, Binoche followed this with another supporting role in Bob Decout's Adieu Blaireau, a policier thriller starring Philippe Léotard and Annie Girardot. Adieu Blaireau failed to have much impact with critics or audiences. It was to be later in 1985 that Binoche would fully emerge as a leading actress with her role in André Téchiné's Rendez-vous. She was cast at short notice when Sandrine Bonnaire had to abandon the film due to a scheduling conflict.  Rendez-vous premiered at the 1985 Cannes Film Festival, winning Best Director. The film was a sensation and Binoche became the darling of the festival.  Rendez-Vous is the story of a provincial actress, Nina (Binoche), who arrives in Paris and embarks on a series of dysfunctional liaisons with several men, including the moody, suicidal Quentin (Lambert Wilson). However it is her collaboration with theatre director Scrutzler, played by Jean-Louis Trintignant, which comes to define Nina. L'Année Juliette; Première, September 1995; iss 222, p 88; (French language)  In a review of Rendez-Vous in Film Comment, Armond White described it as "Juliette Binoche's career defining performance".  In 1986, Binoche was nominated for her first César for Best Actress in a Leading Role for her performance in the film.  Following Rendez-Vous, she was unsure of what role to take next. She auditioned unsuccessfully for Yves Boisset's Bleu comme l'enfer and Robin Davis's Hors la loi,  but was eventually cast in My Brother-in-law Killed My Sister (1986) by Jacques Rouffio opposite the popular French stars Michel Serrault and Michel Piccoli. This film was a critical and commercial failure.  Binoche has commented that Rouffio's film is very significant to her career as it taught her to judge roles based on the quality of the screenplay and her connection with a director, not on the reputation of other cast members.  Later in 1986, she again starred opposite Michel Piccoli in Leos Carax's Mauvais Sang. This film was a critical and commercial success, leading to Binoche's second César nomination. Mauvais Sang is an avant-garde thriller in which she plays Anna the vastly younger lover of Marc (Piccoli) who falls in love with Alex (Denis Lavant), a young thief.  Binoche has stated that she, "discovered the camera", while shooting this film. In August 1986, Binoche began filming Philip Kaufman's adaptation of Milan Kundera's The Unbearable Lightness of Being, portraying the young and innocent Tereza.  Released in 1988, this was Binoche's first English language role and was a worldwide success with critics and audiences alike  Set against the Russian invasion of Prague in 1968, the film tells the story of the relationships a Czech surgeon, Tomas (Daniel Day-Lewis), has with his wife Tereza and his lover Sabina (Lena Olin). Binoche has stated that at the time her English was very limited and that she relied on a French translation to fully grasp her role.  After this success, Binoche decided to return to France rather than pursue an international career. Juliette Binoche. Die unnahbare Schöne; Blum, Katerina; Wilhelm Heyne Verlag, 1995; ISBN 3-453-08129-3; p 89; (German language)  In 1988, she filmed the lead in Pierre Pradinas's Un tour de manège, a little-seen French film opposite François Cluzet.  She has stated that her attraction to this film was that it gave her the opportunity to work with close friends and family.  Pradinas is the husband of her sister Marion Stalens who was set photographer on the film and appeared in a cameo role.  In the summer of 1988, Binoche returned to the stage in an acclaimed production of Anton Checkov's The Seagull directed by Russian director Andrei Konchalovsky at Théâtre De L'odéon in Paris.  Later that year she began work on Léos Carax's Les Amants du Pont-Neuf.  The film was beset by problems and took three years to complete, requiring investment from three producers and funds from the French government. Cahiers du Cinema, Iss. 448, Oct. 1991  When finally released in 1991, Les Amants du Pont-Neuf was a critical success. Binoche won a European Film Award  as well as securing her third César nomination for her performance. In the film Binoche portrays an artist who lives rough on the famous Parisian bridge where she meets another young vagrant (Denis Lavant). This iconic part of the city becomes the backdrop for a wildly passionate love story and some of the most visually arresting images of the city ever created.  The paintings featured in the film were Binoche's own work.  She also designed the French poster for the film which features an ink drawing of the eponymous lovers locked in embrace.  During a break in filming in 1990, Binoche spent five days shooting Mara for Mike Figgis, based on Henry Miller's Quiet Days in Clichy. This 30 minute film was part of HBO's anthology series Women & Men 2.  The film became somewhat contentious when, according to Mike Figgis, HBO altered it once he had completed it.  The film premiered on HBO in the U.S. on 18 August 1991. At this point, Binoche seemed to be at a crossroads in her career. She was recognized as one of the most significant French actresses of her generation.  However, the long production of Les Amants du Pont-Neuf had forced her to turn down several significant roles in international productions including The Double Life of Véronique by Krzysztof Kieślowski, Cyrano de Bergerac by Jean-Paul Rappeneau, Night and Day by Chantal Akerman and Beyond the Aegean an aborted project with Elia Kazan.  Now Binoche chose to pursue an international career outside France. 
1992–2000
The 1990s saw Juliette Binoche inaugurated as a European leading lady in a series of international films that were critical and commercial successes winning Binoche much praise and numerous awards for her performances. Blum, Katerina, Juliette Binoche. die unnahbare Schöne, Wilhelm Heyne Verlag, 1995, ISBN 3-453-08129-3 p.119 to p.125  This period saw her persona develop from that of a young gamine to a more melancholic, tragic presence. Critics suggested that many of her roles were notable for her almost passive intensity in the face of tragedy and despair. Sight & Sound | June 2000. BFI (7 December 2010). Retrieved on 7 January 2011.  In fact Binoche has nicknamed her characters from this period as her "sorrowful sisters".  Following the long shoot of Les Amants du Pont-Neuf, Binoche relocated to London for the 1992 productions of Emily Brontë's Wuthering Heights and Damage, both of which considerably enhanced her international reputation.  Yet, from a professional and personal point-of-view, both films were significant challenges for Binoche; her casting opposite Ralph Fiennes's Heathcliff in Wuthering Heights, in favour of English actresses Helena Bonham Carter  and Kate Beckinsale,  was immediately contentious and drew derision from the British press, unimpressed that a uniquely English role had gone to a French actress.  The film had its world premiere at the 1992 Edinburgh International Film Festival. Reviews were poor, with Binoche being cynically dubbed "Cathy Clouseau" and being derided for her "franglais" accent.  Both Binoche and director Peter Kosminsky distanced themselves from the film, with Binoche refusing to do any promotion for the film or to redub it into French. Quoted in feature article Première Magazine No 222, 09/1995  Damage, a UK and French co-production, is the story of a British conservative minister played by Jeremy Irons who embarks on a torrid affair with his son's fiancée (Binoche). Based on the novel by Josephine Hart and directed by veteran French director Louis Malle, Damage seemed to be the ideal international vehicle for Binoche; however the production was wrought with difficulties and dogged by rumours of serious conflict. In an on-set interview, Louis Malle stated that it was the "most difficult" film he had ever made, while Binoche commented that "the first day was one big argument".  Damage opened in the UK late in 1992 and debuted early in 1993 on US screens. Reviews were somewhat mixed.  For her performance, Juliette Binoche received her fourth César nomination.In 1993, she appeared in Krzysztof Kieślowski's Three Colors: Blue to much critical acclaim.  The first film in a trilogy inspired by the ideals of the French republic and the colors of its flag, Three Colors: Blue is the story of a young woman who loses her composer husband and daughter in a car accident. Though devastated she learns to cope by rejecting her previous life in favour of conscious "nothing"; rejecting all people, belongings and emotions.  Three Colors: Blue premiered at the 1993 Venice Film Festival, landing Binoche the Best Actress Prize. She also won a César, and a nomination for the Golden Globe. Binoche has said her inspirations for the role were her friend and coach Vernice Klier who suffered a similar tragedy, and the book The Black Veil by Anny Duperey which deals with the author's grief at losing her parents at a young age.  Binoche made cameo appearances in the other two films in Kieślowski's trilogy, Three Colors: White and Three Colors: Red. Around this time, Steven Spielberg offered her roles in Jurassic Park and Schindler's List. She turned down both parts.  After the success of Three Colors: Blue, Binoche took a short sabbatical during which she gave birth to her son Raphaël in September 1993. In 1995, Binoche returned to the screen in a big-budget adaptation of Jean Giono's The Horseman on the Roof directed by Jean-Paul Rappeneau. The film was particularly significant in France as it was the first French production to use digital special effects and was at the time the most expensive film in the history of French cinema.  The film was a box-office success around the world and Binoche was again nominated for a César for Best Actress. This role, as a romantic heroine, was to color the direction of many of her subsequent roles in the late 1990s.  In 1996, Binoche appeared in her first comedic role since My Brother-in-Law Killed My Sister a decade before; A Couch in New York was directed by Chantal Akerman and co-starred William Hurt. This screw-ball comedy tells the story of a New York psychiatrist who swaps homes with a Parisian dancer.  The film was a critical and commercial failure.  Three Colors: Blue, The Horseman on the Roof and A Couch in New York all gave Binoche the opportunity to work with prestigious directors she had turned down during the prolonged shoot of Les Amants du Pont-Neuf.  Her next role would significantly reinforce her position as a bona fide international movie star, The English Patient, based on the prize winning novel by Michael Ondaatje and directed by Anthony Minghella, was a worldwide hit.  Produced by Saul Zaentz, producer of The Unbearable Lightness of Being, the film reunited Juliette Binoche with Ralph Fiennes, Heathcliff to her Cathy four years previously. Binoche has said that the shoot on location in Tuscany and at the famed Cinecittà in Rome was among the happiest professional experiences of her career.  The film, which tells the story of a badly burned, mysterious man found in the wreckage of a plane during World War II, won nine Academy Awards, including Best Supporting Actress for Juliette Binoche.  With this film, she became the second French actress to win an Oscar, following Simone Signoret's win for Room at the Top in 1960. After this international hit, Binoche returned to France and began work opposite Daniel Auteuil on Claude Berri's Lucie Aubrac, the true story of a French Resistance heroine. Binoche was released from the film six weeks into the shoot due to differences with Berri regarding the authenticity of his script.  Binoche has described this event as being like "an earthquake" to her. 
Next Juliette Binoche was reunited with director André Téchiné for Alice et Martin (1998), the story of a relationship between an emotionally damaged Parisian musician and her younger lover who hides a dark family secret. The film failed to find an audience in France, although it was critically acclaimed in the UK.  In February 1998 Binoche made her London stage debut in a new version of Luigi Pirandello's Clothe the Naked  retitled Naked and adapted by Nicolas Wright. The production, directed by Jonathan Kent, was very favorably received.   Following this acclaimed performance, she returned to French screens with Children of the Century (1999), a big budget romantic epic, in which she played 19th-century French proto-feminist author George Sand. The film depicted Sand's affair with the poet and dandy Alfred de Musset played by Benoit Magimel. This lavish costume drama was filmed on location in Paris and Venice and featured couture costumes by the renowned fashion designer Christian Lacroix.  The following year saw Binoche in four contrasting roles, each of which enhanced her reputation. La Veuve de Saint-Pierre (2000) by Patrice Leconte, for which she was nominated for a César for Best Actress, was a period drama which saw Binoche appear opposite Daniel Auteuil in the role of a woman who attempts to save a condemned man from the guillotine.  The film won favourable reviews, particularly in the U.S.  where it was nominated for a Golden Globe for Best Foreign Language Film. The film won the Audience Award at the 2000 Toronto Film Festival  Next she appeared in Michael Haneke's Code Unknown, a film which was made following Binoche's approach to the Austrian director.  The film premiered in competition at the 2000 Cannes Film Festival.  This critically acclaimed role was a welcome change from playing the romantic heroine in a series of costume dramas.  Later that year, Binoche made her Broadway debut in an adaptation of Harold Pinter's Betrayal for which she was nominated for a Tony Award. Staged by the Roundabout Theatre Company and directed by David Leveaux, the production also featured Liev Schreiber and John Slattery.  Back on screen, Binoche was the heroine of the Lasse Hallström film Chocolat from the best selling novel by Joanne Harris. For her role Binoche won a European Film Audience Award for Best Actress and was nominated for an Academy Award and a BAFTA.  Chocolat is the story of a mysterious stranger who opens a chocolaterie in a conservative French village in 1959. The film was a worldwide hit. Between 1995 and 2000, Binoche was the advertising face of the Lancôme perfume Poème, her image adorning print campaigns photographed by Richard Avedon  and a television advertising campaign,  including an advert directed by Anthony Minghella and scored by Gabriel Yared. By the end of this period and following roles in a number of prestige productions, critics were wondering if Binoche was typecast as the tragic, despairing muse. In a feature article entitled "The Erotic Face" in the June 2000 edition of British film criticism magazine Sight and Sound, Ginette Vincendeau pondered Binoche's persona; Vincendeau suggested that the fixation of numerous directors upon her face had led to an erasure of her body, and to her being perceived only as a romantic icon rather than a versatile actress. 
2001–2006
Following the success of Chocolat, the early 2000s saw Juliette Binoche internationally recognized as an A-list movie star.  However, her persona seemed to be somewhat fixed following a series of period roles where she played the always stoic heroine facing tragedy and desolation.  Ever keen to try something new, Binoche returned to French cinema in 2002 in an unlikely role; Jet Lag opposite Jean Reno saw Binoche play a ditzy beautician.  The film, directed by Daniele Thompson, was a box-office hit in France and saw Binoche once again nominated for a César for Best Actress.  The film tells the story of a couple who meet at an airport during a strike. Initially the pair despises each other, but, over the course of one night, they find common ground and maybe even love. This playful spirit continued when Binoche featured in a 2003 Italian television commercial for the chocolates Ferrero Rocher. The advertisement played upon her Chocolat persona featuring Binoche handing out the chocolates to people on the streets of Paris. In a more serious vein, Binoche travelled to South Africa to make John Boorman's In My Country (2004) opposite Samuel L. Jackson. Based on the book Country of My Skull by Antjie Krog, the film examines The Truth and Reconciliation Commission (TRC) hearings following the abolition of Apartheid in the mid 1990s.  Although the film premiered at the 2004 Berlin Film Festival, it received much criticism for the inclusion of a fictional romantic liaison and for its depiction of black South Africans.  Despite the negative reception, Binoche was extremely enthusiastic about the film and her connection with Boorman.   Her sister, Marion Stalens, also travelled to South Africa to shoot a documentary, La reconciliation?, which explores the TRC process and follows Binoche's progress as she acts in Boorman's film.    Next, Binoche re-teamed with Michael Haneke for Caché. The film was an immediate success, winning best director for Haneke at the 2005 Cannes Film Festival,  while Binoche was nominated for a European Film Award for Best Actress for her role.  The film tells the story of a bourgeois Parisian couple, played by Binoche and Daniel Auteuil, who begin to receive anonymous videotapes containing footage shot over long periods, surveying the outside of their home. Caché went on to feature in the number one position on the "Top 10 of the 2000s" list published by The Times at the end of the decade.  Binoche's next film, Bee Season, based on the celebrated novel by Myla Goldberg, cast her opposite Richard Gere. The film was not a success at the box office taking less than $5 million worldwide.  For many critics the film, although intelligent, was "distant and diffuse".  Bee Season depicts the emotional disintegration of a family just as their daughter begins to win national spelling bees. Mary (2005) featured Binoche in a somewhat unlikely collaboration with the controversial American director Abel Ferrara for an investigation of modern faith and Mary Magdalene's position within the Catholic Church.  Featuring Forest Whittaker, Matthew Modine and Marion Cotillard, Mary was an immediate success, winning the Grand Prix at the 2005 Venice Film Festival. Despite these accolades and favorable reviews, particularly from the influential cultural magazine Les Inrockuptibles,  Mary failed to secure a distributor in key markets such as the U.S. and the U.K. The Cannes Film Festival in 2006 saw Binoche feature in the anthology film Paris, je t'aime appearing in a section directed by the Japanese director Nobuhiro Suwa. Suwa's Place des Victoires is the story of a grief-stricken mother who manages to have a final brief moment with her dead son. The segment also features Willem Dafoe and Hippolyte Girardot. Paris, je t'aime was a popular success, taking over $17 million, at the world box-office.  In September 2006, Binoche appeared at the Venice Film Festival to launch A Few Days in September, written and directed by Santiago Amigorena. Despite an impressive cast including John Turturro, Nick Nolte and up-coming French star Sara Forestier, the film was a failure. A Few Days in September is a thriller set between 5 and 11 September 2001, in which Binoche plays a French secret service agent, who may, or may not, have information relating to impending attacks on the U.S.  The film was the recipient of harsh criticism from the press for its perceived trivialization of the events of 11 September 2001.  While promoting the film in the U.K., Binoche told an interviewer she believed the CIA and other government agencies must have had foreknowledge of the 11 September attacks, as depicted in the film.  Next Binoche traveled to the 2006 Toronto Film Festival for the premiere of Breaking and Entering, her second film with Anthony Minghella in the director's chair, based on his first original screenplay since his break-through film Truly, Madly, Deeply (1991). In Breaking and Entering, Binoche played a Bosnian refugee living in London, while Jude Law co-starred as a well-to-do businessman drawn into her life via an act of deception. In preparation for her role, Binoche travelled to Sarajevo where she met women who had survived the war of the 1990s.  Lushly photographed by Benoît Delhomme, Breaking and Entering portrays intersecting lives amongst the flux of urban renewal in inner-city London.  Despite the fact that Binoche was praised for her performance, the film did not ring true for critics and failed to find an audience.  In a review in Variety, Todd McCarthy writes that, "Binoche, physically unchanged as ever, plays Amira's controlled anguish with skill".  Breaking and Entering also featured Robin Wright, Vera Farmiga, Juliet Stevenson, Rafi Gavron and Martin Freeman.Although Binoche began the decade on a professional high with an Academy Award nomination for Chocolat, she struggled at the beginning of the 2000s to secure roles that did not confine her to the tragic, melancholic persona developed in the 1990s.    Despite the huge success of Caché, other high profile films such as In My Country, Bee Season and Breaking and Entering failed critically  and commercially,  Binoche seemed to be at a crossroads in her career. 
2007–present2007 was the start of a particularly busy period for Juliette Binoche, one that would see her take on diverse roles in a series of critically acclaimed international movies giving her film career a new impetus, as she shed the restrictions that seemed to have stifled her career in the early part of the decade.  The Cannes Film Festival saw the premiere of Flight of the Red Balloon (2007) by the widely acclaimed Taiwanese director Hou Hsiao-Hsien. It was originally conceived as a short film to form part of a 20th anniversary tribute to the Musée D'Orsay, to be produced by Serge Lemoine president of the museum. When that idea failed to find sufficient funding, Hou developed it into a feature length film and secured the necessary financing.  The film was well received by international critics and went on to debut around the world early in 2008. Paying homage to Albert Lamorisse's 1957 short The Red Balloon, Hou's film tells the story of a woman's efforts to juggle her responsibilities as a single mother with her commitment to her career as a voice artist. Shot on location in Paris, the film was entirely improvised by the cast.  The film was number one on the influential critic J. Hoberman's "Top 10 List" for 2008 published in The Village Voice. Disengagement by Amos Gitai premiered out-of-competition at the 2007 Venice Film Festival. Co-starring Liron Levo and Jeanne Moreau, Disengagement is a political drama charting the story of a French woman, of Dutch/Palestinian origin, who goes in search of a daughter she abandoned 20 years previously on the Gaza strip. She arrives in Gaza during the 2005 Israeli disengagement.  The film won the prestigious Premio Roberto Rossellini  and was critically acclaimed, particularly by the eminent Cahiers du Cinema.  However the film proved more controversial in Israel where state television station Channel 1 withdrew financial support for the film citing the "left-wing nature of Gitai's films". In stark contrast, Peter Hedges co-wrote and directed the Disney produced Dan in Real Life, a romantic comedy featuring Binoche alongside Steve Carell. It was released in October 2007, becoming a popular commercial success in the US, before debuting around the world in 2008. The film grossed over $65 million at the worldwide box-office.  Dan in Real Life is the story of a widowed man (Carell) who meets, and instantly falls for, a woman (Binoche), only to discover she is the new girlfriend of his brother. The film also features Dane Cook, Emily Blunt and Diane Weist Back in France, Binoche was seen to popular and critical success in Paris directed by Cédric Klapisch. Paris is Klapisch's personal ode to the French capital and features an impressive ensemble of French talent, including Romain Duris, Fabrice Luchini and Mélanie Laurent. Paris was one of the most successful French films internationally in recent years, having grossed over $22 million at the world box office.  Binoche and Klapisch had originally met on the set of Mauvais Sang in 1986, where Klapisch was working as a set electrician. Also in France, Summer Hours (2008), directed by Olivier Assayas, is the critically acclaimed story of three siblings who struggle with the responsibility of disposing of their late mother's valuable art collection. The film premiered in France in March 2008 and had its U.S. debut at the 2008 New York Film Festival, before going on general release in the U.S. on 19 May 2009. Widely acclaimed, the film was nominated for the Prix Louis Delluc in France and appeared on numerous U.S. "Top 10 lists", including first place on David Edelstein's "Top 10 of 2009" list in New York Magazine, and J.R. Jones's list in the Chicago Reader.  Summer Hours also features Charles Berling, Jérémie Renier and Édith Scob.In the autumn of 2008, Binoche starred in a theatrical dance production titled in-i, co-created with renowned choreographer Akram Khan. The show, a love story told through dance and dialogue, featured stage design by Anish Kapoor and music by Philip Sheppard. It premiered at the National Theatre in London before embarking on a world tour.  Writing in The Australian, John McCallum wrote that, "Binoche has radiant presence as an actor, her dancing is relaxed and naturalistic",   while The Sunday Times in the UK commented that, "Binoche's physical achievement is incredible: Khan is a master mover". The production was part of a 'Binoche Season' titled Ju'Bi'lations, also featuring a retrospective of her film work and an exhibition of her paintings, which were also published in a bilingual book Portraits in Eyes.  The book featured ink portraits of Binoche as each of her characters and of each director she had worked with up to that time. She also penned a few lines to each director. In April 2006 and again in December 2007, Binoche travelled to Tehran at the invitation of Abbas Kiarostami.  While there in 2007, she shot a cameo appearance in his film Shirin (2008) which he was shooting at the time. Binoche's visit proved controversial when two Iranian MPs raised the matter in parliament, advising more caution be exercised in granting visas to foreign celebrities which might lead to "cultural destruction".  In June 2009 Binoche began work on Certified Copy directed by Kiarostami.  The film was an Official Selection in competition at the 2010 Cannes Film Festival.      Binoche won the Best Actress Award at the festival for her performance. The film went on general release in France on 19 May 2010 to very positive reviews.  Her win at the 2010 Cannes Film festival makes Binoche the first actress to win the European "best actress triple crown": Best Actress at Venice for Three Colors: Blue, Best Actress at Berlin for The English Patient and Best Actress at Cannes for Certified Copy. The September 2010 UK release of the film was overshadowed when French actor Gérard Depardieu made disparaging comments about Binoche to the Austrian magazine Profil, "Please can you explain to me what the mystery of Juliette Binoche is meant to be?" he said. "I would really like to know why she has been so esteemed for so many years. She has nothing – absolutely nothing".  In response, while promoting Certified Copy, Binoche spoke to movie magazine Empire saying, "I don't know him. I understand you don't have to like everyone and you can dislike someone's work. But I don't understand the violence [of his statements]... I do not understand why he is behaving like this. It is his problem."  Certified Copy proved to be controversial in Kiarostami's homeland when Iranian authorities announced on 27 May 2010 that the film was to be banned in Iran, apparently due to Binoche's attire; Deputy Culture Minister Javad Shamaqdari is quoted as saying, "If Juliette Binoche were better clad it could have been screened but due to her attire there will not be a general screening." 
 Following the success of Certified Copy, Binoche appeared in a brief supporting role in The Son of No One for American writer and director Dito Montiel. The film also stars Channing Tatum, Al Pacino and Ray Liotta. The Son of No One premiered at the 2011 Sundance Film Festival to fairly negative reaction.  It was acquired by Anchor Bay Entertainment for distribution in the US and other key territories arriving in selected US cinemas on 4 November 2011.  As of December 2011, according to film review aggregator Rotten Tomatoes, The Son of No One is Juliette Binoche's least critically successful film, with only 18% of critics giving it a positive review.  In June 2010, Binoche started work on Elles for Polish director Malgorzata Szumowska. Elles, produced under the working title Sponsoring,   is an examination of teenage prostitution with Juliette Binoche playing a journalist for ELLE. The film was released in France on 1 February 2012.  On 12 January 2011, Variety announced that Juliette Binoche would star in The Life of Another loosely based on the novel by Frédérique Deghelt.  The film is the directorial debut of the French actress Sylvie Testud and co-stars actor/director Mathieu Kassovitz. In the film, a young woman falls in love, then wakes up 15 years later, the mother of a young boy and on the verge of a divorce. The film began shooting on 4 April 2011 and was released on French screens on 15 February 2012. On 17 February 2011, Screendaily announced that Binoche had been cast in David Cronenberg's film Cosmopolis with Robert Pattinson, Paul Giamatti, Mathieu Amalric, and Samantha Morton.  The film, produced by Paulo Branco, began principal photography on 24 May 2011 and was released in 2012.  In October 2011, Binoche began work on A Cœur Ouvert opposite Edgar Ramirez and directed by Marion Laine. Based on the novel by Mathias Énard, the film is the story of the obsessive relationship between two wildly successful surgeons. When addiction and an unexpected pregnancy almost destroys their relationship, they embark on a cathartic journey to the Orinoco.  In 2012 Juliette Binoche is slated to take the lead in Bruno Dumont's La Créatrice, a drama which recounts three days during the thirty years French artist Camille Claudel spent in a mental asylum despite the fact that she had not been diagnosed with any malady. The film will examine Claudel's fight to maintain her sanity and find creative inspiration. Following this, Binoche will shoot A Stormy Summer Night based on the classic French novel Dix heures et demie du soir en été by Marguerite Duras. The film is to be directed by first time helmer Fabrice Camoin for release in early 2013. 

"I don't look back on the past because I like to live in the present. I know this makes some people think I probably never cared, but I need my freedom and I like to keep moving." - Juliette Binoche   


Personal lifeBinoche has two children: a son Raphaël (born on 2 September 1993), whose father is André Halle, a professional scuba diver, and a daughter Hana (born on 16 December 1999), whose father is actor Benoît Magimel, with whom Binoche starred in the 1999 film Children of the Century. Her sister, Marion Stalens, born 1960, is a professional photographer with Corbis, as well as a director of documentary films, including; La réconciliation?, a documentary shot on the set of John Boorman's film In My Country,  The Actress and the Dancer, exploring the genesis of Binoche's dance show in-i  and Juliette Binoche - Sketches for a Portrait a documentary which follows Binoche as she paints the portraits that would later appear in her book Portraits in Eyes.  Her half brother Camille Humeau (born 1978) is an acclaimed musician and has been part of the line-up of Oncle Strongle,   before top-lining the group Artichaut Orkestra.    In 2007, he appeared in a stage production of Cabaret directed by Sam Mendes.  Stage director Pierre Pradinas is married to her sister Marion. 
Charitable workSince 1992, Binoche is a patron of the French Cambodian charity Enfants d'Asie (previously ASPECA). Through this charity she is godmother to five Cambodian orphans, and has funded the construction of a children's home in Battambang.  Starting in 2000, Juliette Binoche has been involved with the organization Reporters Without Borders. In 2002, she presided over "Photos of Stars" with Thierry Ardisson. Nearly 100 French stars were given disposable cameras, which were then auctioned, the buyer then having the exclusive photos taken by the star developed. 
Political views and activismIn April 2002, Binoche and several other French stars including Catherine Deneuve and Mathieu Kassovitz attended a "protest picnic" to object to the firing of Canal+ chairman Pierre Lescure by the Vivendi Universal company. On 7 February 2006, Binoche attented a high profile demonstration organised by Reporters Without Borders in support of Jill Carroll and two Iraqi journalists who had been abducted in Baghdad. She supported José Bové in the 2007 French presidential elections which were won by Nicolas Sarkozy.  She has disclosed on a number of occasions that she does not approve of the Sarkozy administration, stating that the president is creating a monarchic republic.   Binoche and numerous other French personalities including Isabelle Adjani, Yvan Attal, Jane Birkin and Josiane Balasko joined Réseau Education Sans Frontieres (RESF) on 7 January 2010 with a symbolic "cake of solidarity" to highlight the taxation and legitimacy issues being faced by undocumented workers in France. Binoche was a signatory to a June 2010 petition organized by Reporters Without Borders and Shirin Ebadi to protest against the detention of numerous people, including members of the press, who were protesting the occasion of the first anniversary of disputed re-election of Mahmoud Ahmadinejad. At the 2010 Cannes Film Festival Binoche spoke out against the detention of Iranian director Jafar Panahi, incarcerated in Teheran's Evin Prison since 1 March 2010 without charge or conviction. At the press conference following the press screening of Copie Conforme, Binoche was informed that Panahi had begun a hunger strike. Binoche’s appeal “very influential” in Iranian director's release | The Observers. Observers.france24.com (25 May 2010). Retrieved on 7 January 2011.  The following day Binoche attended a press conference called especially to demand the release of Panahi. Also in attendance were Abbas Kiarostami, Mohsen Makhmalbaf, Gilles Jacob. Binoche read a letter which pointed out that Panahi's detention was "unwarranted and intolerable". When Binoche was awarded the Best Actress award at the festival, brandishing his name on a placard, she used her speech as an opportunity to raise Panahi's plight once again.  On 25 May it was announced that Panahi had been released on bail. It was generally agreed that the publicity Binoche and Kiarostami elicited for his case was a strong factor in his release.  On 20 December 2010 Panahi, after being prosecuted for "assembly and colluding with the intention to commit crimes against the country's national security and propaganda against the Islamic Republic," was handed a six-year jail sentence and a 20-year ban on making or directing any movies, writing screenplays, giving any form of interview with Iranian or foreign media as well as leaving the country. Binoche continues to lobby on his behalf. 
Filmography and awards

List of acting performances in film and television
Year Title Role Notes 
1983 Dorothée, danseuse de corde minor role Television film Also known as Dorothy the Rope Dancer 
1983 Liberty belle Girl at the rally  
1985   A friend of Veronique Also known as A Better Life 
1985 Rendez-vous Nina/Anne Larrieux Nominated - César Award for Best Actress 
1985 Adieu Blaireau Brigitte Also known as Farewell to Fred 
1985 Family Life Natacha Also known as La Vie de famille 
1985   Antoinette Also known as The Girls 
1985 Hail Mary Juliette Also known as Je Vous salue, Marie 
1985 Fort bloqué Nicole Television film 
1986 Mauvais Sang Anna Nominated - César Award for Best Actress Also known as Bad Blood and The Night is Young 
1986 My Brother-in-law Killed My Sister Esther Bouloire Also known as Mon Beau-frère a tué ma soeur 
1988   Tereza  
1989   Elsa Also known as Once Around the Park 
1991   Michèle Stalens Also known as The Lovers on the Bridge European Film Award for Best Actress Nominated - César Award for Best Actress 
1991 Women & Men 2 Mara Television film Segment "Henry Miller's Mara" 
1992 Damage Anna Barton Nominated - César Award for Best Actress 
1992 Emily Brontë's Wuthering Heights Cathy Linton / Catherine Earnshaw  
1993 Three Colors: Blue Julie Vignon (de Courcy) César Award for Best Actress Venice Film Festival for Best Actress Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Actress - Motion Picture Drama Also known as Trois couleurs bleu 
1995   Pauline de Théus Nominated – César Award for Best Actress. Also known as Le Hussard sur le toit 
1996   Hana Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Supporting Role Chlotrudis Award for Best Supporting Actress Silver Bear for Best Actress Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Supporting Actress – Motion Picture Nominated - Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Supporting Role 
1996   Beatrice Saulnier Also known as Un Divan à New York 
1998 Alice et Martin Alice Also known as Alice and Martin 
1999 Children of the Century George Sand/Baroness Aurore Dudevant Also known as Les Enfants du siècle 
2000 Chocolat Vianne Rocher European Film Award for Best Actress Nominated - Academy Award for Best Actress Nominated - BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role Nominated - Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Leading Role Nominated - Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Cast in a Motion Picture Nominated - Golden Globe Award for Best Actress – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy 
2000 Code Unknown Anne Laurent Also known as Code inconnu 
2000   Pauline (Madame La) Nominated - César Award for Best Actress Also known as La Veuve de Saint-Pierre 
2002 Jet Lag Rose Nominated - César Award for Best Actress Also known as Décalage horaire 
2004 In My Country Anna Malan Also known as Country of My Skull 
2005 Mary Marie Palesi / Mary Magdalene  
2005 Bee Season Miriam  
2005 Caché Anne Laurent Nominated - European Film Award for Best Actress Also known as Hidden 
2006 Breaking and Entering Amira  
2006   Irène Montano Also known as Quelques jours en septembre 
2006 Paris, je t'aime Suzanne Segment "Place des Victoires" 
2007 Dan in Real Life Marie  
2007 Disengagement Ana  
2007 Flight of the Red Balloon Suzanne Also known as Le Voyage du ballon Rouge 
2008 Paris Elise  
2008 Summer Hours Adrienne Also known as L'Heure d'été 
2008 Shirin Woman in audience  
2010 Certified Copy Elle Cannes Film Festival Award for Best Actress Also known as Copie Conforme 
2011 The Son of No One Lauren  
2011 Elles Anne Also known as Sponsoring 
2012 Cosmopolis Didi Fancher  
2012 The Life of Another Marie Post Production  Also known as La Vie d'une autre 
2012 An Open Heart Mila Production  Also known as Un Singe sur l'Epaule 
2012 La Créatrice Camille Claudel Pre Production 
2013 A Stormy Summer Night Maria Pre Production  Also known as Orage d'Une Nuit d'Été 

Other awards

Won

1986 – Prix Romy Schneider
1992 – European Film Award – Best Actress – Les Amants du Pont-Neuf
1993 – Berlin International Film Festival – Berlinale Camera   
1993 – Venice Film Festival – Best Actress – Three Colors: Blue
1996 – National Board of Review – Best Supporting Actress – The English Patient
1997 – Berlin International Film Festival – Best Actress – The English Patient   
1997 – European Film Award – Best Actress – The English Patient
1997 – Screen Actors Guild Award – Best Supporting Actress – The English Patient
2010 – Cannes Film Festival – Best Actress – Certified Copy
2010 – Kerry Film Festival – Maureen O'Hara Award 
2010 – Cairo International Film Festival – Lifetime achievement 


Nominations

2001 – Screen Actors Guild Award – Best Actress – Chocolat
2001 – Academy Award for Best Actress in a Leading Role – Chocolat
2001 – Screen Actors Guild Award – Outstanding Cast – Chocolat
2005 – European Film Award Best Actress; – Caché
2005 – London Critics Circle Film Awards – Best Actress – Caché
2006 – British Independent Film Award – Best Actress – Breaking & Entering


References 
External links 
 

 
 
 
Juliette Binoche at filmsdefrance.com
Juliette Binoche Interview at AMCtv.com
  
 
DEFAULTSORT










 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	André Breton
 
 
André Breton ( ; 19 February 1896 – 28 September 1966) was a French writer and poet. He is known best as the founder of Surrealism. His writings include the first Surrealist Manifesto (Manifeste du surréalisme) of 1924, in which he defined surrealism as "pure psychic automatism".
BiographyBorn to a family of modest means in Tinchebray (Orne) in Normandy, he studied medicine and psychiatry. During World War I he worked in a neurological ward in Nantes, where he met the devotee of Alfred Jarry, Jacques Vaché, whose anti-social attitude and disdain for established artistic tradition influenced Breton considerably. Vaché committed suicide at age 24, and his war-time letters to Breton and others were published in a volume entitled Lettres de guerre (1919), for which Breton wrote four introductory essays.Breton married his first wife, Simone Kahn, on 15 September 1921. The couple relocated to rue Fontaine # 42 in Paris on 1 January 1922. The apartment on rue Fontaine became home to Breton's collection of more than 5,300 items: modern paintings, drawings, sculptures, photographs, books, art catalogs, journals, manuscripts, and works of popular and Oceanic art.
From Dada to SurrealismIn 1919 Breton initiated the review Littérature with Louis Aragon and Philippe Soupault. He also associated with Dadaist Tristan Tzara. In 1924 he was instrumental in the founding of the Bureau of Surrealist Research.In a publication The Magnetic Fields (Les Champs Magnétiques), a collaboration with Soupault, he implemented the principle of automatic writing. He published the Surrealist Manifesto in 1924, and was editor of the magazine La Révolution surréaliste from 1924. A group of writers became associated with him: Philippe Soupault, Louis Aragon, Paul Éluard, René Crevel, Michel Leiris, Benjamin Péret, Antonin Artaud, and Robert Desnos.Anxious to combine the themes of personal transformation found in the works of Arthur Rimbaud with the politics of Karl Marx, Breton joined the French Communist Party in 1927, from which he was expelled in 1933. During this time, he survived mostly by the sale of paintings from his art gallery.In 1935, there was a conflict between Breton and Ilya Ehrenburg during the first "International Congress of Writers for the Defense of Culture" which opened in Paris in June. Breton had been insulted by Ehrenburg—along with all fellow surrealists—in a pamphlet which said, among other things, that surrealists were "pederasts". Breton slapped Ehrenburg several times on the street, which resulted in surrealists being expelled from the Congress. Crevel, who according to Salvador Dalí, was "the only serious communist among surrealists"     was isolated from Breton and other surrealists, who were unhappy with Crevel because of his homosexuality and annoyed with communists in general.In 1938, Breton accepted a cultural commission from the French government to travel to Mexico. After a conference at the National Autonomous University of Mexico about surrealism, Breton stated after getting lost in Mexico City (as no one was waiting for him at the airport) "I don't know why I came here. Mexico is the most surrealist country in the world".However, visiting Mexico provided the opportunity to meet Leon Trotsky. Breton and other surrealists traveled via a long boat ride from Patzcuaro to the town of Erongaricuaro. Diego Rivera and Frida Kahlo were among the visitors to the hidden community of intellectuals and artists. Together, Breton and Trotsky wrote a manifesto Pour un art révolutionnaire indépendent (published under the names of Breton and Diego Rivera) calling for "complete freedom of art", which was becoming increasingly difficult with the world situation of the time.
In 1939,  Breton collaborated with artist Wifredo Lam on the publication of Breton's poem "Fata Morgana", which was illustrated by Lam.
1940sBreton was again in the medical corps of the French Army at the start of World War II. The Vichy government banned his writings as "the very negation of the national revolution" Franklin Rosemont André Breton and the First Principles of Surrealism, 1978, ISBN 0-904383-89-X.  and Breton escaped, with the help of the American Varian Fry and Harry Bingham, to the United States and the Caribbean during 1941. Breton got to know Martinican writer Aimé Césaire, and later composed the introduction to the 1947 edition of Césaire's Cahier d'un retour au pays natal. During his exile in New York City he met Elisa, the Chilean woman who would become his third wife.In 1944, he and Elisa traveled to the Gaspé Peninsula in Québec, Canada, where he wrote Arcane 17, a book which expresses his fears of World War II, describes the marvels of the Rocher Percé and the extreme northeastern part of North America, and celebrates his new romance with Elisa.
Later life
Breton returned to Paris in 1946, where he opposed French colonialism (for example as a signatory of the Manifesto of the 121 against the Algerian war) and continued, until his death, to foster a second group of surrealists in the form of expositions or reviews (La Brèche, 1961–1965). In 1959, he organized an exhibit in Paris. By the end of World War II André Breton decided to embrace anarchism explicitly. In 1952 Breton wrote "It was in the black mirror of anarchism that surrealism first recognised itself."     "Breton was consistent in his support for the francophone Anarchist Federation and he continued to offer his solidarity after the Platformists around Fontenis transformed the FA into the Federation Communiste Libertaire. He was one of the few intellectuals who continued to offer his support to the FCL during the Algerian war when the FCL suffered severe repression and was forced underground. He sheltered Fontenis whilst he was in hiding. He refused to take sides on the splits in the French anarchist movement and both he and Peret expressed solidarity as well with the new FA set up by the synthesist anarchists and worked in the Antifascist Committees of the 60s alongside the FA." André Breton died in 1966 at 70 and was buried in the Cimetière des Batignolles in Paris.
Breton as a collectorBreton was an avid collector of art, ethnographic material, and unusual trinkets. He was particularly interested in materials from the northwest coast of North America. During a financial crisis he experienced in 1931, most of his collection (along with his friend Paul Éluard's) was auctioned. He subsequently rebuilt the collection in his studio and home at rue Fontaine 42. The collection grew to over 5,300 items: modern paintings, drawings, sculptures, photographs, books, art catalogs, journals, manuscripts, and works of popular and Oceanic art.  After Breton's death on 28 September 1966, Breton's third wife, Elisa, and his daughter, Aube, allowed students and researchers access to Breton's archive and collection. After thirty-six years, when attempts to establish a surrealist foundation to protect the collection were opposed, the collection was auctioned by Calmels Cohen at Drouot-Richelieu.   A wall of the apartment is preserved at the Centre Georges Pompidou.  Nine previously unpublished manuscripts, including the Manifeste du surréalisme, were auctioned by Sotheby's in May 2008.   
Breton's collection

Selected modern painters or sculptors: Pierre Alechinsky, Aloïse Corbaz, Braulio Arenas, Arman, Jean Arp, Enrico Baj, Ben, A Benquet, Alexandre Boileau, Bona Pieyre de Mandiargue, Micheline Bounoure, André Bourdil, Francis Bouvet, Victor Brauner, Elisa Breton, Jorge Caceres, Jacques Callot, Jorge Camacho, Paul Colinet, Pierre Courthion, Fleury-Joseph Crépin, Salvador Dalí, André Demonchy, Ferdinand Desnos, Deyema, Óscar Domínguez, Enrico Donati, Mirabelle Dors, Marcel Duchamp, Baudet Dulary, René Duvilliers, Yves Elléouët, Nusch Eluard, Paul Éluard, Colette Enard, Jimmy Ernst, Max Ernst, Henri Espinoza, Fahr el Nissa Zeid, Jean Fautrier, Luis Fernandez, Charles Filiger, Alexandre Evariste, Johann Henrich Füssli, Paul Gauguin, Alberto Gironella, Arshile Gorky, Max Walter Svanberg, Eugenio Granell, Henri de Groux, Jacques Hérold, René Iché, Wifredo Lam,  René Magritte, Joan Miró, Pablo Picasso, Man Ray, Diego Rivera, Yves Tanguy, Adolf Wölfli, etc.



Selected photographers:  Manuel Alvarez Bravo, Pierre Argillet, Bach Fritz, Jacques-André Boiffard, Brassaï, Elisa Breton, Claude Cahun, Henri Cartier-Bresson, Léo Dohmen, Paul Dacceti, Izis, Dora Maar, Man Ray, Raoul Ubac, Emile van Moerkerken, etc.



kachina dolls


Marriages
Breton married three times: 

His first wife, from 1921 to 1931, was Simone Collinet, née Simone Kahn (1897–1980).
His second wife was Jacqueline Lamba, with whom he had his only child, a daughter named Aube.
His third wife was Elisa Claro.


WorksHis works include the case studies Nadja (1928) and L'Amour fou [Mad Love] (1937).Selected works:

Mont de piété, 1919
S'il Vous Plaît, 1920 – If You Please
Les Champs magnétiques, 1920 – The Magnetic Fields
Manifeste du surréalisme, 1924 – The Surrealist Manifesto
Les Pas perdus (Breton), 1924 – The Lost Steps
Poisson soluble, 1924 – Soluble Fish
Un Cadavre, 1924 – A Corpse
Légitime Défense, 1926 – Legitimate Defense
Le Surréalisme et la peinture, 1926 – Surrealism and Painting
Nadja, 1928 – Nadja
L'Immaculée Conception, 1930 – The Immaculate Conception
Deuxième Manifeste du surréalisme, 1930 – The Second Manifesto of Surrealism
Ralentir travaux, 1930 – Slow Down Works
L'Union libre, 1931
La Revolver à cheveux blancs, 1932 – The Revolver Has White Hair
Les Vases communicants, 1932 – The Communicating Vessels
Le Message automatique; 1933 – The Automatic Message
Qu'est-ce que le surréalisme, 1934 – What Is Surrealism
L'Air de l'eau, 1934 – Looks Like Water
Point du Jour, 1934 – Break of Day
Position politique du surréalisme, 1935 – The Political Position of Surrealism
Notes sur la poésie, 1936 (with Paul Éluard) – Notes on Poetry
L'Amour fou, 1937 – Mad Love
Point du jour, 1937
Dictionnaire abrégé du surréalisme, 1938 (with Paul Éluard) – Abridged Dictionary of Surrealism
Manifesto for an Independent Revolutionary Art, 1938 (with Leon Trotsky)
Fata Morgana, 1940 
Anthologie de l'humour noir, 1940 – Anthology of Black Humor
Arcane 17, 1945 – Arcane 17
Jeunes Cerisiers garantis contre les lièvres, 1946 – Young Cherry Trees Secured against Hares
Ode à Charles Fourier, 1947 – Ode to Charles Fourier
Yves Tanguy, 1947
Poèmes 1919–48, 1948
La Lampe dans l'horloge, 1948 – The Lamp in the Clock
Martinique, charmeuse de serpents, 1948
Entretiens, 1952 – Discussions
La Clé des champs, 1953 – The Key of the Fields
Farouche à quatre feuilles, 1954 (with Lise Deharme, Julien Gracq, Jean Tardieu) – Wild to Four Leaves
Les Manifestes du surréalisme, 1955 – Manifestoes of Surrealism
L'Art magique, 1957 – The Magic Art
Constellations, 1958
Le la, 1961
Le Surréalisme et la Peinture, 1965
Pas-de-preuve(non-lieu), 1966
Selected Poems, 1969
Perspective cavalière, 1970
What is Surrealism? Selected Poems, 1978
Poems of André Breton, 1982


See also 

Anti-art
Hector Hyppolite


References 

André Breton: Surrealism and Painting – edited and with an introduction by Mark Polizzotti.
Manifestoes of Surrealism by André Breton, translated by Richard Seaver and Helen R. Lane. ISBN 0-472-06182-8


External links 
 
 

The Manifesto of Surrealism (1924)
André Breton's Nadja

  
DEFAULTSORT














 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Barbara McClintock
 
 
 
 Barbara McClintock (June 16, 1902 – September 2, 1992), the 1983 Nobel Laureate in Physiology or Medicine, was an American scientist and one of the world's most distinguished cytogeneticists. McClintock received her PhD in botany from Cornell University in 1927, where she was a leader in the development of maize cytogenetics. The field remained the focus of her research for the rest of her career. From the late 1920s, McClintock studied chromosomes and how they change during reproduction in maize. Her work was groundbreaking: she developed the technique for visualizing maize chromosomes and used microscopic analysis to demonstrate many fundamental genetic ideas, including genetic recombination by crossing-over during meiosis—a mechanism by which chromosomes exchange information. She produced the first genetic map for maize, linking regions of the chromosome with physical traits, and demonstrated the role of the telomere and centromere, regions of the chromosome that are important in the conservation of genetic information. She was recognized amongst the best in the field, awarded prestigious fellowships, and elected a member of the National Academy of Sciences in 1944.During the 1940s and 1950s, McClintock discovered transposition and used it to show how genes are responsible for turning physical characteristics on or off. She developed theories to explain the repression or expression of genetic information from one generation of maize plants to the next. Encountering skepticism of her research and its implications, she stopped publishing her data in 1953. McClintock based her views upon her research rather than upon prejudice.  Later, she made an extensive study of the cytogenetics and ethnobotany of maize races from South America. McClintock's research became well understood in the 1960s and 1970s, as researchers demonstrated the mechanisms of genetic change and genetic regulation that she had demonstrated in her maize research in the 1940s and 1950s . Awards and recognition for her contributions to the field followed, including the Nobel Prize for Physiology or Medicine, awarded to her in 1983 for the discovery of genetic transposition; she is the only woman to receive an unshared Nobel Prize in that category. 
Early lifeBarbara McClintock was born in Hartford, Connecticut, the third of four children of physician Thomas Henry McClintock and Sara Handy McClintock. She was independent from a very young age, a trait McClintock described as her "capacity to be alone". From about the age of three until the time she started school, McClintock lived with an aunt and uncle in Brooklyn, New York in order to reduce the financial burden on her parents while her father established his medical practice. She was described as a solitary and independent child, and a tomboy. She was close to her father, but had a difficult relationship with her mother. Keller, Evelyn Fox. (1983) A feeling for the organism.  W. H. Freeman and Company, New York. ISBN 0-7167-1433-7 McClintock completed her secondary education at Erasmus Hall High School in Brooklyn.  She discovered science at high school, and wanted to attend Cornell University to continue her studies. Her mother resisted the idea of higher education for her daughters, believing it would make them unmarriageable. The family also had financial problems. Barbara was almost prevented from starting college, but her father intervened, and she entered Cornell in 1919.
Education and research at CornellMcClintock began her studies at Cornell's College of Agriculture in 1919. She studied botany, receiving a BSc in 1923. Her interest in genetics had been sparked when she took her first course in that field in 1921. The course was based on a similar one offered at Harvard University, and was taught by C. B. Hutchison, a plant breeder and geneticist.  Hutchison was impressed by McClintock's interest, and telephoned to invite her to participate in the graduate genetics course at Cornell in 1922. McClintock pointed to Hutchison's invitation as the reason she continued in genetics: "Obviously, this telephone call cast the die for my future. I remained with genetics thereafter."  Although it has been reported that women could not major in genetics at Cornell, and therefore her MA and PhD— earned in 1925 and 1927, respectively—were officially awarded in botany, recent research has revealed that women did earn graduate degrees in Cornell's Plant Breeding Department during the time that McClintock was a student at Cornell. During her graduate studies and postgraduate appointment as a botany instructor, McClintock was instrumental in assembling a group that studied the new field of cytogenetics in maize. This group brought together plant breeders and cytologists, and included, Charles R. Burnham, Marcus Rhoades, George Beadle (who became a Nobel laureate in 1958 for showing that genes control metabolism), and Harriet Creighton.  Rollins Adams Emerson, head of the Plant Breeding Department, supported these efforts, although he was not a cytologist himself.  McClintock's cytogenetic research focused on developing ways to visualize and characterize maize chromosomes. This particular part of her work influenced a generation of students, as it was included in most textbooks. She also developed a technique using carmine staining to visualize maize chromosomes, and showed for the first time the morphology of the 10 maize chromosomes.  By studying the morphology of the chromosomes, McClintock was able to link, to a specific chromosome, groups of traits that were inherited together. Marcus Rhoades noted that McClintock's 1929 Genetics paper on the characterization of triploid maize chromosomes triggered scientific interest in maize cytogenetics, and attributed to his female colleague 10 of the 17 significant advances in the field that were made by Cornell scientists between 1929 and 1935. In 1930, McClintock was the first person to describe the cross-shaped interaction of homologous chromosomes during meiosis. During 1931, McClintock and a graduate student, Harriet Creighton, proved the link between chromosomal crossover during meiosis and the recombination of genetic traits.  They observed how the recombination of chromosomes and the resulting phenotype formed the inheritance of a new trait.  Until this point, it had only been hypothesized that genetic recombination could occur during meiosis, although it had been shown genetically. McClintock published the first genetic map for maize in 1931, showing the order of three genes on maize chromosome 9.   This information provided necessary data for the crossing over study she published with Creighton.  In 1938, she produced a cytogenetic analysis of the centromere, describing the organization and function of the centromere.McClintock's breakthrough publications, and support from her colleagues, led to her being awarded several postdoctoral fellowships from the National Research Council. This funding allowed her to continue to study genetics at Cornell, the University of Missouri, and the California Institute of Technology, where she worked with E. G. Anderson.  During the summers of 1931 and 1932, she worked at Missouri with geneticist Lewis Stadler, who introduced her to the use of X-rays as a mutagen.  (Exposure to X-rays can increase the rate of mutation above the natural background level, making it a powerful research tool for genetics.) Through her work with X-ray-mutagenized maize, she identified ring chromosomes, which form when the ends of a single chromosome fuse together after radiation damage. From this evidence, McClintock hypothesized that there must be a structure on the chromosome tip that would normally ensure stability. She showed that the loss of ring-chromosomes at meiosis caused variegation in maize foliage in generations subsequent to irradiation resulting from chromosomal deletion. During this period, she demonstrated the presence of what she called the nucleolar organizers on a region on maize chromosome 6, which is required for the assembly of the nucleolus. McClintock received a fellowship from the Guggenheim Foundation that made possible six months of training in Germany during 1933 and 1934. She had planned to work with Curt Stern, who had demonstrated crossing-over in Drosophila just weeks after McClintock and Creighton had done so; however, in the meantime, Stern emigrated to the United States. Instead,  she worked in Germany with geneticist Richard B. Goldschmidt. She left Germany early, amid mounting political tension in Europe, and returned to Cornell, remaining there until 1936, when she accepted an Assistant Professorship offered to her by Lewis Stadler in the Department of Botany at the University of Missouri–Columbia. 
University of MissouriDuring her time at Missouri, McClintock expanded her research on the effect of X-rays on maize cytogenetics. McClintock observed the breakage and fusion of chromosomes in irradiated maize cells. She was also able to show that, in some plants, spontaneous chromosome breakage occurred in the cells of the endosperm. Over the course of mitosis, she observed that the ends of broken chromatids were rejoined after the chromosome replication. In the anaphase of mitosis, the broken chromosomes formed a chromatid bridge, which was broken when the chromatids moved towards the cell poles. The broken ends were rejoined in the interphase of the next mitosis, and the cycle was repeated, causing massive mutation, which she could detect as variegation in the endosperm.  This cycle of breakage, fusion, and bridge, also described as the breakage–rejoining–bridge cycle, was a key cytogenetic discovery for several reasons.   First it showed that the rejoining of chromosomes was not a random event, and secondly it demonstrated a source of large-scale mutation. For this reason, it remains an area of interest in cancer research today.Although her research was progressing at Missouri, McClintock was not satisfied with her position at the University. She recalled being excluded from faculty meetings, and was not made aware of positions available at other institutions.  In 1940 she wrote to Charles Burnham, "I have decided that I must look for another job. As far as I can make out, there is nothing more for me here. I am an assistant professor at $3,000 and I feel sure that that is the limit for me."   Initially, McClintock's position had been especially created for her by Stadler and may have depended on his presence. Kass, Lee B. 2003.  "Records and recollections: A new look at Barbara McClintock, Nobel Prize-Winning geneticist".  Genetics 164 (August): 1251-1260.  Kass, Lee B. 2005. "Missouri compromise: tenure or freedom.  New evidence clarifies why Barbara McClintock left Academe".  Maize Genetics Cooperation Newsletter 79: 52-71.  McClintock believed she would not gain tenure at Missouri, although according to some accounts she knew she would be offered a promotion by Missouri in the spring of 1942.  Recent evidence reveals that McClintock more likely decided to leave Missouri because she had lost trust in her employer and in the University administration.  In early 1941 she was invited by the Director of the Department of Genetics at Cold Spring Harbor to spend her summer there. She took a leave of absence from Missouri in hopes of finding a position elsewhere. She also accepted a visiting Professorship at Columbia University, where her former Cornell colleague Marcus Rhoades was a professor. He offered to share his research field at Cold Spring Harbor on Long Island.  In December 1941 she was offered a research position by Milislav Demerec, the newly appointed acting director, and she joined the staff of the Carnegie Institution of Washington's Department of Genetics Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory.
Cold Spring HarborAfter her year-long temporary appointment, McClintock accepted a full-time research position at Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory. Here, she was highly productive and continued her work with the breakage-fusion-bridge cycle, using it to substitute for X-rays as a tool for mapping new genes. In 1944, in recognition of her prominence in the field of genetics during this period, McClintock was elected to the National Academy of Sciences—only the third woman to be elected. In 1945, she became the first woman president of the Genetics Society of America. In 1944 she undertook a cytogenetic analysis of Neurospora crassa at the suggestion of George Beadle, who had used the fungus to demonstrate the one gene–one enzyme relationship. He invited her to Stanford to undertake the study. She successfully described the number of chromosomes, or karyotype, of N. crassa and described the entire life cycle of the species. N. crassa has since become a model species for classical genetic analysis. 
Discovery of controlling elements 
In the summer of 1944 at Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory, McClintock began systematic studies on the mechanisms of the mosaic color patterns of maize seed and the unstable inheritance of this mosaicism. She identified two new dominant and interacting genetic loci that she named Dissociator (Ds) and Activator (Ac). She found that the Dissociator did not just dissociate or cause the chromosome to break, it also had a variety of effects on neighboring genes when the Activator was also present. In early 1948, she made the surprising discovery that both Dissociator and Activator could transpose, or change position, on the chromosome.She observed the effects of the transposition of Ac and Ds by the changing patterns of coloration in maize kernels over generations of controlled crosses, and described the relationship between the two loci through intricate microscopic analysis. She concluded that Ac controls the transposition of the Ds from chromosome 9, and that the movement of Ds is accompanied by the breakage of the chromosome. When Ds moves, the aleurone-color gene is released from the suppressing effect of the Ds and transformed into the active form, which initiates the pigment synthesis in cells. The transposition of Ds in different cells is random, it may move in some but not others, which causes color mosaicism. The size of the colored spot on the seed is determined by stage of the seed development during dissociation. McClintock also found that the transposition of Ds and the is determined by the number of Ac copies in the cell.Between 1948 and 1950, she developed a theory by which these mobile elements regulated the genes by inhibiting or modulating their action. She referred to Dissociator and Activator as "controlling units"—later, as "controlling elements"—to distinguish them from genes. She hypothesized that gene regulation could explain how complex multicellular organisms made of cells with identical genomes have cells of different function. McClintock's discovery challenged the concept of the genome as a static set of instructions passed between generations. In 1950, she reported her work on Ac/Ds and her ideas about gene regulation in a paper entitled "The origin and behavior of mutable loci in maize" published in the journal Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences. In summer 1951, when she reported on her work on gene mutability in maize at the annual symposium at Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory, the paper she presented was called "The origin and behavior of mutable loci in maize". Her work on controlling elements and gene regulation was conceptually difficult and was not immediately understood or accepted by her contemporaries; she described the reception of her research as "puzzlement, even hostility".  Nevertheless, McClintock continued to develop her ideas on controlling elements. She published a paper in Genetics in 1953 where she presented all her statistical data, and undertook lecture tours to universities throughout the 1950s to speak about her work.  She continued to investigate the problem and identified a new element that she called Suppressor-mutator (Spm), which, although similar to Ac/Ds, displays more complex behavior. Based on the reactions of other scientists to her work, McClintock felt she risked alienating the scientific mainstream, and from 1953 stopped publishing accounts of her research on controlling elements. Comfort, Nathaniel, C.(1999) ""The real point is control": The reception of Barbara McClintock's controlling elements". Journal of the History of Biology 32:133–6. 
The origins of maizeIn 1957, McClintock received funding from the National Science Foundation, and the Rockefeller Foundation sponsored her to start research on maize in South America, an area that is rich in varieties of this species . She was interested in studying the  evolution of maize, and being in South America would allow her to work on a larger scale. McClintock explored the chromosomal, morphological, and evolutionary characteristics of various races of maize. From 1962, she supervised four scientists working on South American maize at the North Carolina State University in Raleigh. Two of these Rockefeller fellows, Almiro Blumenschein and T. Angel Kato, continued their research on South American races of maize well into the 1970s. In 1981, Blumenschein, Kato, and McClintock published Chromosome constitution of races of maize, which is considered a landmark study of maize that has contributed significantly to the fields of evolutionary botany, ethnobotany, and paleobotany. 
Rediscovery of McClintock's controlling elementsMcClintock officially retired from her position at the Carnegie Institution in 1967, and was made a Distinguished Service Member of the Carnegie Institution of Washington. This honor allowed her to continue working with graduate students and colleagues in the Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory as scientist emerita. In reference to her decision 20 years earlier no longer to publish detailed accounts of her work on controlling elements, she wrote in 1973:  Over the years I have found that it is difficult if not impossible to bring to consciousness of another person the nature of his tacit assumptions when, by some special experiences, I have been made aware of them. This became painfully evident to me in my attempts during the 1950s to convince geneticists that the action of genes had to be and was controlled. It is now equally painful to recognize the fixity of assumptions that many persons hold on the nature of controlling elements in maize and the manners of their operation. One must await the right time for conceptual change.  The importance of McClintock's contributions only came to light in the 1960s, when the work of French geneticists Francois Jacob and Jacques Monod described the genetic regulation of the lac operon, a concept she had demonstrated with Ac/Ds in 1951. Following Jacob and Monod's 1961 Journal of Molecular Biology paper "Genetic regulatory mechanisms in the synthesis of proteins", McClintock wrote an article for American Naturalist comparing the lac operon and her work on controlling elements in maize.  McClintock's contribution to biology is still not widely acknowledged as amounting to the discovery of genetic regulation. McClintock was widely credited for discovering transposition following the discovery of the process in bacteria and yeast in the late 1960s and early 1970s. During this period, molecular biology had developed significant new technology, and scientists were able to show the molecular basis for transposition. In the 1970s, Ac and Ds were cloned by other scientists and were shown to be Class II transposons. Ac is a complete transposon that can produce a functional transposase, which is required for the element to move within the genome. Ds has a mutation in its transposase gene, which means that it cannot move without another source of transposase. Thus, as McClintock observed, Ds cannot move in the absence of Ac. Spm has also been characterized as a transposon. Subsequent research has shown that transposons typically do not move unless the cell is placed under stress, such as by irradiation or the breakage, fusion, and bridge cycle, and thus their activation during stress can serve as a source of genetic variation for evolution. McClintock understood the role of transposons in evolution and genome change well before other researchers grasped the concept. Nowadays, Ac/Ds is used as a tool in plant biology to generate mutant plants used for the characterization of gene function. 
Honors and recognitionMcClintock was awarded the National Medal of Science by Richard Nixon in 1970.  Cold Spring Harbor named a building in her honor in 1973. In 1981, she became the first recipient of the MacArthur Foundation Grant, and was awarded the Albert Lasker Award for Basic Medical Research, the Wolf Prize in Medicine and the Thomas Hunt Morgan Medal by the Genetics Society of America. In 1982, she was awarded the Louisa Gross Horwitz Prize from Columbia University for her research in the "evolution of genetic information and the control of its expression."   Most notably, she received the Nobel Prize for Physiology or Medicine in 1983, credited by the Nobel Foundation for discovering "mobile genetic elements",  over thirty years after she initially described the phenomenon of controlling elements. She was elected a Foreign Member of the Royal Society in 1989.    McClintock received the Benjamin Franklin Medal for Distinguished Achievement in the Sciences of the American Philosophical Society in 1993.   She was awarded 14 Honorary Doctor of Science degrees and an Honorary Doctor of Humane Letters. In 1986 she was inducted into the National Women's Hall of Fame. During her final years, McClintock led a more public life, especially after Evelyn Fox Keller's 1983 book A feeling for the organism brought McClintock's story to the public. She remained a regular presence in the Cold Spring Harbor community, and gave talks on mobile genetic elements and the history of genetics research for the benefit of junior scientists. An anthology of her 43 publications The discovery and characterization of transposable elements: the collected papers of Barbara McClintock was published in 1987. McClintock died in Huntington, New York, on September 2, 1992 at the age of 90; she never married or had children.
LegacySince her death, McClintock has been the subject of the biographical work by science historian Nathaniel C. Comfort, in The tangled field : Barbara McClintock's search for the patterns of genetic control. Comfort's biography contests some claims about McClintock, described as the "McClintock Myth", which he claims was perpetuated by the earlier biography by Keller. Keller's thesis was that McClintock was long ignored because she was a woman working in the sciences. (McClintock was also sometimes met with derision because she was a woman working in the sciences. For example, when McClintock claimed that the genetics of maize was non-Mendelian, Sewall Wright said she "simply didn't understand the mathematics (a weakness in mathematics he felt was common of most women).".  In addition, geneticist Lotte Auerbach recounted that Joshua Lederberg returned from a visit to McClintock's lab with the remark: 'By God, that woman is either crazy or a genius.' "As Auerbach tells it, McClintock had thrown Lederberg and his colleagues out after half an hour 'because of their arrogance. She was intolerant of arrogance....She felt she had crossed a desert alone and no one had followed her.'"  However, Comfort asserts that McClintock was well regarded by her professional peers, even in the early years of her career.  Although Comfort argues that McClintock was not a victim of gender discrimination, she has been widely written about in the context of women's studies, and most recent biographical works on women in science feature accounts of her experience. She is held up as a role model for girls in such works of children's literature as Edith Hope Fine's Barbara McClintock, Nobel Prize geneticist, Deborah Heiligman's Barbara McClintock: alone in her field and Mary Kittredge's Barbara McClintock. A recent biography for young adults by Naomi Pasachoff, Barbara McClintock, Genius of Genetics, provides a new perspective, based on the current literature. On May 4, 2005, the United States Postal Service issued the "American Scientists" commemorative postage stamp series, a set of four 37-cent self-adhesive stamps in several configurations.  The scientists depicted were Barbara McClintock, John von Neumann, Josiah Willard Gibbs, and Richard Feynman. McClintock was also featured in a 1989 four-stamp issue from Sweden which illustrated the work of eight Nobel Prize-winning geneticists. A small building at Cornell University and a laboratory building at Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory bear her name to this day. A street has been named after her in the new "Adlershof Development Society" science park in Berlin The 2011 novel The Marriage Plot, by Jeffrey Eugenides, features a character named Diane Macgregor, whose career, research and Nobel Prize award all reflect McClintock's.
Key publications

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
McClintock, Barbara., Kato, T. A. & Blumenschein, A. (1981) Chromosome constitution of races of maize. Its significance in the interpretation of relationships between races and varieties in the Americas.. Colegio de Postgraduados, Chapingo, Mexico


See also

List of female Nobel laureates


References 
Further reading 

Coe, Ed and Lee B. Kass. 2005. "Proof of physical exchange of genes on the chromosomes".  Proceedings of the National Academy of Science 102 (No. 19, May): 6641-6656.    PMID 15867161
Comfort, Nathaniel C. (1999) ""The real point is control": The reception of Barbara McClintock's controlling elements". Journal of the History of Biology 32:133–62. PMID 11623812
Comfort, Nathaniel C. (2001) The tangled field: Barbara McClintock's search for the patterns of genetic control. Harvard University Press, Cambridge, MA. ISBN 0-674-00456-6
Kass, Lee B. 2003.  "Records and recollections: A new look at Barbara McClintock, Nobel Prize-Winning geneticist".  Genetics 164 (August): 1251-1260.
Kass, Lee B.  2005.  "Harriet Creighton: Proud botanist".  Plant Science Bulletin.  51(4): 118-125.  Available online, December 2005: Botanical Society of America
Kass, Lee B. 2005. "Missouri compromise: tenure or freedom.  New evidence clarifies why Barbara McClintock left Academe".  Maize Genetics Cooperation Newsletter 79: 52-71; article without footnotes or photographs; available, online April 2005: Maize Genetics Cooperation Newsletter
Kass, Lee B. and Christophe Bonneuil.  2004.  "Mapping and seeing: Barbara McClintock and the linking of genetics and cytology in maize genetics, 1928-1935".  Chapt 5, pp. 91–118, in Hans-Jörg Rheinberger and Jean-Paul Gaudilliere (eds.), Classical Genetic Research and its Legacy:  The Mapping Cultures of 20th Century Genetics.  London: Routledge.
Keller, Evelyn Fox (1983) A feeling for the organism.  W. H. Freeman and Company, New York ISBN 0-7167-1433-7
Bogdanov, Yu. F. (2002) A life devoted to science. In "Commemoration of the 100th anniversary of the birth of Barbara McClintock". Russian Journal of Genetics 38:984–87. PMID 12430570
Fedoroff, Nina V. (1995). Barbara McClintock. Biographical Memoirs of the National Academy of Science. 68:211–36.
Fedoroff, Nina V. 2002. "The well mangled McClintock myth". Trends in Genetics 18 (7): 378-379.
Kass, L. B. 1999.  "Current list of Barbara McClintock's publications". Maize Genetics Cooperation Newsletter 73: 42-48.  Available online, 1998: Maize Genetics Cooperation Newsletter
Kass, Lee B. 2000. "McClintock, Barbara, American botanical geneticist, 1902-1992".  pp. 66–69, in Plant Sciences. edited by R. Robinson.  Macmillan Science Library, USA.
Kass, L. B.  2002.  "The Tangled Field, by N. Comfort".  Isis.  93 (4): 729-730.
Kass, L. B., 2004.  Identification of photographs for the Barbara McClintock papers on the National Library of Medicine website.  Maize Genetics Cooperation Newsletter 78: 24-26, available online, 2003: Maize Genetics Cooperation Newsletter
Kass Lee, B. 2007.  Harriet B. Creighton (1909–2004), on Women Pioneers in Plant Biology, American Society of Plant Biologists website, edited by Ann Hirsch. Published online, February 2007: American Society of Plant Biologists
Kass Lee, B. 2007.  Barbara McClintock (1902–1992), on Women Pioneers in Plant Biology, American Society of Plant Biologists website, Ann Hirsch editor. Published online, March 2007: American Society of Plant Biologists
Kass, L. B. and R. P. Murphy.  2003.  "Will the real Maize Genetics Garden please stand up?"  Maize Genetics Cooperation Newsletter.  77: 41-43. Available online, 2003:  Maize Genetics Cooperation Newsletter
Kass, L. B and W. B. Provine. 1999 (&1998).  Formerly restricted interview with Barbara McClintock, now available at Cornell University Archives.  Maize Genetics Cooperation Newsletter. 73: 41. Available online, 1998: Maize Genetics Cooperation Newsletter
Kass, Lee B. Chris Bonneuil, and Ed Coe. 2005. "Cornfests, cornfabs and cooperation: The origins and beginnings of the Maize Genetics Cooperation News Letter". Genetics 169 (April): 1787-1797. Available online, May 6, 2005: Genetics Society of America
Murphy, R.P. and L.B. Kass.  2007.  Evolution of Plant Breeding at Cornell University: A Centennial History, 1907-2006.  Department of Plant Breeding & Genetics, Cornell University, Ithaca, NY, pp. 1–98, Appendices A1-A98, Photo Section P1-P38. (July 2007).
Kass, Lee B. 2007b. Barbara McClintock (1902–1992), on Women Pioneers in Plant Biology, American Society of Plant Biologists website, Ann Hirsch editor. Published online, March 2007:   Lee B. 2007a. Harriet B. Creighton (1909–2004), on Women Pioneers in Plant Biology, American Society of Plant Biologists website, Ann Hirsch editor. Published online, February 2007:   Lee B. and E. Cobb.  2007. Landmarks and milestones in American plant biology, the Cornell connection.  Plant Science Bulletin 53(3, fall): 90-101). Available online, September 2007:   L. B. 2009. Barbara McClintock’s contributions to Biological Abstracts: Another Cornell connection.  Maize Genetics Cooperation Newsletter 83: 20-21.   [issued November 1, 2009]
Kass, L. B. and Chomet, P. 2009.  Barbara McClintock, Pgs.  17-52, in J. Bennetzen and S. Hake, Editors, Handbook of Maize: Genetics and Genomics. Springer.
Jones, R.N. 2005. "McClintock's controlling elements: the full story". Cytogenetics Research 109:90–103 PMID 15753564
Lamberts, William J. (2000) "McClintock, Barbara". American National Biography Online. Oxford University Press
McClintock, Barbara. (1987). The discovery and characterization of transposable elements: the collected papers of Barbara *McClintock, ed John A. Moore. Garland Publishing, Inc., ISBN 0-8240-1391-3.
Fedoroff, Nina V and Botstein, David (1993) The Dynamic Genome: Barbara McClintock's Ideas in the Century of Genetics. Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory Press, New York. ISBN 0-87969-396-7
 
Archives and research collections

The Barbara McClintock Papers - Profiles in Science, National Library of Medicine.
Barbara McClintock Papers, 1927-1991 at the American Philosophical Society


External links 

The Official Site of Louisa Gross Horwitz Prize
Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory Archives, Barbara McClintock:A Brief Biographical Sketch
Enhancer and Gene Trap Transposon Mutagenesis in Arabidopsis, comprehensive article on the use of Ac/Ds and other transposons for plant mutagenesis
Biography and Bibliographic Resources, from the Office of Scientific and Technical Information, United States Department of Energy
 
 
 
 
   
 
DEFAULTSORT






















 
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Tim Brooke-Taylor
 
 Timothy Julian Brooke-Taylor OBE (born 17 July 1940) is an English comic actor. He became active in performing in comedy sketches while at Cambridge University, and became President of the Footlights club, touring internationally with the Footlights revue in 1964. Becoming wider known to the public for his work on BBC Radio with I'm Sorry, I'll Read That Again, he moved into television with At Last the 1948 Show working together with old Cambridge friends John Cleese and Graham Chapman. He is most well known as one member of the Goodies, starring in the TV series throughout the 1970s and picking up international recognition in Australia and New Zealand. He has also appeared as an actor in various sitcoms, and has been a panellist on I'm Sorry I Haven't a Clue for nearly 40 years.
Early life and educationBrooke-Taylor was born in Buxton, Derbyshire, England, the grandson of Francis Pawson, a parson who played centre forward for England's football team in the 1880s.  His mother was an international lacrosse player and his father a solicitor. He was expelled from primary school at the early age of five and a half. Brooke-Taylor was then schooled at Thorn Leigh Pre-Preparatory School, Holm Leigh Preparatory School (where he won a cup for his prowess as a bowler in the school cricket team) and Winchester College which he left with seven O-levels and two A-levels in English and History. After teaching for a year at a preparatory school in Berkhamsted and a term back at Holm Leigh School as a teacher,  he studied at Pembroke College at the University of Cambridge. There he read Economics and Politics before changing to read Law, and mixed with other budding comedians, including John Cleese, Graham Chapman, Bill Oddie and Jonathan Lynn in the prestigious Cambridge University Footlights Club (of which Brooke-Taylor became President in 1963). From Fringe to Flying Circus – 'Celebrating a Unique Generation of Comedy 1960–1980' – Roger Wilmut, Eyre Methuen Ltd, 1980.  Footlights! – 'A Hundred Years of Cambridge Comedy' – Robert Hewison, Methuen London Ltd, 1983. The Footlights Club revue, A Clump of Plinths was so successful during its Edinburgh Festival Fringe run, that the show was renamed as Cambridge Circus and the revue transferred to the West End in London, and then later taken to both New Zealand and to Broadway in the United States in September 1964.    He was also active in the Pembroke College drama society, the Pembroke Players.
CareerBrooke-Taylor moved swiftly into BBC Radio with the fast-paced comedy show I'm Sorry, I'll Read That Again in which he performed and co-wrote.  As the screeching eccentric Lady Constance de Coverlet, he could be relied upon to generate the loudest audience response of many programmes in this long-running series merely with her unlikely catchphrase "did somebody call?" uttered after a comic and transparent feed-line, as their adventure story reached its climax or cliffhanger ending.  Other members of I'm Sorry, I'll Read That Again were John Cleese, Bill Oddie, Graeme Garden, David Hatch and Jo Kendall. In the mid-'60s, Brooke-Taylor performed in the TV series On the Braden Beat with Canadian Bernard Braden, taking over the slot then-recently vacated by Peter Cook in his guise as E.L. Wisty. Brooke-Taylor played a reactionary right-wing city gent who believed he was the soul of tolerance.In 1967, Brooke-Taylor became a writer/performer on the television comedy series At Last the 1948 Show, with John Cleese, Graham Chapman and Marty Feldman.  The famous "Four Yorkshiremen" sketch was co-written by the four writers/performers of the series.    The sketch was one of the few sketches which survived the destruction of the series (by the tapes being wiped), by David Frost's Paradine Productions (which produced the series), and the sketch appears on the DVD of At Last the 1948 Show. The "Four Yorkshiremen" sketch has also been performed during Amnesty concert performances (by members of Monty Python – occasionally including other comedians and actors in place of Monty Python regulars – notably Rowan Atkinson and Alan Rickman), as well as being performed during Monty Python Live at the Hollywood Bowl and on other Monty Python shows. Footage of Tim Brooke-Taylor and John Cleese, from At Last the 1948 Show, was shown on the documentary special Monty Python: Almost the Truth (The Lawyers Cut).Brooke-Taylor also took part in Frost's pilot programme How to Irritate People in 1968, designed to sell what would later be recognised as the Monty Python style of comedy to the American market. Many of the sketches were later revived in the Monty Python TV series, notably the job interview sketch where Brooke-Taylor played a nervous interviewee tormented by interviewer John Cleese. The programme was also notable as the first collaboration of John Cleese and Michael Palin.In 1968–69, Brooke-Taylor was also a cast member and writer on the television comedy series Marty starring Marty Feldman, with John Junkin and Roland MacLeod.   A compilation of the two series of Marty has been released on a BBC DVD with the title of The Best of Marty Feldman. During this period Brooke-Taylor appeared as two characters in the film One Man Band directed by Orson Welles, however the project was never completed and remains unreleased.At around the same time, Brooke-Taylor made two series of Broaden Your Mind with Graeme Garden (and Bill Oddie joining the series for the second season).  Describing itself as "An Encyclopedia of the Air", this series was a string of comedy sketches (often lifted from I'm Sorry I'll Read That Again), linked (loosely) by a weekly running theme. Unfortunately, nothing but a few minutes of film inserts exist for this programme, though home-made off-air audio recordings survive for both seasons. Its success led to the commissioning of The Goodies, also with Bill Oddie and Graeme Garden. First transmitted on BBC2 in November 1970, The Goodies was a huge television success, running for over a decade on both BBC TV and (in its final year) UK commercial channel London Weekend Television, spawning many spin-off books and successful records.During the run of the Goodies, Brooke-Taylor took part in the BBC radio series Hello, Cheeky!, a bawdy stand up comedy show also starring Barry Cryer and John Junkin. The series transferred to television briefly, produced by the UK commercial franchise Yorkshire Television. He also appeared on television in British sitcoms, including You Must Be the Husband with Diane Keen, His and Hers with Madeline Smith, and Me and My Girl with Richard O'Sullivan.Brooke-Taylor also appeared regularly in advertisements, including the Christmas commercials for the Brentford Nylons chain of fabric stores, and in a public information film for the now-defunct E111 form.In 1971, he played the short, uncredited role of a computer scientist in the film Willy Wonka & the Chocolate Factory. After the end of The Goodies on UK television, Brooke-Taylor also worked again with Garden and Oddie on the animated television comedy series Bananaman, in which Brooke-Taylor was the narrator, as well as voicing the characters of King Zorg of the Nurks, Eddie the Gent, Auntie and Appleman. He also lent his voice to the children's TV series Gideon.Tim appeared, with Bill Oddie and Graeme Garden, in the Amnesty International show A Poke in the Eye (With a Sharp Stick) (during which they sang their hit song "Funky Gibbon"), and also appeared in the Amnesty International show The Secret Policeman's Other Ball in the sketches "Top of the Form" (with John Cleese, Graham Chapman, John Bird, John Fortune, Rowan Atkinson and Griff Rhys Jones), and "Cha Cha Cha" (with John Cleese and Graham Chapman).Brooke-Taylor, Graeme Garden, and Bill Oddie also appeared on Top of the Pops with their song "Funky Gibbon". Brooke-Taylor also appeared with Graeme Garden in the theatre production of The Unvarnished Truth.Other BBC radio programmes in which Brooke-Taylor played a part include the self-styled "antidote to panel games" I'm Sorry I Haven't a Clue which started in 1972, and Tim still appears regularly. On 18 February 1981 Brooke-Taylor was the subject of Thames Television's This Is Your Life.Graeme Garden was a regular team captain on the political satire game show If I Ruled the World. Tim Brooke-Taylor appeared as a guest in one episode, and, during the game "I Couldn't Disagree More" he proposed that it was high time The Goodies episodes were repeated. Garden was obliged by the rules of the game to rebut this statement, and replied "I couldn't disagree more... it was time to repeat them ten, fifteen years ago." This was followed by uproarious applause from the studio audience.In 2004, Brooke-Taylor and Graeme Garden were co-presenters of Channel 4's daytime game show, Beat the Nation, in which they indulged in usual game show "banter", but took the quiz itself seriously. He has appeared on stage in Australia and England, usually as a middle class Englishman. Around 1982, he branched out into pantomime as the Dame in Dick Whittington. He is also the author (and co-author) of several humorous books based mainly around his radio and television work and the sports of golf and cricket. He also took part in the Pro-Celebrity Golf television series (opposite Bruce Forsyth). Brooke-Taylor appeared on the premiere episode of the BBC golf-based game show Full Swing.Brooke-Taylor was appointed Officer of the Order of the British Empire (OBE) in the 2011 Birthday Honours.       
Filmography

Year Show/Film Role Notes 
1968 One Man Band Reporter / Young aristocrat Uncompleted/unreleased 
1971 Willy Wonka & the Chocolate Factory Computer Scientist   
1976 Pleasure at Her Majesty's Tim (with The Goodies)  
1981 The Secret Policeman's Other Ball Various  
1985 Morons from Outer Space Police Cop  
2010 Tangled Old Man Voice 

Selected television

Year Show/Film Role Notes 
1966 The Wednesday Play Uncredited role Episode: Cathy Come Home 
1967-68 At Last the 1948 Show Various characters Wrote for the series 
1968 How to Irritate People Various characters Also a writer 
1968-69 Marty Various characters Wrote for the series 
1968-69 Broaden Your Mind Various characters Wrote for the series 
1970-82 The Goodies Tim Wrote for the series 
1973-79 Hello Cheeky Himself Wrote for the series 
1983-84 Bananaman Various voices  
1984-88 Me and My Girl Derek Yates  
1987-88 You Must Be The Husband Tom Hammond  
1992 The Upper Hand Trevor Episode: Blind Date 
1997 One Foot in the Grave Derek Episode: Endgame 
1999   Various characters  
2004 Beat the Nation Quiz Co-Host Co-Host with Graeme Garden  
2005 Absolute Power Peter Harrow  
2005-2009 Heartbeat Ronnie Smethers Guest role 
2008 Agatha Christie's Marple Dr Edward Humbleby Episode: 'Murder is Easy' 
2009 Horne and Corden Vicar  
2010-11 Little Howard's Big Question Various characters  

Radio

Year Show/Film Role Notes 
1964-73 I'm Sorry, I'll Read That Again Various Characters Wrote for the series 
1972 - Present I'm Sorry I Haven't a Clue Himself Cult panel show  

Personal lifeBrooke-Taylor married Christine Weadon in 1968 and they have two sons, Ben and Edward.   He lives in Berkshire. Brooke-Taylor was appointed Officer of the Order of the British Empire (OBE) in the 2011 Birthday Honours for services to light entertainment. 
BibliographyAs sole author


Rule Britannia
Tim Brooke-Taylor's Golf Bag
Tim Brooke-Taylor's Cricket Box

As co-author

Tim Brooke-Taylor also co-wrote the following books with the other members of The Goodies:




The Goodies File
The Goodies Book of Criminal Records
The Making of The Goodies Disaster Movie


Footlights presidency 
 
 
 
Other informationTim Brooke-Taylor served the University of St Andrews as Rector between 1979 and 1982.[1]He is an honorary Vice-President of Derby County F.C.. 
References 
External links

Tim Brooke-Taylor – BBC Guide to Comedy
Tim Brooke-Taylor – The Museum of Broadcast Communication
Tim Brooke-Taylor – London Speaker Bureau
Tim Brooke-Taylor biography – Personally Speaking – Norman Phillips Organisation
Tim Brooke-Taylor – BBC – I'm Sorry, I Haven't a Clue
Tim Brooke-Taylor – TV Comedy People
 
 
Tim Brooke-Taylor Interview Web Wombat Theatre
ISIHAC interviews – with Tim Brooke-Taylor, Graeme Garden, and Barry Cryer
The Origin of Monty Python – mentions Tim, ISIRTA and "At Last the 1948 Show"
Radio Ha Ha interview – Tim discusses his career in Episode 1 of Australian comedy podcast Radio Ha Ha
"A Clump of Plinths" – the 1963 Cambridge Footlights Club revue – later renamed "Cambridge Circus" (this was the Footlights revue during the time when Tim Brooke-Taylor was President of the Footlights.  Tim was also a member of the revue cast.
OBEs all round - Goodies pair honoured
Graeme Garden thought that OBE letter was a bill
Birthday Honours List 2011 in pictures
Goodies pair "thrilled" with OBEs
Tim Brooke-Taylor: 'Yes, I do miss Humphrey Lyttelton. He told the filthiest jokes'

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT

















 
 
 
 
 
	Anders Hejlsberg
 Anders Hejlsberg (born December 1960) Hejlsberg states in a video at the Microsoft Museum that his birthdate is 1960, but most other sources say 1961. At TechEd 2006 in Barcelona, Anders confirmed his birthdate as December 1960  is a prominent Danish software engineer who co-designed several popular and commercially successful programming languages and development tools. He was the original author of Turbo Pascal and the chief architect of Delphi. He currently works for Microsoft as the lead architect of C#    and core developer on TypeScript.
Early lifeHejlsberg was born in Copenhagen, Denmark, and studied engineering at the Technical University of Denmark but did not graduate. Hejlsberg states in this video that he never graduated  While at the university in 1980, he began writing programs for the Nascom microcomputer, including a Pascal compiler which was initially marketed as the Blue Label Software Pascal for the Nascom-2.  However, he soon rewrote it for CP/M and DOS, marketing it first as Compas Pascal and later as PolyPascal. Later the product was licensed to Borland, and integrated into an IDE to become the Turbo Pascal system. Turbo Pascal competed with PolyPascal. The compiler itself was largely inspired by the "Tiny Pascal" compiler in Niklaus Wirth's "Algorithms + Data Structures = Programs", one of the most influential computer science books of the time. Anders and his partners ran a computer store in Copenhagen and marketed accounting systems. Their company, PolyData, was the distributor for Microsoft products in Denmark which put them at odds with Borland. Philippe Kahn and Anders first met in 1986. For all those years, Niels Jensen, one of Borland's founders and its majority shareholder, had successfully handled the relationship between Borland and PolyData. 
At BorlandIn Borland's hands, Turbo Pascal became one of the most commercially successful Pascal compilers.  Hejlsberg remained with PolyData until the company came under financial stress, at which time, in 1989 he moved to California and became Chief Engineer at Borland. There he remained until 1996. During this time he developed Turbo Pascal further, and eventually became the chief architect for the team which produced the replacement for Turbo Pascal, Delphi.
At MicrosoftIn 1996, Hejlsberg left Borland and joined Microsoft. One of his first achievements was the J++ programming language and the Windows Foundation Classes; he also became a Microsoft Distinguished Engineer and Technical Fellow. Since 2000, he has been the lead architect of the team developing the language C#. In 2012 Hejlsberg announced his new project TypeScript - a superset of JavaScript.
AwardsHe received the 2001 Dr. Dobb's Excellence in Programming Award for his work on Turbo Pascal, Delphi, C# and the Microsoft .NET Framework.Together with Shon Katzenberger, Scott Wiltamuth, Todd Proebsting, Erik Meijer, Peter Hallam and Peter Sollich,  Anders was recently awarded a Technical Recognition Award for Outstanding Technical Achievement for their work on the C# language. A video about this is available at Microsoft Channel 9. 
Published work

The C# Programming Language, 2nd Edition, Addison-Wesley Professional, ISBN 0-321-33443-4, June 9, 2006
The C# Programming Language, 3rd Edition, Addison-Wesley Professional, ISBN 0-321-56299-2, October 18, 2008
The C# Programming Language, 4th Edition, Addison-Wesley Professional, ISBN 0-321-74176-5, ISBN 978-0-321-74176-9, October 2010


References 
External links

JavaWorld of 1997 writes how Hejlsberg went to Microsoft: Microsoft offered Anders Hejlsberg a signing bonus of US$500,000 and stock options. Microsoft doubled the bonus to US$1,000,000 after Borland made a counter-offer. Hejlsberg left Borland in October 1996.


Interviews

Software engineering radio Episode 97: Interview Anders Hejlsberg
Interview from .NET Developer's Journal, Vol 3 issue 2.
The C# Design Process
The Trouble with Checked Exceptions
Delegates, Components and Simplexity
Versioning, Virtual and Override
Contracts and Interoperability
Inappropriate Abstractions
Generics in C#, Java and C++
CLR Design Choices
Microsoft's Hejlsberg touts .NET, C-Omega (now LINQ) technologies
Deep Inside C#: An Interview with Microsoft Chief Architect Anders Hejlsberg
C#: Yesterday, Today, and Tomorrow
Video interview at channel9
Computerworld Interview with Anders on C#


Videos

Anders Hejlserg - Introducing TypeScript
Life and Times of Anders Hejlsberg
Anders Hejlsberg - Tour through computing industry history at the Microsoft Museum
Anders Hejlsberg - What's so great about generics?
Anders Hejlsberg - Programming data in C# 3.0
Anders Hejlsberg - What brought about the birth of the CLR
Anders Hejlsberg - The .NET Show: The .NET Framework
Anders Hejlsberg - The .NET Show: Programming in C#
Anders Hejlsberg - More C# Talk from C#'s Architect (Happy Birthday Video #3)
Anders Hejlsberg - LINQ
Anders Hejlsberg - Whiteboard with Anders Hejlsberg
Anders Hejlsberg - LINQ and Functional Programming
Outstanding Technical Achievement: C# Team
Anders Hejlsberg - The Future of C#
Anders Hejlsberg - The future of programming languages (JAOO Aarhus 2008)
The Future of C# and Visual Basic (PDC 2010)

 
 
 
DEFAULTSORT










 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Utah Phillips
 
Bruce Duncan "Utah" Phillips (May 15, 1935 – May 23, 2008) "Utah Phillips Has Left the Stage", KVMR, Nevada City, California, May 24, 2008. Accessed 2008-05-24.  was a labor organizer, folk singer, storyteller, poet  and the "Golden Voice of the Great Southwest". He described the struggles of labor unions and the power of direct action, self-identifying as an anarchist.    He often promoted the Industrial Workers of the World in his music, actions, and words.
Biography
Early yearsPhillips was born in Cleveland, Ohio, to Edwin Deroger Phillips and Frances Kathleen Coates.  He attended East High School in Salt Lake City, Utah.  His father, Edwin Phillips, was a labor organizer, and his parents' activism influenced much of his life's work.  Phillips was a card-carrying member of the Industrial Workers of the World, the "wobblies," headquartered in Chicago, Illinois. Phillips  rode the railroads, and wrote songs.     He served in the United States Army for three years beginning in 1956 (at the latest). Witnessing the devastation of post-war Korea greatly influenced his social and political thinking.
CareerFollowing service, he returned to  Salt Lake City, Utah, and joined Ammon Hennacy from the Catholic Worker Movement in establishing a mission house of hospitality named after the activist Joe Hill.   Phillips worked at the Joe Hill House for the next eight years, then ran for the U.S. Senate as a candidate of Utah's Peace and Freedom Party in 1968. He received 2,019 votes (0.5%) in an election won by Republican Wallace F. Bennett.  He also ran for president of the United States in 1976 for the Do-Nothing Party. He adopted the name U. Utah Phillips in emulation of country vocalist T. Texas Tyler. Phillips met folk singer Rosalie Sorrels in the early 1950s, and remained a close friend of hers.  It was Sorrels who started playing the songs that Phillips wrote, and through her his music began to spread. After leaving Utah in the late 1960s, he went to Saratoga Springs, New York, where he was befriended by the folk community at the Caffé Lena coffee house.  He became a staple performer there for a decade, and would return throughout his career.  Phillips was a proud member of the Industrial Workers of the World (IWW or Wobblies).  His view of unions and politics were shaped by his parents, especially his Mom who was a labor organizer for the CIO.  But Phillips was more of a Christian anarchist and a pacifist, so found the modern-day Wobblies to be the perfect fit for him, an iconoclast and artist.  In recent years, perhaps no single person did more to spread the Wobbly gospel than Phillips, whose countless concerts were, in effect, organizing meetings for the cause of labor, unions, anarchism, pacifism, and the Wobblies.  He was a tremendous interpreter of classic Wobbly tunes including "Hallelujah, I'm a Bum," "The Preacher and the Slave," and "Bread and Roses."An avid trainhopper, Phillips recorded several albums of music related to the railroads, especially the era of steam locomotives. His first recorded album, Good Though!, is an example, and contains such songs as "Daddy, What's a Train?" and "Queen of the Rails" as well as what may be his most famous composition, "Moose Turd Pie"  wherein he tells a tall tale of his work as a gandy dancer repairing track in the Southwestern United States desert.In 1991 Phillips recorded, in one take, an album of song, poetry and short stories entitled I've Got To Know, inspired by his anger at the first Gulf War. The album includes "Enola Gay," his first composition written about the United States' atomic attack on Hiroshima and Nagasaki.Phillips was a mentor to Kate Wolf. He recorded songs and stories with Rosalie Sorrels on a CD called The Long Memory (1996), originally a college project "Worker's Doxology" for 1992 'cold-drill Magazine' Boise State University. His protégée, Ani DiFranco, recorded two CDs, The Past Didn't Go Anywhere (1996) and Fellow Workers (1999), with him.  He was nominated for a Grammy Award for his work with DiFranco. His "Green Rolling Hills" was made into a country hit by Emmylou Harris, and "The Goodnight-Loving Trail" became a classic as well, being recorded by Ian Tyson, Tom Waits, and others.
Later yearsThough known primarily for his work as a concert performer and labor organizer, Phillips also worked as an archivist, dishwasher, and warehouse-man.   Phillips was a member of various socio-political organizations and groups throughout his life. A strong supporter of labor struggles, he was a member of the Industrial Workers of the World (IWW), the International Union of Mine, Mill, and Smelter Workers (Mine Mill), and the Travelling Musician's Union AFM Local 1000. In solidarity with the poor, he was also an honorary member of Dignity Village, a homeless community. A pacifist, he was a member of Veterans for Peace and the Peace Center of Nevada County. In his personal life, Phillips enjoyed varied hobbies and interests. These included Egyptology; amateur chemistry; linguistics; history (Asian, African, Mormon and world); futhark; debate; and poetry. He also enjoyed culinary hobbies, such as pickling, cooking and gardening. He married Joanna Robinson on July 31, 1989, in Nevada City. 

Phillips became an elder statesman for the folk music community, and a keeper of stories and songs that might otherwise have passed into obscurity. He was also a member of the great Traveling Nation, the community of hobos and railroad bums that populates the Midwest United States along the rail lines, and was an important keeper of their history and culture. He also became an honorary member of numerous folk societies in the U.S.A. and Canada. When Kate Wolf grew ill and was forced to cancel concerts, she asked Phillips to fill in. Suffering from an ailment which makes it more difficult to play guitar, Phillips hesitated, citing his declining guitar ability. "Nobody ever came just to hear you play," she said. Phillips told this story as a way of explaining how his style over the years became increasingly based on storytelling instead of just songs. He was a gifted storyteller and monologist, and his concerts generally had an even mix of spoken word and sung content. He attributed much of his success to his personality. "It is better to be likeable than talented," he often said, self-deprecatingly.Until it lost its funding, Phillips hosted his own weekly radio show, Loafer's Glory: The Hobo Jungle of the Mind, originating on KVMR and nationally syndicated.Phillips lived in Nevada City, California, for 21 years where he worked on the start-up of the Hospitality House, a homeless shelter,  and the Peace and Justice Center. "It's my town. Nevada City is a primary seed-bed for community organizing." In August 2007, Phillips announced that he would undergo catheter ablation to address his heart problems.  Later that autumn, Phillips announced that due to health problems he could no longer tour.  By January 2008, he decided against a heart transplant. Phillips died May 23, 2008 in Nevada City, California, from complications of heart disease, at the age of 73.  He was survived by his wife, sons, Duncan and Brendan, and a daughter, Morrigan.  Following a private service, a public memorial was held on June 1, in Pioneer Park, in Nevada City. His service was officiated by Meghan Cefalu, a Unitarian Universalist pastor.  Phillips is buried in Forest View Cemetery in Nevada City.
Discography


Solo albums

1961 Nobody Knows Me (Prestige)
1974 Good Though! (Philo)
1975 El Capitan (Philo)
1980 All Used Up: A Scrapbook (Philo)
1983 We Have Fed You All a Thousand Years (Philo)
1992 I've Got to Know (Alcazar) (reissued 2003 by AK Press)
1996 The Past Didn't Go Anywhere - with Ani Difranco (Righteous Babe Records)
1999 Fellow Workers - with Ani Difranco (Righteous Babe Records)
1997 Loafer's Glory - with Mark Ross (Red House Records)
1997 The Telling Takes Me Home (includes tracks from El Capitan and All Used Up) (Philo/Rounder)
1999 The Moscow Hold (Red House Records)
2000 Making Speech Free (Free Dirt Records)
2005 Starlight on the Rails: A Songbook (4-cd Compilation) (AK Press/Daemon)


 
Other albums

1985 Don't Mourn - Organize!: Songs Of Labor Songwriter Joe Hill - Various Artists (Smithsonian Folkways)
1992 Rebel Voices: Songs of the Industrial Workers of the World - Various Artists (Flying Fish)
1996 The Long Memory - Utah Phillips and Rosalie Sorrels (Red House Records)
1997 Heart Songs: The Old Time Country Songs of Utah Phillips - Jody Stecher and Kate Brislin (Rounder)
1997 Legends of Folk - Utah Phillips, Ramblin' Jack Elliot and Spider John Koerner (Red House Records)
2001 The Rose Tattoo Live - Trains, Tramps And Traditions The Rose Tattoo (Cookie Man Music)
2008 May Day At The Pabst - Utah Philips, Larry Penn, recorded live in Milwaukee in 2006 (Cookie Man Music)
2008 Strangers in Another Country: The Songs of Bruce "Utah" Phillips - Rosalie Sorrels (Red House Records)
2009 Singing Through the Hard Times: A Tribute to Utah Phillips - Various Artists (Righteous Babe Records)
 

Notes and references 
External links 
 

September 2003 Interview in The Progressive
Biography from the 1997 Folk Alliance Lifetime Achievement Awards
Summer 2005 Interview in "Unlikely Stories"
Fall 2005 Interview in YES! Magazine
Turtle Vision photo gallery of Utah Phillips
  (Radio broadcast)
The “Golden Voice of the Great Southwest”, Utah Phillips memorial page on Democracy Now!
Utah Phillips interview with David Kupfer, The Progressive, September 2003.
"Voting for the First Time", by Carolyn Crane. The Nation. October 12, 2004.
 
 
[1], cover performance of "All Used Up" by Suzanne Langille in London, May 14, 2011.

 
 
DEFAULTSORT


























 
 
 
	Titus

For the personal name, see Titus (praenomen).  For other uses, see Titus (disambiguation).
 
 
Titus ( ;  30 December 39 – 13 September 81), was Roman Emperor from 79 to 81. A member of the Flavian dynasty, Titus succeeded his father Vespasian upon his death, thus becoming the first Roman Emperor to come to the throne after his own father.Prior to becoming Emperor, Titus gained renown as a military commander, serving under his father in Judaea during the First Jewish-Roman War. The campaign came to a brief halt with the death of emperor Nero in 68, launching Vespasian's bid for the imperial power during the Year of the Four Emperors. When Vespasian was declared Emperor on 1 July 69, Titus was left in charge of ending the Jewish rebellion. In 70, he successfully laid siege to and destroyed the city and Temple of Jerusalem. For this achievement Titus was awarded a triumph; the Arch of Titus commemorates his victory to this day.Under the rule of his father, Titus gained notoriety in Rome serving as prefect of the Praetorian Guard, and for carrying on a controversial relationship with the Jewish queen Berenice. Despite concerns over his character, Titus ruled to great acclaim following the death of Vespasian in 79, and was considered a good emperor by Suetonius and other contemporary historians. As emperor, he is best known for completing the Colosseum and for his generosity in relieving the suffering caused by two disasters, the Mount Vesuvius eruption of 79 and a fire in Rome in 80. After barely two years in office, Titus died of a fever on 13 September 81. He was deified by the Roman Senate and succeeded by his younger brother Domitian.
Early lifeTitus was born in Rome, probably on 30 December 39 AD, as the eldest son of Titus Flavius Vespasianus—commonly known as Vespasian—and Domitilla the Elder.  He had one younger sister, Domitilla the Younger (b. 45), and one younger brother, also named Titus Flavius Domitianus (b. 51), but commonly referred to as Domitian.Decades of civil war during the 1st century BC had contributed greatly to the demise of the old aristocracy of Rome, which was gradually replaced in prominence by a new provincial nobility during the early part of the 1st century. Jones (1992), p. 3  One such family was the gens Flavia, which rose from relative obscurity to prominence in just four generations, acquiring wealth and status under the Emperors of the Julio-Claudian dynasty. Titus's great-grandfather, Titus Flavius Petro, had served as a centurion under Pompey during Caesar's civil war. His military career ended in disgrace when he fled the battlefield at the Battle of Pharsalus in 48 BC. Jones (1992), p. 1  Nevertheless, Petro managed to improve his status by marrying the extremely wealthy Tertulla, whose fortune guaranteed the upwards mobility of Petro's son Titus Flavius Sabinus I, Titus's grandfather. Jones (1992), p. 2  Sabinus himself amassed further wealth and possible equestrian status through his services as tax collector in Asia and banker in Helvetia. By marrying Vespasia Polla he allied himself to the more prestigious patrician gens Vespasia, ensuring the elevation of his sons Titus Flavius Sabinus II and Vespasian to the senatorial rank. The political career of Vespasian included the offices of quaestor, aedile and praetor, and culminated with a consulship in 51, the year Domitian was born. As a military commander, he gained early renown by participating in the Roman invasion of Britain in 43.  What little is known of Titus's early life has been handed down to us by Suetonius, who records that he was brought up at the imperial court in the company of Britannicus, Suetonius, The Lives of Twelve Caesars, Life of Titus 2  the son of emperor Claudius, who would be murdered by Nero in 55. The story was even told that Titus was reclining next to Britannicus, the night he was murdered, and sipped of the poison that was handed to him.  Further details on his education are scarce, but it seems he showed early promise in the military arts and was a skilled poet and orator both in Greek and Latin. 
He died 2 years after being dismissed.
Military careerFrom c. 57 to 59 he was a military tribune in Germania. He also served in Britannia, perhaps arriving c. 60 with reinforcements needed after the revolt of Boudica. In c. 63 he returned to Rome and married Arrecina Tertulla, daughter of a former Prefect of the Praetorian Guard. She died c. 65.  Titus then took a new wife of a much more distinguished family, Marcia Furnilla. However, Marcia's family was closely linked to the opposition to Nero. Her uncle Barea Soranus and his daughter Servilia were among those who perished after the failed Pisonian conspiracy of 65.  Some modern historians theorize that Titus divorced his wife because of her family's connection to the conspiracy.   He never re-married. Titus appears to have had multiple daughters,  at least one of them by Marcia Furnilla. Suetonius, The Lives of Twelve Caesars, Life of Titus 4  The only one known to have survived to adulthood was Julia Flavia, perhaps Titus's child by Arrecina, whose mother was also named Julia.  During this period Titus also practiced law and attained the rank of quaestor. 
Judaean campaigns 

In 66 the Jews of the Judaea Province revolted against the Roman Empire. Cestius Gallus, the legate of Syria, was defeated at the battle of Beth-Horon and forced to retreat from Jerusalem.  The pro-Roman king Agrippa II and his sister Berenice fled the city to Galilee where they later gave themselves up to the Romans. Nero appointed Vespasian to put down the rebellion, who was dispatched to the region at once with the fifth and tenth legions.  He was later joined by Titus at Ptolemais, bringing with him the fifteenth legion. Josephus, The War of the Jews    With a strength of 60,000 professional soldiers, the Romans prepared to sweep across Galilee and march on Jerusalem. The history of the war was covered in dramatic detail by the Roman-Jewish historian Josephus in his work The Wars of the Jews. Josephus served as a commander in the city of Jotapata when the Roman army invaded Galilee in 67. After an exhausting siege which lasted 47 days, the city fell, with an estimated 40,000 killed and the remaining Jewish resistance committing suicide.  Surviving a group suicide, Josephus surrendered to Vespasian and became a prisoner.  He later wrote that he provided the Romans with intelligence on the ongoing revolt.  By 68, the entire coast and the north of Judaea were subjugated by the Roman army, with decisive victories won at Taricheae and Gamala, where Titus distinguished himself as a skilled general.  
Year of the Four Emperors
The last and most significant fortress of Jewish resistance was Jerusalem. The campaign came to a sudden halt when news arrived of Nero's death. Josephus, The Wars of the Jews    Almost simultaneously, the Roman Senate had declared Galba, then governor of Hispania, as Emperor of Rome. Vespasian decided to await further orders, and sent Titus to greet the new princeps.  Before reaching Italy, Titus learnt that Galba had been murdered and replaced by Otho, governor of Lusitania, and that Vitellius and his armies in Germania were preparing to march on the capital, intent on overthrowing Otho. Not wanting to risk being taken hostage by one side or the other, he abandoned the journey to Rome and rejoined his father in Judaea. Tacitus, Histories    Meanwhile, Otho was defeated in the First Battle of Bedriacum and committed suicide. When the news spread across the armies in Judaea and Ægyptus, they took matters into their own hands and declared Vespasian emperor on 1 July 69.  Vespasian accepted, and through negotiations by Titus, joined forces with Gaius Licinius Mucianus, governor of Syria.  A strong force drawn from the Judaean and Syrian legions marched on Rome under the command of Mucianus, while Vespasian travelled to Alexandria, leaving Titus in charge to end the Jewish rebellion.   By the end of 69, the forces of Vitellius had been beaten, and Vespasian was officially declared emperor by the Senate on 21 December, thus ending the Year of the Four Emperors. 
Siege of Jerusalem
Meanwhile the Jews had become embroiled in a civil conflict of their own, splitting the resistance in the city among two factions; the Sicarii led by Simon Bar Giora, and the Zealots led by John of Gischala.  Titus seized the opportunity to begin the assault on Jerusalem. The Roman army was joined by the twelfth legion, which was previously defeated under Cestius Gallus, and from Alexandria Vespasian sent Tiberius Julius Alexander, governor of Ægyptus, to act as Titus's second in command.  Titus surrounded the city, with three legions (Vth, XIIth and XVth) on the western side and one (Xth) on the Mount of Olives to the east. He put pressure on the food and water supplies of the inhabitants by allowing pilgrims to enter the city to celebrate Passover, and then refusing them egress. Jewish raids continuously harassed the Roman army, one of which nearly resulted in Titus being captured. After attempts by Josephus to negotiate a surrender had failed, the Romans resumed hostilities and quickly breached the first and second walls of the city.  To intimidate the resistance, Titus ordered deserters from the Jewish side to be crucified around the city wall.  By this time the Jews had been exhausted by famine, and when the weak third wall was breached, bitter street fighting ensued.  The Romans finally captured the Antonia Fortress and began a frontal assault on the gates of the Temple.  According to Josephus, Titus had ordered that the Temple should not be destroyed , but while the fighting around the gates continued, a soldier hurled a torch inside one of the windows, which quickly set the entire building ablaze.  The later Christian chronicler Sulpicius Severus, possibly drawing on a lost portion of Tacitus' Histories, claims that Titus favoured destruction of the Temple.  The Temple was completely demolished, after which Titus's soldiers proclaimed him imperator in honor of the victory.  Jerusalem was sacked and much of the population killed or dispersed. Josephus claims that 1,100,000 people were killed during the siege, of which a majority were Jewish. Josephus, The Wars of the Jews    97,000 were captured and enslaved, including Simon Bar Giora and John of Gischala.  Many fled to areas around the Mediterranean. Titus reportedly refused to accept a wreath of victory, as he claimed that he had not won the victory on his own, but had been the vehicle through which their God had manifested his wrath against his people. 
Heir to Vespasian
Unable to sail to Italy during the winter, Titus celebrated elaborate games at Caesarea Maritima and Berytus, then travelled to Zeugma on the Euphrates, where he was presented with a crown by Vologases I of Parthia. While visiting Antioch he confirmed the traditional rights of the Jews in that city.  On his way to Alexandria, he stopped in Memphis to consecrate the sacred bull Apis. According to Suetonius, this caused consternation; the ceremony required Titus to wear a diadem, which the Romans associated with kingship, and the partisanship of Titus's legions had already led to fears that he might rebel against his father. Titus returned quickly to Rome – hoping, says Suetonius, to allay any suspicions about his conduct. Upon his arrival in the city in 71, Titus was awarded a triumph.  Accompanied by Vespasian and Domitian he rode into the city, enthusiastically saluted by the Roman populace and preceded by a lavish parade containing treasures and captives from the war. Josephus describes a procession with large amounts of gold and silver carried along the route, followed by elaborate re-enactments of the war, Jewish prisoners, and finally the treasures taken from the Temple of Jerusalem, including the Menorah and the Pentateuch.  Simon Bar Giora was executed in the Forum, after which the procession closed with religious sacrifices at the Temple of Jupiter. 
The triumphal Arch of Titus, which stands at one entrance to the Forum, memorializes the victory of Titus.
With Vespasian declared emperor, Titus and his brother Domitian likewise received the title of Caesar from the Senate.  In addition to sharing tribunician power with his father, Titus held seven consulships during Vespasian's reign Suetonius, The Lives of Twelve Caesars, Life of Titus 6  and acted as his secretary, appearing in the Senate on his behalf.  More crucially, he was appointed commander of the Praetorian Guard, ensuring their loyalty to the Emperor and further solidifying Vespasian's position as a legitimate ruler.  In this capacity he achieved considerable notoriety in Rome for his violent actions, frequently ordering the execution of suspected traitors on the spot.  When in 79, a plot by Aulus Caecina Alienus and Eprius Marcellus to overthrow Vespasian was uncovered, Titus invited Alienus to dinner and ordered him to be stabbed before he had even left the room.  During the Jewish wars, Titus had begun a love affair with Berenice, sister of Agrippa II.  The Herodians had collaborated with the Romans during the rebellion, and Berenice herself had supported Vespasian upon his campaign to become emperor.  In 75, she returned to Titus and openly lived with him in the palace as his promised wife. The Romans were wary of the Eastern Queen and disapproved of their relationship.   When the pair was publicly denounced by Cynics in the theatre, Titus caved in to the pressure and sent her away, Cassius Dio, Roman History LXV.15  but his reputation further suffered.
Emperor
Succession
Vespasian died of an infection on 23 June 79 AD,  and was immediately succeeded by his son Titus. Cassius Dio, Roman History LXVI.18  Because of his many alleged vices, many Romans feared at this point that he would be another Nero. Suetonius, The Lives of Twelve Caesars, Life of Titus 7  Against these expectations, however, Titus proved to be an effective Emperor and was well loved by the population, who praised him highly when they found that he possessed the greatest virtues instead of vices.  One of his first acts as Emperor was to publicly order a halt to trials based on treason charges, Suetonius, The Lives of Twelve Caesars, Life of Titus 8  which had long plagued the principate. The law of treason, or maiestas law, was originally intended to prosecute those who had corruptly 'impaired the people and majesty of Rome' by any revolutionary action. Tacitus, Annals    Under Augustus, however, this custom had been revived and applied to cover slander or libellous writings as well,  eventually leading to a long cycle of trials and executions under such emperors as Tiberius, Caligula and Nero, spawning entire networks of informers that terrorized Rome's political system for decades.  Titus put an end to this practice, against himself or anyone else, declaring: "It is impossible for me to be insulted or abused in any way. For I do naught that deserves censure, and I care not for what is reported falsely. As for the emperors who are dead and gone, they will avenge themselves in case anyone does them a wrong, if in very truth they are demigods and possess any power." Cassius Dio, Roman History LXVI.19  Consequently, no senators were put to death during his reign;  he thus kept to his promise that he would assume the office of Pontifex Maximus "for the purpose of keeping his hands unstained". Suetonius, The Lives of Twelve Caesars, Life of Titus 9  The informants were publicly punished and banished from the city, and Titus further prevented abuses by introducing legislation that made it unlawful for persons to be tried under different laws for the same offense.  Finally, when Berenice returned to Rome, he sent her away. As Emperor he became known for his generosity, and Suetonius states that upon realising he had brought no benefit to anyone during a whole day he remarked, "Friends, I have lost a day." 
Challenges
Although his administration was marked by a relative absence of major military or political conflicts, Titus faced a number of major disasters during his brief reign. On 24 August 79, two months after his accession, Mount Vesuvius erupted,  resulting in the almost complete destruction of life and property in the cities and resort communities around the Bay of Naples. The cities of Pompeii and Herculaneum were buried under metres of stone and lava,  killing thousands of citizens.  Titus appointed two ex-consuls to organise and coordinate the relief effort, while personally donating large amounts of money from the imperial treasury to aid the victims of the volcano.  Additionally, he visited Pompeii once after the eruption and again the following year. Cassius Dio, Roman History LXVI.24 During the second visit, in spring of AD 80, a fire broke out in Rome, burning large parts of the city for three days and three nights.   Although the extent of the damage was not as disastrous as during the Great Fire of 64—crucially sparing the many districts of insulae—Cassius Dio records a long list of important public buildings that were destroyed, including Agrippa's Pantheon, the Temple of Jupiter, the Diribitorium, parts of Pompey's Theatre and the Saepta Julia among others.  Once again, Titus personally compensated for the damaged regions.  According to Suetonius, a plague similarly struck during the fire.  The nature of the disease, however, or the death toll are unknown.Meanwhile war had resumed in Britannia, where Gnaeus Julius Agricola pushed further into Caledonia and managed to establish several forts there.  As a result of his actions, Titus received the title of Imperator for the fifteenth time. His reign also saw the rebellion led by Terentius Maximus, one of several false Neros who continued to appear throughout the 70s. Tacitus, Histories    Although Nero was primarily known as a universally hated tyrant—there is evidence that for much of his reign, he remained highly popular in the eastern provinces. Reports that Nero had in fact survived the assassination attempts were fueled by the vague circumstances surrounding his death and several prophecies foretelling his return.  According to Cassius Dio, Terentius Maximus resembled Nero in voice and appearance and, like him, sang to the lyre.  Terentius established a following in Asia minor but was soon forced to flee beyond the Euphrates, taking refuge with the Parthians.   In addition, sources state that Titus discovered that his brother Domitian was plotting against him but refused to have him killed or banished.  Cassius Dio, Roman History LXVI.26 
Public works
Construction of the Flavian Amphitheatre, presently better known as the Colosseum, was begun in 70 under Vespasian and finally completed in 80 under Titus.  In addition to providing spectacular entertainments to the Roman populace, the building was also conceived as a gigantic triumphal monument to commemorate the military achievements of the Flavians during the Jewish wars.  The inaugural games lasted for a hundred days and were said to be extremely elaborate, including gladiatorial combat, fights between wild animals (elephants and cranes), mock naval battles for which the theatre was flooded, horse races and chariot races. Cassius Dio, Roman History LXVI.25  During the games, wooden balls were dropped into the audience, inscribed with various prizes (clothing, gold, or even slaves), which could then be traded for the designated item. Adjacent to the amphitheatre, within the precinct of Nero's Golden House, Titus had also ordered the construction of a new public bath-house, which was to bear his name.  Construction of this building was hastily finished to coincide with the completion of the Flavian Amphitheatre. Practice of the imperial cult was revived by Titus, though apparently it met with some difficulty as Vespasian was not deified until six months after his death.  To further honor and glorify the Flavian dynasty, foundations were laid for what would later become the Temple of Vespasian and Titus, which was finished by Domitian.  
DeathAt the closing of the games, Titus officially dedicated the amphitheatre and the baths, which was to be his final recorded act as Emperor.  He set out for the Sabine territories but fell ill at the first posting station Suetonius, The Lives of Twelve Caesars, Life of Titus 10  where he died of a fever, reportedly in the same farm-house as his father. Suetonius, The Lives of Twelve Caesars, Life of Titus 11  Allegedly, the last words he uttered before passing away were: "I have made but one mistake".   Titus had ruled the Roman Empire for just over two years, from the death of his father in 79 to his own on 13 September 81.  He was succeeded by Domitian, whose first act as emperor was to deify his brother. Suetonius, The Lives of Twelve Caesars, Life of Domitian 2 Historians have speculated on the exact nature of his death, and to which mistake Titus alluded in his final words. Philostratus writes that he was poisoned by Domitian with a sea hare, and that his death had been foretold to him by Apollonius of Tyana.  Suetonius and Cassius Dio maintain he died of natural causes, but both accuse Domitian of having left the ailing Titus for dead.   Consequently, Dio believes Titus's mistake refers to his failure to have his brother executed when he was found to be openly plotting against him. According to the Babylonian Talmud (Gittin 56b), an insect flew into Titus's nose and picked at his brain for seven years. He noticed that the sound of a blacksmith hammering caused the ensuing pain to abate, so he paid for blacksmiths to hammer nearby him; however, the effect wore off and the insect resumed its gnawing. When he died, they opened his skull and found the insect had grown to the size of a bird. The Talmud gives this as the cause of his death and interprets it as divine retribution for his wicked actions. 
Ancestry 
  
 
Legacy
HistoriographyTitus's record among ancient historians stands as one of the most exemplary of any emperor. All the surviving accounts from this period, many of them written by his own contemporaries, present a highly favourable view towards Titus. His character has especially prospered in comparison with that of his brother Domitian.The Wars of the Jews offers a first-hand, eye-witness account on the Jewish rebellion and the character of Titus. The neutrality of Josephus' writings has come into question however as he was heavily indebted to the Flavians. In 71, he arrived in Rome in the entourage of Titus, became a Roman citizen and took on the Roman nomen Flavius and praenomen Titus from his patrons. He received an annual pension and lived in the palace.  It was while in Rome, and under Flavian patronage, that Josephus wrote all of his known works. The War of the Jews is heavily slanted against the leaders of the revolt, portraying the rebellion as weak and unorganized, and even blaming the Jews for causing the war.  The credibility of Josephus as a historian has subsequently come under fire. Another contemporary of Titus was Publius Cornelius Tacitus, who started his public career in 80 or 81 and credits the Flavian dynasty with his elevation.  The Histories—his account of this period—was published during the reign of Trajan. Unfortunately only the first five books from this work have survived until the present day, with the text on Titus's and Domitian's reign entirely lost.Suetonius Tranquilius gives a short but highly favourable account on Titus's reign in The Lives of Twelve Caesars, Suetonius, The Lives of Twelve Caesars, Life of Titus 1  emphasizing his military achievements and his generosity as Emperor, in short describing him as follows: Titus, of the same surname as his father, was the delight and darling of the human race; such surpassing ability had he, by nature, art, or good fortune, to win the affections of all men, and that, too, which is no easy task, while he was emperor.  Finally, Cassius Dio wrote his Roman History over a hundred years after the death of Titus. He shares a similar outlook as Suetonius, possibly even using the latter as a source, but is more reserved, noting: His satisfactory record may also have been due to the fact that he survived his accession but a very short time, for he was thus given no opportunity for wrongdoing. For he lived after this only two years, two months and twenty days — in addition to the thirty-nine years, five months and twenty-five days he had already lived at that time. In this respect, indeed, he is regarded as having equalled the long reign of Augustus, since it is maintained that Augustus would never have been loved had he lived a shorter time, nor Titus had he lived longer. For Augustus, though at the outset he showed himself rather harsh because of the wars and the factional strife, was later able, in the course of time, to achieve a brilliant reputation for his kindly deeds; Titus, on the other hand, ruled with mildness and died at the height of his glory, whereas, if he had lived a long time, it might have been shown that he owes his present fame more to good fortune than to merit.  Pliny the Elder, who later died during the eruption of Mount Vesuvius,  dedicated his Naturalis Historia to Titus. In contrast to the ideal portrayal of Titus in Roman histories,  in Jewish memory "Titus the Wicked" is remembered as an evil oppressor and destroyer of the Temple.  For example, one legend in the Babylonian Talmud describes Titus as having had sex with a whore on a Torah scroll inside the Temple during its destruction. 
Titus in later arts
The war in Judaea and the life of Titus, particularly his relationship with Berenice, have inspired writers and artists through the centuries. The bas-relief in the Arch of Titus has been influential in the depiction of the destruction of Jerusalem, with the Menorah frequently being used to symbolise the looting of the Second Temple.
Literature

Bérénice, a play by Jean Racine (1670) which focuses on the love affair between Titus and Berenice.
Tite et Bérénice, a play by Pierre Corneille which was in competition with Racine the same year, and concerns the same subject matter.
La clemenza di Tito, an opera by Mozart, about a fictional romance between Emperor Titus and Vitellia, daughter of Vitellius.
The Josephus Trilogy, novels by Lion Feuchtwanger, about the life of Flavius Josephus and his relation with the Flavian dynasty.
Der jüdische Krieg (Josephus), 1932
Die Söhne (The Jews of Rome), 1935
Der Tag wird kommen (The day will come, Josephus and the Emperor), 1942
The Marcus Didius Falco novels, which take place during the reign of Vespasian.
Titus figures prominently in "The Pearl-Maiden", a novel by H. Rider Haggard, first published in 1901.
The Roman Mysteries, a series of children's books which take place during the reign of Titus.
The High School Latin textbook series Ecce Romani takes place during the reign of Titus.


Paintings

The Destruction of Jerusalem by Titus by Wilhelm von Kaulbach (1846). Oil on canvas, 585 x 705 cm. Neue Pinakothek, Munich. An allegorical depiction of the destruction of Jerusalem, dramatically centered around the figure of Titus.
The Destruction of the Temple at Jerusalem by Nicolas Poussin (1637). Oil on canvas, 147 x 198,5 cm. Kunsthistorisches Museum, Vienna. Depicts the destruction and looting of the Second Temple by the Roman army led by Titus.
The Destruction of the Temple of Jerusalem by Francesco Hayez (1867). Oil on canvas, 183 x 252 cm. Galleria d'Arte Moderna, Venice. Depicts the destruction and looting of the Second Temple by the Roman army.
The Siege and Destruction of Jerusalem by the Romans Under the Command of Titus, A.D. 70 by David Roberts (1850). Oil on canvas, 136 x 197 cm. Private collection. Depicts the burning and looting of Jerusalem by the Roman army under Titus.
The Triumph of Titus and Vespasian by Giulio Romano (1540). Oil on wood, 170 x 120 cm. Louvre, Paris. Depicts Titus and Vespasian as they ride into Rome on a triumphal chariot, preceded by a parade carrying spoils from the war in Judaea. The painting anachronistically features the Arch of Titus, which was not completed until the reign of Domitian.
The Triumph of Titus by Lawrence Alma-Tadema (1885). Oil on canvas. Private collection. This painting depicts the triumphal procession of Titus and his family. Alma-Tadema was known for his meticulous historical research on the ancient world.  Vespasian, dressed as Pontifex Maximus, walks at the head of his family, followed by Domitian and his first wife Domitia Longina, who he had only recently married. Behind Domitian follows Titus, dressed in religious regalia. An exchange of glances between Titus and Domitia suggests an affair which historians have speculated upon.  


Notes 
References

 
 


Further reading 
Primary sources

Suetonius, The Lives of Twelve Caesars, Life of Titus, Latin text with English translation
Cassius Dio, Roman History, Books 65 and 66, English translation
, English translation
,   and  , English translation


Secondary material

Coinage of Titus at Wildwinds.com
A private collection of Titus denarii.
Biography of Titus at roman-emperors.org
[3] (Austin Simmons, The Cipherment of the Franks Casket) Titus is twice depicted on the back side of the Franks Casket.

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
    










 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	James Dewar
 
 Sir James Dewar FRS (20 September 1842 – 27 March 1923) was a Scottish chemist and physicist.  He is probably best-known today for his invention of the Dewar flask, which he used in conjunction with extensive research into the liquefaction of gases. He was also particularly interested in atomic and molecular spectroscopy, working in these fields for more than 25 years.
Early lifeJames Dewar was born in Kincardine-on-Forth in 1842, the youngest of six boys.  He lost his parents at the age of 15.  He was educated at Dollar Academy and the University of Edinburgh, where he studied under Lord Playfair, and later became Lord Playfair's assistant. Dewar would also study under August Kekulé at Ghent.
CareerIn 1875, Dewar was elected Jacksonian professor of natural experimental philosophy at the University of Cambridge, becoming a fellow of Peterhouse.  He became a member of the Royal Institution and later, replaced Dr. John Hall Gladstone in the role of Fullerian Professor of Chemistry in 1877. Dewar was also the President of the Chemical Society in 1897 and the British Association for the Advancement of Science in 1902, as well as serving on the Royal Commission established to examine London's water supply from 1893 to 1894 and the Committee on Explosives. It was whilst he was serving on the Committee on Explosives that he and Frederick Augustus Abel developed cordite, a smokeless gunpowder alternative.In 1867 Dewar described several chemical formulae for benzene.   Ironically, one of the formulae, which does not represent benzene correctly and was not advocated by Dewar, is sometimes still called Dewar benzene. His scientific work covers a wide field - his earlier papers cover a wide range of topics; organic chemistry, Hydrogen and its physical constants, high temperature research, the temperature of the sun and of the electric spark, electro-photometry and the chemistry of the electric arc. With Professor J. G. McKendrick, of Glasgow, he investigated the physiological action of light, and examined the changes which take place in the electrical condition of the retina under its influence. With Professor G. D. Living, one of his colleagues at Cambridge, he began in 1878 a long series of spectroscopic observations, the later of which were devoted to the spectroscopic examination of various gaseous elements separated from atmospheric air by the aid of low temperatures; and he was joined by Professor J. A. Fleming, of University College London, in the investigation of the electrical behaviour of substances cooled to very low temperatures. 
His name is most widely known in connection with his work on the liquefaction of the so-called permanent gases and his researches at temperatures approaching absolute zero. His interest in this branch of physics and chemistry dates back at least as far as 1874, when he discussed the "Latent Heat of Liquid Gases" before the British Association. In 1878 he devoted a Friday evening lecture at the Royal Institution to the then recent work of Louis Paul Cailletet and Raoul Pictet, and exhibited for the first time in Great Britain the working of the Cailletet apparatus. Six years later, again at the Royal Institution, he described the researches of Zygmunt Florenty Wróblewski and Karol Olszewski, and illustrated for the first time in public the liquefaction of oxygen and air. Soon afterwards he built a machine from which the liquefied gas could be drawn off through a valve for use as a cooling agent, before using the liquid oxygen in research work related to meteorites; about the same time he also obtained oxygen in the solid state. By 1891 he had designed and built, at the Royal Institution, machinery which yielded liquid oxygen in industrial quantities, and towards the end of that year he showed that both liquid oxygen and liquid ozone are strongly attracted by a magnet. About 1892 the idea occurred to him of using vacuum-jacketed vessels for the storage of liquid gases - the Dewar flask (otherwise known as a Thermos or vacuum flask) - the invention for which he became most famous. The vacuum flask was so efficient at keeping heat out that it was found possible to preserve the liquids for comparatively long periods, making examination of their optical properties possible. Dewar did not profit from the widespread adoption of his vacuum flask - he lost a court case against Thermos concerning the patent for his invention. While Dewar was recognised as the inventor, because he did not patent his invention there was no way to stop Thermos from using the design.     He next experimented with a high pressure hydrogen jet by which low temperatures were realized through the Joule–Thomson effect, and the successful results he obtained led him to build at the Royal Institution a large regenerative cooling refrigerating machine. Using this machine in 1898, liquid hydrogen was collected for the first time, solid hydrogen following in 1899. He tried to liquefy the last remaining gas, Helium, which condenses into a liquid at −268.9°C, but owing to a number of factors, including a lack of Helium with which to work, Dewar was preceded by Heike Kamerlingh Onnes as the first person to produce liquid helium, in 1908. Onnes would later be awarded the Nobel Prize in Physics for his research into the properties of matter at low temperatures - Dewar was nominated several times but never successful in winning the Nobel Prize. In 1905 he began to investigate the gas-absorbing powers of charcoal when cooled to low temperatures, and applied his research to the production of high vacuums, which were useful for further experiments in atomic physics. Dewar would continue his research work into the properties of elements at low temperatures, specifically low-temperature calorimetry, until the outbreak of World War I. The Royal Institution laboratories lost a number of staff to the war effort, both in fighting and scientific roles, and after the war, Dewar had little interest in restarting the serious research work which went on before the War. Shortages of scholars necessarily compounded the problems. His research during and after the war mainly involved investigating surface tension in soap bubbles, rather than further work into the properties of matter at low temperatures.
Honors and AwardsWhilst Dewar was never recognised by the Swedish Academy, he was recognised by many other institutions both before and after his death, both in Britain and overseas. The Royal Society elected him a Fellow of the Royal Society in June 1877 and bestowed their Rumford (1894), Davy (1909), and Copley Medal(1916) medals upon him for his work, as well as inviting him to deliver their Bakerian Lecture in 1901.  In 1899 he became the first recipient of the Hodgkins gold medal of the Smithsonian Institution, Washington, D.C., for his contributions to our knowledge of the nature and properties of atmospheric air. In 1904 he was the first British subject to receive the Lavoisier medal of the French Academy of Sciences, and in 1906 he was the first to be awarded the Matteucci medal of the Italian Society of Sciences. He was knighted in 1904 and awarded the Gunning Victoria Jubilee Prize for 1900-1904 by the Royal Society of Edinburgh, and in 1908 he was awarded the Albert medal of The Society of Arts. A lunar crater has been named in his honor.James Dewar died in London in 1923, still holding the office of Fullerian Professor of Chemistry at the Royal Institution, having refused to retire.  He was cremated at the Golders Green Crematorium where his ashes remain.
Selected publications

 , G. D. Living and J. Dewar, Cambridge University Press, 1915


See also

Timeline of low-temperature technology
Timeline of hydrogen technologies


Notes 
Further reading


 



Bellis, Mary, "Inventors Sir James Dewar" from about.com



Meiklejohn, William, "Tulliallan: Four lads o’ pairts: Sir James Dewar (1842-1923)" from the Kincardine Local History Group



 



 , Liquid Air and the Liquefaction of Gases, Norman W. Henley and Co., New York, 1900, second edition (extensive description of Dewar's work on the liqufaction of gases)


External links 
 

Fullerian Professorships
Brief biography from the Royal Institution of Great Britain
Brief biography and picture
Another brief biography
 

 
   
DEFAULTSORT













 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Ernst Mach
 Ernst Mach ( ) (February 18, 1838 – February 19, 1916) was an Austrian physicist and philosopher, noted for his contributions to physics such as the Mach number and the study of shock waves. As a philosopher of science, he was a major influence on logical positivism and through his criticism of Newton, a forerunner of Einstein's relativity.
BiographyErnst Waldfried Josef Wenzel Mach was born in Chrlice ( ), Moravia (then in the Austrian empire, now part of Brno in the Czech Republic). His father, who had graduated from Charles University in Prague, acted as tutor to the noble Brethon family in Zlín, eastern Moravia. His grandfather, Wenzl Lanhaus, an administrator of the estate Chirlitz, was also master builder of the streets there. His activities in that field later influenced the theoretical work of Ernst Mach. Some sources give Mach's birthplace as Turas/Tuřany (now also part of Brno), the site of the Chirlitz registry-office. Peregrin Weiss baptized Ernst Mach into the Roman Catholic Church in Turas/Tuřany. Despite his Catholic background, he later became an atheist. Up to the age of 14, Mach received his education at home from his parents. He then entered a Gymnasium in Kroměříž ( ), where he studied for three years. In 1855 he became a student at the University of Vienna. There he studied physics and for one semester medical physiology, receiving his doctorate in physics in 1860 and his Habilitation the following year. His early work focused on the Doppler effect in optics and acoustics. In 1864 he took a job as Professor of Mathematics in Graz, having turned down the position of a chair in surgery at the University of Salzburg to do so, and in 1866 he was appointed as Professor of Physics. During that period, Mach continued his work in psycho-physics and in sensory perception. In 1867, he took the chair of Experimental Physics at the Charles University, Prague, where he stayed for 28 years before returning to Vienna.Mach's main contribution to physics involved his description and photographs of spark shock-waves and then ballistic shock-waves. He described how when a bullet or shell moved faster than the speed of sound, it created a compression of air in front it. Using schlieren photography, he and his son Ludwig were able to photograph the shadows of the invisible shock waves. During the early 1890s Ludwig was able to invent an interferometer which allowed for much clearer photographs. But Mach also made many contributions to psychology and physiology, including his anticipation of gestalt phenomena, his discovery of the oblique effect and of Mach bands, an inhibition-influenced type of visual illusion, and especially his discovery of a non-acoustic function of the inner ear which helps control human balance.Mach also became well known for his philosophy developed in close interplay with his science.  Mach defended a type of phenomenalism recognizing only sensations as real. This position seemed incompatible with the view of atoms and molecules as external, mind-independent things, and from about 1908 to 1911 Mach's reluctance to acknowledge the reality of atoms was criticized by Max Planck as being incompatible with physics. Some of Mach's criticisms of Newton's position on space and time influenced Einstein, but later Einstein realized that Mach was basically opposed to Newton's philosophy and concluded that his physical criticism was not sound. One of the best-known of Mach's ideas is the so-called "Mach principle," concerning the physical origin of inertia. This was never written down by Mach, but was given a graphic verbal form, attributed by Philipp Frank to Mach himself, as, "When the subway jerks, it's the fixed stars that throw you down." In 1898 Mach suffered from cardiac arrest and in 1901 retired from the University of Vienna and was appointed to the upper chamber of the Austrian parliament. On leaving Vienna in 1913 he moved to his son's home in Vaterstetten, near Munich, where he continued writing and corresponding until his death in 1916. His current living descendant is Marilyn vos Savant (her father was Joseph Mach).
Physics
Most of Mach's initial studies in the field of experimental physics concentrated on the interference, diffraction, polarization and refraction of light in different media under external influences. There followed his important explorations in the field of supersonic velocity. Mach's paper on this subject was published in 1877 and correctly describes the sound effects observed during the supersonic motion of a projectile. Mach deduced and experimentally confirmed the existence of a shock wave which has the form of a cone with the projectile at the apex. The ratio of the speed of projectile to the speed of sound v p /v s  is now called the Mach number. It plays a crucial role in aerodynamics and hydrodynamics. He also contributed to cosmology the hypothesis known as Mach's principle.
Philosophy of science
From 1895 to 1901, Mach held a newly created chair for "the history and philosophy of the inductive sciences" at the University of Vienna.   In his historico-philosophical studies, Mach developed a phenomenalistic philosophy of science which became influential in the 19th and 20th centuries. He originally saw scientific laws as summaries of experimental events, constructed for the purpose of making complex data comprehensible, but later emphasized mathematical functions as a more useful way to describe sensory appearances. Thus scientific laws while somewhat idealized have more to do with describing sensations than with reality as it exists beyond sensations.   Mach's positivism also influenced many Russian Marxists, such as Alexander Bogdanov (1873–1928). In 1908, Lenin wrote a philosophical work, Materialism and Empirio-Criticism (published 1909), in which he criticized Machism and the views of "Russian Machists".In accordance with this philosophy, Mach opposed Ludwig Boltzmann and others who proposed an atomic theory of physics. Since one cannot observe things as small as atoms directly, and since no atomic model at the time was consistent, the atomic hypothesis seemed to Mach to be unwarranted, and perhaps not sufficiently "economical". Mach had a direct influence on the Vienna Circle philosophers and the school of logical positivism in general.Mach is attributed with a number of principles that distill his ideal of physical theorisation — what is now called "Machian physics":

It should be based entirely on directly observable phenomena (in line with his positivistic leanings) 
It should completely eschew absolute space and time in favor of relative motion Penrose, R. The Road to Reality, p753: "Mach’s principle asserts that
physics should be defined entirely in terms of the relation of one body to
another, and that the very notion of a background space should be
abandoned" 

Any phenomena that would seem attributable to absolute space and time  (e.g. inertia, and centrifugal force) should instead be seen as emerging from the large scale distribution of matter in the universe. 

The last is singled out, particularly by Albert Einstein as "the" Mach's principle. Einstein cited it as one of the three principles underlying general relativity. In 1930, he stated that "it is justified to consider Mach as the precursor of the general theory of relativity",  though Mach, before his death, would reject Einstein's theory. Einstein was aware that his theories did not fulfill all Mach's principles, and no subsequent theory has either, despite considerable effort.
Physiology
In 1873, independently of each other 
Hawkins, J.E. and Schacht, J. "The Emergence of Vestibular Science" (Part 8 of "Sketches of Otohistory") in "Audiology and Neurotology," April 2005.
 
Mach and the physiologist and physician  Josef Breuer discovered how the sense of balance (i.e., the perception of the head’s imbalance) functions, tracing its management by information which the brain receives from the movement of a fluid in the semicircular canals of the inner ear. That the sense of balance depended on the three semicircular canals was discovered in 1870 by the physiologist Friedrich Goltz, but Goltz didn't discover how the balance-sensing apparatus functioned.
PsychologyIn the area of sensory perception, psychologists remember Mach for the optical illusion called the Mach band.More clearly than anyone before (or even since) Mach  made the distinction between what he called physiological (specifically visual) and geometrical spaces.Mach's views on mediating structures inspired B. F. Skinner's strongly inductive position, which paralleled Mach's in the field of psychology. 
  
EponymsThe lunar crater Mach takes its name from Ernst Mach.  So does the visual illusion and the unit for the velocity of sound.
Mach's principal works in English

The Science of Mechanics (1883)
The Analysis of Sensations (1897)
Popular Scientific Lectures (1895)
The Principles of Physical Optics (1926)
Knowledge and Error (1976)
Principles of the Theory of Heat (1986)


See also


Mach disk
Mach's principle
Mach reflection
Mach–Zehnder interferometer
Visual space
Marilyn vos Savant


References 
Further reading

J. Kockelmans. Philosophy of science: the historical background. New York: The Free Press, 1968.
John T. Blackmore, "Ernst Mach – His Life, Work, an Influence", Berkeley and Los Angeles, 1972
John Blackmore (ed.), ."Ernst Mach – A Deeper Look", Dordrecht, 1992.
J. Blackmore, R. Itagaki and S. Tanaka (eds.): "Ernst Mach's Vienna – 1895–1930", Dordrecht, 2001
John T. Blackmore, Ryoichi Itagaki and Setsuko Tanaka (eds.):" Ernst Mach's Science",Tokai University Press, Kanagawa, 2006.
John T. Blackmore, Ryoichi Itagaki and Setsuko Tanaka, "Ernst Mach's Influence Spreads", Sentinel Open Press: Bethesda, 2009.
John T. Blackmore, Ryoichi Itagaki and Setsuko Tanaka, "Ernst Mach's Graz", 1864–1867", Sentinel Open Press, Behesda, 2010.
John T. Blackmore, Ryoichi Itagaki and Setsuko Tanaka, "Ernst Mach's Prague 1867–1895", Sentinel Open Press, Bethesda 2010
Erik C. Banks, Ernst Mach's World Elements, Kluwer (now Springer), Dordrecht, 203.
John Blackmore und Klaus Hentschel (Hrsg.) "Ernst Mach als Aussenseiter", [with select correspondence], Braumüller, Vienna 1985.
Rudolf Haller & Friedrich Stadler (Hrsg., "Ernst Mach – Werk und Wirkung", Hoelder-Pichler-Tempsky, Vienna, 1988.)
Klaus Hentschel: On Paul Feyerabend's version of `Mach's theory of research and its relation to Albert Einstein', Studies in History and Philosophy of Science 16 (1985): 387-394.
Klaus Hentschel: Die Korrespondenz Duhem-Mach: Zur 'Modellbeladenheit' von Wissenschaftsgeschichte', Annals of Science 45 (1988): 73-91 (with their complete correspondence).
D. Hoffmann und H. Laitko (Hrsg.), Ernst Mach -Studien und Dokumente..., Berlin, 1991.
V. Prosser and J. Folta (eds.), "Ernst Mach and the development of Physics – Conference Papers", Prague, 1991.
Joachim Thiele (Hrsg.), "Wissenschaftliche Kommunikation – Die Korrespondenz Ernst Machs", Hain, Kastellaun, 1978 (with select correspondence).
Jiri Prochazka: Ernst Mach: 1838–1916. Genealogie. /Vol. I/ Brno 2007.
Jiri Prochazka: Ernst Mach: 1838–1916. Genealogie. /Vol. II/ Brno 2009.
Jiri Prochazka: Ernst Mach: 1838–1916. Genealogie. /Vol.III/ Brno, Vienna 2O1O.


External links 
 
 

Various Ernst Mach links, compiled by Greg C Elvers
Klaus Hentschel: Mach, Ernst, in: Neue Deutsche Biographie 15 (1987), S. 605-609.
Works in german and english, in the Internet Archive
 
Short biography and bibliography in the Virtual Laboratory of the Max Planck Institute for the History of Science
Vladimir Lenin: Materialism and Empirio-Criticism
Mach's math genealogy

 
 
DEFAULTSORT


















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Gedeon Burkhard
 
Gedeon Burkhard (born July 3, 1969) is a German film and television actor. Although he has appeared in numerous films and TV series in both Europe and the US, he is probably best recognised for his role as Alexander Brandtner in the Austrian/German television series Kommissar Rex (1998–2001), which has been aired on television in numerous countries around the world, or as Corporal Wilhelm Wicki in the 2009 film Inglourious Basterds,
Life and careerGedeon Burkhard was born in Munich, Germany, the son of German actress Elisabeth von Molo (then Burkhard) and Wolfgang Burkhard, a great-grandson of Alexander Moissi, a famous Italo-Austro-Albanian actor of the 20th century.  Gedeon was educated at a boarding school in England. He began his acting career in 1979 in the German TV film Tante Maria. His father, Wolfgang Burkhard, is his manager. During the 1990s, he lived in the U.S., working in several productions but without much recognition. In this period, Gedeon Burkhard got married in Las Vegas only to divorce 4 months later. After that, he lived in Vienna for Kommisar Rex for more than 5 years, before moving to Berlin for work reasons. Gedeon Burkhard was working in Cologne on the TV series Alarm für Cobra 11 as the detective Chris Ritter, until the end of his contract in November 2007. His character Chris Ritter had a heroic death. He then returned to Berlin, to be close to his daughter and to work in new projects. He said: "For the moment I will dedicate myself again fully to my artistic vagabond life in Berlin".  Burkhard appeared in the Quentin Tarantino movie Inglourious Basterds. Since February 2009, he has been shooting the film "Massel", made for German television. In 2011, he was in Rome, shooting an Italian mini TV series of 6 chapters "Caccia al Re - La Narcotici", with other Italian actor like Stefano Dionisi, Raffaella Rea and Laura Glavan, in which he plays a drug investigator, Daniele Piazza.In 2011, he competed in the Italian version of "Dancing with the Stars", accompanied by professional Italian dancer Samanta Togni, in which he danced with his "daughter" Laura Glavan. Gedeon Burkhard is in a relationship with a German woman, Anika Bormann.
Filmography

Tante Maria (1979) (TV)
Und ab geht die Post (1981) (TV)
Blut und Ehre: Jugend unter Hitler (aka Blood and Honor: Youth Under Hitler (USA)) (1982) (TV)
"Nordlichter: Geschichten zwischen Watt und Wellen" (1983) TV Series
Passagier - Welcome to Germany, Der (aka The Passenger - Welcome to Germany, aka Welcome to Germany (USA)) (1988)
"Fahnder, Der" : Hendriks Alleingang (1988) TV Episode
"Forsthaus Falkenau" :  Frühlingsföhn (1989) TV Episode (as Gedeon Burkhart) & Ein neuer Anfang (1989) TV Episode (as Gedeon Burkhart)
Zwei Frauen (aka Silence Like Glass (USA)) (1989)
Šípková Ruženka (aka Sleeping Beauty (Europe: English title)) (1989) .
"Sekt oder Selters" (1990) TV Series
"The New Adventures of Black Beauty" (1990) TV Series
"Náhrdelník" (aka The Necklace (Europe: English title)) (1992) TV Series
Kleine Haie (aka Acting It Out, aka Little Sharks) (1992)
Sommerliebe (1993) (TV)
Mein Mann ist mein Hobby (1993) (TV)
Abgeschminkt! (aka Making Up! (USA)) (1993)
"Piovra 7, La" (1994) (mini) TV Series
Affären (1994)
"Verliebt, verlobt, verheiratet" (1994) TV Series
"König, Der" : Tod eines Schmetterlings (1994) TV Episode
"Fall für zwei, Ein" : Kleiner Bruder (1995) TV Episode
Magenta (1996)
Wem gehört Tobias? (aka In the Wrong Hands (USA)) (1996)
"SOKO 5113" : Polterabend (1996) TV Episode
Polizeiruf 110 - Die Gazelle (1996) (TV)
2 Männer, 2 Frauen - 4 Probleme!? (aka Four for Venice, aka Two Women, Two Men (USA)) (1998)
The Brylcreem Boys (1998)
Gefährliche Lust - Ein Mann in Versuchung (1998) (TV)
"Kommissar Rex" (aka Inspector Rex (Australia), aka Rex: A Cop's Best Friend (UK)) (1998–2000)
Superfire (2002) (TV)
Zwei Affären und eine Hochzeit (2002) (TV)
We'll Meet Again (2002) (TV)
Yu (2003)
Bisschen Haushalt, Das (2003) (TV)
"Wunschbaum, Der" (2004) (mini) TV Series
Vater meines Sohnes, Der (2004) (TV)
Utta Danella - Eine Liebe in Venedig (2005) (TV)
Der Todestunnel (2004) (TV)
"SOKO Leipzig" : Die Moorleiche (2005) TV Episode
Goldene Zeiten (2006)Misha Hahn.
Der letzte Zug (2006) Henry Neumann.
Alarm für Cobra 11 (2006/2007) (TV) Chris Ritter.
Märzmelodie(2007)(movie)is Florian(lead)
Inglourious Basterds (2009) (USA movie) is Cpl. Wilhelm Wicki.
So ein Schlamassel(2009) German TV Film as Patrick Silberschatz.
La Narcotici (2009) Italian TV Series Chief Daniele Piazza (lead).
Bridges (2010) German animated short film-noir Captain Saul Bridges (lead).
Inga Lindström - Millionäre küsst man nicht (2010) German TV Film Tomas Lindberg (lead).
Ohne Gnade (2010) German movie. Ronzo (supporting role).
Wunderkinder (2010) German movie. Boris Brodsky (lead).


References 
External links

 

  
DEFAULTSORT






 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Song Zheyuan
 
 
Sòng Zhéyuán (宋哲元) (October 30, 1885–April 5, 1940) was a Chinese general during the Chinese Civil War and Second Sino-Japanese War (1937-1945).
Biography

Early life and educationBorn in the village of Zhaohong, northwest of the seat of Leling County, Shandong, he was educated under his uncle from his mother's side, a teacher of a traditional Confucian private school in Yanshan County. At the age of 20 (1904) he began studying in the military institute founded by Lu Jianzhang at Beijing and had since become Lu's favorite. In 1912 the troops of Lu and Feng Yuxiang, now subordinates of Yuan Shikai, were regrouped and Feng had then been Song's superior.
Military careerIn 1917, a year after being appointed the head of 1st battalion of Feng's 2nd regiment, his battalion spearheaded the removal of Zhang Xun from his imperial restoration in 1917.  As part of the Guominjun he became Governor of Jehol Province in 1926.  Following the defeat of the Guominjun in the Anti–Fengtian War Feng Yuxiang participated in the Northern Expedition, Sòng assumed the Chairmanship of Shaanxi province in November 1927 and in April of the same year the head of 4th division under the II Corps of the National Revolutionary Army. Switching sides to the Kuomintang after the abortive coup d'état in 1930 of Feng against Chiang Kai-shek, his troops were designated as the 29th Army and garrisoned in southern Shanxi province where he was responsible for the frontiers of the Rehe and Chahar provinces against the Japanese in Manchukuo.
Chair of Chahar provinceSong was the chairman of Chahar province when Japan invaded the provinces in the end of year 1932. Though poorly equipped compared to the better armed Japanese, Song led the 29th army to resist the aggression in a war known as the Defense of the Great Wall (熱河長城之戰). Japanese troops then entered the suburbs of Beijing and Tianjin after the predictable victory. Song was relieved from his post but reinstalled as commander after the Ho-Umezu agreement.
Later yearsIn the Battle of Lugou Bridge, his 29th Army bore the brunt of the Japanese Guandong Army. His troops were halved after the defeat and chased by the Japanese along the Jinpu Railway into Shandong Province during the Beiping–Hankou Railway Operation. However Han Fuqu, chairman of the province and suspected for his clandestine Japanese liaison, forbade Song to retreat across the Yellow River resulting in the 29th Army being shattered at Shijiazhuang in December 1937 and January 1938. Remaining forces suffered various losses against the Imperial Japanese Army and were delegated to guerrilla combat after retreating into the mountainous regions at the borders of Henan and Shanxi province in February 1938.He soon suffered various illnesses and died at the age of 56 in Mianyang County, Sichuan province after several unsuccessful medical treatments in Guilin, Chongqing, and Chengdu.
See also

History of the Republic of China


References

张学良将军赠给宋哲元的抗日指挥刀
宋哲元与抗日雄狮二十九军

 
DEFAULTSORT







 
 
 
 
 
 
	Hermann Huppen
 
Hermann Huppen (born 17 July 1938) is a Belgian comic book artist.  He is better known under his pen-name Hermann. He is most famous for his post-apocalyptic comic  Jeremiah which was made into a television series.
Biography 
Hermann was born in 1938 in Bévercé (now a part of Malmedy) in Liège Province. De Weyer, Geert (2005). "Hermann". In België gestript, pp. 124-125. Tielt: Lannoo.  After studying to become a furniture maker and working as interior architect, Hermann made his debut as comic book artist in 1964 in the comics magazine Spirou with a four page story. Greg noticed his talent and offered him to work for his studio. In 1966, he began illustrating the Bernard Prince series written by Greg, published in the comic magazine Tintin periodical. In 1969, also in collaboration with Greg, he began the western series Comanche. This appeared at the same time as other western series such as Blueberry.Hermann began writing his own stories in 1977, starting the post-apocalyptic Jeremiah series, which is still produced today. In the same period, he also made three albums of Nick, inspired by Little Nemo in Slumberland, for Spirou.  In 1983 he began a new series, Les Tours de Bois-Maury, which is set in the Middle Ages and is less focused on action than his other works.Hermann has also created many non-series graphic novels sometimes together with his son Yves H. One of them, Lune de Guerre, with a story by Jean Van Hamme, was later filmed as The Wedding Party by Dominique Deruddere. Hermann is characterized by a realistic style and stories that are both somber and angry, with a sense of disillusion with regards to the human character in general, and current society more specifically. 
Selected bibliographyMost of these comics have been published in French and Dutch: other translations are noted in the "remarks" column.

Series Years Volumes Written by Editor Remarks 
Bernard Prince 1969–1980 14 Greg Le Lombard and Dargaud Translated into German;    Translated into Danish;    Translated into Serbian; Translated into Swedish  
Comanche 1972–1983 10 Greg Le Lombard and Dargaud Continued by Rouge for four more stories; Translated into Serbian 
Jugurtha 1975–1977 2 Vernal RTP, Le Lombard and Dargaud  
Jeremiah 1979- 31 Hermann Fleurus, Edi-3, Novedi, Hachette, and Dupuis Translated into Serbian; Volume 1 and 4 translated into English and published by Fantagraphics 1983 under the titles 'The Survivors - Talons of Blood' and 'The Survivors - The Eyes That Burned'. 'Jeremiah 13 - Strike' published by Catalan Communications 1990. Jeremiah - Gun in the water and Jeremiah - Mercenaries published by SAF Comics 2002 and 2003. 
Alerte aux pirates 1980 1 Yves Duval and Step Bédéscope  
Les Dalton 1980 1 Yves Duval Bédéscope  
Hey, Nick! Are you dreaming 1981–1983 3 Morphée Dupuis Translated into English by SAF Comics 2003 
Les Tours de Bois-Maury (The Towers of Bois-Maury) 1984–2006 14 Hermann Glénat Volume 12 written by his son Yves H.: translated into Danish, published in English by Titan Books 
Volume 13 also written by Yves H. 
Volumes 1 published in English by Titan Books 1984; Volumes 1 & 2 published in English by Titan Books 1989; Volumes 1-3 translated into English by Catalan Communications 1990 and Volumes 1 and 2 republished by SAF Comics in 2002 
Volumes 1 to 3 and 12 to 15 translated into Serbian 
Abominations 1988 1 Hermann Glénat Published in English in 1990 by Catalan Communications  
Missié Vandisandi 1991 1 Hermann Dupuis  
Sarajevo Tango 1995 1 Hermann Dupuis The first book Hermann made in direct color. 
Le secret des hommes-chiens 1995 1 Yves Huppen Dupuis First collaboration with his son Yves 
Caatinga 1997 1 Hermann Le Lombard  
Wild bill is Dead 1999 1 Hermann Dupuis Translated into English by SAF Comics 2003 
Liens de sang 2000 1 Yves H. Le Lombard Published in English by Dark Horse Comics  
Lune de guerre 2000 1 Jean Van Hamme Dupuis  
Manhattan Beach 1957 2002 1 Yves H. Le Lombard Translated into English by SAF Comics 2003 
Zhong Guo 2003 1 Yves H. Dupuis  
The girl from Ipanema 2005 1 Yves H. Le Lombard Translated to Danish 
Sur les traces de Dracula : Vlad l'empaleur 2006 1 Yves H. Casterman Translated to Danish; Translated into Serbian 
La vie exagérée de l'Homme Nylon 2007 1 Hans-Michael Kirstein Le Lombard  
Afrika 2007 1 Hermann Le Lombard Danish translation by Faraos Cigarer 
Le diable des sept mers 2008–2009 2 Yves H. Dupuis  
Une nuit de pleine lune 2011 1 Yves H. Glénat  

Awards

1973: Prix Saint-Michel, Belgium
1980: Prix Saint-Michel
1992: Best Long Comic Strip at the Haxtur Awards, Spain

- nominated for Best Drawing at the Haxtur Awards
1999: nominated for Best Drawing and Best Cover at the Haxtur Awards
2001: Best Drawing at the Haxtur Awards

- nominated for Best Short Comic Strip and Best Script at the Haxtur Awards
2002: Grand Prix Saint-Michel

- nominated for Best Short Comic Strip and Best Drawing at the Haxtur Awards
2003: nominated for the Audience Award and the Artwork Award at the Angoulême International Comics Festival, France
2005: nominated for the Audience Award at the Angoulême International Comics Festival
2006: nominated for Best Comic (French language) at the Prix Saint-Michel
2010: nominated for Best Artwork at the Prix Saint-Michel 


Sources 

Béra, Michel; Denni, Michel; and Mellot, Philippe (2002): "Trésors de la Bande Dessinée 2003-2004". Paris, Les éditions de l'amateur. ISBN 2-85917-357-9
Hermann publications in Spirou, Belgian Tintin, French Tintin, Circus / Vécu, BoDoï BDoubliées  
 

Footnotes
 
External links

Hermann Huppen official site
Hermann biography on Lambiek Comiclopedia
Hermann fan site

   
DEFAULTSORT





 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Jean-François Champollion
 
 
 Jean-François Champollion (23 December 1790 – 4 March 1832) was a French classical scholar, philologist and orientalist, decipherer of the Egyptian hieroglyphs.Champollion published the first translation of the Rosetta Stone hieroglyphs in 1822, showing that the Egyptian writing system was a combination of phonetic and ideographic signs.
BiographyChampollion was born in Figeac, Lot, the last of seven children (two of whom had already died before he was born). He was raised in humble circumstances;  because his parents could not afford to send him to school, he was taught to read by his brother Jacques. Jacques, although studious and largely self-educated, did not have Jean-François' genius for language; however, he was talented at earning a living, and supported Jean-François for most of his life.   He lived with his brother in Grenoble for several years, and even as a child showed an extraordinary linguistic talent. By the age of 16 he had mastered a dozen languages and had read a paper before the Grenoble Academy concerning the Coptic language. By 20 he could also speak Latin, Greek, Hebrew, Amharic, Sanskrit, Avestan, Pahlavi, Arabic, Syriac, Chaldean, Persian and Ge'ez in addition to his native French.  In 1809, he became assistant-professor of History at Grenoble University. His interest in oriental languages, especially Coptic, led to his being entrusted with the task of deciphering the writing on the then recently-discovered Rosetta Stone, and he spent the years 1822–1824 on this task. His 1824 work Précis du système hiéroglyphique gave birth to the entire field of modern Egyptology. He also identified the importance of the Turin King List, and dated the Dendera zodiac to the Roman period. His interest in Egyptology was originally inspired by Napoleon's Egyptian Campaigns 1798–1801. Champollion was subsequently made Professor of Egyptology at the Collège de France. 
Egyptian hieroglyphsThomas Young was one of the first to attempt decipherment of the Egyptian hieroglyphs, basing his own work on the investigations of Swedish diplomat Åkerblad. Although he failed to fully decipher the script, Young was able to translate some of the text on the stone, leading the way for Champollion to begin his own investigations.In 1822, Champollion finally published the first correct translation of the hieroglyphs and the key to the Egyptian grammatical system. Young and all others praised this work.
Franco-Tuscan Expedition

In 1827 Ippolito Rosellini, considered the founder of Egyptology in Italy, went to Paris for a year in order to improve his knowledge of the method of decipherment proposed by Champollion. The two philologists decided to organize an expedition to Egypt to confirm the validity of the discovery. Headed by Champollion and assisted by Rosellini his first disciple and great friend, the mission was known as the Franco-Tuscan Expedition, and was made possible by the support of the grand-duke of Tuscany, Leopold II, and the King of France, Charles X.On 21 July 1828, with four members, they boarded the ship Eglé at Toulon and set sail for Egypt. They travelled upstream along the Nile and studied an exhaustive number of monuments and inscriptions. The expedition led to a posthumously-published extensive Monuments de l'Égypte et de la Nubie (1845). Unfortunately, Champollion's expedition was blemished by unchecked looting. Most notably, while studying the Valley of the Kings, he damaged KV17, the tomb of Seti I, by removing a wall panel of 2.26 x 1.05 m in a corridor while other elements were removed by his companion Rossellini or the German expedition of 1845. The scenes are now in the collections of the Louvre, the museums of Florence and Berlin. During his stay, the Khedive of Egypt, Muhammad Ali Pasha, offered the two obelisks standing at the entrance of Luxor Temple to France in 1829, but only one was transported to Paris where it now stands on the Place de la Concorde.Exhausted by his labours during and after his scientific expedition to Egypt, Champollion died of an apoplectic attack (stroke) in Paris in 1832 at the age of 41. He is buried in Père Lachaise Cemetery.Certain portions of Champollion's works were edited by his elder brother, Jacques Joseph Champollion-Figeac; Jacques Joseph's son, Aimé-Louis (1812–1894), wrote a biography of the two brothers.
In popular cultureChampollion was portrayed by Elliot Cowan in the 2005 BBC docudrama Egypt.
Works

  ;
  ;
 
  ;
  ;
  ;
  ;
  ;
  ;
  ;
Others – Principes généraux de l'écriture sacrée, new edition with a preface by Christiane Ziegler, Institut d'Orient, 1984.


Musées Champollion

A museum devoted to Jean-François Champollion was created in his birthplace at Figeac in Lot.  It was inaugurated 19 December 1986 in the presence of President François Mitterrand and Jean Leclant, secrétaire perpétuel of the Académie des inscriptions et belles-lettres.  After two years of building work and extension, the museum re-opened in 2007.  Besides Champollion's life and discoveries, the museum also recounts the history of writing.  The whole façade is covered in pictograms, from the original ideograms of the whole world.
The "*Maison Champollion" at Vif in Isère, formerly the property of Jean-François's brother.


Notes 
Further reading

 
 
 


External links 

Giants of Egyptology: Jean-François Champollion, 1790–1832
Key words: unlocking lost languages
BBC: Jean-François Champollion

  
 
DEFAULTSORT













 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Bertha von Suttner
 
 
Bertha Felicitas Sophie Freifrau von Suttner (Baroness Bertha von Suttner, Gräfin (Countess) Kinsky von Wchinitz und Tettau; 9 June 1843 – 21 June 1914) was an Austrian novelist, radical (organizational) pacifist, and the first woman to be a Nobel Peace Prize laureate.
BiographySuttner was born in Prague, Bohemia, the daughter of an impoverished  Austrian Field Marshal, Franz-Josef Graf Kinsky von Wchinitz und Tettau, and wife Sophie von Körner, and governess to the wealthy Suttner family from 1873. She had an older brother, Arthur Franz Graf Kinsky von Wchinitz und Tettau. She became engaged to engineer and novelist Arthur Gundaccar Freiherr von Suttner (who died on 10 December 1902), but his family opposed the match, and she answered an advertisement from Alfred Nobel in 1876 to become his secretary-housekeeper at his Paris residence.  She only remained a week before returning to Vienna and secretly marrying Arthur on 12 June 1876.Suttner became a leading figure in the peace movement with the publication of her novel, Die Waffen nieder! ("Lay Down Your Arms!") in 1889 and founded an Austrian pacifist organization in 1891.  She gained international repute as editor of the international pacifist journal Die Waffen nieder!, named after her book, from 1892 to 1899.  Her pacifism was influenced by the writings of Immanuel Kant, Henry Thomas Buckle, Herbert Spencer, Charles Darwin and Leo Tolstoy (Tolstoy praised Die Waffen nieder!).
 Bertha von Suttner by Irwin Adams. The World Encyclopedia of Peace.Edited by Ervin László, Linus Pauling and Jong Youl Yoo. Oxford : Pergamon, 1986. ISBN 0-08-032685-4, (vol. 3, pp. 201–4).  Suttner was also a journalist, with one historian stating her work revealed her as "a most perceptive and adept political commentator".   Though her personal contact with Alfred Nobel had been brief, she corresponded with him until his death in 1896, and it is believed that she was a major influence in his decision to include a peace prize among those prizes provided in his will, which she won in 1905.
Commemoration on coins and stamps

Bertha von Suttner was recently selected as a main motif for a high value collectors' coin: the 2008 Europe Taler. The reverse shows important people in the history of Europe, including Bertha von Suttner.  Also depicted in the coin are Martin Luther (symbolising the transition from the Middle Ages to the modern period); Antonio Vivaldi (exemplifying the importance of European cultural life); and James Watt (representing the industrialization of Europe, inventor of the first steam engine in the 18th century).
She is depicted on the Austrian 2 euro coin, and was pictured on the old Austrian 1000 schilling bank note.
She was commemorated on a 2005 German postage stamp.


On film

Die Waffen nieder, by Holger Madsen and Carl Theodor Dreyer. Released by Nordisk Films Kompagni in 1914.  
"No Greater Love" ( ), a 1952 film  has Bertha as the main character.


Works

 


Notes 
See also 

List of pacifists
List of Austrians
List of Austrian writers
List of female Nobel laureates


External links

Nobel Entry
More Info from Nobel Winners
Another biography on Bertha von Suttner
2005 — the Bertha von Suttner Year
 
 
Online text of "Lay down Your Arms", archive.org
  (PDF of full review of Memoirs)
 

 
   
DEFAULTSORT























  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Peter Greenaway
 
 
Peter Greenaway, CBE (born 5 April 1942) is a British film director. His films are noted for the distinct influence of Renaissance and Baroque painting, and Flemish painting in particular. The scenic composition and illumination and the contrasts of costume and nudity, nature and architecture, furniture and people, sexual pleasure and painful death are common traits in his films.
Early lifeGreenaway was born in Newport, Monmouthshire, Wales,  to a teacher mother and a builder's merchant father.    Greenaway's family left South Wales when he was three years old (they had moved there originally to avoid the Blitz) and settled in Chingford, Essex, England. He attended Forest School in North-East London. At an early age Greenaway decided on becoming a painter. He became interested in European cinema, focusing first on the films of Ingmar Bergman, and then on the French nouvelle vague filmmakers such as Jean-Luc Godard and, most especially, Alain Resnais.
Career
1962-1999In 1962, Greenaway began studies at Walthamstow College of Art, where a fellow student was musician Ian Dury (later cast in The Cook, the Thief, His Wife & Her Lover). Greenaway trained as a muralist for three years; he made his first film, Death of Sentiment, a churchyard furniture essay filmed in four large London cemeteries. In 1965, he joined the Central Office of Information (COI), working there fifteen years as a film editor and director. In that time he created a filmography of experimental films, starting with  Train (1966), footage of the last steam trains at Waterloo station, (situated behind the COI), edited to a musique concrète composition. Tree (1966), is a homage to the embattled tree growing in concrete outside the Royal Festival Hall on the South Bank in London. By the 1970s he was confident and ambitious and made Vertical Features Remake and A Walk Through H. The former is an examination of various arithmetical editing structures, and the latter is a journey through the maps of a fictitious country.In 1980, Greenaway delivered The Falls (his first feature-length film) – a mammoth, fantastical, absurdist encyclopedia of flight-associated material all relating to ninety-two victims of what is referred to as the Violent Unknown Event (VUE). In the 1980s, Greenaway's cinema flowered in his best-known films, The Draughtsman's Contract (1982), A Zed & Two Noughts (1985), The Belly of an Architect (1987), Drowning by Numbers (1988), and his most successful (and controversial) film, The Cook, the Thief, His Wife & Her Lover (1989). Greenaway's most familiar musical collaborator during this period is composer Michael Nyman, who has scored several films.In 1989, he collaborated with artist Tom Phillips on a television serial A TV Dante, dramatising the first few cantos of Dante's Inferno. In the 1990s, he presented Prospero's Books (1991), the controversial The Baby of Mâcon (1993), The Pillow Book (1996), and 8½ Women (1999).In the early 1990s, Greenaway wrote ten opera libretti known as the Death of a Composer series, dealing with the commonalities of the deaths of ten composers from Anton Webern to John Lennon, however, the other composers are fictitious, and one is a character from  The Falls. In 1995, Louis Andriessen completed the sixth libretto, Rosa – A Horse Drama. He is currently professor of cinema studies at the European Graduate School in Saas-Fee, Switzerland.
2000 - presentGreenaway completed the artistically ambitious The Tulse Luper Suitcases, a multimedia project with innovative film techniques that resulted in three films. Later there were releases of two shorter features which rework the material of the first three films.He also contributed to Visions of Europe, a short film collection by different European Union directors; his British entry is The European Showerbath. Nightwatching and Rembrandt's J'Accuse two films on Rembrandt which were released in 2007 and 2008 respectively. Nightwatching is the first feature in the series "Dutch Masters", with the next project titled as "Goltzius and the Pelican Company". On 17 June 2005, Greenaway appeared for his first VJ performance during an art club evening in Amsterdam, Netherlands, with music by DJ Serge Dodwell (aka Radar), as a backdrop, ‘VJ’ Greenaway used for his set a special system consisting of a large plasma screen with laser controlled touchscreen to project the ninety-two Tulse Luper stories on the twelve screens of "Club 11", mixing the images live. This was later reprised at the Optronica festival, London.On 12 October 2007, he created the multimedia installation Peopling the Palaces at Venaria Reale at the Royal Palace of Venaria that will remain open for three years and that animate the Palace with 100 videoprojectors. 
'Nine Classical Paintings Revisited'In 2006, Greenaway began an ambitious series of digital video installations, Nine Classical Paintings Revisited, with his exploration of Rembrandt's Night Watch in the Rijksmuseum in Amsterdam. On 30 June 2008, after much negotiation, Greenaway staged a one-night performance 'remixing' da Vinci's The Last Supper in the refectory of Santa Maria delle Grazie  in Milan to a select audience of dignitaries. The performance consisted of superimposing digital imagery and projections onto the painting with music from the composer Marco Robino.
 
File:Nachtwacht.jpg|NightWatch by Rembrandt
File:Paolo Veronese, The Wedding at Cana.JPG|The Wedding at Cana by Paolo Veronese (mid-16th century)
 Greenaway exhibited his digital exploration of The Wedding at Cana by Paolo Veronese as part of the 2009  Venice Biennial. An arts writer for the New York Times called it "possibly the best unmanned art history lecture you'll ever experience," while acknowledging that some viewers might respond to it as "mediocre art, Disneyfied kitsch or a flamboyant denigration of site-specific video installation." The 50-minute presentation, set to a soundtrack, incorporates closeup images of faces from the painting along with animated diagrams revealing compositional relations among the figures. These images are projected onto and around the replica of the painting that now stands at the original site, within the Palladian architecture of the Benedictine refectory on San Giorgio Maggiore. The soundtrack features music and imagined dialogue scripted by Greenaway for the 126 "wedding guests, servants, onlookers and wedding crashers" depicted in the painting, consisting of small talk and banal chatter that culminates in reaction to the miraculous transformation of water to wine, according to the Gospels the first miracle performed by Jesus. Picasso's Guernica, Seurat's Grande Jatte, works by Jackson Pollock and Claude Monet, Velázquez's Las Meninas and Michelangelo's The Last Judgment are possible series subjects. 
FilmsFeatures

The Falls (1980, 185 min)
The Draughtsman's Contract (1982, 103 min)
A Zed & Two Noughts (1985, 115 min)
The Belly of an Architect (1987, 120 min)
Drowning by Numbers (1988, 118 min)
The Cook, the Thief, His Wife & Her Lover (1989, 124 min)
Prospero's Books (1991, 129 min)
The Baby of Mâcon (1993, 122 min)
The Pillow Book (1996, 126 min)
8½ Women (1999, 118 min)
The Tulse Luper Suitcases, Part 1: The Moab Story (2003, 127 min)
The Tulse Luper Suitcases, Part 2: Vaux to the Sea (2004, 108 min)
The Tulse Luper Suitcases, Part 3: From Sark to the Finish (2004, 120 min)
Nightwatching (2007, 134 min)
Goltzius and the Pelican Company (2012, 120 min)

Shorts

Death of Sentiment (1962, 8 min)
Tree (1966, 16 min)
Train (1966, 5 min)
Revolution (1967, 8 min)
5 Postcards from Capital Cities (1967, 35 min)
Intervals (1969, 7 min)
Erosion (1971, 27 min)
H Is for House (1973, 10 min)
Windows (1975, 4 min)
Water Wrackets (1975, 12 min)
Water (1975, 5 min)
Goole by Numbers (1976, 40 min)
Dear Phone (1978, 17 min)
Vertical Features Remake (1978, 45 min)
A Walk Through H: The Reincarnation of an Ornithologist (1978, 41 min)
1-100 (1978, 4 min)
Making a Splash (1984, 25 min)
Inside Rooms: 26 Bathrooms, London & Oxfordshire (1985, 26 min)
Hubert Bals Handshake (1989, 5 min)
Rosa (1992, 15 min)
Peter Greenaway (1995, 55 sec)  - segment of Lumière and Company 
The Bridge (1997, 12 min)
The Man in the Bath (2001, 7 min)
European Showerbath (2004, 5 min)  - segment of Visions of Europe 
Castle Amerongen (2011, 37 min)

Documentaries and mockumentaries

Eddie Kid (1978, 5 min)
Cut Above the Rest (1978, 5 min)
Zandra Rhodes (1979, 13 min)
Women Artists (1979, 5 min)
Leeds Castle (1979, 5 min)
Lacock Village (1980, 5 min)
Country Diary (1980, 5 min)
Terence Conran (1981, 15 min)
Four American Composers (1983, 220 min)
The Coastline (1983, 26 min)
Fear of Drowning (1988)
Rembrandt's J'Accuse (2008, 86min)

Television

Act of God (1980)
Death in the Seine (French TV, 1988)
A TV Dante (mini-series, 1989)
M Is for Man, Music, Mozart (1991)
A Walk Through Prospero's Library (1992)
Darwin (French TV, 1993)
The Death of a Composer: Rosa, a Horse Drama (1999, 90 mins)


Exhibitions

1991 The Physical Self, museum Boymans van Beuningen, Rotterdam
100 Objects to represent the World (1992) at the Academy of Fine Arts Vienna and the Hofburg Imperial Palace Vienna.
Stairs 1 Geneva (1995)
Flyga över vatten/Flying over water, Malmö Konsthall (16/9 2000 - 14/1 2001)
Peopling the Palaces at Venaria Reale, Palace of Venaria (2007)
Heavy Water, Chelouche Gallery, Tel Aviv (2011)


References 
External links 

Official website
  Greenaway. Faculty website at European Graduate School (Biography, filmography, articles and photos)
British Film Institute. Early Films
 
InFrame.tv Interview on Leonardo's Last Supper
 
Manu Luksch. Interview - The Medium is the Message. Telepolis. 13 February 1997
Dana Linssen. Video interview May 2006. 39min.
Peter Greenaway at the National Portrait Gallery, London
Chris Gordon. Interview - An eye for optical theory, The St. Petersburg Times, Russia. 21 June 2012

 
  
DEFAULTSORT











 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	DeWitt Clinton
 
 
 
DeWitt Clinton (March 2, 1769 February 11, 1828) was an early American politician and naturalist who served as United States Senator and the sixth Governor of New York. In this last capacity he was largely responsible for the construction of the Erie Canal. Edwin G. Burrows "Little Short of Madness," American Heritage, Winter 2010.  Clinton was the leader of New York's People’s Party, and was a major rival of Martin van Buren, who was attorney general of New York during Clinton's governorship. According to Daniel Walker Howe (2007) Clinton is an authentic but largely forgotten hero of American democracy. Howe explains, "The infrastructure he worked to create would transform American life, enhancing economic opportunity, political participation, and intellectual awareness." 
Early life and political careerDeWitt Clinton was the second son born to James Clinton and his wife Mary DeWitt (1737–1795, aunt of Simeon De Witt), and was educated at King's College, what is now Columbia University. He became the secretary to his uncle, George Clinton, who was then governor of New York. Soon after he became a member of the Democratic-Republican Party. He was a member of the New York State Assembly in 1798, and of the New York State Senate from the Southern District from 1798 to 1802, and from 1806 to 1811. He was a delegate to the New York State Constitutional Convention in 1801. He was a member of the Council of Appointments in 1801–1802 and 1806–1807. He won the by-election for U.S. Senator from New York after the resignation of John Armstrong, Jr. and served from February 23, 1802, to November 4, 1803. He resigned, unhappy with living conditions in newly built Washington, DC, and was appointed Mayor of New York City. He served as Mayor in 1803–1807, 1808–1810, and 1811–1815. While serving as Mayor, he organized the Historical Society of New York in 1804 and was its president. He also helped re-organizing the American Academy of the Fine Arts in 1808 served as its president between 1813 and 1817. He was Regent of the University of New York from 1808 to 1825.He was married twice. On February 13, 1796, he married Maria Franklin, daughter of the prominent New York Quaker merchant, Walter Franklin. By her he had ten children, four sons and three daughters surviving at the time of her death in 1818. On May 8, 1819, he married Catharine Jones, daughter of a New York physician, Thomas Jones; she outlived her husband. His son, George William Clinton (1807–1885), served as Mayor of Buffalo, New York, 1842–1843.
Later political career and governorshipFrom 1810 to 1824, he was a member of the Erie Canal Commission. He was among the first members, appointed in 1810, who projected and surveyed the route to be taken. After 1816, he became the driving force during the construction of the canal. 

In 1811, the death of John Broome left a vacancy in the office of Lieutenant Governor of New York. In a special election, Clinton defeated the Federalist Nicholas Fish and the Tammany Hall candidate Marinus Willett, to become Lieutenant Governor under Governor Daniel D. Tompkins until the end of the term in June 1813.In 1812, Clinton ran for President of the United States as candidate for both the Federalist Party and a small group of anti-war Democratic-Republicans. In the close Election of 1812, Clinton was defeated by President Madison; Clinton received 89 electoral votes to James Madison's 128. It was the strongest showing of any Federalist candidate for the Presidency since 1800, and the change of the votes of one or two states would have given Clinton the victory. After the resignation of Governor Tompkins, who had been elected Vice President, he won a special gubernatorial election in which he was the only candidate. 1,479 votes were cast for Peter Buell Porter – against Clinton's 43,310 – because the Tammany organization, which fiercely hated Clinton, had printed ballots with Porter's name and distributed among the Tammany followers in New York City. On July 1, 1817, Clinton took office as Governor of New York. He was re-elected in 1820, defeating the sitting Vice President Tompkins in a narrow race – DeWitt Clinton 47,447 votes, Tompkins 45,900 – and served until December 31, 1822.During his second term, the New York State Constitutional Convention of 1821 shortened the gubernatorial term to two years, and moved the beginning of the term from July 1 to January 1, actually cutting off the last 6 months of the 3-year-term he had been elected to. Also the gubernatorial election was moved from April to November, but Clinton was not renominated by his party to run for re-election in November 1822. Even so, he still kept his post as President of the Erie Canal Commission. In April 1824, a majority of his political enemies, the Bucktails, voted in the New York State Legislature for his removal from the Canal Commission. This caused such a wave of indignation among the electorate, that he was nominated for Governor by the "People's Party", and was re-elected governor, against the official candidate of the Democratic-Republican Party, fellow canal commissioner Samuel Young. He served another two terms until his sudden death in office. Clinton was a Freemason, and in 1806, he was elected Grand Master of the Grand Lodge of New York. He retained this title until 1819. The Grand Lodge of New York has established The DeWitt Clinton Award. The Award recognizes distinguished or outstanding community service by non-Masonic organizations or individuals whose actions exemplify a shared concern for the well-being of Mankind and a belief in the worldwide brotherhood of Man.  He was originally buried at the Clinton Cemetery in Little Britain, New York, later he was re-interred at the Green-Wood Cemetery in Brooklyn, New York. Clinton was able to accomplish many things as a leader in civic and state affairs, such as improving the New York public school system, encouraging steam navigation, and modifying the laws governing criminals and debtors. The 1831 DeWitt Clinton locomotive was named in his honor. The community of Whitestone, New York, was for several decades after his death known as Clintonville, but reverted to its traditional name; however, the governor is memorialized to this day by Clintonville street, a major local road.
Erie Canal 
While governor, Clinton was largely responsible for the construction of the Erie Canal. He was persuaded by Canal proponent Jesse Hawley to support construction of a canal from the eastern shore of Lake Erie to the upper Hudson River. Many thought the project was impracticable, and opponents mocked it as "DeWitt's Ditch". John Steele Gordon "10 Moments That Made American Business," American Heritage, February/March 2007.  But in 1817, he got the legislature to appropriate $7,000,000 for construction. When the Canal was finished in 1825, Governor Clinton opened it, sailing in the packet boat Seneca Chief along the Canal into Buffalo. After sailing from the mouth of Lake Erie to New York City he emptied two casks of water from Lake Erie into New York Harbor, celebrating the first connection of waters from East to West. The Canal was an immense success, carrying huge amounts of passenger and freight traffic. It provided cheap transportation from the Atlantic to the West, drawing traffic to New York state and New York City, which became the most important state and city in America.
LegacyList of places named for DeWitt Clinton:
Towns

Clinton, Arkansas
DeWitt, Arkansas
Clinton, Connecticut
Clinton, Illinois which is located in DeWitt County
Clinton, Indiana
Clinton, Iowa
Clinton, Louisiana
Clinton, Massachusetts
Clinton, Mississippi
Clinton, Missouri
Clinton, New Jersey
Port Clinton, Pennsylvania
DeWitt, Illinois, which is located in DeWitt County

DeWitt, Iowa which is located in Clinton County
DeWitt, Michigan which is located in Clinton County
DeWitt, New York


Counties

Clinton County, Iowa, the county seat of which is Clinton, Iowa
Clinton County, Kentucky
Clinton County, Michigan
Clinton County, Pennsylvania
Clinton County, Illinois
DeWitt County, Illinois, the county seat of which is Clinton, Illinois

(Note that the naming of two counties in Illinois after Clinton is the only instance in the United States of two counties in the same state being named after the same person.)
Non-geographic namesakes

DeWitt Clinton High School, Bronx, New York
An engraved portrait of Clinton appeared on the Legal Tender (United States Note) issue of 1880 in the $1000.00 denomination. An illustrated example can be found on the website of Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco's "American Currency Exhibit".
Dewitt Clinton Elementary School, Chicago, Illinois
Dewitt Clinton Elementary School, Lockport, New York
Dewitt Clinton Elementary School, Detroit, Michigan
Ted DeWitt Clinton, a character from the animated series Daria.
DeWitt Clinton Park, Manhattan, New York City. The neighborhood around it, Hell's Kitchen, has also become known as Clinton, or the Special Clinton District (a City Government preservation zone) in recent years.
East Asian plant Clintonia.


See also

List of places named for DeWitt Clinton


Notes 
External material
Sources

Congress Bio
Political Graveyard
Bio at Erie Canal
NY History with Lt. Gov. election in 1811
NY History with Presidential Election result 1812
NY History with Gov. election result 1817
DeWitt genealogy, at Mr. Jumbo


References

Bobbe, Dorothie. DeWitt Clinton (1933)
Cornog, Evan. The Birth of Empire: Dewitt Clinton and the American Experience, 1769–1828 (1998) Oxford University Press, (2000) online
Hanyan, Craig and Mary L. De Witt Clinton and the Rise of the People's Men McGill-Queens University Press, (1996) online
 
Sloan, De Villo. The Crimsoned Hills of Onondaga. Amherst, NY: Cambria Press, 2008   Senator box}}
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT





















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Roald Dahl
 
 
 Roald Dahl ( ,   ; 13 September 1916 23 November 1990) was a British novelist, short story writer, poet, fighter pilot and screenwriter.Born in Wales to Norwegian parents, he served in the British Royal Air Force during World War II, in which he became a flying ace and intelligence officer, rising to the rank of Wing Commander. Dahl rose to prominence in the 1940s, with works for both children and adults, and became one of the world's best-selling authors.   He has been referred to as "one of the greatest storytellers for children of the 20th century".  In 2008 The Times placed Dahl 16th on its list of "The 50 greatest British writers since 1945". The 50 greatest British writers since 1945. The Times. 5 January 2008. Retrieved on 1 February 2010.  His short stories are known for their unexpected endings, and his children's books for their unsentimental, often very dark humour.Some of his notable works include James and the Giant Peach, Charlie and the Chocolate Factory, Matilda, The Witches, Fantastic Mr Fox, The Twits, George's Marvellous Medicine and The BFG.
Early lifeRoald Dahl was born at Villa Marie, Fairwater Road in Llandaff, Cardiff, Wales, in 1916, to Norwegian parents, Harald Dahl and Sofie Magdalene Dahl (née Hesselberg).  Dahl's father had emigrated to the UK from Sarpsborg, Norway, and settled in Cardiff in the 1880s. His mother came over and married his father in 1911. Dahl was named after the polar explorer Roald Amundsen, a national hero in Norway at the time. He spoke Norwegian at home with his parents and his sisters Astri, Alfhild, and Else. Dahl and his sisters were christened at the Norwegian Church, Cardiff, where their parents worshipped. In 1920, when Dahl was three years old, his seven-year-old sister, Astri, died from appendicitis. Weeks later, his father died of pneumonia at the age of 57 while on a fishing trip in the Antarctic. With the option of returning to Norway to live with relatives, Dahl's mother decided to remain in Wales because Harald had wished to have their children educated in British schools, which he considered the world's best. Dahl first attended The Cathedral School, Llandaff. At the age of eight, he and four of his friends (one named Thwaites) were caned by the headmaster after putting a dead mouse in a jar of gobstoppers at the local sweet shop,  which was owned by a "mean and loathsome" old woman called Mrs Pratchett.  This was known amongst the five boys as the "Great Mouse Plot of 1924". Thereafter, he transferred to a boarding school in England: Saint Peter's in Weston-super-Mare. Roald's parents had wanted him to be educated at an English public school and, because of a then regular ferry link across the Bristol Channel, this proved to be the nearest. His time at Saint Peter's was an unpleasant experience for him. He was very homesick and wrote to his mother every week but never revealed to her his unhappiness, being under the pressure of school censorship. Only after her death in 1967 did he find out that she had saved every single one of his letters, in small bundles held together with green tape.  Dahl wrote about his time at St. Peter's in his autobiography Boy: Tales of Childhood. From 1929, he attended Repton School in Derbyshire, where, according to Boy: Tales of Childhood, a friend named Michael was viciously caned by headmaster Geoffrey Fisher, who later became the Archbishop of Canterbury and went on to crown Queen Elizabeth II in 1953. (However, according to Dahl's biographer Jeremy Treglown,  the caning took place in May 1933, a year after Fisher had left Repton. The headmaster concerned was in fact J.T. Christie, Fisher's successor.) This caused Dahl to "have doubts about religion and even about God".    He was never seen as a particularly talented writer in his school years, with one of his English teachers writing in his school report "I have never met anybody who so persistently writes words meaning the exact opposite of what is intended."  Dahl was exceptionally tall, reaching   in adult life.  He excelled at sports, being made captain of the school fives and squash teams, and also playing for the football team.  As well as having a passion for literature, he also developed an interest in photography  and often carried a camera with him. During his years at Repton, Cadbury, the chocolate company, would occasionally send boxes of new chocolates to the school to be tested by the pupils. Dahl apparently used to dream of inventing a new chocolate bar that would win the praise of Mr. Cadbury himself; and this proved the inspiration for him to write his third book for children, Charlie and the Chocolate Factory (1964), and to include references to chocolate in other books for children.   Throughout his childhood and adolescent years, Dahl spent some of his summer holidays with his mother's family in Norway. His childhood and first job selling kerosene in Midsomer Norton and surrounding villages in Somerset, south West England are subjects in Boy: Tales of Childhood.  The main child character in his 1983 book The Witches is a British boy of Norwegian descent, whose grandmother is still living in Norway. After finishing his schooling, he hiked through Newfoundland with the Public Schools' Exploring Society (now known as BSES Expeditions).  In July 1934, Dahl joined the Shell Petroleum Company. Following two years of training in the United Kingdom, he was transferred to first Mombasa, Kenya, then to Dar-es-Salaam, Tanganyika (now Tanzania). Along with the only two other Shell employees in the entire territory, he lived in luxury in the Shell House outside Dar-es-Salaam, with a cook and personal servants. While out on assignments supplying oil to customers across Tanganyika, he encountered black mambas and lions, amongst other wildlife. 
Fighter ace and intelligence officer In August 1939, as World War II loomed, plans were made to round up the hundreds of Germans in Dar-es-Salaam. Dahl was made an officer in the King's African Rifles, commanding a platoon of Askaris, indigenous troops serving in the colonial army. In November 1939, Dahl joined the Royal Air Force as an Aircraftman. After a   car journey from Dar-es-Salaam to Nairobi, he was accepted for flight training with 16 other men, of whom  only two others survived the war. With seven hours and 40 minutes experience in a De Havilland Tiger Moth, he flew solo;  Dahl enjoyed watching the wildlife of Kenya during his flights. He continued to advanced flying training in Iraq, at RAF Habbaniya,   west of Baghdad. He was promoted to Leading Aircraftman on 24 August 1940.  Following six months' training on Hawker Harts, Dahl was made an Acting Pilot Officer.He was assigned to No. 80 Squadron RAF, flying obsolete Gloster Gladiators, the last biplane fighter aircraft used by the RAF. Dahl was surprised to find that he would not receive any specialised training in aerial combat, or in flying Gladiators. On 19 September 1940, Dahl was ordered to fly his Gladiator from Abu Sueir in Egypt, on to Amiriya to refuel, and again to Fouka in Libya for a second refuelling. From there he would fly to 80 Squadron's forward airstrip   south of Mersa Matruh. On the final leg, he could not find the airstrip and, running low on fuel and with night approaching, he was forced to attempt a landing in the desert.  The undercarriage hit a boulder and the aircraft crashed, fracturing his skull, smashing his nose and temporarily blinding him. Alan Warren (1988) Roald Dahl pp.12, 87. Starmont House, 1988  He managed to drag himself away from the blazing wreckage and passed out. Later, he wrote about the crash for his first published work. Dahl was rescued and taken to a first-aid post in Mersa Matruh, where he regained consciousness, but not his sight, and was then taken by train to the Royal Navy hospital in Alexandria. There he fell in and out of love with a nurse, Mary Welland. An RAF inquiry into the crash revealed that the location to which he had been told to fly was completely wrong, and he had mistakenly been sent instead to the no man's land between the Allied and Italian forces.   In February 1941, Dahl was discharged from hospital and passed fully fit for flying duties. By this time, 80 Squadron had been transferred to the Greek campaign and based at Eleusina, near Athens. The squadron was now equipped with Hawker Hurricanes. Dahl flew a replacement Hurricane across the Mediterranean Sea in April 1941, after seven hours flying Hurricanes. By this stage in the Greek campaign, the RAF had only 18 combat aircraft in Greece: 14 Hurricanes and four Bristol Blenheim light bombers. Dahl saw his first aerial combat on 15 April 1941, while flying alone over the city of Chalcis. He attacked six Junkers Ju-88s that were bombing ships and shot one down. On 16 April in another air battle, he shot down another Ju-88. On 20 April 1941, Dahl took part in the "Battle of Athens", alongside the highest-scoring British Commonwealth ace of World War II, Pat Pattle and Dahl's friend David Coke. Of 12 Hurricanes involved, five were shot down and four of their pilots killed, including Pattle. Greek observers on the ground counted 22 German aircraft downed, but because of the confusion of the aerial engagement, none of the pilots knew which plane they had shot down. Dahl described it as "an endless blur of enemy fighters whizzing towards me from every side". In May, as the Germans were pressing on Athens, Dahl was evacuated to Egypt. His squadron was reassembled in Haifa. From there, Dahl flew sorties every day for a period of four weeks, shooting down a Vichy French Air Force Potez 63 on 8 June and another Ju-88 on 15 June, but he then began to get severe headaches that caused him to black out. He was invalided home to Britain. Though at this time Dahl was only a Pilot Officer on probation, in September 1941 he was simultaneously confirmed as a Pilot Officer and promoted to war substantive Flying Officer. Dahl began writing in 1942, after he was transferred to Washington, D.C. as Assistant Air Attaché. His first published work, in 1 August 1942 issue of The Saturday Evening Post, was "Shot Down Over Libya" which described the crash of his Gloster Gladiator. C. S. Forester had asked Dahl to write down some RAF anecdotes so that he could shape them into a story. After Forester read what Dahl had given him, he decided to publish the story exactly as Dahl had written it. The original title of the article was "A Piece of Cake" but the title was changed to sound more dramatic, despite the fact that he was not actually shot down. Dahl was promoted to Flight Lieutenant in August 1942.  During the war, Forester worked for the British Information Service and was writing propaganda for the Allied cause, mainly for American consumption.  This work introduced Dahl to espionage and the activities of the Canadian spymaster William Stephenson, known by the codename "Intrepid". During the war, Dahl supplied intelligence from Washington to Stephenson and his organisation known as British Security Coordination, which was part of MI6. He was revealed in the 1980s to have been serving to help promote Britain's interests and message in the United States and to combat the "America First" movement, working with such other well-known officers as Ian Fleming and David Ogilvy. The book "The Irregulars" (by Jennet Conant, Simon and Schuster 2008) describes this era of Dahl's life and those with whom he worked.  Dahl was once sent back to Britain by British Embassy officials, supposedly for misconduct – "I got booted out by the big boys," he said. Stephenson promptly sent him back to Washington—with a promotion to Wing Commander.  Towards the end of the war, Dahl wrote some of the history of the secret organisation and he and Stephenson remained friends for decades after the war. Upon the war's conclusion, Dahl held the rank of a temporary Wing Commander (substantive Flight Lieutenant). Owing to his accident in 1940 having left him with excruciating headaches while flying, in August 1946 he was invalided out of the RAF. He left the service with the substantive rank of Squadron Leader.  His record of five aerial victories, qualifying him as a flying ace, has been confirmed by post-war research and cross-referenced in Axis records, although it is most likely that he scored more than that during 20 April 1941 when 22 German aircraft were shot down. 
Post-war life
Dahl married American actress Patricia Neal on 2 July 1953 at Trinity Church in New York City. Their marriage lasted for 30 years and they had five children: Olivia, Tessa, Theo, Ophelia and Lucy. On 5 December 1960, four-month-old Theo Dahl was severely injured when his baby carriage was struck by a taxicab in New York City. For a time, he suffered from hydrocephalus and, as a result, his father became involved in the development of what became known as the "Wade-Dahl-Till" (or WDT) valve, a device to alleviate the condition.    In November 1962, Olivia Dahl died of measles encephalitis at age seven. Dahl subsequently became a proponent of immunisation  and dedicated his 1982 book The BFG to his daughter. In 1965, wife Patricia Neal suffered three burst cerebral aneurysms while pregnant with their fifth child, Lucy; Dahl took control of her rehabilitation and she eventually re-learned to talk and walk, and even returned to her acting career,    an episode in their lives which was dramatised in the film The Patricia Neal Story, in which the couple were played by Glenda Jackson and Dirk Bogarde. Dahl married Felicity "Liccy" Crosland at Brixton Town Hall, South London, following a divorce from Neal in 1983. Dahl and Crosland had previously been in a relationship.  According to biographer Donald Sturrock, Liccy gave up her job and moved into 'Gipsy House', Great Missenden in Buckinghamshire, which had been Dahl's home since 1954. In 1983 Dahl reviewed Tony Clifton's God Cried, a picture book about the 1982 Lebanon War that depicted Israelis killing thousands of Beirut inhabitants by bombing civilian targets.  Dahl's review stated that the book would make readers "violently anti-Israeli", writing, "I am not anti-Semitic. I am anti-Israel."  Dahl told a reporter in 1983, "There’s a trait in the Jewish character that does provoke animosity ... I mean there is always a reason why anti-anything crops up anywhere; even a stinker like Hitler didn’t just pick on them for no reason." Roald Dahl: A biography, Jeremy Treglown (Farrar, Straus, Giroux, 1994), pp. 255–256.  Dahl maintained friendships with a number of Jews, including philosopher Isaiah Berlin, who said, "I thought he might say anything. Could have been pro-Arab or pro-Jew. There was no consistent line. He was a man who followed whims, which meant he would blow up in one direction, so to speak."   In the 1986 New Years Honours List, Dahl was offered the Order of the British Empire (OBE), but turned it down, purportedly because he wanted a knighthood so that his wife would be Lady Dahl.   Dahl is the father of author Tessa Dahl and grandfather of author, cookbook writer and former model Sophie Dahl (after whom Sophie in The BFG is named.) 
Death and legacy
Roald Dahl died on 23 November 1990, at the age of 74 of a blood disease, myelodysplastic syndrome, in Oxford,  and was buried in the cemetery at St Peter and St Paul's Church in Great Missenden, Buckinghamshire, England.  According to his granddaughter, the family gave him a "sort of Viking funeral". He was buried with his snooker cues, some very good burgundy, chocolates, HB pencils and a power saw. In his honour, the Roald Dahl Children's Gallery was opened in November 1996, at the Buckinghamshire County Museum in nearby Aylesbury.  In 2002, one of Cardiff Bay's modern landmarks, the historic Oval Basin plaza, was re-christened "Roald Dahl Plass". "Plass" means "place" or "square" in Norwegian, referring to the acclaimed late writer's Norwegian roots. There have also been calls from the public for a permanent statue of him to be erected in the city. Dahl's charitable commitments in the fields of neurology, haematology and literacy have been continued by his widow since his death, through Roald Dahl's Marvellous Children's Charity, formerly known as the Roald Dahl Foundation.   In June 2005, the Roald Dahl Museum and Story Centre opened in Great Missenden to celebrate the work of Roald Dahl and advance his work in literacy education. David Hurst (20 June 2005) "Roald Dahl's fantasy factory". The Daily Mail. Retrieved 3 June 2012  In 2008, the UK charity Booktrust and Children's Laureate Michael Rosen inaugurated The Roald Dahl Funny Prize, an annual award to authors of humorous children's fiction.   On 14 September 2009 (the day after what would have been Dahl's 93rd birthday) the first blue plaque in his honour was unveiled in Llandaff, Cardiff, Wales.  Rather than commemorating his place of birth, however, the plaque was erected on the wall of the former sweet shop (and site of "The Great Mouse Plot of 1924") that features in the first part of his autobiography Boy. It was unveiled by his widow Felicity and son Theo.    The anniversary of Dahl's birthday on 13 September is celebrated as "Roald Dahl Day" in Africa, the United Kingdom and Latin America. Roald Dahl Day expands into full month of special treats The Guardian'.' Retrieved 1 May 2011.   In honour of Roald Dahl, Gibraltar Post issued a set of four stamps in 2010 featuring Quentin Blake's original illustrations for four of the children's books written by Dahl during his long career; The BFG, The Twits, Charlie and the Chocolate Factory and Matilda.  A set of six stamps was issued by Royal Mail in 2012, featuring Quentin Blake's illustrations for Charlie and the Chocolate Factory, The Twits, The Witches, Matilda, Fantastic Mr Fox, James and the Giant Peach.    Dahl's influence has extended beyond literary figures, and he connected with film director Tim Burton with his "mixture of light and darkness, and not speaking down to kids, and the kind of politically incorrect humour that kids get".  Actress Scarlett Johansson named Fantastic Mr. Fox as one of the five books that made a difference to her.  Regarded as "one of the greatest storytellers for children of the 20th century", Once upon a time, there was a man who liked to make up stories ... The Independent (Sunday, 12 December 2010)  Dahl was listed as one of the greatest British writers since 1945.  He ranks amongst the world's best-selling fiction authors with sales estimated at over 100 million, Britain celebrates first Roald Dahl Day msnbc: "Dahl's books, many of them darkly comic and featuring villainous adult enemies of the child characters, have sold over 100 million copies." (13 September 2006)  Fans gather for Dahl celebration BBC News: "Exhibitions and children's reading campaigns are being held to commemorate the life of Dahl, who died in 1990 and has sold more than 100 million books." (13 September 2006)  and his books have been published in almost 50 languages.  In 2003, the UK survey entitled The Big Read carried out by the BBC in order to find the "nation's best loved novel" of all time, four of Dahl's books were named in the Top 100, with only works by Charles Dickens and Terry Pratchett featuring more.  In a 2006 list for the Royal Society of Literature, author J. K. Rowling named Charlie and the Chocolate Factory among her top ten books every child should read.   
Writing
Dahl's first published work, inspired by a meeting with C. S. Forester, was "A Piece Of Cake" on 1 August 1942. The story, about his wartime adventures, was bought by The Saturday Evening Post for US$1000 (a substantial sum in 1942) and published under the title "Shot Down Over Libya". His first children's book was The Gremlins, about mischievous little creatures that were part of RAF folklore. Donald, Graeme Sticklers, Sideburns & Bikinis: The Military Origins of Everyday Words and Phrases Osprey Publishing, 2008  All the RAF pilots blamed the gremlins for all the problems with the plane. The book, which First Lady of the US Eleanor Roosevelt read to her grandchildren,  was commissioned by Walt Disney for a film that was never made, and published in 1943.  Dahl went on to create some of the best-loved children's stories of the 20th century, such as Charlie and the Chocolate Factory, Matilda, James and the Giant Peach, The Witches, Charlie and the Great Glass Elevator, The BFG, George's Marvellous Medicine and Fantastic Mr Fox.Dahl also had a successful parallel career as the writer of macabre adult short stories, usually with a dark sense of humour and a surprise ending.  The Mystery Writers of America presented Dahl with three Edgar Awards for his work, and many were originally written for American magazines such as Collier's (The Collector's Item was Colliers Star Story of the week for 4 September 1948), Ladies Home Journal, Harper's, Playboy and The New Yorker. Works such as Kiss Kiss subsequently collected Dahl's stories into anthologies, gaining worldwide acclaim. Dahl wrote more than 60 short stories; they have appeared in numerous collections, some only being published in book form after his death (See List of Roald Dahl short stories). His three Edgar Awards were given for: in 1954, the collection Someone Like You; in 1959, the story "The Landlady"; and in 1980, the episode of Tales of the Unexpected based on "Skin". Andrew Maunder The Facts On File companion to the British short story Infobase Publishing, 2007 
One of his more famous adult stories, "The Smoker" (also known as "Man From the South"), was filmed twice as both 1960 and 1985 episodes of Alfred Hitchcock Presents, and also adapted into Quentin Tarantino's segment of the 1995 film Four Rooms.  This oft-anthologised classic concerns a man in Jamaica who wagers with visitors in an attempt to claim the fingers from their hands. The 1960 Hitchcock version stars Steve McQueen and Peter Lorre. James Mottram The Sundance kids: how the mavericks took back Hollywood Macmillan, 2006 Dahl acquired a traditional Romanichal Gypsy wagon in the 1960s, and the family used it as a playhouse for his children at home in Great Missenden. He later used the vardo as a writing room, where he wrote Danny, the Champion of the World in 1975.  Dahl incorporated a Gypsy wagon into the main plot of the book, where the young English boy, Danny, and his father, William (played by Jeremy Irons in the film adaptation) live in a Gypsy caravan.  Many local scenes and characters in Great Missenden inspired Dahl's stories. His short story collection Tales of the Unexpected was adapted to a successful TV series of the same name, beginning with "Man From the South". The Facts On File companion to the British short story p.417.  When the stock of Dahl's own original stories was exhausted, the series continued by adapting stories by authors that were written in Dahl's style, including the writers John Collier and Stanley Ellin. A number of his short stories are supposed to be extracts from the diary of his (fictional) Uncle Oswald, a rich gentleman whose sexual exploits form the subject of these stories.  In his novel My Uncle Oswald, the uncle engages a temptress to seduce 20th century geniuses and royalty with a love potion secretly added to chocolate truffles made by Dahl's favourite chocolate shop, Prestat of Piccadilly, London. Darrell Schweitzer (1985) Discovering modern horror fiction, Volume 2. Wildside Press LLC, 1985 Memories with Food at Gipsy House, written with his wife Felicity and published posthumously in 1991, was a mixture of recipes, family reminiscences and Dahl's musings on favourite subjects such as chocolate, onions and claret. Sally Williams (12 September 2006) A plateful of Dahl The Telegraph'.' Retrieved 4 January 2011.  
Children's fictionDahl's children's works are usually told from the point of view of a child. They typically involve adult villains who hate and mistreat children, and feature at least one "good" adult to counteract the villain(s). These stock characters are possibly a reference to the abuse that Dahl stated that he experienced in the boarding schools he attended.  They usually contain a lot of black humour and grotesque scenarios, including gruesome violence. The Witches, George's Marvellous Medicine and Matilda are examples of this formula. The BFG follows it in a more analogous way with the good giant (the BFG or "Big Friendly Giant") representing the "good adult" archetype and the other giants being the "bad adults". This formula is also somewhat evident in Dahl's film script for Chitty Chitty Bang Bang. Class-conscious themes – ranging from the thinly veiled to the blatant – also surface in works such as Fantastic Mr Fox and Danny, the Champion of the World. Dahl also features in his books characters who are very fat, usually children. Augustus Gloop, Bruce Bogtrotter and Bruno Jenkins are a few of these characters, although an enormous woman named Aunt Sponge is featured in James and the Giant Peach and the nasty farmer Boggis in Fantastic Mr Fox is an enormously fat character. All of these characters (with the possible exception of Bruce Bogtrotter) are either villains or simply unpleasant gluttons. They are usually punished for this: Augustus Gloop drinks from Willy Wonka's chocolate river, disregarding the adults who tell him not to, and falls in, getting sucked up a pipe and nearly being turned into fudge. In Matilda, Bruce Bogtrotter steals cake from the evil headmistress, Miss Trunchbull, and is forced to eat a gigantic chocolate cake in front of the school. Featuring in The Witches, Bruno Jenkins is turned into a mouse by witches who lure him to their convention with the promise of chocolate, and, it is speculated, possibly disowned or even killed by his parents because of this. Aunt Sponge is flattened by a giant peach. Dahl's mother used to tell him and his sisters tales about trolls and other mythical Norwegian creatures and some of his children's books contain references or elements inspired by these stories, such as the giants in The BFG, the fox family in Fantastic Mr Fox and the trolls in The Minpins.In his poetry, Dahl gives a humorous re-interpretation of well-known nursery rhymes and fairy tales, providing surprise endings in place of the traditional happily-ever-after. Dahl's collection of poems Revolting Rhymes is recorded in audio book form, and narrated by actor Alan Cumming. 
ScreenplaysFor a brief period in the 1960s, Dahl wrote screenplays. Two, the James Bond film You Only Live Twice and Chitty Chitty Bang Bang, were adaptations of novels by Ian Fleming, though both were rewritten and completed by other writers. Dahl created the Child Catcher, the supporting antagonist in Chitty Chitty Bang Bang; in a 2005 poll, it was voted the scariest villain in children's literature.  Dahl also began adapting his own novel Charlie and the Chocolate Factory, which was completed and rewritten by David Seltzer after Dahl failed to meet deadlines, and produced as the film Willy Wonka & the Chocolate Factory (1971). Dahl later disowned the film, saying he was "disappointed" because "he thought it placed too much emphasis on Willy Wonka and not enough on Charlie".  He was also "infuriated" by the deviations in the plot devised by David Seltzer in his draft of the screenplay. This resulted in his refusal for any more versions of the book to be made in his lifetime, as well as an adaption for the sequel Charlie and the Great Glass Elevator. 
InfluencesA major part of Dahl's literary influences stemmed from his childhood. In his younger days, he was an avid reader, especially awed by fantastic tales of heroism and triumph. Amongst his favourite authors were Rudyard Kipling, William Makepeace Thackeray, Frederick Marryat and Charles Dickens, and their works went on to make a lasting mark on his life and writing. Dahl was also a huge fan of ghost stories and claimed that Trolls by Jonas Lie was one of the finest ghost stories ever written. While he was still a youngster, his mother, Sofie Dahl, would relate traditional Norwegian myths and legends from her native homeland to Dahl and his sisters. Dahl always maintained that his mother and her stories had a strong influence on his writing. In one interview, he mentioned: "She was a great teller of tales. Her memory was prodigious and nothing that ever happened to her in her life was forgotten."  When Dahl started writing and publishing his famous books for children, he created a grandmother character in The Witches and later stated that she was based directly on his own mother as a tribute.  
TelevisionIn 1961, Dahl hosted and wrote for a science fiction and horror television anthology series called Way Out, which preceded the Twilight Zone series on the CBS network for 14 episodes from March to July.  One of the last dramatic network shows shot in New York City, the entire series is available for viewing at The Paley Center for Media in New York City and Los Angeles. The British television series, Tales of the Unexpected, originally aired on ITV between 1979 and 1988.  The series was released to tie in with Dahl's Tales of the Unexpected, which had introduced readers to many motifs that were common in his writing.  The series was an anthology of different tales, initially based on Dahl's short stories.  The stories were sometimes sinister, sometimes wryly comedic and usually had a twist ending. Dahl introduced on camera all the episodes of the first two series, which bore the full title Roald Dahl's Tales of the Unexpected. 
Bibliography 
 
Children's stories

The Gremlins (1943)
James and the Giant Peach (1961) – Film: James and the Giant Peach (live-action/animated) (1996)
Charlie and the Chocolate Factory (1964) Published in 1978 in an omnibus edition titled The Complete Adventures of Charlie and Willy Wonka  – Films: Willy Wonka & the Chocolate Factory (1971) and Charlie and the Chocolate Factory (2005)
The Magic Finger (1 June 1966)
Fantastic Mr Fox (9 December 1970) – Film: Fantastic Mr. Fox (animated) (2009)
Charlie and the Great Glass Elevator (9 January 1972)  A sequel to Charlie and the Chocolate Factory.
Danny, the Champion of the World (30 October 1975) – Film: Danny the Champion of the World (TV movie) (1989)
The Enormous Crocodile (24 August 1978)
The Twits (17 December 1980)
George's Marvellous Medicine (21 May 1981)
The BFG (14 October 1982) – Film: The BFG (animated) (1989)
The Witches (27 October 1983) – Film: The Witches (1990)
The Giraffe and the Pelly and Me (26 September 1985)
Matilda (21 April 1988) – Film: Matilda (1996)
Esio Trot (19 April 1989)
The Vicar of Nibbleswicke (9 May 1990)
The Minpins (8 August 1991)



Children's poetry
Revolting Rhymes (10 June 1982)
Dirty Beasts (25 October 1984)
Rhyme Stew (21 September 1989)
 
Adult fiction

Novels
Sometime Never: A Fable for Supermen (1948)
My Uncle Oswald (1979)



Short story collections
Over To You: Ten Stories of Flyers and Flying (1946)
Someone Like You (1953)
Lamb to the Slaughter (1953)
Kiss Kiss (1960)
Twenty-Nine Kisses from Roald Dahl (1969)
Switch Bitch (1974)
The Wonderful Story of Henry Sugar and Six More (1977)
The Best of Roald Dahl (1978)
Tales of the Unexpected (1979)
More Tales of the Unexpected (1980)
Roald Dahl's Book of Ghost Stories (1983). Edited with an introduction by Dahl.
The Roald Dahl Omnibus (Dorset Press, 1986)
Two Fables (1986). "Princess and the Poacher" and "Princess Mammalia".
Ah, Sweet Mystery of Life: The Country Stories of Roald Dahl (1989)
The Collected Short Stories of Dahl (1991)
The Roald Dahl Treasury (1997)
The Great Automatic Grammatizator (1997). (Known in the USA as The Umbrella Man and Other Stories).
Skin And Other Stories (2000)
Roald Dahl: Collected Stories (2006)

See the alphabetical List of Roald Dahl short stories. See also Roald Dahl: Collected Stories for a complete, chronological listing.
 
 
 
Non-fiction

The Mildenhall Treasure (1946, 1977, 1999)
Boy – Tales of Childhood (1984) Recollections up to the age of 20, looking particularly at schooling in Britain in the early part of the 20th century.
Going Solo (1986) Continuation of his autobiography, in which he goes to work for Shell and spends some time working in Tanzania before joining the war effort and becoming one of the last Allied pilots to withdraw from Greece during the German invasion.
Measles, a Dangerous Illness (1988) 
Memories with Food at Gipsy House (1991)
Roald Dahl's Guide to Railway Safety (1991)
My Year (1993)
Roald Dahl's Revolting Recipes by Felicity Dahl, et al. (1994), a collection of recipes based on and inspired by food in Dahl's books, created by Roald & Felicity Dahl and Josie Fison
Roald Dahl's Even More Revolting Recipes by Felicity Dahl, et al. (2001)


Plays

The Honeys (1955) Produced at the Longacre Theatre on Broadway.
 
Film scripts

The Gremlins (1943)
36 Hours (1965)
You Only Live Twice (1967)
Chitty Chitty Bang Bang (1968)
The Night Digger (1971)
Willy Wonka & the Chocolate Factory (1971)


Television

Way Out (1961) Horror series hosted by Roald Dahl and produced by David Susskind
Alfred Hitchcock Presents: "Lamb to the Slaughter" (1958)
Alfred Hitchcock Presents: "Dip in the Pool" (1958)
Alfred Hitchcock Presents: "Poison" (1958)
Alfred Hitchcock Presents: "Man from the South" (1960) with Steve McQueen and Peter Lorre
Alfred Hitchcock Presents: "Mrs. Bixby and the Colonel's Coat" (1960)
Alfred Hitchcock Presents: "The Landlady" (1961)
Tales of the Unexpected (1979–1988), episodes written and introduced by Dahl
 
 
References 
Sources

Philip Howard, "Dahl, Roald (1916–1990)", Oxford Dictionary of National Biography, Oxford University Press, 2004; online edn, May 2006   Retrieved 24 May 2006
Donald Sturrock, Storyteller: The Life of Roald Dahl, Harper Press, 2010. ISBN 9780007254767 (See the link to excerpts in "External Links", below.)


External links 
 
 

 
Roald Dahl's darkest hour (biography excerpt)
 
 
 
Radio interview with Dahl in Norwegian by NRK (1975)
The Irregulars, Roald Dahl and the British Spy Ring in Wartime Washington, 2008, New York Times Review, 17 October 2008.
February 2011 profile of Patricia Neal on V.O.A.
Footage of Roald Dahl judging at the Whitbread book prize in 1982

 
 
 
 
 
  
 
 
DEFAULTSORT


















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Charles Addams
 
  
Charles Samuel "Chaz" Addams   (January 7, 1912 – September 29, 1988) was an American cartoonist known for his darkly humorous and macabre characters. Some of the recurring characters, who became known as the Addams Family, became the basis for two live-action television series, two animated TV series, three motion pictures and a Broadway musical.
Biography
LifeCharles Samuel Addams was born in Westfield, New Jersey, the son of Grace M. (née Spears) and Charles Huy Addams, a piano-company executive who had studied to be an architect.  He was known as "something of a rascal around the neighborhood" as childhood friends recalled.  Addams was distantly related to U.S. presidents John Adams and John Quincy Adams, despite the different spellings of their last names, and was a first cousin twice removed to noted social reformer Jane Addams.    A house on Elm Street, and another on Dudley Avenue that police once caught him breaking into, are said to be the inspiration for the Addams Family mansion in his cartoons.  College Hall, the oldest building on the current campus of the University of Pennsylvania, where Addams studied, was also an inspiration for the mansion.  He was fond of visiting the Presbyterian Cemetery on Mountain Avenue.  One friend said of him, "His sense of humor was a little different from everybody else's." He was also artistically inclined, "drawing with a happy vengeance" according to a biographer. His father encouraged him to draw, and Addams did cartoons for the Westfield High School student literary magazine, Weathervane.   He attended Colgate University in 1929 and 1930, and the University of Pennsylvania, where a fine-arts building on campus is named for him, in 1930 and 1931. In front of the building is a sculpture of the silhouettes of Addams Family characters.  He then studied at the Grand Central School of Art in New York City in 1931 and 1932.  In 1933 he joined the layout department of True Detective magazine, where he had to retouch photos of corpses that appeared in the magazine's stories to remove the blood from them. Addams complained that "A lot of those corpses were more interesting the way they were." His first drawing in The New Yorker ran on February 6, 1932 (a sketch of a window washer), and his cartoons ran regularly in the magazine from 1938, when he drew the first instance of what came to be called the Addams Family, until his death. He was a freelancer throughout that time.  During World War II, Addams served at the Signal Corps Photographic Center in New York, where he made animated training films for the U.S. Army. In late 1942, he met his first wife, Barbara Jean Day, who purportedly resembled the cartoon Morticia Addams.  The marriage ended eight years later, after Addams, who hated small children, refused to adopt one.  She later married New Yorker colleague John Hersey, author of the book Hiroshima. He married his second wife, Barbara Barb (Estelle B. Barb), in 1954. A practicing lawyer, she "combined Morticia-like looks with diabolical legal scheming," by which she wound up controlling the "Addams Family" television and movie franchises and persuaded her husband to give away other legal rights.  At one point, she got her husband to take out a $100,000 insurance policy. Addams consulted a lawyer on the sly, who later humorously wrote, "I told him the last time I had word of such a move was in a picture called Double Indemnity starring Barbara Stanwyck, which I called to his attention." In the movie, Stanwyck's character plotted her husband's murder.  No one has accused Barbara Barb Addams of attempting the same. They divorced in 1956. The Addams Family television series began after David Levy, a television producer, approached Addams with an offer to create it with a little help from the humorist. All Addams had to do was give his characters names and more characteristics for the actors to use in portrayals. The series ran on ABC for two seasons, from 1964 to 1966. Addams was "sociable and debonair," and described by a biographer as "A well-dressed, courtly man with silvery back-combed hair and a gentle manner, he bore no resemblance to a fiend." Figuratively a  , Addams squired celebrities such as Greta Garbo, Joan Fontaine and Jacqueline Kennedy on social occasions. Later, he married his third and last wife, Marilyn Matthews Miller, best known as "Tee" (1926–2002), in a pet cemetery.  In 1985, the Addamses moved to Sagaponack, New York, where they named their estate "The Swamp." 
DeathAddams died September 29, 1988, at St. Clare's Hospital and Health Center in New York City, having suffered a heart attack while still in his car after parking it.  An ambulance took him from his apartment to the hospital, where he died in the emergency room. Eric Pace, "Charles Addams Dead at 76; Found Humor in the Macabre" New York Times, September 30, 1988, accessed October 11, 2009.  As he had requested, a wake was held rather than a funeral; he had wished to be remembered as a "good cartoonist."  He was cremated, and his ashes were buried in the pet cemetery of his estate "The Swamp."  
CartoonsHis cartoons regularly appeared in The New Yorker, and he also created a syndicated comic strip, Out of This World, which ran in 1956. There are many collections of his work, including Drawn and Quartered (1942) and Monster Rally (1950), the latter with a foreword by John O'Hara. Typical of Addams's work, one cartoon shows two men standing in a room labeled "Patent Attorney." One is pointing a bizarre gun out the window toward the street and saying, "Death ray, fiddlesticks! Why, it doesn't even slow them up!"Dear Dead Days (1959) is not a collection of his cartoons (although it reprints a few from previous collections); it is a scrapbook-like compendium of vintage images (and occasional pieces of text) that appealed to Addams's sense of the grotesque, including Victorian woodcuts, vintage medicine-show advertisements and a boyhood photograph of Francesco Lentini, who had three legs.Addams drew more than 1,300 cartoons over the course of his life. Those that did not appear in The New Yorker were often in Collier's and TV Guide.    In 1961, Addams received, from the Mystery Writers of America, a Special Edgar Award for his body of work. His cartoons appeared in books, calendars and other merchandising. Singer-guitarist Dean Gitter's 1957 recording Ghost Ballads (Riverside, RLP 12-636), folk songs with supernatural themes, was packaged with album art by Addams showing a haunted house.In 1946, Addams met science-fiction writer Ray Bradbury after having drawn an illustration for Mademoiselle magazine's publication of Bradbury's short story "Homecoming", the first in a series of tales chronicling a family of Illinois vampires named the Elliotts. The pair became friends and planned to collaborate on a book of the Elliott Family's complete history with Bradbury writing and Addams providing the illustrations, but it never materialized. Bradbury's stories about the "Elliott Family" were finally anthologized in From the Dust Returned in October 2001, with a connecting narrative and an explanation of his work with Addams, and Addams' 1946 Mademoiselle illustration used for the book's cover jacket. Although Addams' own characters were well-established by the time of their initial encounter, in a 2001 interview Bradbury states that "(Addams) went his way and created the Addams Family and I went my own way and created my family in this book."  Janet Maslin, in a review of an Addams biography for The New York Times, wrote, "Addams's persona sounds cooked up for the benefit of feature writers... was at least partly a character contrived for the public eye," noting that one outré publicity photo showed the humorist wearing a suit of armor at home, "but the shelves behind him hold books about painting and antiques, as well as a novel by John Updike."   In Alfred Hitchcock's North by Northwest, Cary Grant references Charles Addams in the auction scene. Discovering Eve with Mr. Vandamm and Leonard, he says, "The three of you together. Now that's a picture only Charles Addams could draw." The filmmaker was a friend of Addams', and owned two pieces of original Addams art. Davis, Linda H., "First Chapter: 'Charles Addams'", The New York Times, December 3, 2006  Addams is also mentioned as "Chas Addams" in Edward Eager's fantasy novel Knight's Castle.
Bibliography
By Addams
Books of Addams's drawings or illustrated by him 

Drawn and Quartered (1942), first anthology of drawings (Random House)
Addams and Evil (1947), second anthology of drawings, (Simon and Schuster)
(illustrations) Afternoon in the Attic (1950), John Kobler’s anthology of short stories
Monster Rally (1950) third anthology of drawings (Simon & Schuster)
Homebodies (book) (1954) fourth anthology of drawings (Simon & Schuster)
Nightcrawlers (1957), fifth anthology of drawings (Simon & Schuster)
Dear Dead Days: A Family Album (1959), compilations book of photos (G.P. Putnam & Sons)
Black Maria (1960), sixth anthology of drawings (Simon & Schuster)
Drawn and Quartered (1962) re-released (Simon & Schuster)
The Groaning Board (1964), seventh anthology of drawings (Simon & Schuster)
The Chas Addams Mother Goose (1967) Windmill Books
My Crowd (1970), eighth anthology of drawings (Simon & Schuster)
Favorite Haunts (1976), ninth anthology of drawings (Simon & Schuster)
Creature Comforts (1981), tenth anthology of drawings (Simon & Schuster)
The World of Charles Addams, by Charles Addams (1991), posthumously compiled from works with the copyright owned by his second wife, later named Lady Barbara Cloyton (Knopf) ISBN 0-394-58822-3
Half - Baked Cookbook, by Charles Addams (2005), anthology of drawings (Simon & Schuster) ISBN 0-7432-6775-3
Happily Ever After: A Collection of Cartoons to Chill the Heart of Your Loved One, by Charles Addams (2006), anthology of drawings (Simon & Schuster) ISBN 978-0-7432-6777-9
The Addams Family: An Evilution (2010), about the evolution of The Addams Family characters (arranged by H. Kevin Miserocchi) ISBN 978-0-7649-5388-0


About Addams

Davis, Linda H., Charles Addams: A Cartoonist's Life (2006), Random House, 382 pages


See also

Edward Gorey, contemporary American cartoonist with similar macabre style


References  

Obituary, New York Times, Sept. 30, 1988, p. A1
Strickler, Dave. Syndicated Comic Strips and Artists, 1924-1995: The Complete Index. Cambria, CA: Comics Access, 1995. ISBN 0-9700077-0-1.
"The Charms of the Macabre: Charles Addams's cartoon world is full of loving and caring people. How odd." WSJ book review of The Addams Family: An Evilution Edited by H. Kevin Miserocchi.
 
External links

Charles Addams Foundation

  
 
DEFAULTSORT












 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Elizabeth Gaskell
 
 
Elizabeth Cleghorn Gaskell, née Stevenson (29 September 1810 – 12 November 1865), often referred to simply as Mrs Gaskell, was a British novelist and short story writer during the Victorian era. Her novels offer a detailed portrait of the lives of many strata of society, including the very poor, and as such are of interest to social historians as well as lovers of literature. 
Early lifeGaskell was born Elizabeth Cleghorn Stevenson on 29 September 1810, at 93 Cheyne Walk, Chelsea. She was the youngest of eight children; only she and her brother John survived infancy. Her father, William Stevenson, was a Scottish Unitarian minister at Failsworth, Lancashire but resigned his orders on conscientious grounds and moved to London in 1806 with intention of going to India after he was appointed private secretary to the Earl of Lauderdale, who was to become Governor-General of India. This position did not materialise, and Stevenson was nominated Keeper of the Treasury Records. His wife, Elizabeth Holland, came from a family from the English Midlands that was well connected with other Unitarian and prominent families like the Wedgwoods, the Turners and the Darwins, and when she died 13 months after giving birth to her youngest daughter,    she left a bewildered husband who saw no alternative for Elizabeth but to be sent  to live with her mother's sister, Hannah Lumb, in Knutsford, Cheshire. While she was growing up her future was uncertain as she had no personal wealth and no firm home, even though she was a permanent guest at her aunt and grandparents' house. Her father married Catherine Thomson in 1814 and they had a son, William (born 1815) and a daughter, Catherine (born 1816). Although Elizabeth spent several years without seeing her father and his new family, her older brother John often visited her in Knutsford. John was destined for the Royal Navy from an early age like his grandfathers and uncles, but he had no entry and had to join the Merchant Navy with the East India Company's fleet.  John went missing in 1827 during an expedition to India.Much of Elizabeth's childhood was spent in Cheshire, where she lived with her aunt Hannah Lumb in Knutsford, a town she immortalised as Cranford. They lived in a large, red brick house called Heathwaite, on Heathside (now Gaskell Avenue), which faces the large open area of Knutsford Heath. From 1821 to 1826 she attended a school run by the Miss Byerlys at Barford House, and after that Avonbank in Stratford-on-Avon  where she received a traditional education in arts, the classics, decorum and propriety given to young ladies at the time. Her aunts gave her the classics to read, and she was encouraged by her father in her studies and writing. Her brother John sent her modern books and descriptions of his life at sea and his experiences abroad.   After leaving school aged 16, she travelled to London to spend time with her Holland cousins.  She spent some time in Newcastle upon Tyne (with the Rev William Turner's family) and in Edinburgh. Her stepmother's brother was the miniature artist, William John Thomson, who painted the 1832 portrait of Gaskell in Manchester. A bust of Gaskell was sculpted by David Dunbar at the same time. 
Married life and writing career
On 30 August 1832 Elizabeth married minister, William Gaskell in Knutsford. They spent their honeymoon in North Wales, staying with Elizabeth's uncle, Samuel Holland near Porthmadog. The Gaskells settled in Manchester, where William was the minister at Cross Street Unitarian Chapel. Manchester's industrial surroundings influenced Elizabeth's writing in the industrial genre. Their first child, a daughter, was stillborn in 1833. A son, William, (1844–45), died in infancy, and this tragedy was the catalyst for Gaskell's first novel, Mary Barton. Their other children were Marianne (1834), Margaret Emily, known as Meta (1837), Florence Elizabeth (1842), and Julia Bradford (1846). Florence married Charles Crompton, a barrister and Liberal politician, in 1863. In March 1835 Gaskell began a diary, documenting the development of her daughter Marianne, her views of herself and William as parents, the value she gave to her role as a mother, her religious faith, and later the relationship between Marianne and her sister, Meta. In 1836 with her husband, she co-authored the cycle of poems Sketches among the Poor which was published in Blackwood's Magazine in January 1837. In March 1837 her Aunt Lumb had a stroke, and died less than a month later. In 1840 William Howitt published Visits to Remarkable Places containing a contribution entitled Clopton Hall by "a lady", the first work written and published solely by Gaskell. In April 1840 Howitt published The Rural Life of England, which included her second work, Notes on Cheshire Customs. In July 1841 the Gaskells travelled to Belgium and Germany. German literature had a strong influence on her short story writing in regard to theme and structure. In 1847 she published her first work of fiction Libbie Marsh's Three Eras in Howitt's Journal, using the pseudonym, "Cotton Mather Mills". Her next work The Sexton's Hero was published with the same name. She made her last use of the pseudonym in 1848 with the publication of her story Christmas Storms and Sunshine. Her first novel Mary Barton was published in October, 1848. In 1850 the family moved to a villa at 84 Plymouth Grove. Uglow J. Elizabeth Gaskell: A Habit of Stories (Faber and Faber; 1993) (ISBN 0-571-20359-0)  where Elizabeth wrote her remaining literary works while her husband held welfare committees and tutored the poor in his study. The Gaskells' social circle included literary greats, religious dissenters, and social reformers, including William  and Mary Howitt. Charles Dickens and John Ruskin visited Plymouth Grove, as did American writers Harriet Beecher Stowe and Charles Eliot Norton, while conductor Charles Hallé, who lived close by, taught piano to one of their daughters. Her close friend Charlotte Brontë stayed there three times, and on one occasion hid behind the drawing room curtains as she was too shy to meet Gaskell's visitors.  . 

In early 1850 Gaskell wrote to Charles Dickens, asking advice about assisting a girl named Pasley whom she had visited in prison. Pasley provided Gaskell with a model for the title character of Ruth in 1853. Lizzie Leigh was published in March and April, 1850, in the first numbers of Dickens's journal Household Words where many of her works were published including Cranford and, in 1854-55, North and South, her novella My Lady Ludlow, and short stories. In June 1855  Patrick Brontë asked her to write a biography of his daughter, Charlotte, and The Life of Charlotte Brontë was published in 1857. This played a significant role in developing her own (impending) literary career. In 1859 Gaskell travelled to Whitby to gather material for Sylvia's Lovers, which was published in 1863. Her novella Cousin Phyllis was serialized in The Cornhill Magazine from November 1863 to February 1864. The serialization of her last novel Wives and Daughters began in August 1864 in The Cornhill.  She died of a heart attack in 1865, while visiting a house she had purchased in Holybourne, Hampshire. Wives and Daughters was published in book form in early 1866, first in America, and then, ten days later, in England. The house on Plymouth Grove remained in the Gaskell family until 1913, after which it stood empty and fell into disrepair. The University of Manchester acquired it in 1969 and in 2004 it was acquired by the Manchester Historic Buildings Trust. The trust raised money to restore it. Exterior renovations were completed in 2011, and the house is open for monthly tours while renovations continue.  On 25 September 2010 a memorial to Gaskell was dedicated in Poets' Corner in Westminster Abbey. It takes the form of a panel in the Hubbard memorial window, above the tomb of Geoffrey Chaucer. The panel was dedicated by her great-great-granddaughter Rosemary Dabbs and a wreath was laid. 
Literary style and themes
Gaskell's first novel, Mary Barton, was published anonymously in 1848. The best known of her remaining novels are Cranford (1853), North and South (1854), and Wives and Daughters (1865). She became popular for her writing, especially her ghost stories, aided by Charles Dickens, who published her work in his magazine Household Words. Her ghost stories are quite distinct, in the "Gothic" vein, from her industrial fiction.Even though her writing conforms to Victorian conventions (including signing her name "Mrs. Gaskell"), Gaskell usually frames her stories as critiques of contemporary attitudes: her early works focused on factory work in the Midlands. She always emphasised the role of women, with complex narratives and dynamic female characters. 
ThemesUnitarianism urges comprehension and tolerance toward all religions and, even though Gaskell tried to keep her own beliefs hidden, she felt strongly about these values, which permeated her works—as in North and South, where "Margaret the Churchwoman, her father the Dissenter, Higgins the Infidel, knelt down together. It did them no harm".  
Dialect usageGaskell's style is notable for putting local dialect words into the voice of middle-class characters and of the narrator. For example, in North and South Margaret Hale suggests redding up (tidying) the Bouchers' house and even offers jokingly to teach her mother words such as knobstick (strike-breaker). Ingham P. (1995) Introduction to the Penguin Classics edition of North and South  Her husband collected Lancashire dialect, and Gaskell defended her use of dialect as expressing otherwise inexpressible concepts in an 1854 letter to Walter Savage Landor: She used the dialect word "nesh" (soft), which goes back to Old English, in Mary Barton: and later in 'The Manchester Marriage' [1858]: 
Publications
Novels

Mary Barton (1848)
Cranford (1851–3)
Ruth (1853)
North and South (1854–55)
Sylvia's Lovers (1863)
Wives and Daughters: An Everyday Story (1865)


Novellas and collections

The Moorland Cottage (1850)
 
The Old Nurse's Story (1852)
Lizzie Leigh (1855)
My Lady Ludlow (1859)
Round the Sofa (1859)
Lois the Witch (1861)
A Dark Night's Work (1863)
Cousin Phillis (1864)


Short stories

Libbie Marsh's Three Eras (1847)
The Sexton's Hero (1847)
Christmas Storms and Sunshine (1848)
Hand and Heart (1849)
The Well of Pen-Morfa (1850)
The Heart of John Middleton (1850)
Disappearances (1851)
Bessy's Troubles at Home (1852)
The Old Nurse's Story (1852)
Cumberland Sheep-Shearers (1853)
Morton Hall (1853)
Traits and Stories of the Huguenots (1853)
My French Master (1853)
The Squire's Story (1853)
Half a Life-time Ago (1855)
Company Manners (1854)
The Poor Clare (1856)
The Doom of the Griffiths (1858)
Right at Last (1858)
"The Manchester Marriage" (1858) 
The Haunted House (1859) 
The Crooked Branch (1859)
The Half-brothers (1859)
Curious If True (1860)
The Grey Woman (1861)
The Cage at Cranford (1863)
Crowley Castle (1863)


Non-fiction

Sketches Among the Poor (poems 1837)
An Accursed Race (1855)
The Life of Charlotte Brontë (1857)
French Life (1864)


See also

Illegitimacy in fiction


Notes 
External links
General and miscellaneous 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
North and South, the Musical – a new musical based on E. Gaskell's novel
The Visual Life of Elizabeth Gaskell
 
A collection of Elizabeth Gaskell's Manuscripts found at the Archives Hub


Locations

 
 
 
 

   
 
DEFAULTSORT












 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	R. Kelly
  
 Robert Sylvester Kelly (born January 8, 1967),  known by his stage name R. Kelly, is an American singer-songwriter and record producer. Often referred to as the King of R&B, Kelly is recognized as one of the most successful R&B artists of all-time. A native of Chicago, Illinois, Kelly began performing during the late 1980s and debuted in 1992 with the group Public Announcement. In 1993, Kelly went solo with the album 12 Play. He is known for a collection of major hit singles including "Bump n' Grind", "Your Body's Callin'", "I Believe I Can Fly", "Gotham City", "Ignition (Remix)", "If I Could Turn Back the Hands of Time", "The World's Greatest", "I'm a Flirt", and the hip-hopera "Trapped in the Closet". In 1998, Kelly won three Grammy Awards for "I Believe I Can Fly".Kelly has written, produced, and remixed songs for many artists including The Winans, The Isley Brothers, Charlie Wilson, Quincy Jones, K-Ci & JoJo, Aaliyah, Janet Jackson, Whitney Houston, Toni Braxton, Michael Jackson, Hi-Five, Nivea, Ciara, Mary J. Blige, Luther Vandross, Gerald LeVert, Raheem DeVaughn, Ruben Studdard, Jaheim, Kelly Price, Tamia, Maxwell, Celine Dion, Britney Spears, Usher, B2K, Twista, Tyrese, Jennifer Lopez, Trey Songz, and others in the U.S. and abroad.The Recording Industry Association of America (RIAA) has recognized R. Kelly as one of the best-selling music artists in the United States with 38.5 million albums sold as well as only the fifth black artist to crack the top 50 of the same list.    In March 2011, R. Kelly was named the most successful R&B artist of the last 25 years by Billboard.          Kelly has released 10 studio albums, sold 38.5 million albums in the U.S., 15 million singles, and over 54 million albums worldwide making him the most successful R&B male artist of 1990s.            
Early lifeBorn and raised on the South Side of Chicago, Illinois, Kelly was the third of four children.    Kelly's single mother, Joan, was a singer and a Baptist. Kelly's father was absent throughout most of Kelly's life.     Kelly began singing in church at age eight.  In Chicago, Kelly's family lived in the projects at 63rd Street before relocating to a small house at 107th and Parnell Streets. Kelly entered Kenwood Academy in Chicago's Hyde Park neighborhood in the fall of 1980 where he met his music teacher Lena McLin, who encouraged Kelly to perform the Stevie Wonder classic Ribbon in the Sky in a highschool talent show.   As a teenager, Kelly began street performing (or busking) under the Chicago 'L' trains before he eventually formed a group with his friend Marc McWilliams. In 1989, Kelly and McWilliams formed the group MGM (Musically Gifted Men). In 1991, Along with Vincent Corey Walker and Shawnth Brooks, Kelly performed on the TV talent show Big Break, hosted by Natalie Cole, and went on to win the $100,000 grand prize.
Recording career
1992–94: Born Into the 90's and 12 PlayCredited as R. Kelly and Public Announcement, the debut album Born into the 90's was released in early 1992, during the new jack swing period of the early nineties. The album yielded the R&B hits "She's Got That Vibe", "Honey Love", "Dedicated", and "Slow Dance (Hey Mr. DJ)", all of which were led by Kelly.    During late 1992, Kelly and Public Announcement embarked on a tour called "60653", whose title was the zip code of Kelly's neighborhood.  This would be the only album co-credited with Public Announcement. Kelly separated from the group in January 1993.  
Kelly's first solo album, 12 Play, was released on November 9, 1993 and yielded the singer's first number-one hit, "Bump N' Grind", which spent a record-breaking 12 weeks at number one on the Billboard Hot R&B Singles chart. Subsequent hit singles: "Your Body's Callin'" (U.S. Hot 100: #13, U.S. R&B: #2) and "Sex Me" (U.S. Hot 100: #20, U.S. R&B: #8). Both singles sold 500,000 copies in the United States and were certified Gold by the RIAA.  In 1994, 12 Play was certified Gold by the Recording Industry Association of America (RIAA), eventually going six times platinum.   Following the success of 12 Play, Kelly found himself in huge demand as a writer, producer, and mixer. On June 13, 1994, Kelly's protégé Aaliyah released her debut album titled Age Ain't Nothing But a Number which was entirely written and produced by R. Kelly. The album peaked at number 18 on the Billboard 200 and sold over three million copies in the United States. Age Ain't Nothing But a Number spawned two hit singles: "Back & Forth" (U.S. Hot 100: #5, U.S. R&B: #1); blocked Kelly's "Your Body's Callin' from the top spot and "At Your Best (You Are Love)" (U.S. Hot 100: #6, U.S. R&B: #2). Kelly also wrote and produced the female R&B duo Changing Faces first two hit singles, "Stroke You Up" (U.S. Hot 100: #3, U.S. R&B: #2) and "Foolin' Around" (U.S. R&B: #9). During this time, Kelly also became widely known for his remixes. He remixed his own songs, Bump N' Grind, Sex Me and "Homie Lover Friend", a remix featured on the A Low Down Dirty Shame (soundtrack) along with Aaliyah's song, "The Thing I Like" which was written and produced by Kelly, as well. Kelly remixed songs for other artists including Aaliyah, Barry White and Toni Braxton. He produced the popular remix for Janet Jackson's 1994 hit "Any Time, Any Place" and was featured on Jackson's remix album, Janet Remixed.
1995–96: R. Kelly and I Believe I Can FlyIn 1995, Kelly garnered his first-ever Grammy nominations; two nominations for writing, producing and composing Michael Jackson's last number one hit "You Are Not Alone".  Kelly's success continued with the release of his second studio album, R. Kelly which was released on November 14, 1995 in the United States (see 1995 in music). Critics praised Kelly for his departure from salacious bedroom songs to embracing vulnerability. New York Time's Stephen Holden described Kelly as "The reigning king of pop-soul sex talks a lot tougher than Barry White, the father of such fluffed-up pillow talk and along with Marvin Gaye and Donny Hathaway, a major influence on Kelly."  In December 1995, Professor Michael Eric Dyson critiqued Kelly's self-titled album for Vibe (magazine). Dyson described Kelly's growth from the 12 Play album: "Kelly reshapes his personal turmoil to artistic benefit" and noted that Kelly is "reborn before our very own ears." The album reached number one on the Billboard 200 chart, becoming Kelly's first number one album on the chart, and reached number one on the R&B album charts; his second. R. Kelly spawned three platinum hit singles: "You Remind Me of Something" (U.S. Hot 100: #4, U.S. R&B: #1), "I Can't Sleep (Baby If I)" (U.S. Hot 100: #5, U.S. R&B: #1), and "Down Low (Nobody Has To Know)" (U.S. Hot 100: #4, U.S. R&B: #1); a duet with Ronald Isley. Kelly's self-titled album sold four million copies, thus receiving 4× platinum certification from the RIAA.  Kelly promoted the album with a 50-city "Down Low Top Secret Tour" with LL Cool J, Xscape, and Solo. In May 1996, Kelly was featured on the cover of Ebony Man (EM) magazine with the headline proclaiming "R. Kelly The new King of R&B" where he discussed touring, working with Quincy Jones, Toni Braxton, and Janet Jackson ("When I first met them, I could tell they liked my albums. There was always a certain song they named off my album. They said they wanted something like that." Braxton liked "Your Body's Callin'".), as well as his influences Marvin Gaye, Donny Hathaway ("The way he approached the woman he loved in his songs. He didn't hold back" he says of Hathaway. "He was raw with what he had to say. And Marvin Gaye was the same.") and Michael Jackson's dedication to music ("He's another person that I feel is married to his music. That's why we related so well.")In 1996, Kelly released one of his most successful singles with "I Believe I Can Fly", an inspirational song originally released on the soundtrack for the film Space Jam. "I Believe I Can Fly" reached No. 2 on the Billboard Hot 100, and No. 1 on the UK charts for three weeks and won three Grammy Awards in 1998.  Rolling Stone magazine named it as the 406th of its top 500 songs of all time.   
1997–99: R. and Life SoundtrackIn 1997, Kelly fulfilled a longtime dream of his and signed a contract to play basketball with the Atlantic City Seagulls of the USBL. Kelly wore the number 12 in honor of his album 12 Play.  Kelly said "I love basketball enough to not totally let go of my music, but just put it to the side for a minute, and fulfill some dreams of mine that I've had for a long time." Kelly's USBL contract contained a clause that would allow him to fulfill a music obligation when necessary. "If Whitney Houston needs a song written", Gross said, "he would be able to leave the team to do that and come back". "It wasn't a gimmick," said Ken Gross, the Seagulls owner who signed Kelly. "He's a ballplayer. He can play."  Kelly is the first music artist to play professional basketball. In 1998, Kelly released R., his fourth studio album and first double album. The album spans different genres from radio pop (Celine Dion), street rap (Nas and Jay-Z) to Blues ("Suicide"). It was released in the United States on November 17, 1998 (see 1998 in music). Dave Hoekstra of the Los Angeles Times described the album as "easily the most ambitious project of his career."  R. is the first album that Kelly allowed other record producers to contribute on his album, as opposed to producing the entire album himself, and his first time collaborating with various artists on his album. The album remains Kelly's biggest selling album to date having sold 8 million copies in the United States and 4 million copies internationally.R. reached number one on the R&B albums chart, becoming Kelly's third number one album to do so, and entered at number two on the Billboard 200 chart. It spawned Kelly's second number one hit on the Billboard Hot 100, "I'm Your Angel", a duet with Celine Dion and notable classics such as "When A Woman's Fed Up" (Hot R&B/Hip-Hop: #5) and "If I Could Turn Back The Hands of Time" (Hot 100: #12, UK: #2).    The album also contains Kelly's international hit, "I Believe I Can Fly", which had been released two years prior on the Space Jam soundtrack.In 1998, Kelly wrote and produced the debut album of his protégé Sparkle, which was released under his Rockland label and distributed through Interscope. In 2000,Sparkle went Gold due to the success of the first single, "Be Careful", a duet featuring R. Kelly.  Since the success of Space Jam's "I Believe I Can Fly", Kelly gained notoriety for penning songs to popular soundtracks such as Batman & Robin ("Gotham City") and Life ("Fortunate"). In 1999, Kelly wrote and produced, along with contribution from Wyclef Jean, the majority of the soundtrack to the Eddie Murphy and Martin Lawrence film Life. Kelly composed ten songs on the soundtrack, while Jean composed five.
2000–02: TP-2.COM and The Best of Both WorldsAs the year 2000 commenced, Kelly racked up a slew of new awards reflecting his status as an established R&B superstar. In January 2000, Kelly had won Favorite Male Soul/R&B Artist at the American Music Awards, and in February, was nominated for several Grammy Awards, including Best Male R&B Vocal Performance ("When a Woman's Fed Up"), Best R&B Album (R.), and Best Rap Performance by a Duo or Group ("Satisfy You") with P. Diddy. On November 7, 2000, Kelly released his fifth studio album TP-2.com, an album harking back to his breakthrough album, 12 Play. Unlike Kelly's previous effort, R., all songs on TP-2.com was written, arranged, and produced entirely by Kelly. Allmusic's Jason Birchmeier rated TP-2.com with 4 stars and described Kelly's style: "Kelly knows how to take proven formulas and funnel them through his own stylistic aesthetic, which usually means slowing down the tempo, laying on lush choruses of strings and background vocals, taming down the lyrics for radio, and catering his pitch primarily to wistful women. The album was Kelly's second album to peak at #1 on the Billboard 200 and the fourth to top the R&B/Hip-Hop Albums charts. TP-2.com yielded the hits "I Wish" (U.S. Hot 100: #14, U.S. R&B: #1), "Feelin' On Yo Booty" (U.S. R&B: #9), and the remix to "Fiesta" (U.S. Hot 100: #6, U.S. R&B: #1), which featured Jay-Z. In 2001, Kelly won the Outstanding Achievement Award at the MOBO Awards and Billboard magazine ranked TP-2.com at number 94 on the magazine's Top 200 Albums of the Decade. "The World's Greatest", from the Ali soundtrack, was a hit, and Kelly performed at the opening ceremonies of the Winter Olympics.  In 2001, Kelly began discussing the possibility of a joint album with Jay-Z after the positive reception of Jay-Z's "Guilty Until Proven Innocent", which featured Kelly and the remix to "Fiesta" which featured Jay-Z. In December 2001 at the Billboard Music Awards, Kelly confirmed the album's existence and announced the title of the album, The Best of Both Worlds. During this time, Kelly began working on the follow-up to his fifth studio album TP-2.com, titled Loveland.On January 24, 2002, at the press conference announcing the The Best of Both Worlds completion, celebrities such as Johnnie Cochran, Russell Simmons, Ronald Isley and Sean Combs lined up to praise the album, with Jay-Z stating that he hoped the collaboration represents "more unity for black people on a whole."    Black Electorate described the collaboration as "one of the greatest power moves in black music history."  MTV's Shaheem Reid wrote: "And if Jay and Kelly can put their egos to the side long enough to wrap up and promote their album, then their labels — Def Jam and Jive, respectively — can surely figure out a way to join forces and make cheddar together. As determined by a coin toss, the album will be distributed on Roc-A-Fella/Def Jam in the U.S. and Canada, while Jive will handle distribution internationally." When the joint album leaked on February 22, 2002 it caused the label, Roc-A-Fella, to push the album's release date up from the initial date, March 26, to March 19.       Jay-Z expressed his frustration about the album leak to MTV News: "It's the gift and the curse. It's an honor that everybody wants your music fast, but on the other hand, it's another thing when the music gets out before you [want it to]. Because that's your art. You feel attached to it. You feel a certain way and you want people to go out and support it. The time that you take, it's like a piece of your life. You take parts of your life and you put it on these records and then for it to just be traded and moved around [is frustrating]. The release date for The Best of Both Worlds was eventually moved back to the initial date March 26. The album sold 285,000 copies in its opening week and debuted at number two on the Billboard 200. In May 2002, Kelly's initial sixth studio album, Loveland, leaked and was delayed to release in November.  Instead Kelly re-recorded the entire album, titled it Chocolate Factory and featured several of the bootlegged tracks on the bonus Loveland disc.
2003–05: Chocolate Factory, Happy People/U Saved Me and TP.3 ReloadedIn early 2003, Chocolate Factory became a runaway success for Kelly, selling over three million copies due to the success of singles such as "Ignition". "Snake" and "Step in the Name of Love" were also popular singles. "Snake", incidentally, became the basis of the dancehall reggae riddim known as Baghdad. Later that year Kelly followed that success by releasing his first greatest hits collection The R in R&B Collection Volume 1, the album as well as a DVD collection.In 2004, Kelly released the ambitious two-disc set Happy People/U Saved Me, with the first disc including feel-good, stepping-inspired tracks, while focusing on gospel and inspirational material on the second disc. That same year, Kelly performed The Star-Spangled Banner during the introduction of the world championship boxing fight between Bernard Hopkins and Jermain Taylor. His performance, which included a line of dancers doing the "stepping" routine and a prerecorded instrumental track set to the sound of "Happy People" was met with a mixed reaction. In October 2004, Kelly reunited with Jay-Z to do a follow-up to their Best of Both Worlds album shortly after announcing a tour to coincide with the project after the duo performed at Madison Square Garden a year before. The duo's Unfinished Business album was released and peaked at number one on the Billboard chart.The Unfinished Business tour was plagued by a rivalry between the two stars and Kelly reportedly showing up late or not at all to gigs. The singer, according to Jay-Z, often complained that the touring lights were not directed towards him and often left during the middle of sets. Another night during the concert, Kelly stayed on his tour bus for two hours before finally coming out to perform an uninspired set. Jay-Z eventually removed R. Kelly halfway through the tour, after a member of Jay-Z's entourage attacked R. Kelly with Mace or pepper spray. On April 25, 2006, it was confirmed that Jay-Z's younger cousin, Tyran (Ty-Ty) Smith confessed in a Manhattan Criminal Court to pepper-spraying R. Kelly and four of his bodyguards at Madison Square Garden in October 2004. Smith had been charged with assault, but was allowed to plead guilty to disorderly conduct for four days of community service. After the original incident, Jay-Z made Smith an executive of Def Jam Records.  Kelly also launched a $75 million lawsuit against Jay-Z for removing him from the tour, which received a countersuit by Jay-Z which was thrown out by the judge. In 2005, Kelly released his seventh studio LP, TP.3 Reloaded. The album included chapters of "Trapped in the Closet".
2007–09: Double Up and UntitledOn May 29, 2007, R Kelly released his eighth studio album Double Up, which included the hit single "I'm a Flirt (Remix)", featuring T.I. and T-Pain. The original track entitled "I'm a Flirt", also produced and co-written by R. Kelly, appeared as a hidden track on Bow Wow's The Price of Fame (2006). However, Kelly never gave the rights for the song to be released as a formal single, although it was played by many radio stations before the remix version. Kelly's first single from Double Up was "I'm a Flirt (Remix)", Bow Wow was not featured on this version of the song. In Kelly's video for "I'm a Flirt (Remix)", he encourages fans to call a number which flashes up quickly on the screen. Fans who called the number were greeted by a recording of Kelly talking about his upcoming album and playing snippets of new songs in the studio. "I'm a Flirt (Remix)" was successful for Kelly. The song peaked at number 12 on the Billboard Hot 100. It also reached number one on the Billboard Hot Rap Tracks. Another hit on the album, "Same Girl", was a collaboration between Kelly and Usher. The single peaked at number 20 on the Hot 100 and peaked at number four on the R&B chart. Other singles such as "Rock Star" featuring Ludacris and Kid Rock, "Sex Planet" and "Freaky in the Club" were R&B charters, although the latter two were not officially released as singles, nor was the title track featuring Snoop Dogg.Kelly's other single from Double Up titled "Rise Up" was a tribute to the victims of the Virginia Tech massacre. The song was officially released as a digital download May 15, 2007. Proceeds were donated to the Hokie Spirit Memorial Fund, a fund that helped family members of the victims of the shootings. Kelly began his Double Up tour with Ne-Yo, Keyshia Cole and J. Holiday opening for him. After two shows, promoter Leonard Rowe had Ne-Yo removed from the tour because of a contract dispute. However, Ne-Yo alleges that the reason for the dropout was because Ne-Yo believes he received a better response from critics and fans, even though he only performed at two shows. Ne-Yo filed a lawsuit against Rowe Entertainment. It was shown that Kelly was not mentioned in the lawsuit. In December 2007, Kelly was showing up to another preliminary court hearing on his case due to his tour bus being held up in Utah.  The judge threatened to revoke Kelly's bond, but the judge eventually decided not to. In 2008, Kelly released a rap track titled "I'm a Beast" in which he coarsely attacked his detractors, though Kelly himself never mentioned by name whom the song was directed to. In 2008, Billboard reported that Kelly had plans to release his newest album titled 12 Play: Fourth Quarter in the summer of that year but the album was postponed. Billboard also named Kelly among the most successful artists ever for its 50th Anniversary List.  In the spring, the first promotional single "Hair Braider", peaked at No. 56 on Billboard's R&B chart. On July 28, the entire album leaked online.  The album was then pushed back to be released in the fall. On September 18, Kelly released the video to the second promotional single "Skin". However, the album still has no official release date. Though Kelly has not released an album, he has kept busy in the studio doing featured guest spots on numerous remixes including "Lookin Boy" remix by Hotstylz, Mariah Carey's "Touch My Body" remix, a verse for a remix to Kanye West's single "Love Lockdown", Raheem DeVaughn's "Customer" remix, Beyoncé Knowles' "If I Were a Boy" remix, T-Pain's "Chopped 'n' Skrewed" remix, among others. A recent track was leaked on the internet titled "I Believe". Kelly states on his official MySpace page that Obama's election inspired him to write the song, which contains an excerpt from Barack Obama's presidential acceptance speech. This song was available on iTunes as a free download the first week it was released.On June 3, 2009, Kelly released his first ever mixtape, The Demo Tape (Gangsta Grillz) presented by DJ Skee and DJ Drama as a way to reintroduce himself to fans. While at the Velvet Room in Atlanta in February 2009, Kelly announced that he was out there working on the album and that it would be called Untitled.  The album was given a September 29, 2009 release date,  but was delayed until October 13, 2009. The album release was again delayed and was released under Jive Records on December 1, 2009. It got mixed to positive reviews from critics. The single "Number One", which features Keri Hilson, peaked at #8 on the US R&B Chart.Kelly performed for the first time in Africa headlining the Arise African Fashion Awards in Johannesburg, South Africa on June 20, 2009.  Kelly scheduled to perform in Cape Town before heading to Nigeria as part of the annual ThisDay music and fashion festival in July. Kelly also performed in Kampala, Uganda in January 2010. He also scheduled to perform in London as part of his first international tour in eight years, but he did not make his London concert. "I'm very excited about my first visit to Africa, I've dreamed about this for a long time and it's finally here," Kelly said in a statement. "It will be one of the highlights of not only my career but my life. I can't wait to perform in front of my fans in Africa — who have been some of the best in the world." In December 2009, Kelly teamed up with biographer David Ritz and Tavis Smiley's SmileyBooks publications to write his memoirs entitled Soulacoaster. SmileyBooks publisher and founder, Tavis Smiley stated that the memoir's main focus won't be on Kelly's trials and tribulations. Smiley was quoted saying "If anyone thinks this bookis going to fixate on [R. Kelly's trials], they are going to be sadly mistaken. It is going to be a holistic look at his life thus far and the life and legacy that he's building." 
2010: Epic and Love LetterKelly performed the inspirational song "Sign of a Victory" at the 2010 FIFA World Cup opening ceremony on June 11, 2010. On July 13, 2010, a song called "Tongues" surfaced, reportedly the lead single from Kelly's upcoming album Zodiac. The song is produced by Bangladesh and features Ludacris. In an interview in the September 2010 issue of XXL magazine, Kelly mentioned that he is currently working on three new albums (Epic, Love Letter, and Zodiac) and detailed that the new material is basically him "remixing himself". On September 13, 2010, Kelly released one of his three new albums, Epic. A collection of Kelly's most "epic" ballads, including five brand-new inspirational songs; the compilation was only released in Europe. In the September 2010 issue of XXL magazine, Kelly mentioned that the song Sign of Victory gave him the idea to do an international album called Epic.In November 2010, Kelly collaborated with several African musicians forming a supergroup known as One8. The group features 2Face from Nigeria, Alikiba from Tanzania, Congolese singer Fally Ipupa, 4X4 from Ghana, hip-hop artist Movaizhaleine from Gabon, Zambia's JK, Ugandan hip-hop star Navio and Kenya's Amani, the only female in the group. The first release from the group is "Hands Across the World" written and produced by Kelly.  Kelly's latest album Love Letter was released on December 14, 2010 worldwide. The album includes 15 songs, the latter being a bonus track; a cover of Michael Jackson's You Are Not Alone, which was written and produced by Kelly as well. Love Letter has been critically acclaimed by music critics and highly-praised by critics and fans alike. ABC News declared "The genius of R. Kelly has been resurrected and is on full display on Love Letter"  The first single "When a Woman Loves" was nominated for a Grammy for Best Traditional R&B Vocal Performance at the 53rd Annual Grammy Awards. ABC News music critic named "When a Woman Loves" the best single of 2010 saying: "An absolutely stunning love song with a pitch-perfect vocal performance that will send chills down your spine — for the right reasons."  The next single, "Love Letter" and "A Love Letter Christmas", the Christmas remix to "Love Letter", were released as singles on November 22, 2010. In promotion of the Love Letter album he performed at the 2010 Soul Train Music Awards and on Late Night with Jimmy Fallon. All songs on the album were written and produced by Kelly.
2011: Throat surgeryOn February 12 at the 2011 Clive Davis Pre-Grammy Gala in Los Angeles, Kelly performed a medley of hits including Happy People, When a Woman's Fed Up and Bump N' Grind, which brought Usher, Mary J. Blige and Katy Perry to their feet.  Ann Powers of the Los Angeles Times wrote "Kelly is a single-bound kind of leaper who dips into everything from soft porn to opera in his music. His supreme chutzpah, a quality he shares with Streisand, allows him to feel secure within pop's traditions while taking them wherever he pleases. He made Davis' musical program, which at times got lost amid the chatter of the A-list crowd, come alive. It was all so simple then: an instant when one of pop's key traditional elements, that determination to wow, took on new dimension in the hands of an expert." In March 2011, Kelly was named the #1 R&B artist of the last 25 years by Billboard.  In his career Kelly has amassed 35 top 10 hits and 11 #1 hits on the R&B/Hip-Hop Songs chart.On July 19, 2011, Kelly was rushed to the Northwestern Memorial Hospital in Chicago to undergo emergency throat surgery. He cancelled his heavily advertised performance at the Reggae Sumfest in Jamaica that was scheduled the following Friday. In a statement the organizers said, "Kelly's unforeseen and unavoidable health issues will prevent him from making a scheduled appearance on the music festival." Johnny Gourzong, Sumfest Productions executive director, also commented, saying, "We are truly going to miss his presence on the festival."  On July 20, 2011, in a press release, representatives for R. Kelly explained that he was rushed to the hospital to drain an abscess on one of his tonsils and "will be laid up for an indefinite amount of time".  Shortly after, Kelly tweeted fans "I WILL BE BACK!" he promised and "I'd like to thank everybody for their love, concern and support."  On July 21, 2011, Kelly's spokesman, Allan Mayer, reported that Kelly was released from Northwestern Memorial Hospital in Chicago and is recuperating at home. It was not immediately clear when Kelly might be well enough to resume performing.  On July 21, 2011, in a video message to fans, Kelly spoke out for the first time since throat surgery and reassured his fans that he's doing well. He said "Yo what's up, y'all, it's your boy Kellz, fresh out the hospital. Just want to say thanks to my fans for supporting me. I want to say thanks to all the prayer warriors out there for supporting me." On September 23, 2011, Variety confirmed that Kelly has signed on to write original music for the Sparkle soundtrack.  On April 25, 2011, Director Salkim Akli was quoted saying, "Hopefully, R. Kelly will come on and do some of the music for the film. His latest music sounds like it came from a time period. Here's a guy who can write about a woman being a jeep to 'I Believe I Can Fly' and he's an artist. Whether you like him or dislike him, I love artists, and I know that he will just go deep into it and come up with something unique." On October 7, RCA Music Group announced it was disbanding Jive Records along with Arista Records and J Records. With the shutdown, Kelly (and all other artists previously signed to these three labels) will release his future material on the RCA Records brand.  On November 10, 2011, Kelly tweeted to fans "It's been a long time coming but I finally feel a lot better about my throat since the surgery and this is the first song I wrote."  followed with "Enjoy!" and a link to a song titled "Shut Up". In the song, Kelly addresses the people who doubted his ability to comeback after the surgery and the rumors that surrounded him while he was in recovery. Reviews for "Shut Up" were generally positive: Spin (magazine) wrote, "Kelly taking aim at the haters who said "he's washed up, he's lost it." He hasn't. Dude's voice is in prime smooth R&B form".  Prefix (magazine) writer, Andrew Winistorfer described the song as "vintage Kelly: It's all runs in the verses, falsetto in the middle, and randomly placed vitriol. On December 21, 2011, Kelly made a live appearance on The X Factor (U.S.) and gave his first performance since undergoing emergency throat surgery in the summer. He sang his classic hit "I Believe I Can Fly" with finalist Melanie Amaro and received positive reviews from critics. Kelly revealed to Rolling Stone that he felt like he was "just starting out" and how the performance was a "wake up call" for him. His memoir entitled Soulacoaster was released in the Summer of 2012.
2012–present: Write Me Back and Trapped in the Closet RevivalOn January 31, 2012, Kelly revealed in a radio interview that he's releasing a follow-up to the Love Letter album titled Write Me Back. The album is a mix of Kelly's previous albums; Love Letter, Happy People and a little bit of TP-2.Com.  On February 1, 2012, Kelly released the first single, "Share My Love", off Write Me Back, followed by “Feelin’ Single”. The album will be released on June 26. On February 18, 2012, R. Kelly performed at Whitney Houston's memorial. Kelly performed the ballad I Look to You, a song he wrote for Whitney that she released on July 23, 2009. The song was included in her seventh and final studio album, also titled I Look to You. After singing the song he said, "We love you Whitney. Rest in Peace." before leaving the stage. On March 20, 2012, IFC announced a third installment of the Trapped in the Closet will be coming soon. On June 26, 2012, Kelly released his eleventh studio album, Write Me Back.On August 31, 2012, Kelly announced The Single Ladies Tour featuring R&B singer, Tamia. On September 1, 2012, the Japanese branch of retail chain HMV revealed Kanye West's Cruel Summer track list. Kelly is featured alongside Kanye West on the opening song entitled "To The World". 
Personal lifeRobert Kelly, the third of four children, grew up in a single parent home. Kelly was raised in the church, where he sang gospel in the choir.  His mother, Joanne, died in 1993.Kelly has three children: Two daughters, Joann (born 1998) and Jaya (born 2000), and a son Robert Jr. (born 2002). In 1996, Kelly married Andrea Kelly, his former backup dancer and children's mother. In January 2009, after almost 13 years of marriage, the couple divorced. 
Legal issuesAfter a July 1996 brawl at a Lafayette, Louisiana health club involving bodyguard William Robert Savy, Kelly was placed on a year's unsupervised probation starting August 13, 1997. One of the victims, Christopher Mahoney, needed 110 facial stitches. Kelly was arrested on April 8, 1998 on three misdemeanor charges of disorderly conduct, including one charge on violating noise ordinance for playing loud music from his car.  Prosecutors from the district attorney's office dropped the first two charges on May 7 and the noise charge on July 22 that year.  On February 3, 2002, a video allegedly showing Kelly engaging in sex with, and urinating on, an allegedly underage woman surfaced. The story, which was released by an unknown source, was sent to the Chicago Sun-Times, the newspaper that broke the story. Kelly denied that he was the man in the video.    Bootleg copies of that tape became widely available on the black market and over file sharing networks.  In June 2002, Kelly was indicted in Chicago on 21 counts of having sex with a minor, which were later reduced to soliciting a minor for child pornography, seven counts of videotaping the acts, and seven counts of producing child pornography.  That same month, authorities searched Kelly's house in Davenport, Florida. Officers found an unusual amount of commercially manufactured and distributed adult porn in a room.    During the search officers also obtained pictures of an allegedly underage woman on a digital camera – wrapped in a towel in a duffel bag.  Kelly was arrested in January 2003 on those charges. In March 2004, these charges were dropped due to a lack of probable cause for the search warrants. After a number of delays, on October 27, 2006, a Cook County, Illinois court hearing for pre-trial motions set the date of the actual trial to February 7, 2007.  On the date of the trial, Kelly's lawyer informed the court that his client was unable to attend because he was "undergoing surgery for a burst appendix". He also announced that Kelly was "in good condition and was expected to be released from the hospital later in the day." Kelly's attorney stated that Kelly (who pleaded not guilty) would be in attendance on the next trial date of February 21, 2007.  It had previously been announced by the court that the videotape that allegedly showed Kelly performing sex acts with an underage woman would be publicly shown as evidence in the trial. The trial, however, was delayed due to disputes over when the tape was made and to give medical recuperation time to the sitting judge following a fall resulting in broken bones. Later the case was set for a September 17 date.  It took more than six months for the case to go to trial. Jury selection began on May 9, 2008, and the trial officially started on May 20 with opening statements from the prosecution and defense. After two weeks, the prosecution's case wrapped on June 3 while the defense's wrapped six days later, on June 9. After less than a day of deliberations, on June 13, 2008, a Chicago jury found Kelly not guilty of all 14 counts. 
Artistry 
Musical styleLike Marvin Gaye and Al Green, Kelly melds the sinful and the sanctified in his music. He’s most known for his explicit carnality. Kelly is often compared to Marvin Gaye and is viewed as his contemporary equivalent. He often cites Donny Hathaway, Stevie Wonder and Sam Cooke as his influences.
InfluenceSince childhood, Kelly has been influenced by R&B and Soul artists such as Donny Hathaway, Stevie Wonder, and Sam Cooke. Gospel also plays a major part in Kelly's music, he grew up in a storefront church and drew inspiration from there. Joann, Kelly's mother, often would ask Kelly to sing Hathaway's "A Song For You" over and over. Kelly cites Marvin Gaye, Donny Hathaway, Stevie Wonder and The Isley Brother's for influencing his work.
LegacyKelly is considered to be the most successful R&B artist of the last 25 years.    He is also one of the best-selling music artists in the United States with 38.5 million albums sold as well as only the fifth black artist to crack the top 50 of the same list.    Rolling Stone magazine wrote: "Arguably the most important R&B figure of the of the 1990s and 2000s".  Music executive Barry Weiss described Kelly as "The modern-day Prince, although there's a bit of Marvin Gaye in him, and a bit of Irving Berlin."   
Discography 
 
 

Studio
Born into the 90's (1992) (with Public Announcement)
12 Play (1993)
R. Kelly (1995)
R. (1998)
TP-2.com (2000)
Chocolate Factory (2003)
Happy People/U Saved Me (2004)
TP.3 Reloaded (2005)
Double Up (2007)
Untitled (2009)
Love Letter (2010)
Write Me Back (2012)
Black Panties (2013)

 

Collaboration albums
The Best of Both Worlds (2002) (with Jay-Z)
Unfinished Business (2004) (with Jay-Z)



Compilation albums
The R. In R&B Collection, Vol. 1 (2003)
Remix City, Volume 1 (2005)
My Diary (2005)
Playlist: The Very Best of R. Kelly (2010)
Epic (2010)



Unreleased albums
Loveland (2002)
12 Play: 4th Quarter (2008)

 
Filmography


Trapped in the Closet (1–12) (2005)
Trapped in the Closet (13–22) (2007)
Trapped in the Closet (1–22) The Big Package (2007)
R. Kelly Live the Light It Up Tour (2007)
Trapped in the Closet (22–54) (TBA)


Official tours

The 12 Play Very Necessary Tour (w/ Salt-N-Pepa) (1994)
The Down Low Top Secret Tour (w/ LL Cool J, Xscape, and Solo) (1996)
The Get Up on a Room Tour (w/ Kelly Price, Nas, Foxy Brown, and Deborah Cox) (1999)
The TP-2.com Tour (w/ Sunshine Anderson & Syleena Johnson) (2001)
The Key in the Ignition Tour (w/ Ashanti (entertainer)) (2003)
The Light It Up Tour (2006)
The Double Up Tour (w/ J. Holiday & Keyshia Cole) (2007)
The Ladies Make Some Noise Tour (2009)
Love Letter Tour (w/ Keyshia Cole & Marsha Ambrosius) (2011)
The Single Ladies Tour (w/ Tamia) (2012)


Grammy AwardsThe Grammy Awards are awarded annually by the National Academy of Recording Arts and Sciences. R. Kelly has won 3 awards from 23 nominations. 
|-
| style="text-align:center;"| 1996
| "You Are Not Alone"  (Michael Jackson's song) 
| Song of The Year
|  
|-
| style="text-align:center;" rowspan="5"| 1998
| rowspan="5"| "I Believe I Can Fly"
| Record of the Year
|  
|-
| Song of the Year
|  
|-
| Best Male R&B Vocal Performance
|  
|-
| Best R&B Song
|  
|-
| Best Song Written for a Motion Picture, Television or Other Visual Media
|  
|-
| style="text-align:center;" rowspan="2"| 1999
| "I'm Your Angel"  (with Celine Dion) 
| Best Pop Collaboration with Vocals
|  
|-
| "Lean On Me"
| Best R&B Vocal Performance by a Duo or Group
|  
|-
| style="text-align:center;" rowspan="3"| 2000
| "When a Woman's Fed Up"
| Best Male R&B Vocal Performance
|  
|-
| R.
| Best R&B Album
|  
|-
| "Satisfy You"  (with Puff Daddy) 
| Best Rap Performance by a Duo or Group
|  
|-
| style="text-align:center;"| 2001
| "I Wish"
| Best Male R&B Vocal Performance
|  
|-
| style="text-align:center;"| 2003
| "The World's Greatest"
| Best Male R&B Vocal Performance
|  
|-
| style="text-align:center;" rowspan="2"| 2004
| "Step in the Name of Love"
| Best Male R&B Vocal Performance
|  
|-
| Chocolate Factory
| Best Contemporary R&B Album
|  
|-
| style="text-align:center;"| 2005
| "Happy People"
| Best Male R&B Vocal Performance
|  
|-
| style="text-align:center;"| 2006
| Trapped in the Closet
| Best Long Form Music Video
|  
|-
| style="text-align:center;" rowspan="2"| 2008
| "Same Girl"  (with Usher) 
| Best R&B Performance by a Duo or Group with Vocals
|  
|-
| Trapped in The Closet Chapter 13-22
| Best Long Form Music Video
|  
|-
| style="text-align:center;" rowspan="2"| 2011
| "When a Woman Loves"
| Best Traditional R&B Vocal Performance
|  
|-
| Untitled
| Best Contemporary R&B Album
|  
|-
| style="text-align:center;" rowspan="2"| 2012
| "Radio Message"
| Best Traditional R&B Performance
|  
|-
| Love Letter
| Best R&B Album
|  
|-
 
Other Awards

American Music Award
1993: Favorite Soul/R&B Single ("Honey Love")
1995: Favorite Soul/R&B Album (12 Play)
1997: Favorite Soul/R&B Male Artist
2000: Favorite Soul/R&B Male Artist
2005: Favorite Soul/R&B Male Artist
2007: Favorite Soul/R&B Album (Double Up)



BET Awards
2003: Best Male R&B Artist



Billboard Awards
2001: Top R&B/Hip Hop Artist
2001: Top R&B/Hip Hop Album (TP2.com)
2001: Top R&B/Hip Hop Singles & Tracks ("Fiesta")
2001: Top R&B/Hip Hop Artist
2001: Top R&B/Hip Hop Album Artist
2001: Top R&B/Hip Hop Album Artist – Male



BMI Awards
1998: Pop Songwriter of the Year (for "I Believe I Can Fly", "I Can't Sleep Baby (If I)", and "I Don't Want To" (recorded by Toni Braxton))



Grammy Awards
1998: Best R&B Song ("I Believe I Can Fly")
1998: Best Male R&B Vocal Performance ("I Believe I Can Fly")
1998: Best Song Written for a Motion Picture, Television or Other Visual Media ("I Believe I Can Fly")



MOBO Awards
2001: MOBO Outstanding Achievement



NAACP Image Awards
2001: Outstanding Male Artist
2001: Outstanding Music Video ("I Wish")



Soul Train Awards
1999: Best R&B/Soul Album, Male (R.)
1999: Sammy Davis Jr. Entertainer of the Year Award
2000: Best R&B/Soul or Rap Album (R.)
2001: Best R&B/Soul Single, Male ("I Wish")
2001: Best R&B/Soul Album, Male (TP2.com)
2004: R&B/Soul Album, Male (Chocolate Factory)
2004: Quincy Jones Award for Outstanding Career Achievements
2006: Stevie Wonder Award for Outstanding Achievements in Song Writing



Source Hip Hop Awards
1999: R&B Artist of the Year
2001: R&B Artist of the Year



Vibe Awards
2003: R&B Vanguard Award

  
References 
External links 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
DEFAULTSORT















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Gwen Verdon
 Gwenyth Evelyn “Gwen” Verdon (January 13, 1925 – October 18, 2000) was an actress and dancer who won four Tony awards for her musical comedy performances and served as uncredited choreographers assistant and specialty dance coach for both theater and film.  With flaming red hair and an endearing quaver in her voice, Verdon was a critically acclaimed performer on Broadway in the 1950s and 1960s. Having originated many roles in musicals she is also strongly identified with her second husband, director–choreographer Bob Fosse, remembered as the dancer–collaborator–muse for whom he choreographed much of his work and as the guardian of his legacy after his death.
Early life and careerVerdon was born in Culver City, California, the second child of Gertrude Lilian (  Standring; October 24, 1896 – October 16, 1956) and Joseph William Verdon (December 31, 1896 – June 23, 1978), who were British immigrants to the United States by way of Canada.  Her brother was William Farrell Verdon (August 1, 1923 – June 10, 1991). The Verdon family could be described as "showpeople." Her father was an electrician at MGM Studios, and her mother was a former vaudevillian of the Denishawn dance troupe, as well as a dance teacher. As a toddler, Gwen had rickets, which left her legs so badly misshapen she was called "Gimpy" by other children and spent her early years in orthopedic boots and rigid leg braces. Her mother put the three-year-old in dance classes. Further ballet training strengthened her legs and improved her carriage.By the time she was six, she was already dancing on stage. She went on to study multiple dance forms, ranging from tap, jazz, ballroom and flamenco to Balinese. She even added juggling to her repertoire. At age 11, she appeared as a solo ballerina in the musical romance film The King Steps Out (1936), directed by Josef von Sternberg and starring Grace Moore and Franchot Tone. She attended Hamilton High School in Los Angeles and studied under famed balletomane Ernest Belcher. While in high school, she was cast in a revival of Show Boat.Verdon shocked her parents and instructors when she abandoned her budding career aged 17 to elope with reporter James Henaghan in 1942. In 1945, she appeared as a dancer in the movie musical The Blonde From Brooklyn. After her divorce, she entrusted her son Jimmy to the care of her parents.
Adult career 
Early on, Verdon found a job as assistant to choreographer Jack Cole, whose work was respected by both Broadway and Hollywood movie studios. During her five-year employment with Cole, she took small roles in movie musicals as a "specialty dancer". She also taught dance to performers who eventually became stars, such as Jane Russell, Fernando Lamas, Lana Turner, Rita Hayworth, Betty Grable and Marilyn Monroe.Verdon started out on Broadway as a "gypsy", going from one chorus line to another. Her breakthrough role finally came when choreographer Michael Kidd cast her as the second female lead in Cole Porter's musical Can-Can (1953), starring French prima donna Lilo. Out-of-town reviewers hailed Verdon's interpretation of Eve in the Garden of Eden ballet as a performance that upstaged the show's star, who jealously demanded Verdon's role be cut to only two featured dance numbers. With her role reduced to little more than an ensemble part, Verdon formally announced her intention to quit by the time the show premiered on Broadway. But her opening-night Garden of Eden performance was so well received that the audience screamed her name until the startled actress was brought from her dressing room in her bathrobe to take a curtain call. Verdon received a pay increase and her first Tony Award for her triumphant performance.With her short shock of flaming red hair, exquisite body of a pin-up girl and a guileless vulnerability on stage and off, Verdon was considered the best dancer on Broadway in the 1950s and 1960s. That reputation solidified during her next show, George Abbott's Damn Yankees (1955), based on the novel The Year the Yankees Lost the Pennant. She would forever be identified with her role as the vampish Lola, and it was on this show that she first worked with Bob Fosse as her choreographer. In the story, Verdon's Lola is a woman who was once "the ugliest woman in Providence, Rhode Island" but sold herself to the Devil to be the beauty we see in the play. The Devil (played by a wryly comic Ray Walston) convinces a baseball fan to sell his soul so he can play and win the World Series for the Washington Senators. The Devil then employs the seductive Lola to keep the guy ("Joe") from escaping his grasp. The hitch is that Lola falls for the guy and has to choose between her love for him and her beauty pact with the Devil. The musical ran for 1019 performances. Vernon won another Tony and went to Hollywood to repeat her role in the 1958 movie version Damn Yankees, memorably singing "whatever Lola wants, Lola gets". (Fosse can be seen partnered deliciously with her in the witty mambo duet "Who's Got the Pain".)Another Tony came when Verdon memorably played a role associated with Greta Garbo, Eugene O'Neill's Anna Christie, the hard-luck girl fleeing from her past as a prostitute, in the musical New Girl in Town. When Fosse directed as well as choreographed his first Broadway musical, it was Redhead. In 1960, Fosse and Verdon wed.In 1966, Verdon returned to the stage in the role of Charity in Sweet Charity, which like many of her earlier Broadway triumphs was choreographed and directed by husband Fosse. The show is based on Federico Fellini's screenplay for Nights of Cabiria. But whereas Fellini's black-and-white Italian film concerns the romantic ups and downs of an ever-hopeful prostitute, the musical makes the central character a hoofer-for-hire at a Times Square dance hall. The trademark Fosse showmanship, a dynamite musical score and theatregoers' affection for the exuberant, 41-year-old Verdon put the show over, despite Fellini's source material straining against the sanitized, Broadway-ized storyline. It was followed by a movie version starring  Shirley MacLaine as Charity, featuring Ricardo Montalban, Sammy Davis, Jr. and Chita Rivera, with Fosse at the helm of his very first film as director and choreographer. Characteristically generous, Verdon helped with the choreography. The numbers include the famed "Big Spender", the fast-paced "Rhythm of Life", the witty "If My Friends Could See Me Now" and "I'm a Brass Band", in which MacLaine's Charity marched down the middle of Manhattan's Wall Street district. Verdon would also travel to Berlin to help Fosse with Cabaret, the musical film for which he won an Academy Award for Best Director.Although estranged as a couple, Verdon and Fosse continued to collaborate on projects such as Chicago (1975) (in which she originated the role of murderess Roxie Hart) and the musical Dancin' (1978), as well as Fosse's autobiographical movie All That Jazz (1979). The helpmeet/peer played by Leland Palmer in that film is based on the role Verdon played in Fosse's real life.  She also developed a close working relationship with Fosse's lover, Broadway dancer Ann Reinking, and she instructed for Reinking's musical theatre classes. Reinking can be seen in All That Jazz playing the protagonist's lover, as she was in Fosse's real life. She, as much as Verdon, would become responsible for keeping Fosse's trademark choreography alive after Fosse's death. Reinking played Roxie Hart in the highly successful Broadway revival of Chicago that opened in 1996. She choreographed the dances "in the style of Bob Fosse" for that revival.After originating the role of Roxie opposite Chita Rivera in Chicago, Verdon focused on film acting, playing character roles in movies such as The Cotton Club (1984), Cocoon (1985) and Cocoon: The Return (1988). She continued to teach dance and musical theater and to act. She receiving three Emmy Award nominations for appearances on Magnum, P.I. (1988), Dream On (1993) and Homicide: Life on the Street (1993). Verdon appeared as Alice's mother in the Woody Allen movie Alice (1990) and as Ruth in Marvin's Room (1996), co-starring Meryl Streep, Diane Keaton, and Hume Cronyn. In 1999, Verdon served as artistic consultant on a plotless Broadway musical designed to showcase examples of classic Fosse choreography.  Called simply Fosse, the revue was conceived and directed by Richard Maltby Jr and Ann Reinking and choreographed by Reinking and Chet Walker. Verdon's daughter Nicole received a "special thanks" credit. The show received a Tony for best musical.Verdon played Alora in the movie Walking Across Egypt (1999) and appeared in the film Bruno, released in 2000.Verdon received a total of four Tonys, for best supporting actress for Can-Can (1953) and best leading actress for Damn Yankees (1955), New Girl in Town (1957) and Redhead (1959), a murder-mystery musical. She also won a Grammy Award for the cast recording of Redhead.Gwen Verdon was inducted into the American Theatre Hall of Fame in 1981.  In 1998, she was awarded the National Medal of Arts. 
Personal lifeVerdon had two husbands, tabloid reporter James Henaghan (married 1942, divorced 1947) and Bob Fosse (married 1960, his death 1987). She and Henaghan had one son, Jim Henaghan (born 1943); she and Fosse had a daughter, Nicole Fosse (born 1963).In 1971, Verdon filed a legal separation from Fosse (but never divorced) because of his extramarital affairs. She held him in her arms as he suffered a fatal heart attack on the sidewalk outside the Washington theatre where Sweet Charity  Berkvist, Robert."Gwen Verdon, Redhead Who High-Kicked Her Way to Stardom, Dies at 75,"The New York Times, originally published October 19, 2000, accessed June 4, 2009   was being revived.She was a cat fancier, and had up to six cats at one time, with names such as "Feets Fosse", "Junie Moon", and "Tidbits Tumbler Fosse". Verdon died in her sleep in 2000 of a heart attack at the home of her daughter, Nicole, in Woodstock, Vermont,  at the age of 75. At 8 p.m. on the night she died, all marquee lights on Broadway were dimmed in a tribute to the actress.  She was cremated.
Work 
 
Filmography

The King Steps Out (1936)
The Blonde from Brooklyn (1945)
On the Riviera (1951)
David and Bathsheba (1951)
Meet Me After the Show (1951)
Dreamboat (1952)
The I Don't Care Girl (1953)
The Mississippi Gambler (1953)
The Farmer Takes a Wife (1953)
Gentlemen Marry Brunettes (1955) (scenes deleted)
Damn Yankees (1958)
Sgt. Pepper's Lonely Hearts Club Band (1978) (Cameo)
Creepshow (1982) (voice only)
Legs (1983)
The Cotton Club (1984)
Sanford Meisner: The American Theatre's Best Kept Secret (1985)
Cocoon (1985)
Nadine (1987)
Cocoon: The Return (1988)
Marvin's Room (1996)
In Cold Blood (TV) (1996)
 
Stage

The Red Mill (1940) (Los Angeles Civic Light Opera)
Bonanza Bound (1947) (closed on the road)
Alive and Kicking (1950) (Broadway)
Can-Can (1953) (Broadway)
Damn Yankees (1955) (Broadway)
New Girl In Town (1957) (Broadway)
Redhead (1959) (Broadway and national tour)
Sweet Charity (1966) (Broadway)
Children! Children! (1972) (Broadway)
Chicago (1975) (Broadway and national tour)
 
References 
External links

 
 

 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT















 
 
 
 
 
	Hans Janmaat
 Johannes Gerardus Hendrikus "Hans" Janmaat (November 3, 1934 – June 9, 2002) was a Dutch politician of the Centre Party (CP) and later his own formed Centre Democrats (CD). He was Parliamentary leader of the Centre Party in the House of Representatives from September 16, 1982 until October 15, 1984 when he was expelled from the party. He later served as Parliamentary leader of the Centre Democrats in the House of Representatives from September 8, 1989 until May 19, 1998 when his party lost all its seats. Although he was widely known, he was never a major force in the Dutch political landscape,    partly because of a cordon sanitaire imposed by the Third Lubbers cabinet.
Biography
Early lifeJohannes Gerardus Hendrikus Janmaat was born on November 3, 1934 in Nes aan de Amstel in North Holland, as the oldest of nine children in a traditional Roman Catholic family.  His father was a salesman and insurance broker. When Janmaat was 4 years old, the family moved to Gouda, where it would endure the war years in relative peace. 
After graduating in 1954, Janmaat started a study in aeronautical engineering, but had to drop out two years later after his father could no longer afford the tuition fees.  Having to give up his studies to work was the first of many setbacks he would often refer to later in life. In 1966 he married Belgian Evi Hock, having met her while working in Germany.  In 1979, they divorced. In 1996, Janmaat married Wil Schuurman. No children were born in either marriage. In the early 1960s, Janmaat ran a furniture factory with two of his brothers, but it burned down in 1966. He used the insurance payout to study politicology at the University of Amsterdam.  Fellow-students found him ambitious, provocative and witty.  In 1969, he participated in the occupation of the Maagdenhuis, the university's administrative center, as part of a student protest.  He completed his studies in 1972.
PoliticsAfter graduating, Janmaat held part-time positions as a teacher of civics. He also ran a one-man consultancy for small businesses.In 1972, he joined the Catholic People's Party (KVP).  He also worked in several commissions for the Democratic Socialists '70 (DS'70) party. Despite his efforts, he was not considered suitable for a front line position because of his capriciousness and tendency to go against the grain. In the 1970s, he became more interested in the emerging issue of immigration as large numbers of foreign workers came to the Netherlands. His increasingly radical stance lead to a break with the KVP as well as DS'70. In 1980, he read an article in Vrij Nederland which drew his attention to the recently founded extreme-right Centre Party (CP). After several interviews, he joined the party as its seventh member.  Starting as a publicity worker, he would rapidly rise to be the party's top and was its lijsttrekker (top candidate) for the 1982 elections. The party won a single seat in the House of Representatives, which went to Janmaat.  Other political parties largely ignored and ostracized him. 
Centre DemocratsAfter disagreements and a power struggle with other members of the Centrum Party, he was expelled from the CP in October 1984. However, he retained his seat in parliament, in accordance with Dutch law. Janmaat officially launched his own party, the Centre Democrats (CD) in November 1984.  Politically, the party did not differ greatly from the CP, except that it was strongly centered around Janmaat, to prevent another power struggle.  Several attempts were made to reconcile the differences between CP and CD. One such meeting in a hotel in Kedichem was disrupted by left-wing activists, who set fire to the building. Janmaat narrowly escaped with his life, CD secretary (and later wife of Janmaat) Wil Schuurman lost a leg because of injuries sustained jumping out of a window to escape the fire. In the 1986 election, Janmaat lost his seat in parliament, however he regained his single seat in 1989.His biggest political success would be in the 1994 elections, when he gained three seats.  Major political parties changed their response to Janmaat and his views: rather than actively ignoring him they also started openly addressing the issue of immigration.   In the 1998 election the CD lost all three of its seats. Janmaat had become increasingly paranoid and said that computers used for voting had been tampered with.      In 1999, Janmaat was in the process of starting another party, the Conservative Democrats,  however it did not get off the ground and did not participate in the 2002 election. His failing health forced him to withdraw from politics, however the changing political climate did prompt him to challenge his conviction for discrimination at the European Court of Justice. Janmaat's death in 2002 halted the case.
Political viewsJanmaat wanted to represent the indigenous Dutch workers and middle class. His views were based mostly on economic and materialistic arguments rather than an underlying ideology.  Disappointing economic growth, unemployment and government cutbacks could not be addressed while large numbers of immigrants were flowing in to the country.  Janmaat was against a multicultural society: immigrants should either assimilate into Dutch culture, or return to their country of birth. 
His best known slogans were "Holland is not a country of immigration," "full=full" and "we will abolish the multicultural society, as soon as we get the chance and power"; he was convicted for the latter two statements. According to Jan van de Beek, Hans Janmaat often used economic arguments in his tirades against immigrants. He often walked a fine line between freedom of speech and hate speech, and would eventually receive fines and a conditional prison sentence for incitement to hatred and discrimination against foreigners.    Widely considered uncharismatic, he occasionally made rude statements about immigrants and other politicians. He argued that Ernst Hirsch Ballin should not be allowed to hold a high office because of his Jewish heritage     and said he was not saddened by the sudden death of political opponent Ien Dales. 
LegacyOther parties erected a cordon sanitaire around Janmaat, ignoring him while he spoke in parliament.  A taboo on discussing negative aspects of immigration existed in the Dutch political climate in the 1980s. Meindert Fennema, professor of political theory of ethnic relations at the University of Amsterdam, argued in 2006 that Janmaat was convicted for statements that are now commonplace   due to changes in the political climate (caused in part by the September 11 attacks, and the assassinations of Pim Fortuyn and Theo van Gogh). 
References 
External links

  Drs. J.G.H. (Hans) Janmaat  (Parlement & Politiek) 

  DEFAULTSORT












 
 
	Peter the Aleut
 
Cungagnaq (date of birth unknown - d. 1815) is venerated as a martyr and saint (as Peter the Aleut) by some jurisdictions of the Eastern Orthodox Church.  He was allegedly a native of Kodiak Island (Aleutian Islands), and is said to have received the Christian name of Peter when he was baptized into the Orthodox faith by the monks of St. Herman's missionaries operating in the north. All Saints of North America, an Orthodox Church in Virginia, USA   He is purported to have been captured by Spanish soldiers near San Pedro (Pacifica, California) and tortured and killed at the instigation of Roman Catholic priests either there or at Mission Dolores,  in San Francisco. Saint Peter the Aleut, Oct 22 1999, University of Michigan   At the time identified for his death, California was Spanish territory, and Spain was worried about Russian advances southwards from Alaska.  Hubert Howe Bancroft, in his multi-volume History of California, only notes that, in connection with an incident wherein a Russian fur-hunting expedition was taken into custody after declining to leave San Pedro; one Russian source accused "the Spaniards of cruelty to the captives, stating that according to Kuskof’s  report one Aleut who refused to become a Catholic died from ill-treatment received from the padre at San Francisco."
MartyrdomAccording to the most fully developed version of the story, in 1815 a group of Russian employees of the Russian American Company and their Aleut seal and otter hunters, including Peter, was captured by Spanish soldiers, while hunting illicitly for seals near San Pedro.  According to the original account, the soldiers took them to Misión San Pedro y Pablo for interrogation. One Russian source states that after being taken prisoner near modern Los Angeles, the captives were taken to Mission Dolores—that is, modern San Francisco.  With threats of torture, the Roman Catholic priests attempted to force the Aleuts to deny their Orthodox faith and to convert to Roman Catholicism. When the Aleuts refused, the priest had a toe severed from each of Peter's feet. Peter still refused to renounce his faith and the Spanish priest ordered a group of Native Americans, indigenous to California, to cut off each finger of Peter's hands, one joint at a time, finally removing both his hands.  They eventually disemboweled him, making him a martyr to the Eastern Orthodox faith.  They were about to torture the next Aleut when orders were received to release them.
HistoricityAn account of the martyrdom of Peter the Aleut is contained in a lengthy letter written on Nov. 22, 1865, by Symeon Ivanovich Yanovsky to Damascene, abbot of the Valaam Monastery in Finland.   Yanovsky (1789–1876), who is also one of the chief sources of information about St. Herman of Alaska, was chief manager of the Russian colonies from 1818-1820. In the letter he was reporting on an incident that he had heard from a supposed eyewitness, and that had taken place in 1815, that is, a half a century earlier.  The letter contains the description of Peter being tortured by "Jesuits": the Jesuit order had been suppressed in 1773, and had only been reconstituted in 1814. needs reference  There were in 1815 no Jesuits within a thousand miles of California.  There were Franciscans in California at the time. Yanovsky adds, "At the time I reported all this to the Head Office in St. Petersburg." And indeed, this earlier communication, his official dispatch to the company's main office—dated Feb. 15, 1820, five years after the event—also relates the story of St. Peter's martyrdom, albeit with different details. 
VenerationAccording to Yanovsky's 1865 letter, upon receiving the report of Peter's death, St. Herman back on Kodiak Island was moved to cry out, "Holy new-martyr Peter, pray to God for us!" Peter the Aleut was glorified as a saint by the Russian Orthodox Church Outside Russia and locally glorified by the Diocese of Alaska of the Orthodox Church in America as the "Martyr of San Francisco" in 1980.  His feast day is celebrated on September 24.There are a number of churches dedicated to him in North America, for example at Lake Havasu City, Arizona;  Minot, North Dakota;  Calgary;  and Abita Springs, Louisiana. 
Notes 
Sources

Bancroft, Hubert Howe, History of California 1801-1824 vol II (History Company, 1886).
Farris, Glenn, "The Strange Tale of Saint Peter, the Aleut: A Russian Orthodox Martyr on the California Frontier".   Paper presented at "The Spanish Missions and California Indians Symposium," D-Q University, 3 March 1990.
Ogden, Adele, The California Sea Otter Trade 1784-1848 (Berkeley: University of California Publications in History, 26).
The Russian Orthodox Religious Mission in America, 1794–1837, with Materials Concerning the Life and Works of the Monk German, and Ethnographic Notes by the Hieromonk Gedeon. Originally published in St. Petersburg, Russia in 1894. Translated from the Russian by Colin Bearne; ed. by Richard A. Pierce (Kingston, Ont., Canada: Limestone Press, 1978).
Tarakanoff, Vassili Petrovitch, Statement of My Captivity Among the Californians (Los Angeles: Glen Dawson Press, 1953).
Tikhmenev, P.A, A History of the Russian-American Company.  Translated and edited by Richard Pierce and Alton Donnelly (Seattle: Univ. of Washington Press, 1978).


External links

Full text of Yanofsky's account of the martyrdom of Peter (Orthodox Church in America website)

 
DEFAULTSORT



















 
 
 
 
	Richard Whittington
 
 

Richard Whittington (c. 1354–1423) was a medieval merchant and politician, and the real-life inspiration for the pantomime character Dick Whittington. He was four times Lord Mayor of London, a Member of Parliament and a sheriff of London. In his lifetime he financed a number of public projects, such as drainage systems in poor areas of medieval London, and a hospital ward for unmarried mothers. He bequeathed his fortune to form the Charity of Sir Richard Whittington which, nearly 600 years later, continues to assist people in need.  Despite knowing three of the five kings who reigned during his lifetime, there is no evidence that he was knighted.
BiographyHe was born in Gloucestershire, at Pauntley in the Forest of Dean,  although his family originated from Kinver in Staffordshire, England, where his grandfather Sir William de Whittington was a knight at arms.  His date of birth is variously given as in the 1350s and he died in London in 1423. However, he was a younger son and so would not inherit his father's estate as the eldest son might expect to do. Consequently he was sent to the City of London to learn the trade of mercer. He became a successful trader, dealing in valuable imports such as silks and velvets, both luxury fabrics, much of which he sold to the Royal and noble court from about 1388. There is indirect evidence that he was also a major exporter to Europe of much sought after English woollen cloth such as Broadcloth. From 1392 to 1394 he sold goods to Richard II worth £3,500 (equivalent to more than £1.5m today). About Us Measuring Worth Calculator  He also began money-lending in 1388, preferring this to outward shows of wealth such as buying property. By 1397 he was also lending large sums of money to the King.   In 1384 Whittington had become a Councilman. In 1392 he was one of the city's delegation to the King at Nottingham at which the King seized the City of London's lands because of alleged misgovernment. By 1393, he had become an alderman and was appointed Sheriff by the incumbent mayor, William Staundone,  as well as becoming a member of the Mercers' Company. When Adam Bamme, the mayor of London, died in June 1397, Whittington was imposed on the city by the King as Lord Mayor of London two days later to fill the vacancy with immediate effect. Within days Whittington had negotiated with the King a deal in which the city bought back its liberties for £10,000 (nearly £4m today).   He was elected mayor by a grateful populace on 13 October 1397.   The deposition of Richard II in 1399 did not affect Whittington and it is thought that he merely acquiesced in the coup led by Bolingbroke.  Whittington had long supplied the new king, Henry IV, as a prominent member of the landowning elite and so his business simply continued as before. He also lent the new king substantial amounts of money. He was elected mayor again in 1406—during 1407 he was simultaneously Mayor in both London and Calais —and in 1419.  In 1416, he became a Member of Parliament, and was also in turn influential with Henry IV's son, Henry V, also lending him large amounts of money and serving on several Royal Commissions of oyer and terminer. For example, Henry V employed him to supervise the expenditure to complete Westminster Abbey. Despite being a moneylender himself he was sufficiently trusted and respected to sit as a judge in usury trials in 1421.  Whittington also collected revenues and import duties. A long dispute with the Company of Brewers over standard prices and measures of ale was won by Whittington. 
BenefactionsIn his lifetime Whittington donated much of his profit to the city and left further endowments by his Will. He financed: 

the rebuilding of the Guildhall
a ward for unmarried mothers at St Thomas' Hospital
drainage systems for areas around Billingsgate and Cripplegate
the rebuilding of his parish church, St Michael Paternoster Royal
a public toilet in the parish of St Martin Vintry that was cleansed by the River Thames at high tide
most of Greyfriars library

He also provided accommodation for his apprentices in his own house. He passed a law prohibiting the washing of animal skins by apprentices in the River Thames in cold, wet weather because many young boys had died through hypothermia or in the strong river currents.
Death and bequestsWhittington died in March 1423. In 1402 (aged 52) he had married Alice, daughter of Sir Ivo FitzWarin (or Fitzwarren) of Wantage in Berkshire (now Oxfordshire), but she predeceased him in 1411. They had no children. He was buried in the church of St Michael Paternoster Royal, to which he had donated large sums during his lifetime. The tomb is now lost, and the mummified cat found in the church tower in 1949 during a search for its location probably dates to the time of the Wren restoration.  In the absence of heirs, Whittington left £7,000 in his will to charity, in those days a large sum, with a modern-day equivalence of about £3m.  Some of this was used to 

rebuild Newgate Prison and Newgate and accommodation in it for the Sheriffs and Recorder which is the forerunner of that in the Old Bailey
build the first library in Guildhall (the ancestor of the modern Guildhall Library)
repair St Bartholomew's Hospital
the creation of his 'college' i.e. almshouse and hospital originally at St Michael's
install some of the first public drinking fountains
The almshouses were relocated in 1966 to Felbridge near East Grinstead. Sixty elderly women and a few married couples currently live in them. The Whittington Charity also disburses money each year to the needy through the Mercers' Company. The Whittington hospital is now at Archway in the London Borough of Islington and a small statue of a cat along Highgate Hill further commemorates his legendary feline.
Dick Whittington—stage character 

The gifts left in Whittington's will made him well known and he became a character in an English story that was adapted for the stage as a play, The History of Richard Whittington, of his lowe byrth, his great fortune, in February 1604.  In the 19th century this became popular as a pantomime called Dick Whittington and His Cat,   very loosely based on Richard Whittington. There are several versions of the traditional story, which tells how Dick, a boy from a poor Gloucestershire family, sets out for London to make his fortune, accompanied by, or later acquiring, his cat. At first he meets with little success, and is tempted to return home. However, on his way out of the city, whilst climbing Highgate Hill from modern-day Archway, he hears the Bow Bells of London ringing, and believes they are sending him a message.  There is now a large hospital on Highgate Hill, named the Whittington Hospital, after this supposed episode.  A traditional rhyme  associated with this tale is:

Turn again, Whittington,
Once Lord Mayor of London!
Turn again, Whittington,
Twice Lord Mayor of London!
Turn again, Whittington,
Thrice Lord Mayor of London!

On returning to London, Dick embarks on a series of adventures. In one version of the tale, he travels abroad on a ship, and wins many friends as a result of the rat-catching activities of his cat; in another he sends his cat and it is sold to make his fortune. Eventually he does become prosperous, marries his master's daughter Alice Fitzwarren (the name of the real Whittington's wife), and is made Lord Mayor of London three times. The common belief that he served three rather than four times as Lord Mayor stems from the City's records 'Liber  Albus' compiled at his request by the City Clerk John Carpenter wherein his name appears only three times as the remainder term of his deceased predecessor Adam Bamme and his own consequent term immediately afterwards appear as one entry for 1397.As the son of gentry Whittington was never very poor and there is no evidence that he kept a cat. Whittington may have become associated with a thirteenth-century Persian folktale about an orphan who gained a fortune through his cat,  but the tale was common throughout Europe at that time.  Folklorists have suggested that the most popular legends about Whittington—that his fortunes were founded on the sale of his cat, who was sent on a merchant vessel to a rat-beset Eastern emperor—originated in a popular 17th-century engraving  by Renold Elstracke in which his hand rested on a cat, but the picture only reflects a story already in wide circulation.  Elstracke's  oddly-shaped cat was in fact a later replacement by printseller Peter Stent for what had been a skull in the original, with the change being made to conform to the story already in existence, in order to increase sales. 
Notes 
References

The History of Sir Richard Whittington by T. H. (1885), from Project Gutenberg
Dick Whittington and His Cat


External links

Nine part radio play from BBC Radio Gloucestershire
The History of Whittington, as collected by Andrew Lang in The Blue Fairy Book (1889)
Dick Whittington and His Cat.  London: Jarrold, 1900
"Who Was Dick Whittington?" Museum of London 17 December 2006  (Free educational program: Storytelling)Event details
Dick Whittington and His Cat as retold by Rohini Chowdhury

 
DEFAULTSORT
 



















 
 
 
 
 
 
	Bob Dole
 
 Robert Joseph "Bob" Dole (born July 22, 1923) is an American politician who represented Kansas in the United States Senate from 1969 to 1996 and the House of Representatives from 1961 to 1969. In the 1976 presidential election he was the Republican Party nominee for Vice President and incumbent President Gerald Ford's running mate. In the presidential election of 1996 he was the Republican nominee for President against incumbent Bill Clinton. Dole is the only politician to have been his party's nominee for both President and Vice President, but elected to neither office.In 2007, President George W. Bush appointed Dole as a co-chair of the commission to investigate problems at Walter Reed Army Medical Center, along with Donna Shalala, a former member of the Clinton cabinet.    Bob Dole is currently a member of the advisory council of the Victims of Communism Memorial Foundation and special counsel at the Washington, D.C. office of law firm Alston & Bird. Dole is married to former U.S. cabinet member and former U.S. Senator Elizabeth Hanford Dole of North Carolina. 
Early yearsDole was born in Russell, Kansas, the son of Bina M. (née Talbott; 1904–1983) and Doran Ray Dole (1901–1975).  His father, who had moved the family to Russell while Dole was still a toddler, made a living by running a small creamery. Among his father's customers was the father of Arlen Specter who ran a junkyard in the town and used Dole's scales to weigh junk. Specter, who was six years younger than Dole and graduated Russell High School in 1947, was not a Dole contemporary although Specter's brother Morton Specter and Dole's brother Kenny Dole were friends.  During the Great Depression, which hit Kansas very hard, the Dole family moved into the basement of their home and rented out the rest of the house. As a boy, he took many odd jobs around Russell, and he would later work as a soda jerk in the local drug store.Dole graduated from Russell High School in the spring of 1941  and enrolled at the University of Kansas the following fall. Dole had been a star high school athlete in Russell, and influential Kansas basketball coach Phog Allen traveled to Russell to recruit him to play for the basketball team. While at KU, Dole played for the basketball team, the track team, and the football team. In football, Dole played at the end position, earning varsity letters in 1942 and 1944. While in college, he joined the Kappa Sigma fraternity, where he later became one of the "Men of the Year". Dole's pre-med studies at KU were interrupted by World War II. After the war, he returned to being a law student. Dole attended the University of Arizona from 1948 to 1951 and earned his degree from Washburn University School of Law in 1952. Dole was initiated as a Freemason of Russell Lodge No. 177, Russell, Kansas on April 19, 1955.  Dole grew up in a house at 1035 North Maple in Russell ( ) and it remained his official residence throughout his political career. 
World War II and recoveryIn 1942, Dole joined the United States Army's Enlisted Reserve Corps to fight in World War II. Dole became a second lieutenant in the Army's 10th Mountain Division.
In April 1945, while engaged in combat near Castel d'Aiano in the Apennine mountains southwest of Bologna, Italy, Dole was hit by German machine gun fire in his upper right back and his right arm was also badly injured. As Lee Sandlin describes, when fellow soldiers saw the extent of his injuries all they thought they could do was to "give him the largest dose of morphine they dared and write an 'M' for 'morphine' on his forehead in his own blood, so that nobody else who found him would give him a second, fatal dose."  Dole had to wait nine hours on the battlefield before being taken to the 15th Evacuation Hospital, where he began a recovery that would take until 1948 at Percy Jones Army Hospital in Battle Creek, Michigan (where Dole met future fellow politicians Daniel Inouye and Philip Hart). His right arm was paralyzed; Dole often carried a pen in his right hand to signal that he could not shake hands with that arm.The hospital where Dole recovered from his wounds, the former Battle Creek Sanitarium, is now named Hart-Dole-Inouye Federal Center in honor of three patients who became United States Senators: Dole, Philip Hart and Daniel Inouye.Dole was decorated three times, receiving two Purple Hearts for his injuries, and the Bronze Star with combat "V" for valor for his attempt to assist a downed radio man.
Political careerDole ran for office for the first time in 1950 and was elected to the Kansas House of Representatives, serving a two-year term.  After graduating from law school at Washburn University in Topeka, he was admitted to the bar and commenced the practice of law in his hometown of Russell in 1952.Also in 1952 Dole became the County Attorney of Russell County, serving in that position for eight years. In 1960, Dole was elected to the United States House of Representatives from Kansas' 6th Congressional District, located in central Kansas. In 1962, his district was merged with the 3rd District in western Kansas to form the 1st Congressional District, a huge 60-county district that soon became known as the "Big First." Dole was re-elected that year and twice thereafter without serious difficulty.
U.S. Senate

In 1968, Dole defeated Kansas Governor William H. Avery for the Republican nomination for the United States Senate to succeed retiring Senator Frank Carlson, subsequently being elected. Dole was re-elected in 1974, 1980, 1986, and 1992, before resigning on June 11, 1996 to focus on his Presidential campaign. Dole only faced one truly enthusiastic and well-financed challenger – in 1974 by Congressman Bill Roy. Much of Roy's popularity was in response to the fallout from Watergate. Dole would win re-election in 1974 by only a few thousand votes, having in the end graphically painted Roy as pro-abortion. While in the Senate, Dole served as chairman of the Republican National Committee from 1971 until 1973, the ranking Republican on the Agriculture Committee from 1975 to 1978, and the ranking Republican on the Finance Committee from 1979 to 1980.When the Republicans took control of the Senate after the 1980 elections, Dole became chairman of the Finance Committee in 1981, serving until 1985. From 1985, when Howard Baker of Tennessee retired, until his resignation from the Senate, Dole was the leader of the Senate Republicans, serving as Majority Leader from 1985 until 1987 and again from 1995 to 1996. Dole served as Minority Leader from 1987 to 1995. Following the advice of conservative William Kristol, Dole flatly rejected the health care plan of Bill Clinton, remarking, "There is no crisis in health care."Dole had a moderate voting record and was widely considered to be one of the few Kansas Republicans who could bridge the gap between the moderate and conservative wings of the Kansas Republican Party. As a Congressman in the early '60s, he supported the major civil rights bills, which appealed to moderates. When Johnson proposed the Great Society in 1964–65, Dole voted against some War on Poverty measures like public-housing subsidies and Medicare, thus appealing to conservatives. Dole's first speech in the Senate in 1969 was a plea for federal aid for the handicapped. Later, as a member of the Senate Select Committee on Nutrition and Human Needs Dole joined liberal Senator George McGovern to lower eligibility requirements for federal food stamps, a liberal goal that was supported by Kansas farmers.Dole's hawkishness on the Vietnam War and on crime issues kept him in good standing with the right wing. When they heard Nixon might make Dole chairman of the Republican National Committee, half the Republican Senators protested, especially moderates who feared Dole would direct party assets to conservatives. They were wrong, as Dole in fact offered something to all Republican factions. 
Presidential politics
In 1976, Dole ran unsuccessfully for Vice President on a ticket headed by President Gerald Ford. Incumbent Vice President Nelson Rockefeller had withdrawn from consideration the previous fall, and Dole was chosen. Dole stated during the Vice Presidential debate with Walter Mondale, "I figured it up the other day: If we added up the killed and wounded in Democrat wars in this century, it would be about 1.6 million Americans — enough to fill the city of Detroit".  The remark backfired.Dole ran for the 1980 Republican Presidential nomination, eventually won by Ronald Reagan. Despite Dole's fame from the '76 campaign, he was viewed as a lower tier candidate, trailing not only Reagan but George Bush, Howard Baker, John Connally, and John Anderson. Dole received only 597 votes (less than 1%) in the New Hampshire primary and immediately withdrew.  In March 1980, Dole urged former President Ford to jump into the race as a stop-Reagan candidate.Dole made a more serious bid in 1988, formally announcing his candidacy in Russell, Kansas, on November 9, 1987. At the ceremony, Dole was presented with the cigar box that had been used to collect donations for his war-related medical expenses. The box contained $100,000 in campaign donations. Dole started out strong by solidly defeating then-Vice President George H.W. Bush in the Iowa caucus—Bush finished third, behind television evangelist Pat Robertson. However, Bush recovered in time to defeat Dole in the New Hampshire primary a week later. The New Hampshire contest between the two was particularly bitter although they differed little on the issues. After the returns had come in on the night of that primary, Dole appeared to lose his temper in a television interview. Dole was interviewed live in New Hampshire on NBC by Tom Brokaw, who was in the NBC studio in New York. It happened that Bush was right next to Brokaw in the studio. Brokaw asked Bush if he had anything to say to Dole. Bush responded, "No, just wish him well and meet again in the south." Dole, apparently not expecting to see Bush, when asked the same question about the Vice President said, "Yeah, stop lying about my record", largely in response to a very tough New Hampshire Bush commercial which accused Dole of "straddling" on taxes. This remark prompted some members of the media to perceive him as angry about the loss, contributing to his "hatchet man" image earned during his tenure as RNC chairman and the '76 campaign.Despite two big wins in South Dakota and Minnesota a week after New Hampshire, Dole was not able to recover. Viewed by many as a micromanager who could not effectively oversee a presidential campaign while serving as a senator , he did not hire a full-time campaign manager, former TN Senator Bill Brock, until the fall of 1987, well after Bush's team had been in place. Despite raising almost as much money as the Bush campaign, the Dole campaign spent its money faster and was vastly outspent in the contests held after IA, NH, MN, and SD. Despite a key endorsement by Senator Strom Thurmond, one of many Republican senators who supported their leader, Dole was defeated by Bush again in South Carolina in early March. Several days later, every southern state voted for Bush in a "Super Tuesday" sweep. Another big victory in Illinois persuaded Dole to withdraw from the race.
1996 presidential campaign
 
Dole was the early front runner for the GOP nomination in the 1996 presidential race. He was expected to win the nomination against underdog candidates such as the more conservative Senator Phil Gramm of Texas and more moderate Senator Arlen Specter of Pennsylvania. However populist Pat Buchanan upset Dole in the early New Hampshire primary, with Dole finishing second and former Tennessee governor Lamar Alexander finishing third. Publisher Steve Forbes also ran and broadcast a stream of negative ads. At least eight candidates ran for the nomination.Dole eventually won the nomination, becoming the oldest first-time presidential nominee at the age of 73 years, 1-month (Ronald Reagan was 73 years, 6 months in 1984, for his second presidential nomination). In his acceptance speech, he stated "Let me be the bridge to an America that only the unknowing call myth. Let me be the bridge to a time of tranquillity, faith, and confidence in action",  to which incumbent president and Democratic nominee Bill Clinton responded, "We do not need to build a bridge to the past, we need to build a bridge to the future.".  Dole however had been forced to spend more on the primary than he had planned and until the convention in San Diego faced federal limits on campaign spending. Dole hoped to use his long experience in Senate procedures to maximize publicity from his rare positioning as Senate Majority Leader against an incumbent President but was stymied by Senate Democrats. On June 11, 1996, Dole resigned his seat to focus on the campaign, saying he was either heading for "The White House or home". The incumbent, Bill Clinton, had no serious primary opposition. Dole promised a 15% across-the-board reduction in income tax rates and made former Congressman and supply side advocate Jack Kemp his running mate. Dole also found himself criticized from both the left and the right within the Republican Party over the convention platform, one of the major issues being the inclusion of the Human Life Amendment. Bill Clinton framed the narrative against Dole early, painting him as a mere clone of unpopular then-House Speaker Newt Gingrich, warning America that Dole would work in concert with the Republican Congress to slash popular social programs, like Medicare and Social Security, dubbed by Clinton as "Dole-Gingrich".  Dole's tax-cut plan found itself under attack from the White House, who said it would "blow a hole in the deficit" which had been cut nearly in half during his opponent's term.  Dole was defeated, as pundits had long expected, by Bill Clinton in the 1996 election. Clinton won in a 379–159 Electoral College landslide, capturing 49.2% of the vote against Dole's 40.7% and Ross Perot's 8.4% who drew equally from both candidates. Dole is the only person in the history of the two major U.S. political parties to have been his party's nominee for both President and Vice President, but who was never elected to either office.The span of 20 years between his participation in the 1976 vice-presidential debate and the 1996 presidential debates, is the longest for any candidate since televised debates in presidential election years were instituted in 1960.
Retirement
Dole has worked part-time for a Washington, D.C. law firm, and engaged in a career of writing, consulting, public speaking, and television appearances. This has included becoming a television commercial spokesman for such products as Viagra, Visa, Dunkin' Donuts and Pepsi-Cola (with Britney Spears), and as an occasional political commentator on the popular American interview program Larry King Live and has guested a number of times on Comedy Central's satirical news program, The Daily Show with Jon Stewart. Dole was, for a short time, a commentator opposite Bill Clinton on CBS's 60 Minutes. Dole guest-starred as himself on NBC's Brooke Shields sitcom Suddenly Susan in January 1997 (shortly after losing the presidential election). On the Larry King show Dole had a heated exchange with Democratic presidential primary candidate Wesley Clark in which Dole correctly predicted that Clark would lose the New Hampshire primary and other primaries. In 2001, Dole, at age 77, was treated successfully for an abdominal aortic aneurysm by vascular surgeon Kenneth Ouriel. Dr. Ouriel said Dole "maintained his sense of humor throughout his care."   The Robert J. Dole Institute of Politics, housed on the University of Kansas campus in Lawrence, Kansas, was established to bring bipartisanship back to politics. The Institute, which opened in July 2003 to coincide with Dole's 80th birthday, has featured such notables as former President Bill Clinton and former New York City Mayor Rudy Giuliani.Dole has written several books, including one on jokes told by the Presidents of the United States, in which he ranks the presidents according to their level of humor. On January 18, 1989, Dole was presented with the Presidential Citizens Medal by President Reagan. Then, on January 17, 1997, President Clinton awarded him the Presidential Medal of Freedom for his service in the military and his political career. Dole received the American Patriot Award in 2004 for his lifelong dedication to America and his service in World War II.Dole's legacy also includes a commitment to combating hunger both in the United States and around the globe. In addition to numerous domestic programs, along with former Senator George McGovern (D-South Dakota), Dole created an international school lunch program through the George McGovern-Robert Dole International Food for Education and Child Nutrition Program, which helps fight child hunger and poverty by providing nutritious meals to children in schools in developing countries. This program has since led to greatly increased global interest in and support for school-feeding programs — which benefit girls and young women, in particular — and won McGovern and Dole the 2008 World Food Prize.In recent years, Dole has struggled with health problems. In December 2004, he had a hip-replacement operation, which required him to receive blood thinners. One month after the surgery it was determined that Dole was bleeding inside his head. He spent 40 days at Walter Reed, and upon release his "good" arm, the left, was of limited use. Dole told a reporter that he needed help to handle the simplest of tasks, since both of his arms are injured. Dole undergoes physical therapy for his left shoulder once a week, but doctors have told him that he might not regain total use of his left arm. In 2009, he was hospitalized for an elevated heart rate and sores on his leg for which he underwent a successful skin graft procedure. In February 2010, he was hospitalized for pneumonia after undergoing knee surgery. He spent 10 months at Walter Reed, recovering from the surgery and experienced 3 bouts with pneumonia. Dole was released from the hospital in November 2010. However, in January 2011, Dole was readmitted to Walter Reed Hospital and spent about six days there, being treated for a fever as well as a minor infection.Dole is special counsel at the Washington, D.C., law firm of Alston & Bird. On April 12, 2005, Dole released his autobiography One Soldier's Story: A Memoir (ISBN 0-06-076341-8), which talks of his World War II experiences and his battle to survive his war injuries. Dole also was responsible for a large amount of funds raised for the U.S. National World War II memorial in Washington, D.C.On June 28, 2004, Dole was named 'Shining Star of Perseverance' by the Assurant Employee Benefits WillReturn Council. On September 18, 2004, Dole offered the inaugural lecture to dedicate the University of Arkansas Clinton School of Public Service at which Dole chronicled his life as a public servant as well as discussed the importance of public service in terms of defense, civil rights, the economy, and in daily life. In 2007, Dole joined fellow former Senate Majority Leaders Howard Baker, Tom Daschle, and George Mitchell to found the Bipartisan Policy Center, a non-profit think tank that works to develop policies suitable for bipartisan support. That same year, President George W. Bush appointed Dole and Donna Shalala co-chairs of a commission to investigate problems at Walter Reed Army Medical Center. Dole appears in the 2008 documentary on Lee Atwater, Boogie Man: The Lee Atwater Story. In the film, Dole says, "I don't comment on Atwater." Additionally, "This isn't politics, this is garbage."On January 26, 2012, Dole issued a letter critical of Newt Gingrich, focusing on Dole's and Gingrich's time working together on Capitol Hill.   The letter was issued immediately before the Florida primary.  Bob Dole endorsed Mitt Romney for the Republican nomination. 
Personal life
Dole married Phyllis Holden, an occupational therapist at a veterans hospital, in Battle Creek, Michigan in 1948. Their daughter, Robin, was born in 1954. Dole and Holden divorced in 1972. Holden died on April 22, 2008.In 1975 Dole was elevated to the 33rd˚of the Fraternal Order of Freemasonry to which he is a member.  In that same year he married former Senator Elizabeth Dole, née Hanford, of North Carolina. Mrs. Dole ran unsuccessfully for the Republican Presidential nomination in 2000 and was elected to the United States Senate in 2002, to succeed the retiring Republican Jesse Helms. However, she lost her seat in 2008, a heavily Democratic year, to Kay Hagan.
Electoral history 
See also

Kemp Commission
Notable Freemasons
 
Notes 
References

 
Dole, Bob: One Soldier's Story: A Memoir. (2005). HarperCollins. ISBN 0-06-076341-8.
James W. Ceaser and Andrew E. Busch: Losing to Win: The 1996 Elections and American Politics. (1997). Rowman & Littlefield.
Clinton, Bill: My Life. (2005). ISBN 1-4000-3003-X.
Robert E. Denton Jr.: The 1996 Presidential Campaign: A Communication Perspective. (1998). Praeger Publishers.
Elovitz, Paul: "Work, Laughter and Tears: Bob Dole's Childhood, War Injury, the Conservative Republicans and the 1996 Election". Journal of Psychohistory (1996) 24(2): 147–162.  .
Joshua Wolf Shenk: "The Best and Worst of Bob Dole", Washington Monthly, Vol. 28, July 1996 online
Kerry Tymchuk, Molly Meijer Wertheimer, Nichola D. Gutgold: Elizabeth Hanford Dole: Speaking from the Heart. (2004). Praeger.
Bob Dole discussing Lee Atwater in the film [[Boogie Man: The Lee Atwater Story]]


External links 
 
 

DOLE, Robert Joseph, (1923 – )
His official website
His remarks at the dedication of the Dole Institute of Politics at the University of Kansas
His memorial to Ronald Reagan after Reagan's death (registration required)
The Robert J. Dole Institute of Politics
His biography on Alston & Bird's website
CNN AllPolitics review of his early life
Remarks at the Presentation Ceremony for the Presidential Citizens Medal – January 18, 1989
 
Booknotes interview with Dole on Historical Almanac of the United States Senate, September 9, 1990.
C-Span interviews with Bob Dole

 
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
 
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
DEFAULTSORT





































 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Primož Trubar
 

Primož Trubar or Primož Truber ( ) (1508 – 28 June 1586)    was the Protestant reformer, most known as the author of the first Slovene language printed book,    the founder and the first superintendent of the Protestant Church of the Slovene Lands, notable for consolidating the Slovene language. Trubar is the key figure of Slovenian cultural history and in many aspects a major historical personality.,    
His life and workTrubar was born in the village Rašica    (now in the Velike Lašče municipality) in the Duchy of Carniola, then under the Habsburgs. In the years 1520–1521 he attended school in Rijeka,  in 1522–1524 he continued his education in Salzburg. From there he went to Trieste under the tutorship of the Roman Catholic bishop Pietro Bonomo, where he got in touch with the Humanist writers, in particular Erasmus of Rotterdam. In 1528 he enrolled at the University of Vienna, but did not complete his studies. In 1530 he returned to the Slovene Lands and became a preacher. He gradually leaned towards Protestantism and was in 1547 expelled from Ljubljana.While a Protestant preacher in Rothenburg, Germany, he wrote first two books in Slovene, Catechismus and Abecedarium, which were published in 1550 in Tübingen, Germany.  In the following years, he authored around 25 more books in Slovenian; the most important of them is the translation of the complete New Testament, which he started while living in Kempten im Allgäu. Trubar died on 28 June 1586 in Derendingen, Germany (now part of the city of Tübingen), where he is also buried.
Commemoration


In 1986, the Slovenian television produced a TV series, directed by Andrej Strojan with the screen play written by Drago Jančar, in which Trubar was played by the Slovenian actor Polde Bibič.Trubar was commemorated on the 10 tolar banknote  in 1992, and on the Slovenian 1 euro coin in 2007. In 2008, the Government of Slovenia proclaimed the Year of Primož Trubar and the 500th anniversary of Trubar's birth was celebrated throughout the country.  A commemorative €2 coin and a postage stamp were issued.    An exhibition dedicated to the life and work of Primož Trubar, and the achievements of the Slovenian Reformation Movement was on display at the National Museum of Slovenia from 6 March to 31 December 2008.In 2009, the Trubar Forum Association printed Trubar's Catechism and Abecedarium in modern Slovene, in a scholarly edition that includes both the Trubar-era Slovene and the modern Slovene translation with scholarly notes. 
The "Sermon on Faith", a portion of the Catechism, is available in modern Slovene, English, German and Esperanto. Since 2010, 8 June is commemorated in Slovenia as the Primož Trubar Day.   
See also

Adam Bohorič
Sebastian Krelj
Jurij Dalmatin
István Küzmics


Notes 
References  
DEFAULTSORT













 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Peter Gabriel
 
 Peter Brian Gabriel (born 13 February 1950) is an English singer, musician, and songwriter who rose to fame as the lead vocalist and flautist of the progressive rock group Genesis.  After leaving Genesis, Gabriel went on to a successful solo career. His 1986 album, So, is his most commercially successful, and the album's biggest hit, "Sledgehammer", won a record nine MTV Awards at the 1987 MTV Video Music Awards, and the song is the most played music video in the history of the station. More recently, Gabriel has focused on producing and promoting world music and pioneering digital distribution methods for music. He has also been involved in various humanitarian efforts. Gabriel has won numerous music awards throughout his career, including three Brit Awards—winning Best British Male in 1987, six Grammy Awards, thirteen MTV Video Music Awards, and in 2007 he was honoured as a BMI Icon at the 57th annual BMI London Awards for his “influence on generations of music makers.”    Gabriel was also awarded the Polar Music Prize in 2009, and was inducted into the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame as a member of Genesis in 2010.
Early lifePeter Gabriel was born in Chobham, Surrey, England.  His father, Ralph Parton Gabriel, was an electrical engineer, and his mother, Edith Irene Allen,  from a musical family, taught him to play the piano at an early age. He attended Cable House, a private primary (pre-prep) school in Woking, Surrey, St. Andrews Prep School in Horsell, then Charterhouse School (Godalming) from 1963. He played drums in his first rock bands, and Mike Rutherford commented in 1985 that "Pete was - and still is, I think - a frustrated drummer." Neer, Dan (1985). Mike on Mike [interview LP], Atlantic Recording Corporation. 
Genesis 
Gabriel founded Genesis in 1967 with fellow Charterhouse School pupils Tony Banks, Anthony Phillips, Mike Rutherford, and drummer Chris Stewart. The name of the band was suggested by fellow Charterhouse  alumnus, the pop music impresario Jonathan King, who produced their first album, From Genesis to Revelation.Gabriel was influenced by many different sources in his way of singing, such as Family lead singer Roger Chapman. In 1970, he played the flute on Cat Stevens' album, Mona Bone Jakon.Genesis drew some attention in England and eventually also in Italy, Belgium, Germany and other European countries, largely due to Gabriel's flamboyant stage presence, which involved numerous bizarre costume changes and comical, dreamlike stories told as the introduction to each song (originally Gabriel developed these stories solely to cover the time between songs that the rest of the band would take tuning their instruments and fixing technical glitches). The concerts made extensive use of black light with the normal stage lighting subdued or off. A backdrop of fluorescent white sheets and a comparatively sparse stage made the band into a set of silhouettes, with Gabriel's fluorescent costume and make-up providing the only other sources of light.
CostumesEarly Genesis concerts were hampered by a bad PA system which made it difficult for audiences to understand what Gabriel was singing. According to Mike Rutherford, this drove Gabriel to find other ways to impress his personality on the audience, leading to his performing in various costumes. In an episode of the 2007 British documentary series Seven Ages of Rock, Steve Hackett recalled the first appearance of Gabriel 'in costume'. It was the dress-wearing, fox-headed entity immortalised on the cover of Foxtrot. Hackett and the rest of the band had no inkling that Gabriel was going to do this, and at the time Hackett worried that it would ruin the performance. However, it was a success, encouraging Gabriel to continue wearing costumes while singing.Among Gabriel's many famous costumes, which he developed to visualise the musical ideas of the band as well as to gain press coverage, were "Batwings" for the band's usual opening number, "Watcher of the Skies". Other costumes included "The Flower" and "Magog", which were both alternately worn for "Supper's Ready" from the album Foxtrot. "Britannia" was worn for "Dancing with the Moonlit Knight", and "The Reverend" was worn for "The Battle of Epping Forest" from Selling England by the Pound. "The Old Man" was worn for "The Musical Box" from Nursery Cryme."The Slipperman" and "Rael" were worn during "The Colony of Slippermen", in which "Rael" was the protagonist of the album The Lamb Lies Down on Broadway.
DepartureGabriel's departure from Genesis in 1975—which stunned fans of the group and left many commentators wondering if the band could survive—was the result of a number of factors. His stature as the lead singer of the band, and the added attention garnered by his flamboyant stage persona, led to tensions within the band. Genesis had always operated more or less as a collective, and Gabriel's burgeoning public profile led to fears within the group that he was being unfairly singled out as the creative hub. The band had also begun to feel confined by the reputation (and fans' expectations) attached to their famously elaborate theatrical performances, believing that the visual element of their performances was receiving more attention than their actual music.Tensions were heightened by the ambitious album and tour of the concept work The Lamb Lies Down on Broadway, a Gabriel-created concept piece which saw him taking on the lion's share of the lyric writing. During the writing and recording of The Lamb Lies Down on Broadway, Gabriel was approached by director William Friedkin, allegedly because Friedkin had found Gabriel's short story in the liner notes to Genesis Live interesting. Gabriel left Genesis to pursue a film project with Friedkin, only to rejoin a week later.  The decision to quit the band was made before the tour supporting The Lamb Lies Down on Broadway, with Gabriel explaining his decision to the band while keeping it from the press until the conclusion of that tour. Bassist Mike Rutherford recalled that they all "could see it coming."  Although tensions were high, both Gabriel and the remaining members of Genesis have stated publicly that Gabriel left the band on good terms.The breaking point came with the difficult pregnancy of Gabriel's wife, Jill, and the subsequent birth of their first child, Anna-Marie. When he opted to stay with his sick daughter and wife, rather than record and tour, the resentment from the rest of the band led Gabriel to conclude that he had to leave the group. "Solsbury Hill", Gabriel's debut single as a solo artist, was written specifically about his departure from Genesis. The song also charted on the Billboard Hot 100 in 1978,  reaching the Top 70, though it was recorded in 1976, and appeared on the 'Car' album in 1977. In 1982, Gabriel reunited with his former Genesis colleagues for the one-off concert Six of the Best, in order to recoup debts that arose from his involvement in the staging of the first WOMAD concert.
Solo careerGabriel refused to title any of his first four solo albums, which were all labelled Peter Gabriel using the same typeface, but which featured different cover designs (by Hipgnosis); in all of these designs, Gabriel's face is wholly or partially obscured in some way. The albums are usually differentiated by number in order of release (I, II, III, IV), or by sleeve design, with the first three solo albums often referred to as Car, Scratch and Melt respectively, in reference to their cover artwork. His fourth solo album, also called Peter Gabriel, was titled Security in the U.S. at the behest of Geffen Records.After acquiescing to distinctive titles, Gabriel used a series of 2-letter words to title his next three albums: So, Us, and Up. His most recent greatest hits compilation is titled Hit; within the two-CD package, disc one is labelled "Hit" and disc two is labelled "Miss".
Peter Gabriel albums (1977–1985)Gabriel recorded his first self-titled solo album in 1976 and 1977 with producer Bob Ezrin. His first solo success came with the single "Solsbury Hill", an autobiographical piece expressing his thoughts on leaving Genesis. Although mainly happy with the music, Gabriel felt that the album, and especially the track "Here Comes the Flood" was over-produced. Sparser versions can be heard on Robert Fripp's Exposure, and on Gabriel's greatest hits compilation Shaking the Tree (1990).Gabriel worked with guitarist Fripp as producer of his second solo LP, in 1978. This album was leaner, darker and more experimental, and yielded decent reviews, but no major hits.Gabriel developed a new interest in world music (especially percussion), and for bold production, which made extensive use of recording tricks and sound effects. Gabriel's interest in music technology is considered by many people to be the spark of his success as it inspired his third album. The third album is often credited as the first LP to use the now-famous "gated drum" sound.  Phil Collins played drums on several tracks, including the opener, "Intruder", which featured the reverse-gated, cymbal-less drum kit sound which Collins would also use on his single "In the Air Tonight" and through the rest of the 1980s. Gabriel had requested that his drummers use no cymbals in the album's sessions, and when he heard the result he asked Collins to play a simple pattern for several minutes, then built "Intruder" around it. The album achieved some chart success with the songs "Games Without Frontiers" (#4 U.K, #48 U.S.), and "Biko".Arduous and occasionally damp recording sessions at his rural English estate in 1981 and 1982 resulted in Gabriel's fourth LP release, on which Gabriel took more production responsibility. It was one of the first commercial albums recorded entirely to digital tape (using a Sony mobile truck), and featured the early, extremely expensive, Fairlight CMI sampling computer, which had already made its first brief appearances on the previous album. Gabriel combined a variety of sampled and deconstructed sounds with world-beat percussion and other unusual instrumentation to create a radically new, emotionally charged soundscape. Furthermore, the sleeve art consisted of inscrutable, video-based imagery. Despite the album's peculiar sound, odd appearance, and often disturbing themes, it sold very well.  This album featured his first Top 40 hit in the U.S., "Shock the Monkey", as well as the song "I Have the Touch". The music video for "Shock the Monkey", which featured Gabriel in white face paint and a caged macaque, held the #1 spot on "MTV" for 9 weeks. Geffen records forced Peter to give his fourth self-titled album a name in the US - Security - to mark his arrival on the label and to differentiate his fourth album from the other three.Alternate versions of Gabriel's third and fourth albums were also released with German lyrics. Peter Gabriel 3 consisted of basically the same recording overdubbed with new vocals, while Security was also remixed and several tracks were extended or altered in slight ways.Gabriel toured extensively for each of his albums. Initially, he pointedly eschewed the theatrics that had defined his tenure with Genesis. For his second solo tour, his entire band shaved their heads. By the time of Security he began involving elaborate stage props and acrobatics which had him suspended from gantries, distorting his face with Fresnel lenses and mirrors, and wearing unusual make-up. Recordings of the 1982 tour supporting his ´Security´ album were released as the double LP Plays Live. Some of the dates of his 1983 summer tour of USA and Canada included a section opening for David Bowie. The stage was set for Gabriel's critical and commercial breakout with his next studio release, which was in production for almost three years. During the recording and production of the album he also found time to develop the film soundtrack for Alan Parker's 1984 feature Birdy, which consisted of new material as well as remixed instrumental tracks from his previous studio album.
So, Passion and Us (1986–1994) 
Gabriel achieved his greatest popularity with songs from the 1986 album So.  The album charted at number 1 in the UK Album Chart, and number 2 on the Billboard 200 in the US.   It is certified triple platinum in the UK, and five times platinum in the US.   The album produced three UK Top 20 hits, "Sledgehammer", "Big Time", and "Don't Give Up" — a duet with Kate Bush. Roberts, David (2006). British Hit Singles & Albums. London: Guinness World Records Limited  The album also produced three Top 40 hits in the U.S., "Sledgehammer", "In Your Eyes" (featured in the John Cusack film Say Anything), and "Big Time".  "Sledgehammer", peaked at #1 in the U.S., knocking Genesis' "Invisible Touch" off the top spot, and #4 in the UK. Whitburn, Joel (2006). The Billboard Book of Top 40 Hits. Billboard Books  The ballad "Don't Give Up" was about the devastation of unemployment. Gabriel co-produced So with Daniel Lanois, also known for his work with U2 and Brian Eno.  In 1990, Rolling Stone ranked So number #14 on its list of "Top 100 Albums of the Eighties". The 100 Greatest Albums Of The 80s. 
Rolling Stone. Special Issue 1990. Retrieved 21 November 2011 Gabriel's song "Sledgehammer", which dealt specifically with the themes of sex and sexual relations, was accompanied by a much-lauded music video, which was a collaboration with director Stephen R. Johnson, Aardman Animations, and the Brothers Quay.  The video set a new standard for art in the music video industry, and won nine MTV Video Music Awards in 1987, a record which still stands as of 2011. Peter Gabriel, 'Sledgehammer' (1986) - The 30 All-TIME Best Music Videos Time. Retrieved 19 November 2011  "Sledgehammer" is the most played music video in the history of MTV, and in 1998 it was named the station's number one animated video of all time.   A follow-up video for the song "Big Time" also broke new ground in music video animation and special effects. The song is a story of "what happens to you when you become a little too successful", in Gabriel's words. The success of the album earned Peter Gabriel two awards at the Brit Awards in 1987: Best British Male Solo Artist and Best British Video for "Sledgehammer". The BRITs 1987 Brits.co.uk. Retrieved 24 November 2011  Gabriel was also nominated for three Grammy Awards: Best Male Rock Vocal Performance, Song of the Year, and Record of the Year.    In 1989, Gabriel released Passion, the soundtrack for Martin Scorsese's movie The Last Temptation of Christ. For this work he received his first Grammy Award, in the category of Best New Age Performance. He also received a Golden Globe nomination for Best Original Score - Motion Picture.Following this, Gabriel released Us in 1992 (also co-produced with Daniel Lanois), an album in which he explored the pain of recent personal problems; his failed first marriage, and the growing distance between him and his first daughter. Gabriel's introspection within the context of the album Us can be seen in the first single release "Digging in the Dirt" directed by John Downer. Accompanied by a disturbing video featuring Gabriel covered in snails and various foliage, this song made reference to the psychotherapy which had taken up much of Gabriel's time since the previous album. Gabriel describes his struggle to get through to his daughter in "Come Talk To Me" directed by Matt Mahurin, which featured backing vocals by Sinéad O'Connor. O'Connor also lent vocals to "Blood of Eden", directed by Nichola Bruce and Michael Coulson, the third single to be released from the album, and once again dealing with relationship struggles, this time going right back to Adam's rib for inspiration. The result was one of Gabriel's most personal albums. It met with less success than So, reaching #2 in the album chart on both sides of the Atlantic, and making modest chart impact with the singles "Digging in the Dirt" and the funkier "Steam", which evoked memories of "Sledgehammer". Gabriel followed the release of the album with a world tour (with Paula Cole or Joy Askew filling O'Connor's vocal role) and accompanying double CD and DVD Secret World Live in 1994.Gabriel employed an innovative approach in the marketing of the Us album. Not wishing to feature only images of himself, he asked artist filmmakers Nichola Bruce and Michael Coulson to coordinate a marketing campaign using contemporary artists. Artists such as Helen Chadwick, Rebecca Horn, Nils Udo, Andy Goldsworthy, David Mach and Yayoi Kusama collaborated to create original artworks for each of the 11 songs on the multi-million-selling CD. Coulson and Bruce documented the process on Hi-8 video. Bruce left Real World and Coulson continued with the campaign, using the documentary background material as the basis for a promotional EPK, the long-form video All About Us and the interactive CD-ROM Xplora1.Gabriel won three more Grammy Awards, all in the Music Video category. He won the Grammy Award for Best Short Form Music Video in 1993 and 1994 for the videos to "Digging in the Dirt" and "Steam" respectively. Gabriel also won the 1996 Grammy Award for Best Long Form Music Video for his Secret World Live video.
OVO, Up, Scratch My Back and New Blood (1995–present)After five years of not releasing any new music, Gabriel re-emerged with OVO, a soundtrack for the live Millennium Dome Show in London in 2000, and Long Walk Home, the music from the Australian movie Rabbit-Proof Fence, early in 2002. This soundtrack also received a Golden Globe nomination for Best Original Score – Motion Picture. In September 2002, Gabriel released Up, his first full-length studio album in a decade. Entirely self-produced, Up returned to some of the themes of his work in the late 1970s and early 1980s. Three singles failed to make an impression on the charts—in part because almost every track exceeded six minutes in length, with multiple sections—but the album sold well globally, as Gabriel continued to draw from a loyal fan base from his almost forty years in the music business. Up was followed by a world tour featuring his daughter Melanie Gabriel on backing vocals, and two concert DVDs, Growing Up Live (2003) and Still Growing Up: Live & Unwrapped (2004).In 2008, Gabriel contributed to the WALL-E soundtrack several new songs with Thomas Newman, including the film's closing song, "Down to Earth", for which they received the Grammy Award for Best Song Written for a Motion Picture, Television or Other Visual Media.  The song was also nominated for the Golden Globe for Best Original Song - Motion Picture and the Academy Award for Best Original Song.In 2010, Gabriel released Scratch My Back. The album is made up entirely of cover songs including material written by David Bowie, Lou Reed, Arcade Fire, Radiohead, Regina Spektor, Neil Young, and more. The concept for the record is that Gabriel covers songs by various artists and those artists in turn will cover Gabriel songs to be released on a future follow-up album called I'll Scratch Yours. Scratch My Back features only orchestral instrumentation; there are no guitars, drums, or electronic elements that are usual attributes of Gabriel records. A very brief tour followed the album's release where Gabriel performed with a full orchestra and two female backup singers, his daughter Melanie Gabriel and Norwegian singer-songwriter Ane Brun.On 11 October 2011, Gabriel released New Blood, a collection of his earlier songs recorded with an orchestra. A special edition of the album features solely instrumental versions of some of the songs.In Autumn 2012, Gabriel will embark on the Back to Front Tour in which he will perform the entire So album to celebrate its 25th anniversary.  Following this tour, Gabriel has revealed that he is going to take a year's sabbatical from the music industry in order to spend time with his family.  
Musicians and collaboratorsGabriel has worked with a relatively stable crew of musicians and recording engineers throughout his solo career. Bass and Stick player Tony Levin, for example, has appeared on every Gabriel studio album (except Scratch My Back and the soundtracks Passion and Long Walk Home) and has performed on every Gabriel solo tour (except The New Blood Tour).  Guitar player David Rhodes has been Gabriel’s guitarist of choice since 1979.  Prior to So, Jerry Marotta was Gabriel's preferred drummer, both in the studio and on the road. (For the So and Us albums and tours Marotta was replaced by Manu Katché, who was then replaced by Ged Lynch on parts of the Up album and all of the subsequent tour). Gabriel is known for choosing top-flight collaborators, from co-producers such as Ezrin, Fripp, Lillywhite, and Lanois to musicians such as Natalie Merchant, Elizabeth Fraser, L. Shankar, Trent Reznor, Youssou N'Dour, Larry Fast, Nusrat Fateh Ali Khan, Sinéad O'Connor, Kate Bush, Ane Brun, Paula Cole, John Giblin, Peter Hammill, Papa Wemba, Manu Katché, Bayete, Phil Collins (as drummer), and Stewart Copeland.Over the years, Gabriel has collaborated with singer Kate Bush several times; Bush provided backing vocals for Gabriel's "Games Without Frontiers" and "No Self Control" in 1980, and female lead vocal for "Don't Give Up" (a Top 10 hit in the UK) in 1986, and Gabriel appeared on her television special. Their duet of Roy Harper's "Another Day" was discussed for release as a single, but never appeared. He also collaborated with Laurie Anderson on two versions of her composition "Excellent Birds" – one for her 1984 album Mister Heartbreak, and a slightly different version called "This is the Picture (Excellent Birds)", which appeared on cassette and CD versions of So. In 1987, when presenting Gabriel with an award for his music videos, Anderson related an occasion in which a recording session had gone late into the night and Gabriel's voice had begun to sound somewhat strange, almost dreamlike. It was discovered that he had fallen asleep in front of the microphone, but had continued to sing. Gabriel sang (along with Jim Kerr of Simple Minds) on "Everywhere I Go", from The Call's 1986 release, Reconciled. On Toni Childs' 1994 CD, The Woman's Boat, Gabriel sang on the track, "I Met a Man".In 1998, Gabriel appeared on the soundtrack of Babe: Pig in the City, not as a composer, but as the singer of the song "That'll Do", written by Randy Newman. The song was nominated for an Academy Award, and Gabriel and Newman performed it at the following year's Oscar telecast. He performed a similar soundtrack appearance for the 2004 film Shall We Dance?, singing a cover version of "The Book of Love" by The Magnetic Fields.Gabriel has also appeared on Robbie Robertson's self-titled album, singing on "Fallen Angel"; co-written two Tom Robinson singles; and appeared on Joni Mitchell's 1988 album Chalk Mark in a Rainstorm, on the track "My Secret Place".In 2001, Gabriel contributed lead vocals to the song "When You're Falling" on Afro Celt Sound System's Volume 3: Further in Time.  In the summer of 2003, Gabriel performed in Ohio with a guest performance by Uzbek singer Sevara Nazarkhan.Gabriel collaborated on tracks with electronic musician BT. The tracks were never released, as the computers they were contained on were stolen from BT's home in California. He also sang the lyrics for Deep Forest on their theme song for the movie Strange Days. In addition, Gabriel has appeared on Angelique Kidjo's 2007 album Djin Djin, singing on the song "Salala".Gabriel has recorded a cover of the Vampire Weekend single "Cape Cod Kwassa Kwassa" with Hot Chip, where his name is mentioned several times in the chorus. He substitutes the original line "But this feels so unnatural / Peter Gabriel too / This feels so unnatural/ Peter Gabriel too" with "It feels so unnatural / Peter Gabriel too / and it feels so unnatural / to sing your own name."
WOMAD and other projectsGabriel has been interested in world music for many years, with the first musical evidence appearing on his third album. This influence has increased over time, and he is the driving force behind the World of Music, Arts and Dance (WOMAD) movement. He created the Real World Studios and record label to facilitate the creation and distribution of such music by various artists, and he has worked to educate Western culture about the work of such musicians as Yungchen Lhamo, Nusrat Fateh Ali Khan and Youssou N'dour. He has a long-standing interest in human rights, and launched Witness,  a nonprofit which trains human rights activists to use video and online technologies to expose human rights abuses. In 2006 his work with WITNESS and his long standing support of peace and human rights causes was recognised by the Nobel Peace Prize Laureates with the Man of Peace award. In the 1990s, with Steve Nelson of Brilliant Media and director Michael Coulson, he developed advanced multimedia CD-ROM-based entertainment projects, creating the acclaimed Xplora (the world's largest selling music CD-ROM), and subsequently the EVE CD-ROM. EVE was a music and art adventure game directed by Michael Coulson and co-produced by the Starwave Corporation in Seattle; it won the prestigious Milia d'Or award Grand Prize at the Cannes in 1996 and featured themes and interactivity well in advance of its time. Xplora and EVE can no longer be played on modern PCs, due to changes to their operating systems.In 1994, Gabriel starred in the Breck Eisner short film "Recon" as a detective who enters the minds of murder victims to find their killer's identity.Gabriel helped pioneer a new realm of musical interaction in 2001, visiting Georgia State University's Language Research Center to participate in keyboard jam sessions with bonobo apes from the Democratic Republic of the Congo. (This experience inspired the song "Animal Nation," which was performed on Gabriel's 2002 "Growing Up" tour and was featured on the Growing Up Live DVD and The Wild Thornberrys Movie soundtrack.) Gabriel's desire to bring attention to the intelligence of primates also took the form of ApeNet, a project that aimed to link great apes through the internet, enabling the first interspecies internet communication. He was one of the founders of On Demand Distribution (OD2), one of the first online music download services.  Its technology is used by MSN Music UK and others, and has become the dominant music download technology platform for stores in Europe.  OD2 was bought by US company Loudeye in June 2004 and subsequently by Finnish mobile giant Nokia in October 2006 for $60 million.Additionally, Gabriel is also co-founder (with Brian Eno) of a musicians union called Mudda, short for "magnificent union of digitally downloading artists."In 2000, Peter Gabriel collaborated with Zucchero, Anggun and others in a charity for kids with AIDS. Erick Benzi wrote words and music and Patrick Bruel, Stephan Eicher, Faudel, Lokua Kanza, Laam, Nourith, Axelle Red have accepted to sing it.In 2003, Gabriel's song "Burn You Up, Burn You Down" was featured in Cyan Worlds' video game Uru: Ages Beyond Myst. In 2004, Gabriel contributed another song ("Curtains") and contributed voice work on another game in the Myst franchise, Myst IV: Revelation.During the latter part of 2004, Gabriel spent time in a village in eastern Nepal with musician Ram Sharan Nepali, learning esoteric vocal techniques.  Gabriel subsequently invited Nepali to attend and perform at the Womad festival in Adelaide, Australia.  In June 2005, Gabriel and broadcast industry entrepreneur David Engelke purchased Solid State Logic, a leading manufacturer of mixing consoles and digital audio workstations.   SSL is among the top 2 or 3 recording console manufacturers in the world of recording.In May 2008, Gabriel's Real World Studios, in partnership with Bowers & Wilkins, started the Bowers & Wilkins Music Club - now known as Society of Sound - a subscription-based music retail site. Albums are currently available in either Apple Lossless or Flac format. 
Activist for humanitarian causesIn 1986 he started what has become a longstanding association with Amnesty International, becoming a pioneering participant in all 28 of Amnesty's Human Rights Concerts — a series of music events and tours staged by the US Section of Amnesty International between 1986-1998.  He performed during the six-concert A Conspiracy of Hope US tour in June 1986; the twenty-concert Human Rights Now! world tour in 1988; the Chile: Embrace Of Hope Concert in 1990 and at The Paris Concert For Amnesty International in 1998.  He also performed in Amnesty's Secret Policeman's Ball benefit shows in collaboration with other artists and friends such as Lou Reed, David Gilmour and Youssou N'Dour; Gabriel closed those concerts performing his anti-apartheid anthem Biko. 
He spoke of his support for Amnesty on NBC's Today Show in 1986.  Inspired by the social activism he encountered in his work with Amnesty, in 1992 Gabriel co-founded WITNESS, a non-profit group that equips, trains and supports locally-based organizations worldwide to use video and the internet in human rights documentation and advocacy.In 1995, Gabriel and Cape Verdean human rights activist Vera Duarte were awarded the North-South Prize in its inaugural year.     
In the late 1990s, Gabriel and entrepreneur Richard Branson discussed with Nelson Mandela their idea of a small, dedicated group of leaders, working objectively and without any vested personal interest to solve difficult global conflicts.On 18 July 2007, in Johannesburg, South Africa, Nelson Mandela announced the formation of a new group, Global Elders, in a speech he delivered on the occasion of his 89th birthday. The present members of this group are Desmond Tutu, Graça Machel, Kofi Annan, Ela Bhatt, Lakhdar Brahimi, Gro Harlem Brundtland, Fernando Henrique Cardoso, Jimmy Carter, Mary Robinson, Muhammad Yunus, and Aung San Suu Kyi (with an empty chair for her). The Elders will be independently funded by a group of "Founders", including Branson and Gabriel.Desmond Tutu serves as the chair of the Elders, who will use their collective skills to catalyse peaceful resolutions to long-standing conflicts, articulate new approaches to global issues that are causing or may later cause immense human suffering, and share wisdom by helping to connect voices all over the world. They will work together over the next several months to consider carefully which specific issues they will confront.In November 2007 Gabriel's non-profit group WITNESS launched The Hub, a participatory media site for human rights.In September 2008 Gabriel was named as the recipient of Amnesty International’s 2008 Ambassador of Conscience Award. In the same month, he received Quadriga United We Care award of Werkstatt Deutschland along with Boris Tadić, Eckart Höfling and Wikipedia. The award was presented to him by Queen Silvia of Sweden. Gabriel lent his support to the campaign to release Sakineh Mohammadi Ashtiani, an Iranian woman sentenced to death by stoning after being convicted of committing adultery. 
PoliticsAt the 1997 general election, Gabriel declared his support for the Labour Party, which won that election by a landslide after 18 years out of power, led by Tony Blair. In 1998, Gabriel was named in a list of the biggest private financial donors to Labour.  In 2003, he revealed he had voted for Labour and admired what they had done for health and education but distanced himself from the Labour government over Tony Blair’s support for George W. Bush and Britain’s involvement in the Iraq War, which he strongly opposed, although he continued to believe Blair was a man of conscience.  Quoted in The Mirror newspaper, he said: This is a fundamental issue of life and death and I very much think the Prime Minister is in the wrong. I'm also sure George W. Bush is an affable bloke but he's highly dangerous and I wish America was in the hands of someone else. To put oil interests ahead of human life is appalling. War is always terrible but unjustified war is obscene and on present evidence that is what we are facing. People want peace and I think it's great that the Mirror is leading this campaign. I think the consequences of this war would be the biggest threat to world peace in my lifetime...There is a slogan which says: 'Peace is what happens when you respect the rights of others'. Iraqis have rights too.  In 2005, Gabriel gave a Green Party of England and Wales general election candidate special permission to record a cover of his song "Don't Give Up" for his campaign. In 2010, The Guardian described Gabriel as "a staunch advocate of proportional representation". In 2012, Gabriel condemned the use of his music by American talk radio personality Rush Limbaugh during a controversial segment in which Limbaugh vilified Georgetown University law student Sandra Fluke. A statement on behalf of Gabriel read: "Peter was appalled to learn that his music was linked to Rush Limbaugh's extraordinary attack on Sandra Fluke. It is obvious from anyone that knows Peter's work that he would never approve such a use. He has asked his representatives to make sure his music is withdrawn and especially from these unfair, aggressive and ignorant comments." 
Personal lifeGabriel has two daughters with his first wife Jill Moore: Anna-Marie (born 26 July 1974) and Melanie Gabriel (born 23 August 1976). Married on 17 March 1971, they divorced in 1987. Moore's father was Lord Moore of Wolvercote. Anna-Marie is a filmmaker and Melanie is a musician. Anna-Marie filmed and directed the Growing Up On Tour: A Family Portrait and Still Growing Up: Live & Unwrapped DVDs. Melanie has been a backing vocalist in her father's band since 2002.  In the late 1980s and early 1990s, Gabriel lived with actress Rosanna Arquette but they never married. Gabriel also has two sons with Meabh Flynn: Isaac Ralph (born 27 September 2001) and Luc (born 5 July 2008). Gabriel and Flynn have been married since 9 June 2002.Gabriel has resided for many years in the county of Wiltshire in England, where he also runs his Real World Studios. He previously lived in the Woolley Valley near Bath, Somerset. In 2010 he joined a campaign to stop an agricultural development at the valley, which had also inspired his first solo single "Solsbury Hill" in 1977. 
Appearances: 2005–presentGabriel actively coordinated and performed at the Eden Project Live 8 concert in July 2005. 
In his earliest days, Gabriel played flute on Cat Stevens's first album on the Island records label, Mona Bone Jakon as a "nervous session musician". Stevens, now known as Yusuf Islam, joined him on stage 33 years after that experience, in Johannesburg during Nelson Mandela's 46664 concert. The two performed the Stevens hit "Wild World".A double DVD set, Still Growing Up: Live & Unwrapped, was released in October 2005. FIFA asked Gabriel and Brian Eno to organise an opening ceremony for the 2006 FIFA World Cup finals in Germany, planned to take place a couple of days before the start of the tournament; however, the show was cancelled in January 2006 by FIFA.Rumours of a possible reunion of the original Genesis line-up began circulating in 2004 after Phil Collins stated in an interview that he was open to the idea of sitting back behind the drums and "let Peter be the singer." The classic line-up has only reformed for a live performance once before, in 1982. However, the group did work together to create a new version of the 1974 song "The Carpet Crawlers", ultimately released on the Turn It On Again: The Hits album as "The Carpet Crawlers 1999". Gabriel later met with other Genesis band members, to discuss a possible reunion tour of The Lamb Lies Down on Broadway. He chose to opt out of a reunion tour, and his former bandmates, Collins, Banks, and Rutherford chose to tour as Genesis without him.At the opening ceremonies of the Winter Olympics in Turin, Italy, Gabriel performed John Lennon's "Imagine" during the opening of the festivities  on 10 February 2006.In October 2006, Gabriel was given the first Pioneer Award at the BT Digital Music Awards, an award presented in recognition of his "profound and lasting influence on the development of digital music."In November 2006, the Seventh World Summit of Nobel Peace Laureates in Rome presented Gabriel with the Man of Peace award. The award, presented by former President of the USSR and Nobel Peace Prize winner Mikhail Gorbachev and Walter Veltroni, Mayor of Rome, was an acknowledgement of Gabriel's extensive contribution and work on behalf of human rights and peace. The award was presented in the Giulio Cesare Hall of the Campidoglio in Rome. At the end of the year, he was awarded the Q magazine Lifetime Achievement Award, presented to him by American musician Moby. In an interview published in the magazine to accompany the award, Gabriel's contribution to music was described as "vast and enduring."Gabriel took on a project with the BBC World Service's competition "The Next Big Thing" to find the world's best young band. Gabriel is judging the final six young artists with William Orbit, Geoff Travis and Angélique Kidjo.The Times reported on 21 January 2007, that Peter Gabriel had announced that he planned to release his next album in the U.S. without the aid of a record company. Gabriel, an early pioneer of digital music distribution, had raised £2 million towards recording and 'shipping' his next album, Big Blue Ball in a venture with investment boutique Ingenious Media. Gabriel is expected to earn double the money that he would through a conventional record deal. Commercial director Duncan Reid of Ingenious explains the business savvy of the deal, saying, "If you're paying a small distribution fee and covering your own marketing costs, you enjoy the lion's share of the proceeds of the album. Gabriel is expected to outsource CD production for worldwide release through Warner Bros. Records. The new album deal covers the North America territory, where Gabriel is currently out of contract. The album Big Blue Ball was launched in America thanks to a venture capital trust initiative. Bosses at London-based firm Ingenious raised more than $4 million (GBP 2 million) to help promote the release in the United States. The venture capitalists, Gabriel and his Real World Limited partners, have created a new joint venture company, High Level Recordings Limited, to oversee the release of the album, which took place in 2008. Gabriel appeared on a nationwide tour for the album in 2009. On 24 May 2007, he was honoured with the Ivor Novello Award for lifetime achievement. Gabriel was a judge for the 6th and 8th annual Independent Music Awards to support independent artists. In February 2009, Gabriel announced that he would not be performing on the 2008 Academy Awards telecast because producers of the show were limiting his performance of "Down to Earth" from WALL-E to 65 seconds. John Legend and the Soweto Gospel Choir performed the song in his stead.Gabriel's 2009 tour of Mexico and South America included visiting Mexico, Argentina, Chile, Peru, and Venezuela. His first ever performance in Peru was held in Lima on 20 March 2009, during his second visit to the country. His concert in Mexico City, on 27 March 2009, attracted more than 38,000 fans.On 25 July 2009, he played at WOMAD Charlton Park, his only European performance of the year, to promote Witness. The show included two tracks from the then-forthcoming Scratch My Back: Paul Simon's "The Boy in the Bubble" and The Magnetic Fields' "The Book of Love". On 5 October 2011 at the Royal Festival Hall, London Gabriel appeared at the end of an interview of President Carter by Channel 4 News presenter, Jon Snow, to lead the 2,500-strong audience in a rendition of happy birthday to mark the President turning 87.On 9 November 2011 he appeared and performed on CBS's Late Show with David Letterman.
Discography 

Peter Gabriel 1 (Car) (1977)
Peter Gabriel 2 (Scratch) (1978)
Peter Gabriel 3 (Melt) (1980) / Ein deutsches Album (1980)
Peter Gabriel 4 (Security) (1982) / Deutsches Album (1982)
Birdy (1985)
So (1986)
Passion (1989)
Us (1992)
OVO (2000)
Long Walk Home (2002)
Up (2002)
Scratch My Back (2010)
New Blood (2011)


See also

List of best selling music artists
List of artists who reached number one on the Hot 100 (U.S.)
List of artists who reached number one on the U.S. Dance chart
List of artists who reached number one on the U.S. Mainstream Rock chart


References 
External links 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Audio interview at BBC Wiltshire
Peter Gabriel takes part in a panel at the Global Philanthropy Forum video

 
 
 
  
  
DEFAULTSORT





















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Laurel and Hardy
 
Laurel and Hardy were one of the most popular and critically acclaimed comedy double acts of the early Classical Hollywood era of American cinema. Composed of thin Englishman Stan Laurel (1890–1965) and large American Oliver Hardy (1892–1957), they became well known during the late 1920s to the mid-1940s for their slapstick comedy, with Laurel playing the clumsy and childlike friend of the pompous Hardy.   They made over 100 films together, initially two-reelers (short films) before expanding into feature length films in the 1930s. Their films include Sons of the Desert (1933), the Academy Award winning short film The Music Box (1932), Babes in Toyland (1934), and Way Out West (1937). Hardy's catchphrase "Well, here's another nice mess you've gotten me into!" is still widely recognized.Oft misquoted as "another fine mess", see section on Catchphrases.Prior to the double act both were established actors with Laurel appearing in over 50 films and Hardy in over 250 films. Although the two comedians first worked together on the film The Lucky Dog (1921), this was a chance pairing and it was not until 1926, when both separately signed contracts with the Hal Roach film studio, that they began appearing in movie shorts together. Smith 1984, p. 24.   Laurel and Hardy officially  became a team the following year in the silent short film Putting Pants on Philip (1927). The pair remained with the Roach studio until 1940, then appeared in eight "B" comedies for 20th Century Fox and Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer from 1941 to 1945. McGarry 1992, p. 67.  After finishing their movie commitments at the end of 1944, they concentrated on stage shows, embarking on a music hall tour of England, Ireland, and Scotland.  In 1950 they made their last film, a French/Italian co-production called Atoll K, before retiring from the screen. In total they appeared together in 107 films. They starred in 40 short sound films, 32 short silent films and 23 full-length feature films, and made 12 guest or cameo appearances, including the recently discovered Galaxy of Stars promotional film (1936).A common comedy routine was a tit-for-tat fight. Their silent film Big Business (1929), which includes one of these routines, was added to the Library of Congress as a national treasure in 1992. Notable Laurel traits included crying like a baby while being berated and scratching his hair when in shock. On December 1, 1954, the team made their only American television appearance, surprised by Ralph Edwards on his live NBC-TV program, This Is Your Life.The works of Laurel and Hardy have been re-released in numerous theatrical reissues, television revivals, 16mm and 8mm home movies, feature-film compilations, and home videos since the 1930s. They were voted the seventh greatest comedy act in a 2005 UK poll by fellow comedians. The duo's signature tune, known variously as "The Cuckoo Song", "Ku-Ku", or "The Dance of the Cuckoos", played on the opening credits of their films. The official Laurel and Hardy appreciation society is known as The Sons of the Desert, after a fraternal society in their film of the same name.
Before the teaming

Stan Laurel 
Stan Laurel (June 16, 1890 – February 23, 1965) was born Arthur Stanley Jefferson in Ulverston, Lancashire, England.  His father, Arthur Joseph Jefferson, was a theatrical entrepreneur and theatre owner in northern England and Scotland, who with his wife was a major force in the industry.  Laurel was born into a family with theatre in its blood.  In 1905 the Jefferson family moved to Glasgow to be closer to their business mainstay, The Metropole Theatre,  with Laurel making his stage debut in a Glasgow hall called the Panoptikon, a month short of his 16th birthday.  Arthur Jefferson secured Laurel his first acting job with a theatrical juvenile company, Levy and Cardwell, specialising in Christmas Pantomimes.  In 1909 he was employed by Britain's leading comedy impresario, Fred Karno,  working as a supporting actor and as an understudy of Charlie Chaplin.  Laurel said of Karno "There was no one like him. He had no equal. His name was box-office." In 1912, Laurel left England with a Fred Karno Troupe, to tour the United States of America. Laurel expected the tour to be merely a pleasant interval in his life before returning to London; however, he had, in actuality, emigrated.  In 1917 Laurel was teamed with Mae Dahlberg: they worked as a double act for stage and film and were common law husband and wife.  Laurel made his film debut with Dahlberg in Nuts in May (1917).  It was while working with her that he started using the stage name Stan Laurel, changing his name legally in 1931.  Dahlberg held Laurel's career back because she demanded parts in Laurel's films and her tempestuous nature made her difficult to work with; dressing room arguments between the two were common, so film producer Joe Rock paid her to leave Laurel and return to her native Australia.  In 1925 Laurel joined the Hal Roach film studio as a director and writer and between May 1925 and September 1926 he was credited in at least 22 films.  Laurel starred in over 50 films for various producers before teaming up with Hardy,  but without Hardy he experienced only modest success because it was difficult for producers, writers and directors to figure out what character he might be playing, and American audiences knew him either as a "nutty burglar" or as a Charlie Chaplin imitator. 
Oliver Hardy 
Oliver Hardy (January 18, 1892 – August 7, 1957) was born Norvell Hardy in Harlem, Georgia.  He took his father's first name, calling himself "Oliver Norvell Hardy."  His offscreen nicknames were "Ollie" and "Babe." Hardy's nickname "Babe" originated from an Italian barber near the Lubin Studios in Jacksonville, Florida, who would rub Hardy's face with talcum powder and say, "That's nice a baby!" which the other Lubin actors mimicked.  Hardy was billed as "Babe Hardy" in his early films. McCabe 1989, p. 19.  By his late teens, Hardy was a popular stage singer, and he operated his own movie house in Milledgeville, Georgia, the Palace Theater, partly financed by his mother. Bergen 1992, p. 26. Seeing film comedies inspired him with an urge to take up comedy himself and in 1913 he began working with Lubin Motion Pictures in Jacksonville, Florida. He started out by helping around the studio with lights, props and other duties, gradually learning the craft as a script-clerk.  Around the same time, he married his first wife, Madelyn Salosihn. Everson 2000, p. 22.  In 1914, Hardy acted as Babe in his first film called Outwitting Dad.  Between 1914 and 1916,  Hardy made 177 shorts as Babe with the Vim Comedy Company, which were released up to the end of 1917.  Exhibiting a versatility in playing heroes, villains and even female characters, Hardy became much in demand as a supporting actor, comic villain or second banana. For the next 10 years he memorably assisted star comics Billy West, a Charlie Chaplin imitator, Jimmy Aubrey, Larry Semon and Charley Chase.  In total, Hardy starred or co-starred in more than 250 silent shorts, about 150 of which have been lost. While in New York, his abortive effort to enlist in 1917 led him and his wife, Madelyn, to seek new opportunities in California. 
History

Films 

 The first film pairing of the two comedians, although as separate performers, took place in The Lucky Dog (1921).  The exact date the film was produced isn't recorded, but film historian Bo Bergulund dated it between late 1920 and January 1921.  The association was so casual that based upon interviews given in the 1930s both had forgotten it entirely.  The plot sees Laurel befriended by a stray dog who after a number of lucky escapes saves him from being blown up by a stick of dynamite, while Hardy is a mugger attempting to rob him.  Several years later, both comedians had separately signed for the Hal Roach film studio and next appeared in 45 Minutes From Hollywood (1926). Hal Roach was the most important person in their film careers; he brought them together officially as a team and paid their wages for over 20 years.  Charley Rogers worked closely with the three men for many years and said "It could not have happened if Laurel, Hardy and Roach had not met at the right place and at the right time.  Their first "official" film together was Putting Pants on Philip (1927).  The plot sees Laurel as Philip, a young Scottish man newly arrived in the United States in full kilted splendor: after various mishaps surrounding the kilt, his uncle, played by Hardy, tries to put him in trousers. Laurel said  to John McCabe: "Of all the questions we're asked, the most frequent is how did we come together? I always explain that we just came together naturally."  Laurel and Hardy were joined by accident and grew by indirection.  In 1926 both were part of the Roach Comedy All Stars - a group of actors of similar standing who took part in a series of films; quite unwittingly Laurel and Hardy's parts became larger and the parts of their fellow stars became less, because Laurel and Hardy were the best actors.  The teaming was suggested by Leo McCarey, who was their supervising director between 1927 and 1930; during this period McCarey and Laurel jointly devised the team's format.  After the teaming they played the same characters for 30 years. Although Hal Roach employed writers and directors such as H. M. Walker, Leo McCarey, James Parrott and James W. Horne on Laurel and Hardy films, Laurel would rewrite entire sequences or scripts, have the cast and crew improvise on the sound stage, and meticulously review the footage for editing. Mitchell 2010, p. 28.  By 1929 Laurel was the head writer. The writing sessions were gleeful chaos; Stan had three or four writers who joined him in a perpetual game of 'Can You Top This?'  As Laurel so obviously relished writing gags, Hardy was more than happy to leave the job to his partner.  From this point Laurel was also the uncredited film director. He ran the Laurel and Hardy set no matter who was in the director's chair, but never felt compelled to assert his authority. Roach remarked "Laurel bossed the production. With any director if Laurel said 'I don't like this idea,' the director didn't say 'Well, you're going to do it anyway.' That was understood."  As Laurel made so many suggestions there wasn't much left for the credited director to do. In 1929 the silent era of film was coming to an end and most silent-film actors saw their careers decline with the advent of sound.  Silent film actors failed to make the transition because they decided their prime duty was to tell stories in words, and they misused sound through over-emphasis, or there was poor recording. Laurel and Hardy avoided this pitfall because they decided to continue making primarily visual films. McCabe 1987, p. 153.  They did not ignore sound but they were not ruled by it.  They proved skillful in their melding of visual and verbal humor,  and made a seamless transition to the talking era in their first sound film Unaccustomed As We Are (1929). The title took its name from the familiar phrase "Unaccustomed as we are to public speaking".  In the opening dialogue Laurel and Hardy began by spoofing the very slow and self conscious speech of the early talking actors, a routine they would use regularly. Laurel and Hardy's first starring feature film  was Pardon Us (1931).  The most memorable Laurel and Hardy film is The Music Box (1932), the image of the duo forever pushing a piano up a tremendous flight of steps has stuck in the public consciousness.  The film won an Academy Award for Best Live Action Short Subject in 1932.  While many enthusiasts claim the superiority of The Music Box, their silent film Big Business (1929) is by far the most consistently acclaimed.  The plot sees Laurel and Hardy as Christmas tree salesman involved in a classic tit-for-tat battle with James Finlayson, eventually destroying his house and their car.  Big Business was added to the Library of Congress in the United States as a national treasure in 1992.  Sons of the Desert (1933) is considered Laurel and Hardy's best feature film. Babes in Toyland (1934) retains a timeless appeal and remains a perennial on American T.V. at Christmas.  Hal Roach spoke scathingly about the film and Laurel's behavior during its making. Laurel was unhappy with Roach's plot and after an argument was allowed to make the film his own way. The rift permanently damaged Roach-Laurel relations to the point that Roach said that after Toyland he no longer wished to produce Laurel and Hardy films, although their association continued for another six years. Hoping for greater artistic freedom, Laurel and Hardy split with Roach and signed with major studios 20th Century-Fox and Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer. However, the working conditions were now completely different, as they were hired only as actors, relegated to the B-film divisions, and initially not allowed to improvise or contribute to the scripts. When the films proved popular, the studios allowed the team more input with Laurel and Hardy starring in eight features through 1944. These films, while not considered the team's best, were extremely successful. Budgeted at $250,000 to $300,000 each, the films earned millions at the box office. The films were so profitable that Fox kept making Laurel and Hardy comedies after discontinuing its other "B" series. Laurel and Hardy made one final film together, Atoll K (1951), a French-Italian co-production directed by Leo Joannon, which was plagued by language barriers, production problems, and both Laurel and Hardy's grave health issues. During shooting, Hardy began to lose weight precipitously and developed an irregular heartbeat while Laurel experienced painful prostate complications. McGarry 1992, p. 73.  Critics were disappointed with its storyline, English dubbing, and Laurel's sickly physical appearance.  The film was not a success, and brought an end to Laurel and Hardy's film careers. A number of their films were re-shot with Laurel and Hardy talking in Spanish, Italian, French or German.  The plots for these films were similar to the English language version although the supporting cast were often native language actors. Laurel and Hardy could not speak a foreign language and they received voice coaching to reproduce their lines. Pardon Us (1931) was re-shot in all four foreign languages. Blotto (1930), Hog Wild (1930) and Be Big! (1931) had French and Spanish versions. Night Owls (1930) had Spanish and Italian versions. Below Zero (1930) and Chickens Come Home (1931) only Spanish version.Most of the Laurel and Hardy films survive, and have never gone out of circulation permanently. Three of their 107 films are considered lost, as they have not been seen in full since the 1930s.  The silent Hats Off (1927) has vanished completely. The first half of Now I'll Tell One (1927) is lost and the second half has yet to be released on video.  In the operatic Technicolor musical The Rogue Song (1930) Laurel and Hardy appear in 10 sequences, only one of which is known to exist along with the complete soundtrack. 
Style of comedy and characterizations 
The humor of Laurel and Hardy was generally visual with slapstick used for emphasis. They often had physical arguments with each other, which were quite complex and involved cartoon violence, and their characters preclude them from making any real progress in even the simplest endeavors. Much of their comedy involves milking a joke, where a simple idea provides a basis from which to build several gags without following a defined narrative.Laurel and Hardy had an inherent physical contrariety. Stan Laurel was of average height and weight, but appeared small and slight next to Oliver Hardy, who was   tall Mitchell, Glenn. The Laurel & Hardy Encyclopedia. London: Batsford, 1995. ISBN 0-7134-7711-3  and weighed about 280 lb (127 kg) in his prime. Laurel kept his hair short on the sides and back, but let it grow long on top to create a natural "fright wig". At times of shock he would simultaneously cry while pulling up his hair. In contrast, Hardy's thinning hair was pasted on his forehead in spit curls and he wore a toothbrush moustache. To achieve a flat-footed walk, Laurel removed the heels from his shoes.  Both wore bowler hats, with Laurel's being narrower than Hardy's, and with a flattened brim. The characters' normal attire also called for wing collar shirts, with Hardy wearing a standard neck tie which he would twiddle and Laurel a bow tie. Hardy's sports jacket was too small for him and done up with one straining button, whereas Laurel's double breasted jacket was loose fitting.A common routine the team performed was a "tit-for-tat" fight with an adversary. This could be with their wives—often played by Mae Busch, Anita Garvin or Daphne Pollard—or with a neighbour, often played by Charlie Hall or James Finlayson. Laurel and Hardy would accidentally damage someone else's property, with the injured party retaliating by ruining something belonging to Laurel or Hardy. After calmly surveying the damage they would find something else to vandalize and conflict would escalate until both sides were simultaneously destroying property in front of each other. An early example of the routine occurs in their classic short, Big Business (1929), which was added to the Library of Congress as a national treasure in 1992, and one of their short films, which revolves entirely around such an altercation, was titled Tit for Tat (1935).One of their best-remembered dialogue routines was the "Tell me that again" routine. Laurel would tell Hardy a genuinely smart idea he had come up with, and Hardy would reply, "Tell me that again." Laurel would attempt to repeat the idea, but jumble it into utter nonsense. Hardy, who had difficulty understanding Laurel's idea when expressed clearly, would understand perfectly when hearing the jumbled version.While much of their comedy remained visual, various lines of humorous dialogue appeared in Laurel and Hardy's talking films. Some examples include:

"You can lead a horse to water, but a pencil must be led." (Laurel, Brats)
"I was dreaming I was awake, but I woke up and found meself asleep." (Laurel, Oliver the Eighth)
"A lot of weather we've been having lately." (Hardy, Way Out West)

In some cases, their comedy bordered on the surreal, a style Stan Laurel called "white magic".  For example, in Way Out West (1937), Laurel clenches his fist and pours tobacco into it, as if it were a pipe. Then, he flicks his thumb upward as if he held a lighter. His thumb ignites, and he matter-of-factly lights his "pipe." The amazed Hardy, seeing this, would unsuccessfully attempt to duplicate it throughout the rest of the film. Much later in the film, Hardy finally succeeds – only to be terrified when his thumb catches fire.Rather than showing Hardy suffering the pain of misfortunes such as falling down stairs or being beaten by a thug, banging and crashing sound effects were often used so the audience could visualize the scene for themselves.Why Girls Love Sailors (1927) was a significant film for Hardy because it gave him two of his most enduring trademarks. The first was his "tie-twiddle" to demonstrate embarrassment. Hardy, while acting, had been met with a pail of water in the face. He said "I had been expecting it, but I didn't expect it at that particular moment. It threw me mentally and I couldn't think what to do next, so I waved the tie in a kind of tiddly-widdly fashion to show embarrassment while trying to look friendly."   His second trademark was the "camera look" in which he breaks the fourth wall. Hardy said "I had to become exasperated, so I just stared right into the camera and registered my disgust" Offscreen, Stan Laurel and Oliver Hardy were quite the opposite of their movie characters: Laurel was the industrious "idea man," while Hardy was more easygoing. Gehring 1990, p. 5. 
Final yearsAfter Atoll K, Laurel and Hardy took several months off, so that Laurel could recuperate. Upon their return to the European stage in 1952, they undertook a well-received series of public appearances in a short sketch Laurel had written called "A Spot of Trouble".  Hoping to repeat the success the following year, Laurel wrote a routine titled "Birds of a Feather" (in 1953).   On September 9, 1953, their boat arrived in Cobh, Ireland. Laurel recounted their reception:

The love and affection we found that day at Cobh was simply unbelievable. There were hundreds of boats blowing whistles and mobs and mobs of people screaming on the docks. We just couldn't understand what it was all about. And then something happened that I can never forget. All the church bells in Cobh started to ring out our theme song ["Dance of the Cuckoos"] and Babe [Oliver Hardy] looked at me and we cried. I'll never forget that day. Never. 


On December 1, 1954, the team made their only American television appearance, surprised by Ralph Edwards on his live NBC-TV program, This Is Your Life. Lured to the Knickerbocker Hotel as a subterfuge for a business meeting with producer Bernard Delfont, the doors opened to their suite #205, flooding the room with light and the voice of Edwards. The telecast was preserved on a kinescope and later released on home video. Partly due to the positive response from the television broadcast, the pair was renegotiating with Hal Roach Jr. for a series of color NBC Television specials to be called Laurel and Hardy's Fabulous Fables. However, plans for the specials were shelved, as the aging comedians suffered from declining health. McCabe 1975, p. 398. In 1955, Laurel and Hardy made their final public appearance together, taking part in This Is Music Hall, a BBC Television program about the Grand Order of Water Rats, a British variety organization. Laurel and Hardy provide a filmed insert during which they reminisce about their friends in British variety. They made their final appearance on camera in 1956 in a home movie titled "One Moment Please". The film was shot by a family friend at Laurel's home; it is without audio and lasts three minutes.Under doctor's orders to improve a heart condition, Hardy lost over   in 1956. Several strokes resulted in loss of mobility and speech. He died of a stroke on August 7, 1957. Longtime friend Bob Chatterton said Hardy weighed just   at the time of his death. Hardy was laid to rest at Pierce Brothers Valhalla Memorial Park, North Hollywood. Just after Hardy's death, Laurel and Hardy's films returned to movie theaters, as clips of their work were featured in Robert Youngson's silent-film compilation The Golden Age of Comedy. For the remaining eight years of his life, Stan Laurel refused to perform, even turning down Stanley Kramer's offer to make a cameo in his landmark 1963 movie, It's a Mad, Mad, Mad, Mad World. In 1960, Laurel was given a special Academy Award for his contributions to film comedy. Despite not appearing onscreen after Hardy's death, Laurel did contribute gags to several comedy filmmakers. Most of his writing was in the form of correspondence; he insisted on answering every fan letter personally. Late in life, he hosted many visitors of the new generation of comedians and celebrities, including Dick Cavett, Jerry Lewis, Peter Sellers, Marcel Marceau and Dick Van Dyke. Laurel lived until 1965, surviving to see the duo's work rediscovered through television and classic film revivals. He died on February 23 in Santa Monica, and is buried at Forest Lawn-Hollywood Hills in Los Angeles, California. 
Supporting castLaurel and Hardy's films included a memorable supporting cast, some of whom appeared regularly. 

Harry Bernard, played bit parts as waiter, bartender and cop.
Mae Busch played a formidable Mrs. Hardy, and some other characters.
Charley Chase, the Hal Roach film star and brother of James Parrott, Laurel and Hardy writer/director, made 4 appearances.
Baldwin Cooke played bit parts as waiter, bartender and cop.
James Finlayson, a small, balding, moustachioed Scotsman known for displays of indignation and squinting "double takes", made 33 appearances.
Anita Garvin was a memorable Mrs. Laurel.
Billy Gilbert, made many appearances, most notably in the classic The Music Box (1932).
Charlie Hall, who usually played angry "little men", appeared nearly 50 times.
Jean Harlow, the "Blonde Bombshell" had a small role in their short Double Whoopee (1929) and two other films, before her breakout stardom.
Arthur Housman made memorable appearances as a comic drunk.
Edgar Kennedy master of the "slow burn", often appeared as a cop, hostile neighbor or relative.
Walter Long played grizzled, physically threatening villains.
Sam Lufkin appeared several times.
Daphne Pollard was featured, mostly as Oliver's shrewish wife.
Charley Rogers, the English actor, appeared several times.
Tiny Sandford was a very tall and burly man who played authority figures, notably cops.
Thelma Todd appeared several times.
Ben Turpin the cross-eyed actor made two memorable appearances.
Peter Cushing, well before becoming a star in many memorable Hammer Horror Films made an appearance in A Chump at Oxford.


Music 
The duo's famous signature tune, known variously as "The Cuckoo Song", "Ku-Ku", or "The Dance of the Cuckoos", was composed by Roach musical director Marvin Hatley as the on-the-hour chime for the Roach studio radio station.  Laurel heard the tune on the station, and asked Hatley to use it as the Laurel and Hardy theme song. In Laurel's eyes, the song's melody represented Hardy's character (pompous and dramatic), while the harmony represented Laurel's own character (somewhat out of key, and only able to register two notes: "coo-coo").  The original theme, recorded by two clarinets in 1930, was re-recorded with a full orchestra in 1935. Leroy Shield composed the great majority of the music used in the Laurel and Hardy short sound films.  A compilation of songs from their films titled Trail of the Lonesome Pine was released in 1975. The title track was released as a single in the UK and reached #2 in the charts.
Influence and legacy

CatchphrasesThe catchphrase most used by Laurel and Hardy on film is: 
  
The phrase, which was earlier used by W. S. Gilbert in The Mikado (1885) and again in The Grand Duke (1896), was first used by Hardy in The Laurel-Hardy Murder Case (1930). In popular culture, the catchphrase is often misquoted as "Well, here's another fine mess you've gotten me into." The misquoted version of the phrase was never used by Hardy on film; the misunderstanding stems from the title of their film Another Fine Mess (1930). 
Numerous variations of the quote appeared on film. In Chickens Come Home (1931), Ollie says impatiently to Stan, "Well...." with Stan replying, "Here's another nice mess I've gotten you into." In Thicker than Water (1935) and The Fixer-Uppers (1935), the phrase becomes "Well, here's another nice kettle of fish you pickled me in!" In Saps at Sea (1940) it becomes "Well, here's another nice bucket of suds you've gotten me into!"Another regular catchphrase, cried out by Ollie, when in moments of distress, as Stan stands helplessly by, is "Why don't you do something to help me?" 
"D'oh!" is a catchphrase used by James Finlayson, the mustachioed Scottish actor who appeared in 33 Laurel and Hardy films. The phrase, expressing surprise, impatience, or incredulity, was the inspiration for "D'oh!" as spoken by the fictional character Homer Simpson in the long running animated comedy The Simpsons. Homer's first intentional use of "d'oh!" occurred in the Ullman short "Punching Bag" (1988). 
The Sons of the Desert 
The official Laurel and Hardy appreciation society is known as The Sons of the Desert, after a fraternal society in their film of the same name (1933).  It was founded in New York City in 1965 by Laurel and Hardy biographers John McCabe, Orson Bean, Al Kilgore, Chuck McCann and  John Municino, with the sanction of Stan Laurel. Since the group's inception, well over 150 chapters of the organization have formed across North America, Europe and Australia. An Emmy-winning film documentary about the group, Revenge of the Sons of the Desert, has been released on DVD as part of The Laurel and Hardy Collection, Vol. 1.
Posthumous revivalsSince the 1930s, the works of Laurel and Hardy have been re-released in numerous theatrical reissues, television revivals (broadcast, especially public television, and cable), 16mm and 8mm home movies, feature-film compilations, and home video. After Stan Laurel's death in 1965, there were two major motion-picture tributes: Laurel and Hardy's Laughing '20s, Robert Youngson's compilation of the team's silent-film highlights; and The Great Race, a large-scale salute to slapstick which director Blake Edwards dedicated to "Mr. Laurel and Mr. Hardy." For many years the duo were impersonated by Jim MacGeorge (as Laurel) and Chuck McCann (as Hardy) in children's TV shows and television commercials for various products. There are two Laurel and Hardy museums, one in Laurel's birthplace, Ulverston, United Kingdom,  and the other in Hardy's birthplace, Harlem, Georgia, United States. Maurice Sendak showed three identical Oliver Hardy figures as bakers preparing cakes for the morning in his award-winning children's book In the Night Kitchen (1970).  This is treated as a clear example  of "interpretative illustration" wherein the comedians' inclusion harked back to the author's own childhood.Sendak described his early upbringing as sitting in movie houses fascinated by the Laurel and Hardy comedies.  The Beatles used cut-outs of Stan Laurel and Oliver Hardy as two of the cutout celebrity crowd for the cover of their 1967 album, Sergeant Pepper's Lonely Hearts Club Band.A 2005 poll by fellow comedians and comedy insiders of the top 50 comedians for The Comedian's Comedian, a TV documentary broadcast on UK's Channel 4, voted the duo the seventh greatest comedy act ever, making them the top double act on the list. Numerous colorized versions of copyright-free Laurel and Hardy features and shorts have been reproduced by a multitude of production studios. Although the results of adding color were often in dispute, many of the popular titles are currently only available in the colorized version. The color process often renders the print into an "unwatchable" state, while some scenes were altered or deleted, dependent on the source material used. Tooze, Gary. "Laurel & Hardy - The Collection (21-disc Box Set)." dvdbeaver.com. Retrieved: April 20, 2011.  Helpmates (1932) was the first film to undergo the process; it was experimented upon by Colorization Inc., a subsidiary of Hal Roach Studios in 1983. Colorization became a success for the studio and Helpmates was released on home video with the colorized version of The Music Box (1932) in 1986. The technology for this process was inferior compared to today's digital colorization technology. There were numerous continuity errors and garish color design choices. However the most significant criticism that these versions received revolved around their editing: whole scenes were altered or deleted altogether, changing the character of the film.Merchandiser Larry Harmon claimed ownership of Laurel's and Hardy's likenesses, and issued Laurel and Hardy toys and coloring books. He co-produced a series of Laurel and Hardy cartoons in 1966 with Hanna-Barbera Productions.  His animated versions of Laurel and Hardy guest-starred in a 1972 episode of Hanna-Barbera's The New Scooby-Doo Movies. In 1999, Harmon produced a direct-to-video feature, the live-action comedy The All-New Adventures of Laurel and Hardy: For Love or Mummy, with actors Bronson Pinchot and Gailard Sartain playing the lookalike nephews of the original Laurel and Hardy, Stanley Thinneus Laurel and Oliver Fatteus Hardy. 
Around the worldLaurel and Hardy are popular in many countries around the world, but often have been given different names, for example in Poland they are known as Flip and Flap (Flip i Flap), in Germany as "Dick und Doof"*, and in Italy as Stanlio e Ollio*.
Filmographies 

Laurel and Hardy filmography
Oliver Hardy filmography
Stan Laurel filmography


References

Notes 
Citations 
Bibliography 

Andrews, Robert, Famous Lines: A Columbia Dictionary of Familiar Quotations. New York: Columbia University Press, 1997. ISBN 0-231-10218-6.
Barr, Charles. Laurel & Hardy (Movie Paperbacks ). Berkeley, California: University of California Press, 1974, first edition 1967. ISBN 0-520-00085-4.
Bergen, Ronald. The Life and Times of Laurel and Hardy. New York: Smithmark, 1992. ISBN 0-8317-5459-1.
Cullen, Frank, Florence Hackman and Donald McNeilly. Vaudeville, Old and New: An Encyclopedia of Variety Performers in America. London: Routledge, 2007. ISBN 978-0-415-93853-2.
Everson, William K. The Complete Films of Laurel and Hardy. New York: Citadel, 2000, First edition 1967. ISBN 0-8065-0146-4.
Gehring, Wes D. Laurel & Hardy: A Bio-Bibliography. Burnham Bucks, UK: Greenwood Press, 1990. ISBN 978-0-313-25172-6.
Haines, Richard W. Technicolor Movies: The History of Dye Transfer Printing. Jefferson, North Carolina: McFarland & Company, Inc., 1993. ISBN 0-89950-856-1.
Lanes, Selma G. The Art of Maurice Sendak. New York: Harry N. Abrams; 2nd revised edition, 1998, first edition, 1980. ISBN 0-8109-8063-0.
Louvish, Simon. Stan and Ollie: The Roots of Comedy. London: Faber & Faber, 2001. ISBN 0-571-21590-4.
McCabe, John with Al Kilgore and Richard W. Bann. Laurel & Hardy.  New York: Bonanza Books, 1983, First edition 1975, E.P. Dutton. ISBN 978-0-491-01745-9.
McCabe, John. Mr. Laurel & Mr. Hardy: An Affectionate Biography. London: Robson Books, 2004, First edition 1961, ISBN 1-86105-606-0. Reprint: New York: Doubleday & Co., 1987, 1966.
McCabe, John. The Comedy World of Stan Laurel. New York: Robson Press, 2004, First edition 1974, Doubleday & Co. ISBN 978-0-940410-23-7.
McGarry, Annie. Laurel & Hardy. London: Bison Group, 1992. ISBN 0-86124-776-0.
MacGillivray, Scott. Laurel & Hardy: From the Forties Forward, Second Edition, Revised and Expanded. New York: iUniverse, 2009; First edition Lanham, Maryland: Vestal Press, 1998. ISBN 1-4401-7239-0.
McIver, Stuart B. Dreamers, Schemers and Scalawags. Sarasota, Florida: Pineapple Press Inc., 1998. ISBN 978-1-56164-155-0.
Mitchell, Glenn. The Laurel & Hardy Encyclopedia. New York: Batsford, 2010, First edition 1995. ISBN 978-1-905287-71-0.
Sagert, Kelly Boyer. Flappers: A Guide to an American Subculture. Westport, Connecticut: Greenwood, 2010. ISBN 978-0-313-37690-0.
Smith, Leon. Following the Comedy Trail: A Guide to Laurel & Hardy and Our Gang Film Locations. Littleton, Massachusetts: G.J. Enterprises, 1984. ISBN 978-0-938817-05-5.
Skretvedt, Randy. Laurel and Hardy: The Magic Behind the Movies (2nd ed.) Anaheim, California: Past Times Publishing Co., 1996,ISBN 0-940410-29-X, First edition 1987, Moonstone Press.
 
Further reading 

Anobile, Richard J., ed. A Fine Mess: Verbal and Visual Gems from The Crazy World of Laurel & Hardy. New York: Crown Publishers. 1975. ISBN 0-517-52438-4.
Brooks, Leo M. The Laurel & Hardy Stock Company. Hilversum, Netherlands: Blotto Press. 1997. ISBN 90-901046-1-5.
Byron, Stuart and Elizabeth Weis, eds. The National Society of Film Critics on Movie Comedy. New York: Grossman/Viking, 1977. ISBN 978-0-670-49186-5.
Crowther, Bruce. Laurel and Hardy: Clown Princes of Comedy. New York: Columbus Books, 1987. ISBN 978-0-86287-344-8.
Durgnat, Raymond. "Beau Chumps and Church Bells" (essay)."  The Crazy Mirror: Hollywood Comedy and the American Image. New York: Dell Publishing, 1970. ISBN 978-0-385-28184-3.
Everson, William K. The Films of Hal Roach. New York: Museum of Modern Art, 1971. ISBN 978-0-87070-559-5.
Gehring, Wes D. Film Clowns of the Depression: Twelve Defining Comic Performances. Jefferson, North Carolina: McFarland & Co., 2007. ISBN 978-0-7864-2892-2.
Guiles, Fred Lawrence. Stan: The Life of Stan Laurel. New York: Stein & Day, 1991, First edition 1980. ISBN 978-0-8128-8528-6.
Harness, Kyp. The Art of Laurel and Hardy: Graceful Calamity in the Films. Jefferson, North Carolina: McFarland & Company, 2006. ISBN 0-7864-2440-0.
Kanin, Garson. Together Again!: Stories of the Great Hollywood Teams. New York: Doubleday & Co., 1981. ISBN 978-0-385-17471-8.
Kerr, Walter. The Silent Clowns. New York: Da Capo Press, 1990, First edition 1975, Alfred A. Knopf. ISBN 978-0-306-80387-1.
Lahue, Kalton C. World of Laughter: The Motion Picture Comedy Short, 1910-1930. Norman, OK: University of Oklahoma Press, 1966. ISBN 978-0-8061-0693-9.
Maltin, Leonard. The Great Movie Comedians. New York: Crown Publishers, 1978. ISBN 978-0-517-53241-6.
Maltin, Leonard. The Laurel & Hardy Book (The Curtis Films Series). Sanibel Island, FL: Ralph Curtis Books, 1973.
Maltin, Leonard. Movie Comedy Teams. New York: New American Library, 1985, First edition 1970. ISBN 978-0-452-25694-1.
Maltin, Leonard, Selected Short Subjects (first published as The Great Movie Shorts. New York: Crown Publishers, 1972.) New York: Da Capo Press, 1983. ISBN 978-0-452-25694-1
Marriot, A.J. Laurel & Hardy: The British Tours. Hitchen, Herts, UK: AJ Marriot, 1993. ISBN 0-9521308-0-7.
Mast, Gerald. The Comic Mind: Comedy and the Movies. Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 1979, First edition 1973. ISBN 978-0-226-50978-5.
McCabe, John. Babe: The Life of Oliver Hardy. London: Robson Books, 2004, First edition 1989, Citadel. ISBN 1-86105-781-4.
McCaffrey, Donald W. "Duet of Incompetence" from The Golden Age of Sound Comedy: Comic Films and Comedians of the Thirties. New York: A.S. Barnes, 1973. ISBN 978-0-498-01048-4.
McIntyre, Willie. The Laurel & Hardy Digest: A Cocktail of Love and Hisses. Ayrshire, Scotland: Willie McIntyre, 1998. ISBN 978-0-9532958-0-7.
Nollen, Scott Allen. The Boys: The Cinematic World of Laurel and Hardy. Jefferson, North Carolina: McFarland & Co., 1989. ISBN 978-0-7864-1115-3.
Robb, Brian J. The Pocket Essential Laurel & Hardy. Manchester, UK: Pocket Essentials, 2008. ISBN 978-1-84243-285-3.
Robinson, David. The Great Funnies: A History of Film Comedy. New York: E.P. Dutton, 1969. ISBN 978-0-289-79643-6.
Sanders, Jonathan. Another Fine Dress: Role Play in the Films of Laurel and Hardy. London: Cassell, 1995. ISBN 978-0-304-33196-3.
Scagnetti, Jack. The Laurel & Hardy Scrapbook. New York: Jonathan David Publishers, 1982. ISBN 978-0-8246-0278-9.
Sendak, Maurice. In the Night Kitchen. New York: HarperCollins, First edition 1970. ISBN 0-06-026668-6.
Staveacre, Tony. Slapstick!: The Illustrated Story. London: Angus & Robertson Publishers, 1987. ISBN 978-0-207-15030-2.
Stone, Rob et al. Laurel or Hardy: The Solo Films of Stan Laurel and Oliver Hardy. Manchester, New Hampshire: Split Reel, 1996. ISBN 0-9652384-0-7.
Ward, Richard Lewis. A History of the Hal Roach Studios. Carbondale, Illinois: Southern Illinois University Press, 2006. ISBN 978-0-8093-2637-2.
Weales, Gerald. Canned Goods as Caviar: American Film Comedy of the 1930s. Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 1985. ISBN 978-0-226-87664-1.
 
External links 

 
 
The Official Sons of the Desert Website
The Official Laurel and Hardy Website
Laurel and Hardy Films Official Website
Laurel and Hardy Central.com
Laurel and Hardy Forum.com
The Laurel and Hardy Discussion Group on Yahoo!Groups
Another Nice Mess: The Films of Laurel & Hardy
 
  
DEFAULTSORT







  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Keith Emerson
 
 Keith Noel Emerson (born 2 November 1944, Todmorden, West Yorkshire) is an English keyboard player and composer. Formerly a member of the Keith Emerson Trio, John Brown's Bodies, The T-Bones, The V.I.P.'s, P.P. Arnold's backing band, and The Nice (which evolved from P.P. Arnold's band), he was a founder of Emerson, Lake & Palmer (ELP), one of the early supergroups, in 1970. Following the breakup of ELP, circa 1979, Emerson had modest success with Emerson, Lake & Powell in the 1980s as well as with 3, with the album To the Power of Three. ELP reunited during the early 1990s, releasing the album Black Moon. Emerson also reunited The Nice in 2002 for a tour. His latest album, Keith Emerson Band featuring Marc Bonilla, was released in 2008.Along with contemporaries Richard Wright of Pink Floyd, Tony Banks of Genesis, Rick Wakeman of Yes and Jon Lord of Deep Purple, Emerson is widely regarded as one of the top keyboard players of the progressive rock era.       Allmusic refers to Emerson as "perhaps the greatest, most technically accomplished keyboardist in rock history".  "Keith Emerson has proven himself perhaps the greatest, most technically accomplished keyboardist in rock history." 
Biography 

Emerson grew up in the seaside resort of Worthing, West Sussex, England. As a child, he learned western classical music, from which he derived a lot of inspiration to create his own style, combining classical music, jazz, and rock themes. Emerson became intrigued with the Hammond organ after hearing jazz organist Jack McDuff perform "Rock Candy" and it subsequently became his instrument of choice for performing in the late 1960s. This blending of elements is illustrated in his participation in the 1969 Music From Free Creek "supersession" project, where Emerson performs with drummer Mitch Mitchell and bassist Chuck Rainey covering, among other tracks, the Eddie Harris instrumental "Freedom Jazz Dance".Emerson acquired his first Hammond organ when he was 15 or 16, an L-100, on hire purchase The flamboyance that Emerson came to be known for began by chance when a fight broke out during a V.I.P.s performance in France. The band told him to keep playing so he made some explosion and machine gun sounds with his Hammond organ, which stopped the fight; everyone looked on with amazement. The other band members told him to do it at the next concert, which he did with success.   Emerson first heard the Moog when a record shop owner played Switched-On Bach for him. Emerson said: "My God that's incredible, what is that played on?" The owner then showed him the album cover. So I said, "What is that?" And he said, "That's the Moog synthesizer." My first impression was that it looked a bit like electronic skiffle." Without one of his own, Emerson borrowed Mike Vickers' Moog for an upcoming Nice concert at the Royal Festival Hall, London with the Royal Philharmonic. Mike helped patch the Moog and the concert was a great success. Emerson's performance of Also sprach Zarathustra from the recently released 2001: A Space Odyssey was a show stopper. Emerson: "I thought this was great. I've got to have one of these." With ELP's record deal with Atlantic came funds to buy the Moog. Keith: "It cost a lot of money and it arrived and I excitedly got it out of the box stuck it on the table and thought, 'Wow That's Great! a Moog synthesizer [pause] How do you switch it on?...There were all these leads and stuff, there was no instruction manual." Mike Vickers came through by patching it to produce six sounds and those six sounds became the foundation of ELP's sound. In 1969, Emerson incorporated the Moog modular synthesizer into his battery of keyboards. While other artists such as The Beatles and The Rolling Stones had used the Moog in studio recordings, Emerson was the first artist to tour with one. Emerson's use of the Moog was so important to the development of new models that he was given prototypes, such as the Constellation he took on one tour  and the Apollo, which had its debut on the opening track of Brain Salad Surgery, "Jerusalem."The Moog was a temperamental device; the oscillators went out of tune with temperature change. Emerson: "I had my faithful roady Rocky tune the instrument to A 440 just prior to the audience coming in, but once the audience came into the auditorium and the temperature rose up then everything went out of tune." 

His willingness to experiment with the Moog led to unexpected results, such as the time he stumbled into the signature sound for Hoedown, one of ELP's most popular tunes. Emerson: "We'd started working on that arrangement and then I hit, I don't know what, I switched a blue button and I put a patch cord in there, but anyway 'whoooeee.'" The so-called "Monster Moog," built from numerous modules, weighed in at a whopping 550 pounds, stood 10 feet tall and took 4 roadies to move. Even with its unpredictability, it became an indispensable component of not only ELP's concerts but also Emerson's. He is known for his technical skill and for his live antics, including using knives to wedge down specific keys of his Hammond organ during solos, playing the organ upside down while having it lie over him and backwards while standing behind it, and has cited guitarist Jimi Hendrix and English organist Don Shinn as his chief theatrical influences. He also employed a special rig to rotate his piano end-over-end while he was playing it, though this of course is purely for visual effect, as a piano cannot operate as an instrument while upside down.Emerson has performed several notable rock arrangements of classical compositions, ranging from J. S. Bach via Modest Mussorgsky to 20th century composers such as Béla Bartók, Aaron Copland, Leoš Janáček and Alberto Ginastera. Occasionally Emerson has quoted from classical and jazz works without giving credit, particularly early in his career, from the late 1960s until 1972. The song "Rondo" by The Nice is a 4/4 interpretation of "Blue Rondo à la Turk" by the Dave Brubeck Quartet, originally in 9/8 time signature. The piece is introduced by an extensive quote from Bach's Italian Concerto, third movement. In fact, considering the Bach and Emerson's own improvisations, the Brubeck contribution is merely the anchoring theme.On ELP's eponymous first album, Emerson's classical quotes went largely uncredited. "The Barbarian" is heavily influenced by "Allegro barbaro" by Bartók, and "Knife Edge" was virtually a note-for-note restatement of "Sinfonietta" by Janáček. Note-for-note extracts were taken from pieces by Bartók, Janáček and Bach, mixed in with some original material, and credited completely to Emerson, Lake, Palmer and roadie Richard Fraser. By 1971, with the releases Pictures at an Exhibition and Trilogy, Emerson began to fully credit classical composers, Modest Mussorgsky for the piano piece which inspired the first album, and Aaron Copland for "Hoedown" on the second. Emerson was adamant that he did not use Maurice Ravel's orchestration of Pictures at an Exhibition in developing his own version.
Emerson provided music for a number of films since 1980, including Dario Argento's Inferno and World of Horror, the 1981 thriller Nighthawks and, more recently, Godzilla: Final Wars. He was also the composer for the short-lived 1994 animated television series Iron Man.In 1990 Emerson toured with The Best, a short-lived supergroup which also included John Entwistle, Joe Walsh, Jeff "Skunk" Baxter and Simon Phillips.In 2002 Emerson re-formed and toured with The Nice, though performing a longer set of ELP music using a backing band including guitarist/vocalist Dave Kilminster.In 2004, Emerson published his autobiography entitled Pictures of an Exhibitionist, which dealt with his entire career, particularly focusing on his early days with The Nice, and his nearly career-ending nerve-graft surgery in 1993.  Emerson was the headliner of both the first and third Moogfest, a festival held in honour of Robert Moog at the B.B. King Blues Club & Grill in New York City in 2004 and 2006 respectively.  Emerson opened the Led Zeppelin reunion/Ahmet Ertegun tribute concert at the O2 Arena in London on 10 December 2007, along with Chris Squire and Alan White (Yes) and Simon Kirke (Bad Company/Free). The supergroup played the new arrangement of "Fanfare for the Common Man".The album Keith Emerson Band Featuring Marc Bonilla was released in August 2008. He toured with his own band in Russia, the Baltic States and Japan between August and October 2008. The tour band members were Marc Bonilla, Travis Davis and Tony Pia. On 30 June 2009, Emerson appeared as a guest during Spinal Tap's 'One Night Only World Tour' at Wembley Arena, during the songs "Short And Sweet" and "Heavy Duty".In March 2010, Emerson received a Frankfurt Music Prize from the city of Frankfurt.  In the same month, Tokyo Philharmonic Orchestra made a premier performance of "Tarkus" arranged by a renowned Japanese composer Takashi Yoshimatsu.
Emerson toured with Greg Lake in the US and Canada during spring of 2010, doing a series of "An Intimate Evening with Emerson and Lake" duo shows in which they performed newly arranged versions of the music of Emerson, Lake & Palmer, The Nice, and King Crimson as well as Emerson's new original composition.On 25 July 2010, a one-off Emerson, Lake & Palmer reunion concert closed the High Voltage Festival as the main act in Victoria Park, East London to commemorate the band's 40th anniversary.In September 2010, Emerson released a message stating "During a routine medical examination, a colonoscopy revealed a rather dangerous polyp in my lower colon. It is of the conclusion of the doctors here in London that I must undergo surgery immediately. Unfortunately, the timing of this urgent surgery does not allow me to start touring in early October because of the required period of hospitalization and recuperation. I must remain optimistic that all will turn out well".In September 2011, Emerson began working with the renowned conductor Terje Mikkelsen, along with the Keith Emerson Band featuring Marc Bonilla and The Munich Radio Orchestra on new orchestral renditions of ELP classics and their new compositions. In recent years, several notable classic music composers, conductors and musicians have been performing various orchestral versions of Emerson’s compositions, such as “Tarkus” and “Piano Concerto No.1”, around the world. As of 2012, the documentary film about Emerson "Emerson:Pictures of an Exhibitionist" is in post production. He occasionally sits in with jazz orchestras performing new arrangements of ELP pieces as well as standard jazz pieces.
Instrumentation and playing style 
On stage Emerson started out on Hammond organ, with a grand piano toward the back of the stage. By the end of his time with The Nice, the standard arrangement was two Hammond organs, a C-3 (only cosmetically different than a B-3) and an L-100, placed facing each other with the C-3 to the left from the audience point of view. The L-100 took plenty of abuse during the stage act and was usually reinforced, to the point where it weighed so much that, on at least one occasion, Emerson became trapped beneath it and had to be rescued by a roadie. At any given time Emerson is said  to have owned several L-100 models, in various stages of repair, to support his act. The C-3, in contrast, seems to have lasted for years.Although the Hammond L-100 with its shorter manuals is considered a "poor man's" Hammond, Emerson not only played much of the early Nice music on his L-100, but also made good use of some of its unique features which his bigger Hammond C-3 does not provide. The L-100 has a self-starting motor, which - if turned off and on in short intervals - renders the whole organ into a wailing howl while the note generator, which is tied to a synchronous motor, tries to recover to pitch. The L-100 also features a spring-loaded reverb tank, which produces bomb-like noises if shaken. Both effects can be heard in abundance on "Rondo 69". On "Ars Longa Vita Brevis" Emerson uses the reverb tank as a musical instrument, tapping the internal spring against the tank bottom in an effort to create a chromatic scale of "boings".With ELP, Emerson added the Moog synthesiser behind the C-3 with the keyboard and ribbon controller stacked on the top of the organ. The ribbon controller allowed Emerson to vary pitch, volume or timbre of the output from the Moog by moving his finger up and down the length of a touch-sensitive strip. It also could be used as a phallic symbol, which quickly became a feature of the act. When the Minimoog entered the act it was placed where needed, such as on top of the grand piano. The same location was also used for an electric Clavinet keyboard, used almost exclusively for the encore piece "Nut Rocker".During the Brain Salad Surgery tour of 1974 (one show of which was documented on the 3-LP set, Welcome Back My Friends, to the Show That Never Ends), Emerson's keyboard setup included the Hammond C-3 organ, run through multiple Leslie speakers driven by HiWatt guitar amplifiers, the Moog 3C modular synthesiser (modified by addition of various modules and an oscilloscope) with ribbon controller, a Steinway concert grand piano with a Moog Minimoog synthesiser on top of it (used for the steel drum part on Karn Evil 9, 2nd Impression), an upright acoustic-electric piano that was used for honky-tonk piano sounds, a Hohner Clavinet and another Moog Minimoog synthesiser. Emerson also used a prototype polyphonic synthesiser produced by Moog, which was the test bed for the Moog Polymoog polyphonic synthesiser. The original synthesiser setup as envisioned by Moog was called the Constellation, and consisted of three instruments - the polyphonic synthesiser, called the Apollo, a monophonic lead synthesizer called the Lyra, and a bass-pedal synthesiser, called the Taurus. Moog eventually produced the Moog Taurus bass pedal synthesiser as a separate instrument, as well as the Polymoog Synthesiser and Polymoog Keyboard. The Apollo polyphonic synthesiser is currently at a keyboard museum in Calgary, Alberta, Canada. Emerson still owns the Lyra synthesiser.Occasionally Emerson used a pipe organ, when available. In particular, at the Newcastle City Hall he used the Harrison & Harrison pipe organ for the introductory section of Pictures at an Exhibition. The organ is located at the rear above the stage, at the top of a series of steps where choirs can stand. The end of the introductory passage is followed by a drum roll, covering the time while Emerson descended the steps. While all went well for the recording used to produce the album, the debut tour performance at the same venue ground to a halt as the power failed, just as Emerson arrived at the Hammond organ to open the next part of the piece. After a lengthy delay the performance continued with only the Hammond L-100 functioning.Emerson also used the organ at the Royal Festival Hall for "The Three Fates" from the eponymous debut album by the group. He also used another pipe organ for "The Only Way (Hymn)" from Tarkus. Emerson used the Royal Festival Hall pipe organ again in October 2002 for the introductory quotation from Dvorak's 9th Symphony (From The New World), before running back to the stage and performing "America (2nd Amendment)".Amplifiers and speakers behind Emerson became more elaborate, including a Leslie unit. There was also a board attached to the front of the stack, intended as a target for his knife throwing. He was given his trademark knife, an authentic Nazi dagger, by Lemmy, who was a roadie for The Nice in his earlier days.    During the Brain Salad Surgery tour, at the end of the show, a sequencer in the Moog Modular synthesiser was set running at an increasing rate, with the Moog Synthesiser pivoting to face the audience while a large pair of silver bat wings was deployed at the back of the synthesiser.As the technology of electronic keyboard instruments became more sophisticated, Emerson was quick to adopt new instruments, such as the Yamaha GX1 polyphonic synthesiser, one of which can be seen on the video promoting "Fanfare for the Common Man". Emerson was reported to have spent $50,000 to buy the Yamaha GX-1 synthesiser at the time of the Works Volume 1 album. Emerson later bought a 2nd GX-1 from John Paul Jones of Led Zeppelin, to use to repair his GX-1, which was damaged by a tractor crash into Emerson's home studio. At the time that Emerson left England in the early 1990s to move to Santa Monica, California, he sold the majority of his keyboard equipment, though not the modular Moog. The original Yamaha GX-1 was bought by Hans Zimmer of movie soundtrack fame, while the John Paul Jones GX-1 was bought by a collector in Italy.In 1978, Emerson became the official endorser of the world's first fully polyphonic synthesisers, the Korg PS-3300 and PS-3100. He started recording with them around this time too and the Korg PS-3300 was heavily used on the ELP album Love Beach. He carried on using it into the 1980s, the instrument dominating the 1981 film soundtrack for Nighthawks which starred Sylvester Stallone.He would sometimes reach into the interior and hit, pluck or strum the strings with his hand. The introduction to "Take a Pebble" included chords and arpeggios played by pressing down on keys, to raise the dampers from the strings, and playing the strings inside the piano as one might play the autoharp. In the live performance of "Hang On to A Dream" with the Nice, recorded for the post-breakup album Elegy, he performed a cadenza of sorts hitting the piano strings with a small hammer, followed by a lengthy wind-down, returning to the song in which he alternated keyboard arpeggios with blows directly on the bass strings.
Discography
Solo

Inferno - soundtrack (1980)
Nighthawks - soundtrack (1981)
Honky (1982)
Best Revenge - soundtrack (1985)
Murder Rock - soundtrack (1986)
The Emerson Collection (1986)
Harmageddon/China Free Fall (1987)
The Christmas Album (1988)
Changing States (aka Cream of Emerson Soup) (1995)
Emerson Plays Emerson (2002)
La Chiesa - soundtrack (2002)
Godzilla: Final Wars - soundtrack (2004)
At the Movies (2005)
Hammer It Out (anthology) (2005)
Off the Shelf (2006)
Keith Emerson Band featuring Marc Bonilla (2008)
"Moscow" - live album CD & DVD (2010)


As part of a groupFor Emerson's work with The Nice, see The Nice Discography. For Emerson's work with Emerson, Lake & Palmer, see Emerson, Lake & Palmer discography. For Emerson's work with Emerson, Lake & Powell, see Emerson, Lake & Powell Discography. For Emerson's work with 3, see 3 Discography.Emerson also appeared with the short-lived group Aliens of Extraordinary Ability with Stuart Smith, Richie Onori, Marvin Sperling and Robbie Wykoff. 
Partial list of pieces based on other composers' worksNote that lack of credit does not imply plagiarism. It is certain that, where required, royalties were paid to composers or their estates. Permission to use pieces was sometimes denied by the composer's family or estate, as for instance with Gustav Holst's Mars, the Bringer of War. Aaron Copland was said to be somewhat puzzled by Emerson's take on Fanfare For the Common Man, but approved its use. Alberto Ginastera, on the other hand, was thrilled by Emerson's electronic realization of his first piano concerto, the fourth movement of which appeared on their album Brain Salad Surgery under the title "Toccata," and declared that he wished he could have done it in that fashion.
With the Nice

"America, 2nd Amendment", from West Side Storys "America", by Leonard Bernstein, credited, quoting Antonín Dvořák's symphony No. 9, From the New World, uncredited.
"Rondo", derived from Dave Brubeck's "Blue Rondo à la Turk", uncredited, quoting Bach, Italian Concerto third movement, uncredited.
"Diary of an Empty Day", from Symphonie Espagnole by Édouard Lalo, credited.
"Azrael Revisited", quoting Sergei Rachmaninoff's Prelude in C-sharp minor, credited, and Lennie Tristano's Turkish Mambo, uncredited.
"Ars Longa Vita Brevis" - Bach, the third Brandenburg Concerto, Allegro, credited.
"Intermezzo from the Karelia Suite" - Sibelius, credited.
"Pathetique", Symphony No. 6 by Tchaikovsky, credited.
"Hang on to a Dream", from "How Can We Hang On To A Dream?" by Tim Hardin, credited, quoting (during a live recording) "Summertime", from Porgy and Bess by George Gershwin, uncredited.
"She Belongs to Me", by Bob Dylan, credited, quoting Bach, uncredited, and fragments of the theme from The Magnificent Seven, by Elmer Bernstein, uncredited.
"Country Pie", by Bob Dylan, credited, lyrics partly set to Bach, the sixth Brandenburg Concerto, credited.


With ELP

"The Barbarian", based on Allegro barbaro, Sz. 49, BB 63 by Béla Bartók, uncredited on US release of Emerson Lake & Palmer (credited on the British Manticore re-pressing of the original LP, on the back cover of the LP jacket).
"Knife Edge", based on Sinfonietta by Leoš Janáček, uncredited on US release (credited on the British Manticore re-pressing of the original LP, on the back cover of the LP jacket); middle section based on French Suites by J.S. Bach, uncredited.
"The Only Way (Hymn)", incorporating (in the song's introduction and bridge) J.S. Bach's Toccata in F and Prelude VI, credited on Tarkus.
"Are You Ready Eddy?", based on the tune of Bobby Troup's song "The Girl Can't Help It" and including a quote from the Assembly bugle call, both uncredited (on Tarkus).
Pictures at an Exhibition, by Modest Mussorgsky, credited.
"Blues Variation" from Pictures at an Exhibition also contains an uncredited quote of the 'head' of Bill Evans' minor blues piece "Interplay", during Keith Emerson's Hammond Organ solo.
"Nutrocker", adapted by Kim Fowley (credited) from Tchaikovsky's "March of the Wooden Soldiers" (uncredited).
"Hoedown", from Rodeo by Aaron Copland, credited, quoting "Shortenin' Bread" and "Turkey in the Straw"", both traditional.
"Abaddon's Bolero", quoting "The Girl I Left Behind", traditional.
"Jerusalem", by C. Hubert H. Parry, credited.
"Toccata", from a piano concerto by Alberto Ginastera, endorsed by the composer, credited.
"Karn Evil 9, 2nd Impression", quoting "St. Thomas", a Caribbean melody sometimes attributed to Sonny Rollins, uncredited.
"Fanfare for the Common Man", by Aaron Copland, credited.
Carmina Burana, by Carl Orff, quoted in an extended solo in live recordings from Poland.
With Emerson, Lake & Powell, the main theme to "Touch & Go" is identical to the English folk song "Lovely Joan", better known as the counterpoint tune in Ralph Vaughan Williams Fantasia on Greensleeves Not credited. 
"Romeo & Juliet" from Romeo and Juliet suite by Sergei Prokofiev, credited.
"Love at First Sight" intro, 12 Etudes Op.10 (a son ami Franz Liszst) - No.1 in C major, allegro, by Frederic Chopin, uncredited.


With Billy Sherwood

"In The Flesh" (and Steve Porcaro + Vinnie Colaiuta, on Back Against The Wall) (2005)
"Black Dog" (and Alan White, on Led box The ultimate Led Zeppelin tribute) (2008)


Contemporary usageThe surreal comedy series, Big Train, featured Emerson portrayed by Kevin Eldon, as a Roman slave fighting his enemies with progressive rock. 
See also

List of Hammond organ players
List of Moog synthesizer players


References 

Forrester, George, Martyn Hanson and Frank Askew. Emerson, Lake & Palmer, The Show That Never Ends, A Musical Biography. (2001) Helter Skelter Publishing ISBN 1-900924-17-X.
Keith Emerson, Pictures of an Exhibitionist. (2004) ISBN 1-84454-053-7


External links 

 
 
 
Official ELP website

 
  
 
 
DEFAULTSORT











 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Stanley Fish
Stanley Eugene Fish (born April 19, 1938 in Providence, Rhode Island ) is an American literary theorist, legal scholar, academic, and public intellectual. He is often associated with postmodernism, at times to his irritation, as he describes himself as an anti-foundationalist. 
He is the Davidson-Kahn Distinguished University Professor of Humanities and a professor of law at Florida International University, in Miami, as well as Dean Emeritus of the College of Liberal Arts and Sciences at the University of Illinois at Chicago, and the author of 12 books. Fish has also taught at the Cardozo School of Law, University of California, Berkeley, Johns Hopkins University, The University of Pennsylvania, Yale Law, Columbia University, The John Marshall Law School, and Duke University.
Academic careerFish earned a B.A. from the University of Pennsylvania in 1959, and an M.A. from Yale University in 1960.  He completed his Ph.D. in 1962, also at Yale University. He taught English at the University of California at Berkeley and Johns Hopkins University before becoming Arts and Sciences Professor of English and Professor of Law at Duke University from 1986 to 1998. From 1999 to 2004 he was Dean of the College of Liberal Arts and Sciences at the University of Illinois at Chicago, as well as serving as Distinguished Visiting Professor at The John Marshall Law School from 2000 until 2002.   He also held joint appointments in the Departments of Political Science and Criminal Justice, and was the chairman of the Religious Studies Committee.  During his tenure there, he recruited professors well respected in the academic community and garnered a lot of attention for the College.  After resigning as dean in a high-level dispute with the state of Illinois over funding UIC,  Fish spent a year teaching in the Department of English. The Institute for the Humanities at UIC named a lecture series in his honor, which is still ongoing.  In June 2005, he accepted the position of Davidson-Kahn Distinguished University Professor of Humanities and Law at Florida International University, teaching in the FIU College of Law. In November 2010 he joined the Board of Visitors of Ralston College, a start-up institution in Savannah, Georgia.  He has also been a Fellow of the American Academy of Arts and Science since 1985 . 
MiltonFish started his career as a medievalist. His first book, published by Yale University Press in 1965, was on the late-medieval/early-Renaissance poet John Skelton. Fish reveals in his partly biographical essay, "Milton, Thou Shouldst be Living at this Hour" (published in There's No Such Thing as Free Speech . . . And It's a Good Thing, Too), that he came to Milton by accident. In 1963 — the same year that Fish started as an assistant professor at the University of California, Berkeley — the resident Miltonist, Constantinos A. Patrides, received a grant. The chair of the department asked Fish to teach the Milton course, notwithstanding the fact that the young professor "had never — either as an undergraduate or in graduate school — taken a Milton course" (269). The eventual result of that course was Surprised by Sin: The Reader in Paradise Lost (1967; rpt. 1997).  Fish's 2001 book, How Milton Works, reflects five decades' worth of his scholarship on Milton.
Interpretive communities 
As a prominent and respected literary theorist, Fish is best known for his analysis of interpretive communities — an offshoot of reader-response criticism. Fish's work in this field examines how the interpretation of a text is dependent upon each reader's own subjective experience in one or more communities, each of which is defined as a 'community' by a distinct epistemology. For Fish, a large part of what renders a reader’s subjective experience valuable — that is, why it may be considered “constrained” as opposed to an uncontrolled and idiosyncratic assertion of the self — comes from a concept native to the field of linguistics called linguistic competence. In Fish’s source the term is explained as “the idea that it is possible to characterize a linguistic system that every speaker shares.”  In the context of literary criticism, Fish uses this concept to argue that a reader’s approach to a text is not completely subjective, and that an internalized understanding of language shared by the native speakers of that given language makes possible the creation of normative boundaries for one’s experience with language.
Fish and university politicsIn addition to his work in literary criticism, Fish has also written extensively on the politics of the university, having taken positions supporting campus speech codes and criticizing political statements by universities or faculty bodies on matters outside their professional areas of expertise.Fish argued in January 2008 on his New York Times-syndicated blog that the humanities are of no instrumental value, but have only intrinsic worth. Fish explains, "To the question 'of what use are the humanities?', the only honest answer is none whatsoever. And it is an answer that brings honor to its subject. Justification, after all, confers value on an activity from a perspective outside its performance. An activity that cannot be justified is an activity that refuses to regard itself as instrumental to some larger good. The humanities are their own good. There is nothing more to say, and anything that is said diminishes the object of its supposed praise." Fish has lectured across the country at many universities and colleges including Florida Atlantic University, Brown University, the University of Pennsylvania, Harvard University, University of Toronto, Columbia University, the University of Vermont, the University of Georgia, the University of Louisville, the University of Kentucky, Bates College,the University of Central Florida, the University of West Florida, and the Benjamin N. Cardozo School of Law.
Fish as university politicianAs chair of the Duke English department from 1986 to 1992, Fish attracted attention and controversy. Fish, according to Lingua Franca, used "shameless—and in academe unheard-of—entrepreneurial gusto" to take "a respectable but staid Southern English department and transform it into the professional powerhouse of the day," in part through the payment of lavish salaries. His time at Duke saw comparatively quite light undergraduate and graduate coursework requirements, matched by heavy graduate teaching requirements. This permitted professors to reduce their own teaching. In April 1992, near the end of Fish's time as department chair, an external review committee considered evidence that the English curriculum had become "a hodgepodge of uncoordinated offerings," lacking in "broad foundational courses" or faculty planning. The department's dissipating prominence in the 1990s was featured on the front page of the New York Times. Within the first years following Fish's departure as chair, many of his most prominent hires left, including Eve Kosofsky Sedgwick (citing anti-intellectualism and homophobia), Michael Moon, and Jonathan Goldberg. By 1999, Fish's wife, Americanist Jane Tompkins, had "practically quit teaching" at Duke and "worked as a cook at a local health food restaurant." 
Criticisms of his workAs a frequent contributor to the New York Times  and the Wall Street Journal editorial page, Fish has been the target of wide-ranging criticism.Writing in Slate Magazine, Judith Shulevitz reported that not only does Fish openly proclaim himself "unprincipled" but also rejects wholesale the concepts of "fairness, impartiality, reasonableness." To Fish, "ideas have no consequences." For taking this stance, Shulevitz characterizes Fish as "not the unprincipled relativist he's accused of being. He's something worse. He's a fatalist." Likewise, among academics, Fish has endured vigorous criticism.  The conservative R. V. Young writes,  Terry Eagleton, a prominent British Marxist,  excoriates Fish's "discreditable epistemology" as "sinister." According to Eagleton, "Like almost all diatribes against universalism, Fish's critique of universalism has its own rigid universals: the priority at all times and places of sectoral interests, the permanence of conflict, the a priori status of belief systems, the rhetorical character of truth, the fact that all apparent openness is secretly closure, and the like." Hence, it is inherently self-defeating. Of Fish's attempt to co-opt the critiques leveled against him, Eagleton responds, "The felicitous upshot is that nobody can ever criticise Fish, since if their criticisms are intelligible to him, they belong to his cultural game and are thus not really criticisms at all; and if they are not intelligible, they belong to some other set of conventions entirely and are therefore irrelevant." In her essay "Sophistry about Conventions," philosopher Martha Nussbaum argues that Stanley Fish's theoretical views are based on "extreme relativism and even radical subjectivism."  Discounting his work as nothing more than sophistry, Nussbaum claims that Fish "relies on the regulative principle of non-contradiction in order to adjudicate between competing principles," thereby relying on normative standards of argumentation even as he argues against them.  Offering an alternative, Nussbaum cites John Rawls's work in A Theory of Justice to highlight "an example of a rational argument; it can be said to yield, in a perfectly recognizable sense, ethical truth."  Nussbaum appropriates Rawls's critique of the insufficiencies of Utilitarianism, showing that a rational person will consistently prefer a system of justice that acknowledges boundaries between separate persons rather than relying on the aggregation of the sum total of desires. "This," she claims, "is all together different from rhetorical manipulation." Camille Paglia, author of Sexual Personae and public intellectual, denounced Fish as a "totalitarian Tinkerbell," charging him with hypocrisy for lecturing about multiculturalism from the perspective of a tenured professor at the homogeneous and sheltered ivory tower of Duke. David Hirsch, a prominent critic of post-structuralist influences on hermeneutics, censured Fish for "lapses in logical rigor" and "carelessness toward rhetorical precision." In an examination of Fish's arguments, Hirsch attempts to demonstrate that "not only was a restoration of New Critical methods unnecessary, but that Fish himself had not managed to rid himself of the shackles of New Critical theory."  Hirsch compares Fish's work to Penelope's loom in the Odyssey, stating, "what one critic weaves by day, another unweaves by night."  "Nor," he writes, "does this weaving and unweaving constitute a dialectic, since no forward movement takes place."  Ultimately, Hirsch sees Fish as left to "wander in his own Elysian fields, hopelessly alienated from art, from truth, and from humanity." 
Awards
Fish received the PEN/Diamonstein-Spielvogel Award for the Art of the Essay in 1994 for There's No Such Thing As Free Speech, and it's a Good Thing, Too
See also

Formalism
New Criticism


Notes and references 
Bibliography
Primary works by Stanley Fish

John Skelton's Poetry.  New Haven, CT: Yale UP, 1965.
Surprised by Sin: The Reader in Paradise Lost.  Cambridge, MA: Harvard UP, 1967.  ISBN 0-674-85747-X (10).  ISBN 978-0-674-85747-6 (13).
Self-Consuming Artifacts: The Experience of Seventeenth-Century Literature.  Berkeley, CA: U of California P, 1972.
"Interpreting the Variorum."  Critical Inquiry (1976).
"Why We Can't All Just Get Along."  First Things (1996).
The Living Temple: George Herbert and Catechizing.  Berkeley, CA: U of California P, 1978.
Is There a Text in This Class? The Authority of Interpretive Communities.  Cambridge, MA: Harvard UP, 1980.  ISBN 0-674-46726-4 (10). ISBN 978-0-674-46726-2 (13).
Doing What Comes Naturally: Change, Rhetoric, and the Practice of Theory in Literary and Legal Studies.  Durham, NC: Duke UP, 1989.
Professional Correctness: Literary Studies and Political Change.  Cambridge, MA: Harvard U P, 1999.
The Trouble with Principle.  Cambridge, MA: Harvard UP, 1999.
How Milton Works.  Cambridge, MA: Harvard UP, 2001.
Save The World on Your Own Time Oxford: Oxford University Press, 2008.
The Fugitive in Flight: Faith, Liberalism, and Law in a Classic TV Show. Philadelphia, PA: University of Pennsylvania Press, 2010.
How to Write a Sentence: And How to Read One. New York, NY: HarperCollins Publishers, 2011.


Collections of works by Stanley Fish

There's No Such Thing As Free Speech, and it's a Good Thing, Too.  New York: Oxford UP, 1994.
The title essay and an additional essay, "Jerry Falwell's Mother," focus on free speech issues.  In the latter piece, Fish argues that, if one has some answer in mind to the question "what is free speech good for?" along the lines of "in the free and open clash of viewpoints the truth can more readily be known," then it makes no sense to defend deliberate malicious libel (such as that which was at issue in the U.S. Supreme Court case of Hustler Magazine v. Falwell) in the name of "free speech."
The Stanley Fish Reader.  Ed. H. Aram Veeser.  London: Blackwell Publishers, 1999.


Secondary criticism about Stanley Fish

Olson, Gary A.  Justifying Belief: Stanley Fish and the Work of Rhetoric.  Albany: SUNY P, 2002.
Postmodern Sophistry: Stanley Fish and the Critical Enterprise.  Ed. Gary Olson and Lynn Worsham.  Albany, NY: SUNY P, 2004.
Owen, J. Judd. Religion and the Demise of Liberal Rationalism.  Chapters 6–8 and "Appendix: A Reply to Stanley Fish." University of Chicago Press, 2001.
Perez-Firmat, Gustavo: “Interpretive Assumptions and Interpreted Texts:  On a Poem by Stanley Fish,” Essays in Literature, 11 (1984), 145–52.
Lang, Chris "The Reader-Response Theory of Stanley Fish"[5]
Landa, José Ángel García "Stanley E. Fish's Speech Acts"[6]

                                                                                          
External links 

Smart People Podcast interview with Stanley Fish
Interview with Stanley Fish published in The minnesota review March 3, 2000.  Accessed December 23, 2006.
"Leading Professor Stanley Fish to Join FIU Law Faculty."  Press release.  Florida International University.  June 29, 2005.
Stanley Fish article published in the Johns Hopkins University Guide to Literary Theory & Criticism.
Stanley Fish.  Florida International University Law School faculty biography.
Stanley Fish's blog at The New York Times Editorial section.
Stanley Fish on Deconstruction.  Radio interview with program host, Hugh LaFollette.  WETS-FM.  University of San Francisco.  n.d.  (Audio link.)
 

WorldCat Identities page for Stanley Eugene Fish

 
DEFAULTSORT













 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Lennox Lewis
 Lennox Claudius Lewis, CM, CBE (born 2 September 1965) is a retired boxer and the most recent undisputed world heavyweight champion. He holds dual British and Canadian citizenship. As an amateur he won gold representing Canada at the 1988 Olympic Games after defeating future heavyweight champion Riddick Bowe in the final.Lewis turned professional in 1989, winning his first 21 fights. In 1992 he knocked out Donovan Ruddock to take over the number one position in the World Boxing Council (WBC) rankings and eventually be declared WBC heavyweight champion in 1993. Lewis lost the title to Oliver McCall in 1994 but defeated McCall in a rematch to win the vacant WBC title in 1997. Lewis went on to defend the title four times, becoming the Lineal Champion after beating Shannon Briggs by KO in 1998. He became undisputed champion after defeating Evander Holyfield in November 1999. After defeating Mike Tyson by KO in 2002 and stopping Vitali Klitschko in 2003, Lennox Lewis retired from boxing in 2004.Throughout his professional career, Lewis suffered two losses, both of which he avenged in rematches, both by knockout. Lewis won the heavyweight championship three times and was the fifth man to reclaim the lineal championship.Lewis is   tall and has an   reach. During his boxing prime, he weighed about  . Lewis often referred to himself as "the pugilist specialist."
Early lifeLewis was born on 2 September, 1965, in West Ham, London, England to Jamaican-born parents.  At birth he weighed  , and was given the name Lennox by the doctor, who said he looked like a Lennox.  Lewis moved to Kitchener, Ontario, Canada in 1977 at the age of 12. He attended Cameron Heights Collegiate Institute for high school, where he excelled in Canadian football, soccer and basketball.   
Amateur careerLewis eventually decided that his favorite sport was boxing. He became a dominant amateur boxer and won the world amateur junior title in 1983.   At the age of 18, Lewis represented Canada as a super heavyweight at the 1984 Summer Olympics in Los Angeles. He advanced to the quarter-finals, where he lost a decision to American Tyrell Biggs, the eventual gold medalist.Lewis chose not to turn professional after the Olympics, and instead fought four more years as an amateur, hoping for a second chance to win a gold medal. After winning several more amateur titles during those years, he travelled to Seoul, South Korea for the 1988 Summer Olympics and achieved his goal. In the gold medal match, Lewis defeated future world champion Riddick Bowe by a second round referee stopped contest (RSC).
Professional boxing careerHaving achieved that goal, Lewis declared himself a professional boxer and moved back to his native England. He claimed he'd always considered himself British,      but many British fans regard him as "a Canadian at heart and a Briton for convenience," as he had trained only in Canada and the United States and already lived half his life in North America.   He signed with the boxing promoter Frank Maloney and the early part of his pro career was filled with knockouts of journeymen. After he signed with American promoter Main Events  he captured the European heavyweight title late in 1990 against Frenchman Jean Maurice Chanet. In his next fight in March 1991, Lewis won the British title against the undefeated world ranked Gary Mason, then won the Commonwealth title in April 1992 against Derek Williams.By this time, Lewis was a consensus top-five heavyweight in the world. During this period Lewis defeated former WBA heavyweight champion Mike Weaver, 1984 Olympic Gold medalist Tyrell Biggs, former world cruiserweight title holders Glenn McCrory and Osvaldo Ocasio, and journeymen Levi Billups and Mike Dixon.
WBC championOn 31 October 1992, Lewis knocked out Canadian Donovan "Razor" Ruddock in two rounds for the number one contender's position in the WBC world rankings. At the time it was Lewis' most impressive win, and established him as one of the world's best heavyweights. Sportscaster Larry Merchant declared following the win "We have a great new heavyweight."The win over Ruddock made Lewis the number one contender for Riddick Bowe's heavyweight championship. Bowe refused to face Lewis, and held a press conference to dump the title in a trash can and relinquish it. On 14 December 1992, the WBC declared Lewis its champion, making him the first world heavyweight titleholder from Britain in the 20th century.Lewis successfully defended the belt three times, defeating Tony Tucker, who was decked (in the third and ninth rounds) for the first time in his career, and he followed this up with knockout victories over Phil Jackson and Frank Bruno. The Lennox Lewis vs. Frank Bruno fight was the first time that two British-born boxers had fought for a version of the world heavyweight title. 
Loss to McCallLewis lost his WBC title to Oliver McCall on 24 September 1994 in a huge upset at the Wembley Arena in London. In the second round, McCall connected with a powerful right hook, putting Lewis down on his back. He was up at the count of six, but stumbled forward into the referee in a daze. Referee Jose Guadalupe Garcia felt Lewis was unable to continue and ended the fight, giving McCall the win by technical knockout. Lewis and others argued that the stoppage was premature and that a champion should be given the benefit of the doubt.    They also contended that Garcia, a Mexican referee working for the Mexican-based WBC, had been persuaded by promoter Don King to end the fight early if the opportunity arose, in order to bring back the heavyweight title to his promotional stable. Evans, Gavin (2005-09-19). Mama's Boy: Lennox Lewis and the Heavyweight Crown. Highdown Publishing. ISBN 9781905156092. After the fight, Lewis decided he needed a new trainer to replace Pepe Correa, who had become increasingly difficult to work with. Correa would subsequently denounce Lewis in public after being fired. Renowned trainer Emanuel Steward, who had been McCall's trainer during their fight, was one of Lewis' first choices for the task. Even before the fight with McCall, Steward had seen much potential in Lewis and immediately expressed a desire to work with him. He set about correcting several of Lewis' technical flaws over the course of the next few fights, which included maintaining a more balanced stance, less reliance on the right hand, and a particular focus on using a strong, authoritative jab; the latter of which would become a hallmark of Lewis' style throughout his career. Their partnership would last until Lewis' retirement, with both having mutual praise and respect for each other to this day. 
Regaining the WBC titleIn his first comeback fight Lewis was given a chance to fight for the mandatory challenger position within the WBC and won it by knocking out American contender Lionel Butler. However, at the behest of promoter Don King  the WBC chose to bypass him and give Mike Tyson the first shot at the title that had recently been won by fellow Briton Frank Bruno against Oliver McCall. Bruno had previously lost to both Lewis and Tyson.While Lewis had the No. 1 contender's slot in the WBC rankings he knocked out Australian Justin Fortune, then defeated former WBO Champion Tommy Morrison in October 1995, and Olympic gold medallist and former WBO champion Ray Mercer by a close majority decision in May 1996. Lewis successfully sued to try to force Tyson to make a mandatory defense of the WBC title against him or force Tyson to give up the title, winning a four million dollar settlement from promoter Don King. Rather than fight Lewis, Tyson relinquished the WBC belt to fight Evander Holyfield, and the title was declared vacant. This set up a rematch between Lewis and McCall, who squared off on 7 February 1997 in Las Vegas for the WBC title. In one of the strangest fights in boxing history, McCall (having lost the first three rounds) refused to box in the fourth and fifth rounds, then began crying in the ring, forcing the referee to stop the fight and award Lewis the victory and the title.
As newly re-crowned WBC champion, Lewis successfully defended the title during 1997 against fellow Briton and former WBO world champion Henry Akinwande, who was disqualified after five rounds for excessive clinching. Lewis then met Poland's Andrew Golota, whom he knocked out in the first round. During 1998, Lewis again retained the WBC world title when he knocked out lineal champion Shannon Briggs in five rounds (Briggs had recently outpointed George Foreman in a controversial fight, to win the lineal title) and beat formerly-undefeated European champion Željko Mavrović from Croatia in a 12-round unanimous decision. Lewis stated in 2006 that his fight with Mavrovic was the most awkward win of his career. 
Lewis vs. Holyfield
On 13 March 1999, Lewis faced WBA and IBF title holder Evander Holyfield in New York City in what was supposed to be a heavyweight unification bout. Lewis fought a brilliant tactical fight, keeping Holyfield off balance with a long jab and peppering him with combinations almost at will. Although most observers believed Lewis had clearly won the fight, the bout was declared a draw, to much controversy. The raw statistics of the fight suggested the bout belonged to Lewis, who landed 348 punches compared to Holyfield's 130. Lewis also out-jabbed Holyfield 137 to 52.  Judge Eugenia Williams, who scored the fight in Holyfield's favour, said she saw Lewis land fewer punches than Holyfield. 
Lewis vs. Holyfield II
The sanctioning bodies ordered a rematch.    Eight months later in Las Vegas (13 November 1999), the two men fought again in a more open and entertaining contest than the original fight, with the two boxers having some heavy exchanges from rounds 6 to 9. The punch stats however still clearly favoured Lewis who landed 195 punches to Evander Holyfield's 137 punches, although interestingly Lewis landed 119 power shots and 76 jabs, showing a definite shift in his tactics from the first fight when he focused more on the jab. This time around the 3 Judges did score the fight unanimously (115–113, 116–112 & 117–111) all in favour of Lewis who became undisputed heavyweight champion of the World.In 1999, Lewis was given one of the most prestigious sports awards in Britain, being voted the BBC Sports Personality of the Year.
Reign as Undisputed ChampionAfter Lewis defeated Holyfield the WBA ordered Lewis to defend the title against John Ruiz of Puerto Rico, then an obscure Don King fighter who had been made the WBA's #1-ranked contender. The WBA gave permission for Lewis to fight his WBC mandatory Michael Grant first if he would fight Ruiz next, which Lewis agreed to. Opposed to this, Ruiz's promoter challenged this decision in court on the basis of a clause in the Lewis-Holyfield rematch contract that said Lewis's first bout as undisputed champion would be against the WBA's number one contender. Lewis was therefore to be stripped of his WBA belt if he fought Grant first. It was because of this that the WBA instated its "Super Champion" title, giving unified titleholders who also hold a WBA belt more time to defend against mandatory challengers. Lewis proceeded to fight the 6 ft 8 inch American Michael Grant who he considered the best contender available. He successfully defended his WBC, IBO & IBF titles against Grant with a second round knockout victory in Madison Square Garden in April 2000.Later that same year Lewis knocked out South African Francois Botha in two rounds in London, before winning a 12-round decision against New Zealander and IBF mandatory opponent, David Tua in Las Vegas.
Lewis vs. Rahman
On 21 April 2001, Lewis was knocked out by 15-to-1 underdog Hasim Rahman in a bout in South Africa. Prior to the bout, Lewis had a role in the film Ocean's Eleven in which he "boxed" against Wladimir Klitschko.
Lewis vs. Rahman II
Lewis immediately sought a rematch with the new champion; however, Rahman, now being promoted by Don King, tried to secure another opponent for his inaugural title defence. Lewis took Rahman to court to honour the rematch clause in their contract. Rahman was ordered to honour the clause and give Lewis a rematch in his first title defence. While promoting the rematch with Rahman on ESPN's Up Close, the fighters got into a brawl    similar to the one between Muhammad Ali and Joe Frazier in front of Howard Cosell on Wide World of Sports. Many  felt the brawl was staged to promote the fight, so the reality of the episode is still a matter of debate. Lewis regained the title on 17 November by outclassing and then knocking out Hasim Rahman in the fourth round of their rematch.
Lewis vs. Tyson 

On 8 June 2002, Lewis defended his title against Mike Tyson. A fight many had hoped would be a classic turned out to be one-sided as Lennox used his jab and superior reach to score a dominant knockout victory over "Iron Mike." By the end of the seventh round Tyson was tired and sluggish, his face swollen and his eyes cut. He was knocked out in the eighth by a right hook from Lewis. After the fight was over, George Foreman declared "He [Lewis] is, no doubt, the best heavyweight of all time. What he's done clearly puts him on top of the heap."  
This fight was the highest-grossing event in pay-per-view history, generating $106.9 million from 1.95 million buys in the U.S., until it was surpassed by De La Hoya-Mayweather in 2007.   Ticket sales were slow because they were priced as high as $2,400, but a crowd of 15,327 turned up to see Memphis, Tennessee's biggest-ever sporting event. Tyson also had to pay Lewis $335,000 out of his purse for biting him at the news conference to announce the fight, which was originally scheduled for 6 April 2002 in Las Vegas. Las Vegas, however, rejected the fight because of Tyson's licensing problems and several other states refused Tyson a license before Memphis finally bid $12 million to land it.
Lewis vs. KlitschkoIn May 2003, Lewis sued boxing promoter Don King for $385 million, claiming that King used threats to have Tyson pull out of a rematch scheduled with Lewis then scheduled a fight with Kirk Johnson, but when Johnson suffered an injury in training, Lewis fought Vitali Klitschko, the WBC's #1 contender and former WBO champion. Lewis had planned to fight him in December, but since Klitschko had been on the undercard of the Johnson fight anyway, they agreed to square off on June 21. Lewis entered the ring at a career high 256½ pounds.    Lewis was dominated in the early rounds and was wobbled in round two by solid Klitschko punches. Lewis opened a cut above Klitschko's eye with a right cross in the third round and gave a better showing in the fourth round, and gaining the upper hand in fifth and sixth rounds. Before the start of round seven the doctor advised that the fight should be stopped because of a severe cut above Klitschko's left eye, awarding Lewis victory by TKO. Klitschko was leading 58–56 on all three judges' scorecards when the fight was stopped.Interviewed about the fight by HBO, doctor Paul Wallace explained his decision:
 
"When he raised his head up, his upper eyelid covered his field of vision. At that point I had no other option but to stop the fight. If he had to move his head to see me, there was no way he could defend his way against a punch."
 
Klitschko's face required sixty stitches.   Because Klitschko had fought so bravely against Lewis, boxing fans soon began calling for a rematch. The WBC agreed, and kept the Ukrainian as its No. 1 contender. Lewis initially was in favour of a rematch:
 
"I want the rematch, I enjoyed that fight. It was just a fight. We went at it. You have to play dollars and cents but I'm opting more for the rematch." 
 
Negotiations for the rematch followed but Lewis changed his mind   Instead, Klitschko fought and defeated Kirk Johnson on December 6 in WBC Eliminator, setting up a mandatory rematch with Lewis. Lewis announced his retirement shortly thereafter and vacated the title. Lewis stated when he had decided not to fight:
 "So, when it came time for me to see if I should fight Klitschko again, I thought – at my worst, at my worst! I beat Klitschko and look what I did to his face! I was at my worst – just think [what would’ve happened] if I’d trained just a little bit harder. I didn’t need to fight him again."  
Hanging up the gloves
Lewis announced his retirement in February 2004 and decided to pursue other interests, including sports management and music promotion. Lewis said he would not return to the ring. At his retirement, Lewis's record was 41 wins, 2 losses and 1 draw, with 32 wins by knockout. Though it was rumoured in an article published by the Daily Mail on the February 24 that he would return to fight Klitschko once again, Lewis quickly shot down those rumours on his personal website. In 2008 Lewis commented on a possible match up with Riddick Bowe. "He waits until I am in retirement to call out my name," said Lewis. "I will come out of retirement to beat up that guy. I'll beat him up for free." Along with Gene Tunney and Rocky Marciano he is one of three world heavyweight champions to have retired with no unavenged defeats.
Outside boxing
In 2000, Lewis appeared on Reflection Eternal's debut album Train of Thought, giving a shout out on the track "Down for the Count."In 2002, Lewis was reportedly offered £5m by WWE chairman Vince McMahon to take up wrestling with WWE. His camp held discussions over a possible match with former WWE superstar Brock Lesnar in February 2003, at the No Way Out pay-per-view event.  He had borne the Union Flag for the British Bulldog before his match against Bret "The Hitman" Hart at SummerSlam in 1992.In 2003, Lewis made a brief cameo appearance in the Jennifer Lopez and LL Cool J video "All I Have".Lewis played in the World Series of Poker in both 2006 and 2007, and was knocked out without winning any money.Lewis appeared on NBC's Celebrity Apprentice in 2008. He came in fourth place (out of 14).Lewis has also done a public service announcement against domestic violence for Do Something. In 2008, Lewis was inducted into Canada's Sports Hall of Fame.  In 2009, in his first year of eligibility, Lewis was inducted into the International Boxing Hall of Fame. On 8 May 2010, Lewis was let go by HBO as a commentator for Boxing After Dark.In 2011 he was awarded an honorary Doctorate from Wilfrid Laurier University in Waterloo, Ontario.
Personal life
Upon retiring from boxing, Lewis moved to Miami Beach with his wife, Violet Chang, a former Miss Jamaica runner-up. They have four children. Lewis told AventuraUSA.com in 2007 that he is contemplating opening an "international boxing academy" and perhaps one day starting a record label, but he has yet to embark on either endeavour. Lewis supports the English football team West Ham United, the local team for the place of his birth.  Lewis has a villa at the Tryall Club in Montego Bay, Jamaica.Lewis is an avid amateur chess player, and funded an after-school chess program for disadvantaged youths, one of whom earned a university chess scholarship at Tennessee Tech. 
Amateur highlights


Record: 75–7 (58 KOs)   
1983 Junior World Super Heavyweight Champion
Represented Canada as a Super Heavyweight at the 1984 Olympics in Los Angeles. Results were:
Defeated Mohammad Youssuf (Pakistan) TKO 3
Lost to Tyrell Biggs (United States) points
1985 Silver Medalist at World Cup competition.
1986 Super Heavyweight Gold Medalist at the Commonwealth Games in Edinburgh, Scotland
1987 Super Heavyweight Silver Medalist at Pan American Games in Indianapolis. Lost to Jorge Luis Gonzalez of Cuba in the final.
1987 Won the North American Super Heavyweight championship competition, defeating Jorge Luis Gonzalez
Won the Super Heavyweight Gold medal for Canada at the 1988 Olympics in Seoul, South Korea.
Defeated Chris Odera (Kenya) TKO 2
Defeated Ulli Kaden (East Germany) TKO 1
Defeated Janusz Zarenkiewicz (Poland) forfeit
Defeated Riddick Bowe (United States) TKO 2.


Professional boxing record 
| style="text-align:center;" colspan="8"|41 Wins (32 knockouts), 2 Losses, 1 Draw 
|-  style="text-align:center; margin:0.5em auto; font-size:95%; background:#e3e3e3;"
|  style="border-style:none none solid solid; "|Res.
|  style="border-style:none none solid solid; "|Record
|  style="border-style:none none solid solid; "|Opponent
|  style="border-style:none none solid solid; "|Type
|  style="border-style:none none solid solid; "|Rd., Time
|  style="border-style:none none solid solid; "|Date
|  style="border-style:none none solid solid; "|Location
|  style="border-style:none none solid solid; "|Notes
|- align=center
| Win||41–2–1||align=left|  Vitali Klitschko
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
|colspan=8| 
|- align=center
| Win||40–2–1||align=left|  Mike Tyson
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
|colspan=8| 
|- align=center
| Win||39–2–1||align=left|  Hasim Rahman
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
| Loss||38–2–1||align=left|  Hasim Rahman
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
| Win||38–1–1||align=left|  David Tua
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
| Win||37–1–1||align=left|  Francois Botha
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
| Win||36–1–1||align=left|  Michael Grant
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
|colspan=8| 
|- align=center
| Win||35–1–1||align=left|  Evander Holyfield
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
|style="background: #c5d2ea"|Draw||34–1–1||align=left|  Evander Holyfield
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
| Win||34–1||align=left|  Željko Mavrović
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
| Win||33–1||align=left|  Shannon Briggs
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
| Win||32–1||align=left|  Andrew Golota
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
| Win||31–1||align=left|  Henry Akinwande
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
| Win||30–1||align=left|  Oliver McCall
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
| Win||29–1||align=left|  Ray Mercer
| || || 
|align=left| 
|align=left|
|- align=center
| Win||28–1||align=left|  Tommy Morrison
| || || 
|align=left| 
|align=left| 
|- align=center
| Win||27–1||align=left|  Justin Fortune
| || || 
|align=left| 
|align=left|
|- align=center
| Win||26–1||align=left|  Lionel Butler
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
| Loss||25–1||align=left|  Oliver McCall
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
| Win||25–0||align=left|  Phil Jackson
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
| Win||24–0||align=left|  Frank Bruno
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
| Win||23–0||align=left|  Tony Tucker
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
|colspan=8| 
|- align=center
| Win||22–0||align=left|  Donovan Ruddock
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
| Win||21–0||align=left|  Mike Dixon
| || || 
|align=left| 
|align=left|
|- align=center
| Win||20–0||align=left|  Derek Williams
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
| Win||19–0||align=left|  Levi Billups
| || || 
|align=left| 
|align=left|
|- align=center
| Win||18–0||align=left|  Tyrell Biggs
| || || 
|align=left| 
|align=left|
|- align=center
| Win ||17–0||align=left|  Glenn McCrory
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
| Win||16–0||align=left|  Mike Weaver
| || || 
|align=left| 
|align=left|
|- align=center
| Win||15–0||align=left|  Gary Mason
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
| Win||14–0||align=left|  Jean Chanet
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
|- align=center
| Win||13–0||align=left|  Mike Acey
| || || 
|align=left| 
|align=left|
|- align=center
| Win||12–0||align=left|  Ossie Ocasio
| || || 
|align=left| 
|align=left|
|- align=center
| Win||11–0||align=left|  Dan Murphy
| || || 
|align=left| 
|align=left|
|- align=center
| Win||10–0||align=left|  Jorgé Dascola
| || || 
|align=left| 
|align=left|
|- align=center
| Win||9–0|| align=left|  Michael Simuwelu
| || || 
|align=left| 
|align=left|
|- align=center
| Win||8–0|| align=left|  Calvin Jones
| || || 
|align=left| 
|align=left|
|- align=center
| Win||7–0||align=left|  Noel Quarless
| || || 
|align=left| 
|align=left|
|- align=center
| Win||6–0||align=left|  Greg Gorrell
| || || 
|align=left| 
|align=left|
|- align=center
| Win||5–0||align=left|  Melvin Epps
| || || 
|align=left| 
|align=left|
|- align=center
| Win||4–0||align=left|  Steve Garber
| || || 
|align=left| 
|align=left|
|- align=center
| Win||3–0||align=left|  Andrew Gerrard
| || || 
|align=left| 
|align=left|
|- align=center
| Win||2–0||align=left|  Bruce Johnson
| || || 
|align=left| 
|align=left|
|- align=center
| Win||1–0||align=left|  Al Malcolm
| || || 
|align=left| 
| 
 
Styles from birth

Lennox Lewis, CM (1988–1999)
Lennox Lewis, CM, MBE (1999–2002)
Lennox Lewis, CM, CBE (2002–present)


See also 

List of heavyweight boxing champions
List of WBC world champions
List of Canadian sports personalities
List of British heavyweight boxing champions
List of European Boxing Union heavyweight champions


References 
External links 

Official Site
BBC Sports-Lewis' career in photos
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT



































 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Tommy Cooper
 
 
 Thomas Frederick "Tommy" Cooper (19 March 1921 – 15 April 1984) was a British prop comedian and magician.Cooper was a member of The Magic Circle, and respected by traditional magicians. Famed for his red fez, his appearance was large and lumbering at   and more than   in weight. On 15 April 1984, Cooper collapsed and soon after died from a heart attack in front of millions of television viewers, midway through his act on the London Weekend Television variety show Live From Her Majesty's, transmitted live from Her Majesty's Theatre. His stage persona required that his act intentionally went wrong for comic purposes, leading to some initial uncertainty about whether this collapse was real.
BiographyBorn in Caerphilly, South Wales, at 19 Llwyn Onn Street, Trecenydd, Cooper was delivered by the woman who owned the house in which the family was lodging. His parents were Welsh-born army recruiting sergeant father Thomas H. (Tom) Cooper, and his English-born wife Gertrude (née Gertrude C. Wright) from Crediton, Devon.  Tommy Cooper exetermemories.co.uk  In light of the heavily polluted air and the offer of a job for his father, the family moved to Exeter, Devon, when Cooper was three and gained the West Country accent that was part of his act. Anniversary of Tommy Cooper's death BBC Wales News - 16 April 2004 The family lived in the back of Haven Banks, where Cooper attended Mount Radford School for Boys, and helped his parents run their ice cream van, which attended fairs on the weekend. At the age of eight an aunt bought Cooper a magic set and he spent hours perfecting the tricks. Magic ran in his family—his brother David (born 1930 )  opened a magic shop in the 1960s in Slough High Street (then Buckinghamshire now Berkshire) called D. & Z. Cooper's Magic Shop. 
World War IIAfter school, Cooper became a shipwright in Hythe, Hampshire, and in 1940 was called up as a trooper in the Royal Horse Guards regiment of the British Army in World War II. He served initially in Montgomery's Desert Rats in Egypt. Cooper became part of the NAAFI entertainment party and developed an act around his magic tricks interspersed with comedy. One evening in Cairo, during a sketch in which he was supposed to be in a costume which required a pith helmet, having forgotten the prop, Cooper reached out and borrowed the fez from a passing waiter which got huge laughs. Tommy Cooper: Just Like That! BBC News  It was from this incident that stemmed two of the attributes that were a hallmark of his later act: the ever-present fez hat and his aptitude for slapstick comedy.
Act developmentWhen he was demobbed after seven years of military service, Cooper took up show business on Christmas Eve, 1947—he would later add a popular monologue about his military experience as "Cooper the Trooper". Cooper worked in variety theatres around the country and at London's Windmill Theatre, where he performed 52 shows per week. Cooper had developed his conjuring skills and was a member of The Magic Circle, but there are various versions as to where he developed his act delivery of "failed" magic tricks: 

Performing to his shipbuilding colleagues when everything went wrong. Devastated, Cooper still noted that the failed tricks got laughs.
During his British Army career.
At a post-war audition, at which his tricks went wrong, but which the panel thoroughly enjoyed.

To keep the audience on their toes, Cooper threw in the occasional trick that worked when it was least expected.
Career 
In 1947 Cooper got his big break with Miff Ferrie, at that time trombonist in a band called The Jackdaws, who booked him to appear as the second spot comedian in a show starring sand dance act "Marqueeze and the Dance of the Seven Veils". Cooper then began a two-year period of arduous performing. It included a tour of Europe and a stint in pantomime, playing one of Cinderella's ugly sisters. The period culminated in a season long booking at the Windmill Theatre where he doubled up doing cabarets; one week performing in 52 shows. Ferrie would remain Cooper's sole agent for the next 37 years, until Cooper's death in 1984.Cooper rapidly became a top-liner in variety with his turn as the conjurer whose tricks never succeeded, but it was his television work which raised him to national prominence. After his debut on the BBC talent show New to You in March 1948, he soon started starring in his own shows, and was popular with audiences for four decades, most notably through his work with London Weekend Television from 1968 to 1972 and with Thames Television from 1973 to 1980. Thanks to his many television shows during the mid 70s, he was one of the biggest and most recognizable comedians in the world.Cooper was a heavy drinker and smoker, and experienced a decline in health during the late 1970s, suffering a heart attack in 1977 while in Rome, where he was performing a show. Three months later he was back on television in Night Out at the London Casino. By 1980, though, his drinking meant that Thames Television would not give him another starring series, and Cooper's Half Hour was his last. He did continue to guest on other television shows, however, and worked with Eric Sykes on two Thames productions in 1982:John Fisher writes in Cooper's biography, "Everyone agrees that he was mean. Quite simply he was acknowledged as the tightest man in show business, with a pathological dread of reaching into his pocket." One of Cooper's stunts was to pay the exact taxi fare and when leaving the cab to slip something into the taxi driver's pocket saying, "Have a drink on me." That something would turn out to be a tea bag. By the mid-1970s, alcohol had started to erode Cooper's professionalism and club owners complained that he turned up late or rushed through his show in five minutes. In addition, he suffered chronic indigestion, lumbago, sciatica, bronchitis and severe circulation problems in his legs. When Cooper realised the extent of his injuries he cut down on his drinking and the energy and confidence returned to his act and some of his later television performances were a revelation. However, he never stopped drinking and could be fallible: on an otherwise triumphant appearance with Parkinson he forgot to set the safety catch on the guillotine illusion into which he had cajoled Parkinson. Only a last-minute intervention by the floor manager saved Parkinson from serious injury or worse. 
Death on a live television showOn 15 April 1984, Cooper collapsed from a heart attack in front of millions of television viewers, midway through his act on the London Weekend Television variety show Live From Her Majesty's, transmitted live from Her Majesty's Theatre. An assistant had helped him put on a cloak for his sketch, while Jimmy Tarbuck, the host, was hiding behind the curtain waiting to pass him different props which he would then appear to pull from inside his gown.    The assistant smiled at him as he collapsed, believing that it was a joke.    Likewise, the audience laughed as he fell, until it became apparent he was seriously ill.  At this point the show's director, Alasdair MacMillan, cued the orchestra to play music for an unscripted commercial break (noticeable by several seconds of blank screen while LWT's master control contacted regional stations to start transmitting advertisements)  and Tarbuck's manager tried to pull Cooper back through the curtains. It was decided to continue with the show. Dustin Gee and Les Dennis were the act that had to follow Tommy Cooper, and other stars proceeded to present their acts in the limited space in front of the stage. For a long time, a rumour circulated that the size 13 feet from his 6' 4" frame protruded underneath the curtains. While the show continued, efforts were being made backstage to revive Cooper, not made easier by the darkness. It was not until a second commercial break that ambulancemen were able to move his body to Westminster Hospital, where he was pronounced dead on arrival. His death wasn't officially reported until the next morning, although the incident was the lead item on the news programme that followed the show.The video of Tommy Cooper suffering a heart attack on stage has been uploaded to numerous video sharing websites. YouTube was heavily criticised by the press when footage of the incident was posted on their website in May 2009.  On 28 December 2011, segments of the Live From Her Majesty's clip, including Cooper collapsing on stage, were screened on Channel 4 in the UK, on a programme titled "The Untold Tommy Cooper".Cooper was cremated at Mortlake Crematorium in London.  He was survived by his wife, Gwen (whom he called 'Dove'), and two children, Thomas and Vicky, and a two-year-old grandchild, Tam. Cooper's son Thomas, who was an actor in his own right, changed his name for stage to Thomas Henty (his mother's maiden name). Henty said in interviews that, though he loved his dad, he needed his own identity to make a career on stage, and told very few who his famed father was, to further his dramatic acting career. Eventually son Tom travelled on the road as manager to his father. He also acted as occasional stage manager to his father, and was backstage with his father on the night he died. But like his father, son Thomas was a heavy drinker, and he died in August 1988 at Charing Cross Hospital in Fulham, London, aged 32. He died of haematemesis, following complications caused by liver failure. Doctors had attempted to pump seventy pints of new blood into his body, but the blood failed to clot, and after three days his mother took the decision to have his life support machine switched off. Thomas Henty left a son, Tam Henty.
Legacy
A statue of Cooper was unveiled in his hometown of Caerphilly, Wales, in 2008 by fellow entertainer Sir Anthony Hopkins, who is patron of The Tommy Cooper Society. The statue was sculpted by James Done.   
In 2009 for Red Nose Day, a charity Red Nose was put on the statue, but the nose was stolen.   In a 2005 poll The Comedians' Comedian, Cooper was voted the sixth greatest comedy act ever by fellow comedians and comedy insiders. He is commonly cited as one of the best comedians of all time, with several polls placing him at number one. Jerome Flynn has toured with his own tribute show to Cooper called Just Like That. In February 2007, The Independent reported that Andy Harries, a producer of The Queen, was working on a dramatization about the last week of Tommy Cooper's life.  Harries described Cooper's death as "extraordinary" in that the whole thing was broadcast live on national television. dan le sac vs Scroobius Pip wrote a song entitled 'Tommy C—about Cooper's career and death—which appears on their 2008 album Angles.In 2012 the British Heart Foundation ran a series of adverts featuring Tommy Cooper to raise awareness of heart conditions. These included posters bearing his image together with radio adverts featuring classic Cooper jokes. 
Recordings

"Don't Jump Off the Roof Dad" (1961), words and music by Cy Coben, single, Palette Records PG 9019 (reached Number 40 in the UK singles chart)
"Country Dreaming" - 12” LP
"Ginger" - 7” single 
"Happy Tommy"- 7" single
"Just Like That" 7” single 
"Masters of Comedy"- CD 
"My Name Is Tommy" - 12” LP 
"No Arms Will Ever Hold You" - 7” single 
"Sweet Words Of Love" - 7" single 
"Tommy Cooper Very Best Of" - CD, DVD
"Walkin' Home From School" - 7" single 
"We'll Meet Again" - 7" single


References 
External links

The Tommy Cooper Society

 
 
DEFAULTSORT
















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Prosper Ménière
 Prosper Ménière (18 June 1799 – 7 February 1862) was born in Angers, France. He was  lycée- and university-educated and he excelled at humanities and classics. He completed his gold medal in medical studies at Hôtel-Dieu de Paris in 1826, and his M.D. in 1828. He then assisted Guillaume Dupuytren.Ménière was originally set to be an assistant professor in faculty, but political tensions disturbed his professorship and he was sent to control the spread of cholera. He received a legion of honor for his work, but never gained professorship. After securing the position of physician-in-chief at the Institute for deaf-mutes, he focused on the diseases of the ear.  Ménière's studies at the deaf-mute institute helped formulate his paper, On a particular kind of hearing loss resulting from lesions of the inner ear which ultimately led to the recognition of Ménière's disease. There is debate as to how Ménière's name is spelled.  Prosper himself was known to write his name as "Menière" while his son used the spelling "Ménière."  Many people omit the accent marks. 

References 

 
 
Footnotes 
External links

Prosper Ménière Society Official website

 
DEFAULTSORT





 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Stevie Smith
 
Florence Margaret Smith, known as Stevie Smith (20 September 1902 – 7 March 1971) was an English poet and novelist.
LifeStevie Smith, born Florence Margaret Smith in Kingston upon Hull, was the second daughter of Ethel and Charles Smith. (Couzyn, Jeni 1985) Contemporary Women Poets. Bloodaxe, p. 32.  She was called "Peggy" within her family, but acquired the name "Stevie" as a young woman when she was riding in the park with a friend who said that she reminded him of the jockey Steve Donaghue. Her father was a shipping agent, a business that he had inherited from his father. As the company and his marriage began to fall apart, he ran away to sea and Smith saw very little of her father after that. Retrieved 22 March 2011. Subscription required.  He appeared occasionally on 24-hour shore leave and sent very brief postcards ("Off to Valparaiso, Love Daddy"). When she was three years old she moved with her mother and sister to Palmers Green in North London where Smith would live until her death in 1971.  She resented the fact that her father had abandoned his family. Later, when her mother became ill, her aunt Madge Spear (whom Smith called "The Lion Aunt") came to live with them, raised Smith and her elder sister Molly and became the most important person in Smith's life. Spear was a feminist who claimed to have "no patience" with men and, as Smith wrote, "she also had 'no patience' with Hitler". Smith and Molly were raised without men and thus became attached to their own independence, in contrast to what Smith described as the typical Victorian family atmosphere of "father knows best". When Smith was five she developed tubercular peritonitis and was sent to a sanatorium near Broadstairs, Kent, where she remained for three years. (Couzyn, Jeni 1985) Contemporary Women Poets. Bloodaxe, p. 33.  She related that her  preoccupation with death began when she was seven, at a time when she was very distressed at being sent away from her mother.  Death and fear fascinated her and provide the subjects of many of her poems. [Couzyn, Jeni 1985) Contemporary Women Poets. Bloodaxe, p. 35.  When suffering from the depression to which she was subject all her life she was so consoled by the thought of death as a release that, as she put it, she did not have to commit suicide. She wrote in several poems that death was "the only god who must come when he is called". Her mother died when Smith was 16 and suffered through her life from an acute nervousness, described as a mix of shyness and intense sensitivity. In the Poem "A House of Mercy", she wrote of her childhood house in North London:
 
It was a house of female habitation,
Two ladies fair inhabited the house,
And they were brave. For although Fear knocked loud
Upon the door, and said he must come in,
They did not let him in. 
 Smith was educated at Palmers Green High School and North London Collegiate School for Girls.  She spent the remainder of her life with her aunt, and worked as private secretary to Sir Neville Pearson with Sir George Newnes at Newnes Publishing Company in London from 1923 to 1953. Despite her secluded life, she corresponded and socialized widely with other writers and creative artists, including Elisabeth Lutyens, Sally Chilver, Inez Holden, Naomi Mitchison, Isobel English and Anna Kallin. After she retired from Sir Neville Pearson's service following a nervous breakdown she gave poetry readings and broadcasts on the BBC that gained her new friends and readers among a younger generation. Sylvia Plath became a fan of her poetry, "a desperate Smith-addict", and made an appointment to meet her but killed herself before the meeting could occur.Smith died of a brain tumour on 7 March 1971. Her last collection, Scorpion and other Poems was published posthumously in 1972, and the Collected Poems followed in 1975. Three novels were republished and there was a successful play based on her life, Stevie, written by Hugh Whitemore. It was filmed in 1978 by Robert Enders and starred Glenda Jackson and Mona Washbourne. She was described by her friends as being naive and selfish in some ways and formidably intelligent in others, having been raised by her aunt as both a spoiled child and a resolutely autonomous woman. Likewise, her political views vacillated between her aunt's Toryism and her friends' left-wing tendencies. Smith was celibate for most of her life, although she rejected the idea that she was lonely as a result, alleging that she had a number of intimate relationships with friends and family that kept her fulfilled. She never entirely abandoned or accepted the Anglican faith of her childhood, describing herself as a "lapsed atheist", and wrote sensitively about theological puzzles; "There is a God in whom I do not believe/Yet to this God my love stretches." Her 14-page essay of 1958, "The Necessity of Not Believing", concludes: "There is no reason to be sad, as some people are sad when they feel religion slipping off from them. There is no reason to be sad, it is a good thing."
CareerSmith wrote three novels, the first of which, Novel on Yellow Paper, was published in 1936. All her novels are lightly fictionalised accounts of her own life, which got her into trouble at times as people recognised themselves. Smith said that two of the male characters in her last book are different aspects of George Orwell, who was close to Smith (there were even rumours that they were lovers; he was married to his first wife at the time). She also wrote nine volumes of poetry. The first, A Good Time Was Had By All, established her as a poet: soon her poems were found in periodicals. A confessional poet, her style was often very dark; her characters were perpetually saying "goodbye" to their friends or welcoming death. At the same time her work has an eerie levity and can be very funny though it is neither light nor whimsical. "Stevie Smith often uses the word 'peculiar' and it is the best word to describe her effects" (Hermione Lee). She was never sentimental, undercutting any pathetic effects with the ruthless honesty of her humour. Apart from death, common subjects include loneliness; myth and legend; absurd vignettes, usually drawn from middle-class British life, war, human cruelty and religion. Though her poems were remarkably consistent in tone and quality throughout her life, their subject matter changed over time, with less of the outrageous wit of her youth and more reflection on suffering, faith and the end of life. Her best-known poem is "Not Waving but Drowning". She was awarded the Cholmondeley Award for Poets in 1966 and won the Queen's Gold Medal for poetry in 1969. (Couzyn, Jeni 1985) Contemporary Women Poets. Bloodaxe, p. 39. 
Fiction
Novel on Yellow Paper (Cape, 1936)Smith's first novel is structured as the random typings of a bored secretary, Pompey. She plays word games, retells stories from classical and popular culture, remembers events from her childhood, gossips about her friends and describes her family, particularly her beloved Aunt. As with all Smith's novels, there is an early scene where the heroine expresses feelings and beliefs which she will later feel significant, although ambiguous, regret for. In Novel on Yellow Paper that belief is anti-Semitism, where she feels elation at being the "only Goy" at a Jewish party. This apparently throwaway scene acts as a timebomb, which detonates at the centre of the novel when Pompey visits Germany as the Nazis are gaining power. With horror, she acknowledges the continuity between her feeling "Hurray for being a Goy" at the party and the madness that is overtaking Germany. The German scenes stand out in the novel, but perhaps equally powerful is her dissection  of failed love. She describes two unsuccessful relationships, first with the German Karl and then with the suburban Freddy. The final section of the novel describes with unusual clarity the intense pain of her break-up with Freddy.
Over the Frontier (Cape, 1938)Smith herself dismissed her second novel as a failed experiment, but its attempt to parody popular genre fiction in order to explore profound political issues now seems to anticipate post-modern fiction. If anti-Semitism was one of the key themes of Novel on Yellow Paper, Over the Frontier is concerned with militarism. In particular, she asks how the necessity of fighting Fascism can be achieved without descending into the nationalism and dehumanisation that fascism represents. After a failed romance the heroine, Pompey, suffers a breakdown and is sent to Germany to recuperate. At this point the novel changes style radically, as Pompey becomes part of an adventure/spy yarn in the style of John Buchan or Dornford Yates. As the novel becomes increasingly dreamlike, Pompey crosses over the frontier to become a spy and soldier. If her initial motives are idealistic, she becomes seduced by the intrigue and, ultimately, violence. The vision Smith offers is a bleak one: "Power and cruelty are the strengths of our lives, and only in their weakness is there love."
The Holiday (Chapman and Hall, 1949)Smith's final novel is her own favourite, and most fully realised. It is concerned with personal and political malaise in the immediate post-war period. Most of the characters are either employed in the army or civil service in post-war reconstruction, and its heroine, Celia, works for the Ministry as a crytographer and propagandist. The Holiday describes a series of hopeless relationships. Celia and her cousin Caz are in love, but cannot pursue their affair since it is believed that, because of their parents' adultery, they are half-brother and sister. Celia's other cousin Tom is in love with her, Basil is love with Tom, Tom is estranged from his father, Celia's beloved Uncle Heber, who pines for a reconciliation;  and Celia's best friend Tiny longs for the married Vera. These unhappy, futureless but intractable relationships are mirrored by the novel's political concerns. The unsustainability of the British Empire and the uncertainty over Britain's post-war role are constant themes, and many of the characters discuss their personal and political concerns as if they were seamlessly linked. Caz is on leave from Palestine and is deeply disillusioned, Tom goes mad during the war, and it is telling that the family scandal that blights Celia and Caz's lives took place in India. Just as Pompey's anti-semitism was tested in Novel on Yellow Paper, so Celia's traditional nationalism and sentimental support for colonialism is challenged throughout The Holiday.
Works
Novels

Novel on Yellow Paper (Cape, 1936)
Over the Frontier (Cape 1938)
The Holiday (Chapman and Hall, 1949)


Poetry collections

This Englishwoman (1937)
A Good Time Was Had By All (Cape, 1937)
Tender Only to One (Cape, 1938)
Mother, What Is Man? (Cape, 1942)
Harold's Leap (Cape, 1950)
Not Waving but Drowning (Deutsch, 1957)
Selected Poems (Longmans, 1962) includes 17 previously unpublished poems
The Frog Prince  (Longmans, 1966) includes 69 previously unpublished poems
The Best Beast (Longmans, 1969)
Two in One (Longmans, 1971) reprint of Selected Poems and The Frog Prince
Scorpion and Other Poems (Longmans, 1972)
Collected Poems (Allen Lane, 1975)
Selected Poems (Penguin, 1978)
New Selected Poems of Stevie Smith (New Directions, 1988)


Other

Some Are More Human Than Others: A Sketch-Book (Gaberbocchus, 1958)
Me Again: Uncollected Writings of Stevie Smith (Virago, 1984)
"The Necessity of Not Believing" (Gemini No. 5, Spring 1958, Vol. 2, No. 1)


Further reading

Stevie Smith and Authorship By William May Oxford University Press ISBN 0-19-958337-4


References 
External links
Profiles 

Smith Profile, poems and audio files at the Poetry Archive. Retrieved 2010-12-12
Smith profile at Academy of American Poets. Retrieved 2010-12-12
Smith profile at Poetry Foundation. Poems and bibliography. Retrieved 2010-12-12


Archive

Stevie Smith papers. Archive at University of Tulsa McFarlin Library's in special collections department. Retrieved 2010-12-12
Archive at British Library. Retrieved 2010-12-12
The Stevie Smith Papers at Washington University in St. Louis. Retrieved 2010-12-12
 


Works

Stevie Smith reading "Not Waving But Drowning", BBC (includes poem text and poet's photo). Retrieved 2010-12-12
Author profile for Stevie Smith, LibraryThing. Retrieved 2010-12-12
"Pretty" by Stevie Smith from The Times, 13 May 2008. Retrieved 2010-12-12
Music to "Mother, Among the Dustbins", Retrieved 2011-06-28

 
 
DEFAULTSORT













 
 
 
 
 
	Obi-Wan Kenobi
 
 Obi-Wan Kenobi is a character in the Star Wars universe. He is one of several primary characters in the Star Wars series. Along with Anakin Skywalker (Darth Vader), R2-D2 and C-3PO, he is one of only four characters to appear in all six Star Wars films. He is portrayed in the original trilogy by Alec Guinness and in the prequel trilogy by Ewan McGregor, and is voiced by James Arnold Taylor in the film Star Wars: The Clone Wars  and its spin-off TV series.
Appearances
Films
Original trilogyObi-Wan Kenobi is first introduced in Star Wars Episode IV: A New Hope (1977), where he is played by Alec Guinness and is first seen rescuing Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill) from a group of Tusken Raiders. Obi-Wan takes Luke to his hut, where he reveals that he knew Luke's father, Anakin Skywalker, and served with him in the Clone Wars. He gives Anakin's lightsaber to Luke, having told him that Darth Vader (David Prowse/James Earl Jones) "betrayed and murdered" Anakin. Suddenly, R2-D2 plays a message from Princess Leia Organa (Carrie Fisher) that pleads for Obi-Wan to get the droid to her father on Alderaan. Obi-Wan offers to instruct Luke in the ways of the Force and asks him to join him on the quest; but Luke is only persuaded when his aunt and uncle are slain by the Empire, whereupon Obi-Wan takes him to deliver the message to Alderaan.Obi-Wan and Luke buy passage to Alderaan on the spaceship Millennium Falcon, piloted by smuggler Han Solo (Harrison Ford) and his partner Chewbacca (Peter Mayhew); but before they reach Alderaan, the planet is destroyed by the Death Star on the orders of Grand Moff Tarkin (Peter Cushing). On arrival, the Millennium Falcon is captured by the space station's tractor beam. Luke, Chewbacca and Han rescue the princess and attempt to get back to the Falcon. While that is going on, Obi-Wan disables the tractor beam so that the Falcon can escape and confronts his old apprentice, Darth Vader, in a lightsaber duel, eventually sacrificing himself so that Luke and the others can escape. Now disembodied, he speaks to Luke telepathically in the film's climactic battle scene, telling him to use the Force to destroy the Death Star.In Star Wars Episode V: The Empire Strikes Back (1980), set three years after A New Hope, Obi-Wan appears as a Force ghost and instructs Luke to visit the Dagobah system for further training under Jedi Master Yoda (Frank Oz). After Luke has been further trained in the teachings of the Jedi, Obi-Wan appears in the Dagobah swamp to dissuade him from going to Cloud City, where Vader holds Han Solo and Princess Leia hostage. During Luke's battle with Vader, in which he loses his right hand, he learns that the Sith Lord is his father.In Star Wars Episode VI: Return of the Jedi (1983), set six months after The Empire Strikes Back (in the novelization), Obi-Wan appears on Dagobah to talk with Luke, who has learned from a dying Yoda that Vader is indeed his father. He explains Anakin Skywalker's fall from grace, and helps Luke realize that Leia is his sister. He then tells Luke that killing Vader is the only way to destroy the Empire. At the end of the film, Obi-Wan's ghost appears alongside the ghosts of Yoda and a redeemed Anakin Skywalker on the forest moon of Endor, watching Luke and his comrades as they celebrate the destruction of the second Death Star.
Prequel trilogyIn Star Wars Episode I: The Phantom Menace (1999), set 32 years before A New Hope, Obi-Wan Kenobi, now played by Ewan McGregor, is seen as a young Jedi Padawan,   in which role he accompanies his master Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) in negotiations with the Trade Federation, who are blockading the planet Naboo. Upon their arrival on the Federation's flagship, they are attacked by battle droids and are forced to retreat to the planet, where they meet a clumsy Gungan named Jar Jar Binks (Ahmed Best), who assists the Jedi in reaching Queen Padmé Amidala (Natalie Portman). In escaping the blockade, the ship is damaged and makes an unscheduled landing on Tatooine, where Qui-Gon meets Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd), a young slave who shows such tremendous potential in the Force that Qui-Gon believes him to be the "Chosen One" of Jedi prophecy, destined to bring balance to the Force by destroying the Sith. The Jedi Council forbids Anakin's training, however, believing that the boy's future is clouded by the fear he exhibits.During the Battle of Naboo, Qui-Gon is mortally wounded by the Sith Lord Darth Maul (Ray Park/Peter Serafinowicz). Having nearly fallen to his death, Obi-Wan uses the Force to seize his master's abandoned lightsaber, and defeats Maul. The dying Qui-Gon then exacts his promise to train Anakin.For his heroics in defeating a Sith (being the first Jedi in 1,000 years to do so), Yoda bestows on Obi-Wan the rank of Jedi Knight, and reluctantly grants him the right to train Anakin.  
In Star Wars Episode II: Attack of the Clones (2002), set 10 years after The Phantom Menace, Obi-Wan has become an experienced Jedi, and Anakin (Hayden Christensen) his padawan. By this time, Anakin has grown powerful but arrogant, and believes that Obi-Wan is holding him back.He and Anakin are required to protect Padmé, now a Senator, after an attempt on her life. Obi-Wan traces the attempt to the planet Kamino, and learns of a massive clone army that the planet's inhabitants are building for the Galactic Republic. He then meets with the bounty hunter Jango Fett (Temuera Morrison), the template for the clones, and deduces that he is the one responsible for the attempts on Padmé. Obi-Wan attempts to apprehend Fett, who escapes to Geonosis with his adopted son Boba (Daniel Logan). Obi-Wan follows them by placing a homing beacon on Fett's ship, Slave I.On Geonosis, Obi-Wan discovers the Confederacy of Independent Systems, known as the Separatists, a conspiracy of star systems bent on secession from the Republic. The renegades are led by former Jedi Count Dooku (Christopher Lee), who was once Qui-Gon's master. Obi-Wan is captured after sending a message to Anakin. While Obi-Wan is in captivity, Dooku reveals that the Galactic Senate is under the control of a Sith Lord named Darth Sidious.When Anakin and Padmé arrive on Geonosis to rescue Obi-Wan, they are themselves captured, and all three are sentenced to death by the Geonosians. The executions are prevented by the arrival of Jedi and clone reinforcements, led by Jedi Masters Mace Windu (Samuel L. Jackson) and Yoda. Obi-Wan and Anakin confront Dooku in a duel, wherein Dooku strikes Anakin with Force lightning, then turns to Obi-Wan. The two duel and Dooku outmanoeuvres Obi-Wan, wounding him on both his left arm and leg. Dooku is about to deliver a killing blow when Anakin recovers from the lightning and blocks Dooku's attack. Dooku and Anakin fight a short duel, and Dooku cuts off Anakin's right lower arm (which is later replaced by a robotic prosthetic). Yoda arrives and fights Dooku as well, but the Sith Lord puts Anakin and Obi-Wan in mortal danger in order to create a distraction, and escapes. In Star Wars Episode III: Revenge of the Sith (2005), set three years after Attack of the Clones, Obi-Wan is a Jedi Master on the High Jedi Council and a general in the Army of the Republic. Anakin, now a full-fledged Jedi Knight, remains his partner, and the two have become war heroes and best friends. They are sent on a mission to rescue Supreme Chancellor Palpatine (Ian McDiarmid), who has been kidnapped by Dooku and Separatist leader General Grievous (Matthew Wood). When they find the captive Palpatine, Count Dooku engages them both in a duel. Obi-Wan is rendered unconscious by Dooku, but Anakin defeats the Sith Lord by cutting off both his hands. At Palpatine's urging, Anakin kills the defenseless Count in cold blood, a violation of the Jedi Code.  Palpatine then tries to convince Anakin to leave the unconscious Obi-Wan behind.  Anakin refuses, insisting to Palpatine that "his fate will be the same as ours". Soon after returning to Coruscant, Obi-Wan is called away to Utapau to confront General Grievous. Meanwhile, Anakin is angry at the Jedi Council for refusing him the rank of Master, and is also troubled by visions of Padmé, whom he married in the previous film, dying in childbirth. With Obi-Wan on the opposite end of the galaxy, Palpatine—who is in reality Darth Sidious—eventually corrupts Anakin to the dark side of the Force and takes him as his Sith apprentice, Darth Vader.After finding the Separatist encampment, Obi-Wan engages Grievous in battle, eventually killing him with a blaster. At the same time, Palpatine issues Order 66, directing clone troopers to turn on their Jedi generals. Obi-Wan survives the attempt on his life and escapes, rendezvousing with Yoda and Senator Bail Organa (Jimmy Smits) of Alderaan aboard Organa's ship, the Tantive IV. Obi-Wan returns to Coruscant, where he and Yoda discover that every Jedi in the Jedi Temple has been murdered, even the children. Obi-Wan sends a beacon to all surviving Jedi, instructing them to scatter across the galaxy and remain in hiding. A heartbroken Obi-Wan then watches a security hologram revealing that the assassin, Darth Vader, is actually Anakin. Subsequently, Obi-Wan and Yoda split up to confront the two Sith Lords: Obi-Wan to fight Vader and Yoda to battle Palpatine. Obi-Wan wishes to fight Sidious to avoid having to kill his best friend, but Yoda insists that Obi-Wan is not strong enough to fight the new Emperor of the galaxy, and would have to accept that the Anakin he knows no longer exists, having been "consumed by Darth Vader."Unaware of his former Padawan's location, Obi-Wan visits Padmé and explains to her what Vader has done. Padmé refuses to believe him, and will not reveal Vader's whereabouts, knowing that Obi-Wan will attempt to kill him. At this point, Obi-Wan realizes that Vader is the father of Padmé's child and tells her he is "so sorry." Padmé sets out to the Mustafar system to confront her husband herself, and Obi-Wan secretly stows away in her ship.Arriving on Mustafar, Padmé confronts Vader and realizes with horror that Obi-Wan had been telling the truth. When Obi-Wan emerges from Padmé's ship, an enraged Vader immediately suspects that Padmé has betrayed him, and uses the dark side of the Force to choke her into unconsciousness. Obi-Wan and Vader then fight a furious lightsaber duel, which ends with Obi-Wan severing Vader's legs and left arm in midair. Vader then slides too close to a lava flow and catches fire, almost burning to death. Unable to bring himself to deliver a fatal blow, Obi-Wan retrieves his former apprentice's lightsaber and returns to the shuttle, leaving Vader to die. However, Vader clings to life long enough to be rescued by Palpatine, who rebuilds him as the black armor-clad cyborg first seen in the original trilogy.Obi-Wan watches helplessly as Padmé dies after giving birth to twins. Luke is put on Tatooine with Owen Lars (Joel Edgerton), Anakin's stepbrother, and Obi-Wan agrees to look after him in secret; Luke's twin sister Leia, meanwhile, is adopted by Bail Organa. Yoda, unsuccessful in his confrontation with Palpatine, then tells Obi-Wan that he has more training for him: Qui-Gon's spirit will teach him how to retain his identity through the Force and commune with the living after death. The film ends as Obi-Wan gives the infant Luke to Lars and his wife Beru (Bonnie Piesse), and disappears into the distance.
Expanded universeObi-Wan Kenobi appears extensively in the Star Wars "Expanded Universe" of comic books, novels, and video games. This material portrays the events in the character's life outside of the six films.
TelevisionObi-Wan is a major character in the animated microseries Star Wars: Clone Wars and the CGI animated series Star Wars: The Clone Wars, which both cover the period between Attack of the Clones and Revenge of the Sith. It is also revealed that he is granted a seat on the Jedi Council during this time. Obi-Wan is voiced by James Arnold Taylor in both versions.Among Obi-Wan's adventures in the microseries are a battle with the Intergalactic Banking Clan and an air strike on the planet Rattatak. In the microseries' final episode, he and Anakin are sent to the Outer Rim of the galaxy, a journey that climaxes in a quest to save the planet Nelvaan from the Techno Union.
NovelsMany Expanded Universe novels detail Obi-Wan's exploits before, during, and after the six films.Obi-Wan's life prior to The Phantom Menace is portrayed mostly in Jude Watson's Jedi Apprentice and Jedi Quest series. The Jedi Apprentice books follow his adventures as Qui-Gon Jinn's Padawan. Notable events in the series include battling the Dark Jedi Xanatos, falling in love with fellow Padawan Siri Tachi, and going on his first independent mission. The Jedi Quest books detail his adventures with Anakin in the years leading up to Attack of the Clones.His heroism just before and during the Clone Wars is portrayed in novels such as Outbound Flight, The Approaching Storm, and The Cestus Deception.Obi-Wan's life between Revenge of the Sith and A New Hope is  portrayed mostly in Jude Watson's The Last of the Jedi series. Set roughly a year after the fall of the Republic, the series follows Obi-Wan as he seeks out possible survivors of the Great Jedi Purge, most notably Anakin's former rival, Ferus Olin. The books also portray Obi-Wan adjusting to life as a hermit on Tatooine, and quietly watching over the infant Luke Skywalker. He also discovers that Vader is still alive after seeing him on the Holonet, the galaxy's official news source.Obi-Wan appears in spirit form in many novels set after Return of the Jedi. In The Truce at Bakura, he appears to Luke to warn him about the threat presented by the Ssi-ruuk; in The Lost City of the Jedi, he guides Luke to the titular city on Yavin IV; in Heir to the Empire, meanwhile, he bids farewell to Luke, explaining that he must abandon his spiritual form to "move on" to a new, higher plane of consciousness. Before parting, Luke tells him that Obi-Wan was like a father to him, to which Obi-Wan replies that he loved Luke like a son.
Video gamesObi-Wan appears in many video games. He is a playable character in all four Lego Star Wars video games, Battlefront II, and Renegade Squadron of the Battlefront series. He is also the lead character in Star Wars: Obi-Wan. The older version, Ben Kenobi, is only playable in Lego Star Wars II: The Original Trilogy and The Complete Saga, Renegade Squadron, and Star Wars: The Force Unleashed in multiplayer mode. He also appears in Star Wars: The Clone Wars – Jedi Alliance, Star Wars: Jedi Power Battles and Star Wars: The Clone Wars – Lightsaber Duels as a playable character.
Comic booksIn the comic book series Star Wars: Republic, Obi-Wan faces many grave threats while fighting against the Separatists. Among other notable storylines, he is kidnapped and tortured by Dooku's minion Asajj Ventress before being rescued by Anakin ("Hate & Fear"), and apprehends corrupted Jedi Master Quinlan Vos ("The Dreadnaughts of Rendili"). Throughout the series, he grows increasingly wary of Palpatine's designs on the Republic—and his influence on Anakin.In the non-canon story "Old Wounds", set a few years after the events of Revenge of the Sith, Obi-Wan confronts a resurrected Darth Maul on Tatooine to protect Luke Skywalker. The duel ends when Owen Lars shoots and kills Maul; he then warns Obi-Wan to stay away from his nephew. Through the Force, Obi-Wan reassures Luke that he will be there for him when needed.
Cultural impact 
The character is loosely inspired by General Makabe Rokurōta, a character from The Hidden Fortress played by Toshirō Mifune, whom series creator George Lucas also considered casting as Obi-Wan.  Mad magazine parodied the original film under the title Star Roars and included a character named "Oldie Von Moldie"; a grizzled 97-year-old whose lightsaber runs on an extension cord. The Shanghai nightclub shown in the beginning of Indiana Jones and the Temple of Doom is called "Club Obi-Wan" because George Lucas wrote both the Star Wars and Indiana Jones Series. A real bar/club by this name existed in the Xihai district of Beijing, China but closed in the summer of 2010. The Super Mario Bros. Super Show! episode "Star Koopa", being a spoof of Star Wars, also had its own parody of Obi-Wan Kenobi called Obi-Wan Toadi. The 1998 Animaniacs episode "Star Warners", which spoofed Star Wars, featured Slappy Squirrel portraying a parody of Obi-Wan Kenobi as "Slappy Wanna Nappy". In the Family Guy episode "Blue Harvest", Obi-Wan is parodied by the character Herbert. In the short film Thumb Wars Obi-Wan is parodied as the character Oobedoob Benubi. In the film his full name is Oobedoob Scooby-Doobi Benubi, "the silliest name in the galaxy". In the 1977 Star Wars parody Hardware Wars, Obi-Wan is parodied by the character "Augie Ben Doggie". In French Internet subculture, "Obi-Wan Kenobi" became an expression meaning "your question does not make sense", and is said when one does not know what to answer but wants to respond in an amusing way. It was popularised by Les Guignols de l'info, which made a parody of the French version of Who Wants to Be a Millionaire? in which for every question, the fourth choice was invariably "Obi-Wan Kenobi" (and the question invariably nonsense). Humorous multiple choice questionnaires made on the internet since often featured an "Obi-Wan Kenobi" option. TV Tropes  uses Obi-Wan's name for the archetype mentor figure. In 2003, the American Film Institute selected Obi-Wan Kenobi as the 37th greatest movie hero of all time.  He was also listed as IGN's third greatest Star Wars character,  as well as one of UGO Networks's favorite heroes of all time.   In 2004 the Council of the Commune Lubicz in Poland passed a resolution giving the name Obi-Wan Kenobi to one of the streets in Grabowiec, a small village near Toruń.  The street was named in 2005. The spelling of the street name, Obi-Wana Kenobiego is the genitive form of the noun in the Polish language: the street of Obi-Wan Kenobi. "ul." is an abbreviation of ulica, the Polish for street. Manu Ginobili from the San Antonio Spurs NBA team, has sometimes been referred to as Obi Wan Ginobili, due to his quick movements and play on the court.In the Disney Channel show Good Luck Charlie, the fifth Duncan Baby was called Toby Wan Kenobi Duncan.
See also 

Qui-Gon Jinn
Darth Vader
Luke Skywalker
Jedi
The Force


References 

The New Essential Guide to Characters, 1st edition, 2002. Daniel Wallace, Michael Sutfin, ISBN 0-345-44900-2
Star Wars Episode I Who's Who: A Pocket Guide to Characters of the Phantom Menace, hardcover, 1999. Ryder Windham, ISBN 0-7624-0519-8
Star Wars: Power of Myth, 1st edition paperback, 2000. DK Publishing, ISBN 0-7894-5591-9
Star Wars: The Visual Dictionary, hardcover, 1998. David West Reynolds, ISBN 0-7894-3481-4
Star Wars: The Phantom Menace: The Visual Dictionary, hardcover, 1999. David West Reynolds, ISBN 0-7894-4701-0
Star Wars: Attack of the Clones: The Visual Dictionary, hardcover, 2002. David West Reynolds, ISBN 0-7894-8588-5
Star Wars: Revenge of the Sith: The Visual Dictionary, hardcover, 2005. James Luceno, ISBN 0-7566-1128-8
Revised Core Rulebook (Star Wars Roleplaying Game), 1st edition, 2002. Bill Slavicsek, Andy Collins, J.D. Wiker, Steve Sansweet, ISBN 0-7869-2876-X
Star Wars Roleplaying Game Core Rulebook, 1st edition, 2000. Bill Slavicsek, Andy Collins, ISBN 0-7869-1793-8
 
External links 

 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 DEFAULTSORT






 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Antonio Gramsci
 
 
Antonio Gramsci ( ) (22 January 1891 – 27 April 1937) was an Italian writer, politician, political theorist, sociologist, and linguist. He was a founding member and onetime leader of the Communist Party of Italy and was imprisoned by Benito Mussolini's Fascist regime.Gramsci was one of the most important Marxist thinkers in the 20th century. His writings are heavily concerned with the analysis of culture and political leadership and he is notable as a highly original thinker within modern European thought. He is renowned for his concept of cultural hegemony as a means of maintaining the state in a capitalist society.
Life
Early lifeGramsci was born in Ales, on the island of Sardinia, the fourth of seven sons of Francesco Gramsci (1860–1937), a low-level official from Gaeta, and his wife, Giuseppina  Marcias (1861–1932). Gramsci's father was of Arbëreshë descent,  while his mother belonged to a local landowning family. The senior Gramsci's financial difficulties and troubles with the police forced the family to move about through several villages in Sardinia until they finally settled in Ghilarza.In 1898 Francesco was convicted of embezzlement  and imprisoned, reducing his family to destitution.  The young Antonio had to abandon schooling and work at various casual jobs until his father's release in 1904. The boy suffered from health problems: a malformation of the spine owing to a childhood accident left him hunch-backed and underdeveloped.  He was also plagued by various internal disorders throughout his life.Gramsci completed secondary school in Cagliari, where he lodged with his elder brother Gennaro, a former soldier whose time on the mainland had made him a militant socialist. However, Gramsci's sympathies then did not lie with socialism, but rather with the grievances of impoverished Sardinian peasants and miners.  They perceived their neglect as a result of privileges enjoyed by the rapidly industrialising North, and they tended to turn to Sardinian nationalism as a response.
Turin
In 1911, Gramsci won a scholarship to study at the University of Turin, sitting the exam at the same time as future cohort Palmiro Togliatti. At Turin, he read literature and took a keen interest in linguistics, which he studied under Matteo Bartoli. Gramsci was in Turin as it was going through industrialization, with the Fiat and Lancia factories' recruiting workers from poorer regions. Trade unions became established, and the first industrial social conflicts started to emerge. Gramsci frequented socialist circles as well as associating with Sardinian emigrants. His worldview shaped by both his earlier experiences in Sardinia and his environment on the mainland, Gramsci joined the Italian Socialist Party in late 1913.Despite showing talent for his studies, Gramsci had financial problems and poor health. Together with his growing political commitment, these led to his abandoning his education in early 1915. By this time, he had acquired an extensive knowledge of history and philosophy. At university, he had come into contact with the thought of Antonio Labriola, Rodolfo Mondolfo, Giovanni Gentile and, most importantly, Benedetto Croce, possibly the most widely respected Italian intellectual of his day. Such thinkers espoused a brand of Hegelian Marxism to which Labriola had given the name "philosophy of praxis". Though Gramsci would later use this phrase to escape the prison censors, his relationship with this current of thought was ambiguous throughout his life.From 1914 onward, Gramsci's writings for socialist newspapers such as Il Grido del Popolo earned him a reputation as a notable journalist.  In 1916 he became co-editor of the Piedmont edition of Avanti!, the Socialist Party official organ. An articulate and prolific writer of political theory, Gramsci proved a formidable commentator, writing on all aspects of Turin's social and political life.Gramsci was, at this time, also involved in the education and organisation of Turin workers: he spoke in public for the first time in 1916 and gave talks on topics such as Romain Rolland, the French Revolution, the Paris Commune and the emancipation of women. In the wake of the arrest of Socialist Party leaders that followed the revolutionary riots of August 1917, Gramsci became one of Turin's leading socialists when he was both elected to the party's Provisional Committee and made editor of Il Grido del Popolo.In April 1919 with Togliatti, Angelo Tasca and Umberto Terracini Gramsci set up the weekly newspaper L'Ordine Nuovo (The New Order). In October of the same year, despite being divided into various hostile factions, the Socialist Party moved by a large majority to join the Third International. The L'Ordine Nuovo group was seen by Vladimir Lenin as closest in orientation to the Bolsheviks, and it received his backing against the anti-parliamentary programme of the extreme left Amadeo Bordiga.Amongst the various tactical debates that took place within the party, Gramsci's group was mainly distinguished by its advocacy of workers' councils, which had come into existence in Turin spontaneously during the large strikes of 1919 and 1920. For Gramsci these councils were the proper means of enabling workers to take control of the task of organising production. Although he believed his position at this time to be in keeping with Lenin's policy of "All power to the Soviets", his stance was attacked by Bordiga for betraying a syndicalist tendency influenced by the thought of Georges Sorel and Daniel DeLeon. By the time of the defeat of the Turin workers in spring 1920, Gramsci was almost alone in his defence of the councils.
In the Communist Party of ItalyThe failure of the workers' councils to develop into a national movement led Gramsci to believe that a Communist Party in the Leninist sense was needed. The group around L'Ordine Nuovo declaimed incessantly against the Italian Socialist Party's centrist leadership and ultimately allied with Bordiga's far larger "abstentionist" faction. On 21 January 1921, in the town of Livorno (Leghorn), the Communist Party of Italy (Partito Comunista d'Italia – PCI) was founded. Gramsci supported against Bordiga the Arditi del Popolo, a militant anti-fascist group which struggled against the Blackshirts.Gramsci would be a leader of the party from its inception but was subordinate to Bordiga, whose emphasis on discipline, centralism and purity of principles dominated the party's programme until the latter lost the leadership in 1924.In 1922 Gramsci travelled to Russia as a representative of the new party. Here, he met Julia Schucht, a young violinist whom Gramsci later married and by whom he had two sons, Delio and Giuliano. The Russian mission coincided with the advent of Fascism in Italy, and Gramsci returned with instructions to foster, against the wishes of the PCI leadership, a united front of leftist parties against fascism. Such a front would ideally have had the PCI at its centre, through which Moscow would have controlled all the leftist forces, but others disputed this potential supremacy: socialists did have a certain tradition in Italy too, while the communist party seemed relatively young and too radical. Many believed that an eventual coalition led by communists would have functioned too remotely from political debate, and thus would have run the risk of isolation.In late 1922 and early 1923, Benito Mussolini's government embarked on a campaign of repression against the opposition parties, arresting most of the PCI leadership, including Bordiga. At the end of 1923, Gramsci travelled from Moscow to Vienna, where he tried to revive a party torn by factional strife.In 1924 Gramsci, now recognised as head of the PCI, gained election as a deputy for the Veneto. He started organizing the launch of the official newspaper of the party, called L'Unità (Unity), living in Rome while his family stayed in Moscow. At its Lyons Congress in January 1926, Gramsci's theses calling for a united front to restore democracy to Italy were adopted by the party.In 1926 Joseph Stalin's manoeuvres inside the Bolshevik party moved Gramsci to write a letter to the Comintern, in which he deplored opposition led by Leon Trotsky, but also underlined some presumed faults of the leader. Togliatti, in Moscow as a representative of the party, received the letter, opened it, read it, and decided not to deliver it. This caused a difficult conflict between Gramsci and Togliatti which they never completely resolved. 
Imprisonment and death
On November 9, 1926 the Fascist government enacted a new wave of emergency laws, taking as a pretext an alleged attempt on Mussolini's life several days earlier. The fascist police arrested Gramsci, despite his parliamentary immunity, and brought him to Roman prison Regina Coeli.At his trial, Gramsci's prosecutor stated, "For twenty years we must stop this brain from functioning". Antonio Gramsci, Selections from the Prison Notebooks, Lawrence and Wishart, 1971, ISBN 0-85315-280-2, p.lxxxix.  He received an immediate sentence of 5 years in confinement on the island of Ustica and the following year he received a sentence of 20 years of prison in Turi, near Bari. In prison his health deteriorated. In 1932, a project for exchanging political prisoners (including Gramsci) between Italy and the Soviet Union failed. In 1934 he gained conditional freedom on health grounds, after visiting hospitals in Civitavecchia, Formia and Rome. He died in 1937, at the "Quisisana" Hospital in Rome at the age of 46. His ashes are buried in the Protestant Cemetery there.In an interview archbishop Luigi de Magistris, former head of the Apostolic Penitentiary of the Holy See stated that during Gramsci's final illness, he "returned to the faith of his infancy" and "died taking the sacraments."    However, Italian State documents on his death show that no religious official was sent for or received by Gramsci.  Other witness accounts of his death also do not mention any conversion to Catholicism or recantation by Gramsci of his atheism.  
ThoughtGramsci is seen by many  as one of the most important Marxist thinkers of the twentieth century, in particular as a key thinker in the development of Western Marxism. He wrote more than 30 notebooks and 3000 pages of history and analysis during his imprisonment. These writings, known as the Prison Notebooks, contain Gramsci's tracing of Italian history and nationalism, as well as some ideas in Marxist theory, critical theory and educational theory associated with his name, such as:

Cultural hegemony as a means of maintaining and legitimising the capitalist state.
The need for popular workers' education to encourage development of intellectuals from the working class.
An analysis of the modern capitalist state that distinguishes between political society, which dominates directly and coercively, and civil society, where leadership is constituted by means of consent.
"Absolute historicism".
A critique of economic determinism that opposes fatalistic interpretations of Marxism.
A critique of philosophical materialism.


Hegemony 
 
Hegemony was a term previously used by Marxists such as Vladimir Ilyich Lenin to denote the political leadership of the working-class in a democratic revolution. Gramsci greatly expanded this concept, developing an acute analysis of how the ruling capitalist class – the bourgeoisie – establishes and maintains its control.Orthodox Marxism had predicted that socialist revolution was inevitable in capitalist societies. By the early 20th century, no such revolution had occurred in the most advanced nations. Capitalism, it seemed, was even more entrenched than ever. Capitalism, Gramsci suggested, maintained control not just through violence and political and economic coercion, but also through ideology. The bourgeoisie developed a hegemonic culture, which propagated its own values and norms so that they became the 'common sense' values of all. People in the working-class (and other classes) identified their own good with the good of the bourgeoisie, and helped to maintain the status quo rather than revolting.To counter the notion that bourgeois values represented 'natural' or 'normal' values for society, the working class needed to develop a culture of its own. Lenin held that culture was 'ancillary' to political objectives but for Gramsci it was fundamental to the attainment of power that cultural hegemony be achieved first. In Gramsci's view, a class cannot dominate in modern conditions by merely advancing its own narrow economic interests. Neither can it dominate purely through force and coercion. Rather, it must exert intellectual and moral leadership, and make alliances and compromises with a variety of forces. Gramsci calls this union of social forces a ‘historic bloc’, taking a term from Georges Sorel. This bloc forms the basis of consent to a certain social order, which produces and re-produces the hegemony of the dominant class through a nexus of institutions, social relations and ideas. In this manner, Gramsci developed a theory that emphasized the importance of the political and ideological superstructure in both maintaining and fracturing relations of the economic base.Gramsci stated that bourgeois cultural values were tied to folklore, popular culture and  religion, and therefore much of his analysis of hegemonic culture is aimed at these. He was also impressed by the influence Roman Catholicism had and the care the Church had taken to prevent an excessive gap developing between the religion of the learned and that of the less educated. Gramsci saw Marxism as a marriage of the purely intellectual critique of religion found in Renaissance humanism and the elements of the Reformation that had appealed to the masses. For Gramsci, Marxism could supersede religion only if it met people's spiritual needs, and to do so people would have to think of it as an expression of their own experience.For Gramsci, hegemonic dominance ultimately relied on a "consented" coercion, and in a "crisis of authority" the "masks of consent" slip away, revealing the fist of force.
Intellectuals and educationGramsci gave much thought to the question of the role of intellectuals in society. Famously, he stated that all men are intellectuals, in that all have intellectual and rational faculties, but not all men have the social function of intellectuals.  He did not see modern intellectuals as simply talkers. Rather, they were practically-minded directors and organisers who produced hegemony by means of ideological apparatuses such as education and the media. Furthermore, he distinguished between a "traditional" intelligentsia which sees itself (wrongly) as a class apart from society, and the thinking groups which every class produces from its own ranks "organically". Such "organic" intellectuals do not simply describe social life in accordance with scientific rules, but instead articulate, through the language of culture, the feelings and experiences which the masses could not express for themselves. The need to create a working-class culture relates to Gramsci's call for a kind of education that could develop working-class intellectuals, who would not simply introduce Marxist ideology from without the proletariat, but rather renovate and make critical of the status quo the already existing intellectual activity of the masses. His ideas about an education system for this purpose correspond with the notion of critical pedagogy and popular education as theorized and practised in later decades by Paulo Freire in Brazil, and have much in common with the thought of Frantz Fanon. For this reason, partisans of adult and popular education consider Gramsci an important voice to this day.
State and civil society 
Gramsci's theory of hegemony is tied to his conception of the capitalist state. Gramsci does not understand the 'state' in the narrow sense of the government. Instead, he divides it between 'political society' (the police, the army, legal system, etc.) – the arena of political institutions and legal constitutional control – and 'civil society' (the family, the education system, trade unions, etc.) – commonly seen as the 'private' or 'non-state' sphere, including the economy. He stresses, however, that the division is purely conceptual and that the two, in reality, often overlap. The capitalist state, Gramsci claims, rules through force plus consent: political society is the realm of force and civil society is the realm of consent.Gramsci proffers that under modern capitalism, the bourgeoisie can maintain its economic control by allowing certain demands made by trade unions and mass political parties within civil society to be met by the political sphere. Thus, the bourgeoisie engages in passive revolution by going beyond its immediate economic interests and allowing the forms of its hegemony to change. Gramsci posits that movements such as reformism and fascism, as well as the 'scientific management' and assembly line methods of Frederick Taylor and Henry Ford respectively, are examples of this.Drawing from Machiavelli, he argues that 'The Modern Prince' – the revolutionary party – is the force that will allow the working-class to develop organic intellectuals and an alternative hegemony within civil society. For Gramsci, the complex nature of modern civil society means that a 'war of position', carried out by revolutionaries through political agitation, the trade unions, advancement of 'proletarian' culture, and other ways to create an opposing civil society was necessary along side a 'war of maneuver' — a direct revolution — in order to have a successful revolution without a danger of a counter-revolution or degeneration.Despite his claim that the lines between the two may be blurred, Gramsci rejects the state-worship that results from identifying political society with civil society, as was done by the Jacobins and Fascists. He believes the proletariat's historical task is to create a 'regulated society' and defines the 'withering away of the state' as the full development of civil society's ability to regulate itself.
HistoricismGramsci, like the early Marx, was an emphatic proponent of historicism. In Gramsci's view, all meaning derives from the relation between human practical activity (or "praxis") and the "objective" historical and social processes of which it is a part. Ideas cannot be understood outside their social and historical context, apart from their function and origin. The concepts by which we organise our knowledge of the world do not derive primarily from our relation to things (to an objective reality), but rather from the social relations between the users of those concepts. As a result, there is no such thing as an unchanging "human nature", but only an idea of such which varies historically. Furthermore, philosophy and science do not "reflect" a reality independent of man, but rather are only "true" in that they express the real developmental trend of a given historical situation.For the majority of Marxists, truth was truth no matter when and where it is known, and scientific knowledge (which included Marxism) accumulated historically as the advance of truth in this everyday sense. On this view, Marxism could not be said to not belong to the illusory realm of the superstructure because it is a science. In contrast, Gramsci believed Marxism was "true" in a socially pragmatic sense: by articulating the class consciousness of the proletariat, Marxism expressed the "truth" of its times better than any other theory. This anti-scientistic and anti-positivist stance was indebted to the influence of Benedetto Croce. However, it should be underlined that Gramsci's "absolute historicism" broke with Croce's tendency to secure a metaphysical synthesis in historical "destiny". Though Gramsci repudiates the charge, his historical account of truth has been criticised as a form of relativism.
Critique of "economism"In a notable pre-prison article entitled "The Revolution against  ", Gramsci claimed that the October Revolution in Russia had invalidated the idea that socialist revolution had to await the full development of capitalist forces of production. This reflected his view that Marxism was not a determinist philosophy. The principle of the causal "primacy" of the forces of production, he held, was a misconception of Marxism. Both economic changes and cultural changes are expressions of a "basic historical process", and it is difficult to say which sphere has primacy over the other. The belief, widespread within the workers’ movement in its earliest years, that it would inevitably triumph due to "historical laws", was, in Gramsci's view, a product of the historical circumstances of an oppressed class restricted mainly to defensive action. Such a fatalistic doctrine was to be abandoned as a hindrance once the working-class became able to take the initiative. Because Marxism is a "philosophy of praxis", it cannot rely on unseen "historical laws" as the agents of social change. History is defined by human praxis and therefore includes human will. Nonetheless, will-power cannot achieve anything it likes in any given situation: when the consciousness of the working-class reaches the stage of development necessary for action, it will encounter historical circumstances that cannot be arbitrarily altered. However, it is not predetermined by historical inevitability or "destiny" as to which of several possible developments will take place as a result.His critique of economism also extended to that practiced by the syndicalists of the Italian trade unions. He believed that many trade unionists had settled for a reformist, gradualist approach in that they had refused to struggle on the political front in addition to the economic front. For Gramsci, much as the ruling class can look beyond its own immediate economic interests to reorganise the forms of its own hegemony, so must the working-class present its own interests as congruous with the universal advancement of society. While Gramsci envisioned the trade unions as one organ of a counter-hegemonic force in capitalist society, the trade union leaders simply saw these organizations as a means to improve conditions within the existing structure. Gramsci referred to the views of these trade unionists as "vulgar economism", which he equated to covert reformism and even liberalism.
Critique of materialismBy virtue of his belief that human history and collective praxis determine whether any philosophical question is meaningful or not, Gramsci's views run contrary to the metaphysical materialism and 'copy' theory of perception advanced by Engels   and Lenin, though he does not explicitly state this. For Gramsci, Marxism does not deal with a reality that exists in and for itself, independent of humanity. The concept of an objective universe outside of human history and human praxis was, in his view, analogous to belief in God; there could be no objectivity, but only a universal intersubjectivity to be established in a future communist society. Natural history was thus only meaningful in relation to human history. In his view philosophical materialism resulted from a lack of critical thought, and could not, as Lenin  claimed, be said to oppose religious dogma. Despite this, Gramsci resigned himself to the existence of this arguably cruder form of Marxism: the proletariat's status as a dependent class meant that Marxism, as its philosophy, could often only be expressed in the form of popular superstition and common sense. Nonetheless, it was necessary to effectively challenge the ideologies of the educated classes, and to do so Marxists must present their philosophy in a more sophisticated guise, and attempt to genuinely understand their opponents’ views.
InfluenceGramsci's thought emanates from the organized left, but he has also become an important figure in current academic discussions within cultural studies and critical theory. Political theorists from the center and the right have also found insight in his concepts; his idea of hegemony, for example, has become widely cited. His influence is particularly strong in contemporary political science (see Neo-gramscianism). His work also heavily influenced intellectual discourse on popular culture and scholarly popular culture studies in whom many have found the potential for political or ideological resistance to dominant government and business interests.His critics charge him with fostering a notion of power struggle through ideas. They find the Gramscian approach to philosophical analysis, reflected in current academic controversies, to be in conflict with open-ended, liberal inquiry grounded in apolitical readings of the classics of Western culture. Gramscians would counter that thoughts of "liberal inquiry" and "apolitical reading" are utterly naive; for the Gramscians, these are intellectual devices used to maintain the hegemony of the capitalist class. To credit or blame Gramsci for the travails of current academic politics is an odd turn of history, since Gramsci himself was never an academic, and was in fact deeply intellectually engaged with Italian culture, history, and current liberal thought.As a socialist, Gramsci's legacy has been disputed. Togliatti, who led the Party (renamed as Italian Communist Party, PCI) after World War II and whose gradualist approach was a forerunner to Eurocommunism, claimed that the PCI's practices during this period were congruent with Gramscian thought. Others, however, have argued that Gramsci was a Left Communist, who would likely have been expelled from his Party if prison had not prevented him from regular contact with Moscow during the leadership of Joseph Stalin.
Influences on Gramsci's thought

Niccolò Machiavelli — 16th century Italian writer who greatly influenced Gramsci's theory of the state.
Karl Marx — philosopher, historian, economist and founder of Marxism.
Vladimir Lenin — founder of the Bolshevik Party and a leader of the Russian Revolution.
Antonio Labriola — Italy's first notable Marxist theorist, believed Marxism's main feature was the nexus it established between history and philosophy.
Georges Sorel — French syndicalist writer who rejected the inevitability of historical progress.
Vilfredo Pareto — Italian economist and sociologist, known for his theory on mass and elite interaction.
Henri Bergson — French philosopher.
Benedetto Croce — Italian liberal, anti-Marxist and idealist philosopher whose thought Gramsci subjected to careful and thorough critique.
Giovanni Gentile — Italian neo-Hegelian philosopher


Later thinkers influenced by Gramsci 
 

Zackie Achmat
Louis Althusser 
Perry Anderson
Giulio Angioni
Michael Apple
Stanley Aronowitz
Giovanni Arrighi
Zygmunt Bauman
Enrico Berlinguer
Homi K. Bhabha
Gordon Brown 
Judith Butler
Alex Callinicos
Robert W. Cox
Alain de Benoist
Ernesto de Martino
Marilena de Souza Chaui
Rudi Dutschke
John Fiske
Paulo Freire
Néstor García Canclini
Eugenio Garin
Eugene D. Genovese
Stephen Gill 
Sam Gindin 
Todd Gitlin
Paul Gottfried
Stuart Hall
David Harvey
Hamish Henderson
Eric Hobsbawm
Samuel P. Huntington
Bob Jessop
Ernesto Laclau
Subcomandante Marcos
Chantal Mouffe
Antonio Negri
Luigi Nono
Michael Omi
Pier Paolo Pasolini
Antonio Pigliaru
Michelangelo Pira
Nicos Poulantzas
Gyan Prakash
William I. Robinson
Edward Said 
Ato Sekyi-Otu
Gayatri Chakravorty Spivak
E.P. Thompson
Emily Thomas
Cornel West
Howard Winant
Raymond Williams
Eric Wolf
Howard Zinn
Partha Chatterjee
Eqbal Ahmad 
Jean Comaroff and John Comaroff 
 
Gramsci's influence in popular culture
Music:

Gramsci Melodic – American (Pittsburgh) synthpop band
Scritti Politti – British alternative band
Billy Bragg – English folk musician  

Theatre:

Occupations – Gramsci is a central character in Trevor Griffiths's 1970 play about workers taking over car factories in Turin in 1920.

Television: Emily Thomas

Spaced – Series 1 Episode 5 features a dog named Gramsci, named by his owner after "an Italian Marxist" to help in his campaign against the ruling class by hunting down the rich. One character claimed that the dog could smell wealth from twenty feet away.

Cities

Genoa A major road going through the lower portion of Genoa, along the coast, is named after Antonio Gramsci.


Bibliography

Pre-Prison Writing (Cambridge University Press)
The Prison Notebooks (three volumes) (Columbia University Press)
Selections from the Prison Notebooks (International Publishers)


See also

Cultural hegemony
Subaltern Studies
Reformism
Articulation (sociology)
Risorgimento
Praxis School
Liberation theology
Antonio Gramsci Battalion


Endnotes 
Sources 

 
 
 
Harman Chris the Prison Notebooks and Philosophy
 
 
 
 
Pastore, Gerardo (2011), Antonio Gramsci. Questione sociale e questione sociologica. Livorno: Belforte. ISBN 978-88-7467-059-8.
 
 
External links 
 
 

Gramsci's writings at MIA
The International Gramsci Society
"Notes on Language". TELOS
Fondazione Instituto Gramsci
Special issue of International Socialism journal with a collection on Gramsci's legacy
Roberto Robaina: Gramsci and revolution: a necessary clarification
Dan Jakopovich: Revolution and the Party in Gramsci's Thought: A Modern Application
Gramsci's contribution to the field of adult and popular education
The life and work of Antonio Gramsci
  Antonio Gramsci, 1891–1937
The Praxis Prism – The Epistemology of Antonio Gramsci
Gramsci Links Archive
  
 
  
DEFAULTSORT




















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Sophie Wilson
 
 
 
 Sophie Wilson (born 'Roger Wilson' in Leeds, England, in 1957) is a British computer scientist. She is known for designing the Acorn Micro-Computer, the first of a long line of computers sold by Acorn Computers Ltd,    as well as the instruction set of the highly successful ARM processor.
Life and career
Wilson was educated at Cambridge University. In 1978, she designed the Acorn Micro-Computer, the first of a long line of computers sold by Acorn Computers Ltd. In 1981, Wilson extended the Acorn Atom's BASIC programming language dialect into an improved version for the Acorn Proton, a microcomputer that enabled Acorn to win the contract with the British Broadcasting Corporation (BBC) for their ambitious computer education project, whereupon the Proton became the BBC Micro and its BASIC was developed into BBC BASIC. In 1983, she designed the instruction set for one of the first RISC processors, the Acorn RISC Machine (ARM), later to become one of the most successful IP-cores (i.e., a licenced CPU core) of the 1990s and 2000s.Wilson designed Acorn Replay, the video architecture for Acorn machines. This included the operating system extensions for video access as well as the codecs themselves, optimised to run high frame rate video on ARM CPUs from the ARM 2 onwards.Wilson was a member of the board of the technology and games company Eidos plc, which bought and created Eidos Interactive, for the years following its flotation in 1990, and was a consultant to ARM Ltd when it was split off from Acorn in 1990.

Since the demise of Acorn Computers, Wilson has made a small number of public appearances to talk about her time there. Wilson is now the Director of IC Design in Broadcom’s Cambridge, U.K. office.  She was the Chief Architect of Broadcom's Firepath processor.  Firepath has its history in Acorn Computers, which, after being renamed to Element 14, was bought by Broadcom in 2000.She was listed in 2011 in Maximum PC as   in an article entitled The 15 Most Important Women in Tech History.    She was awarded the Fellow Award by the Computer History Museum in California in 2012.            Wilson is transgender.       In the BBC television drama Micro Men a young version of her is played by Stefan Butler and Wilson herself makes a cameo appearance as a pub landlady. 
 
See also

Acorn Computers
Steve Furber
Hermann Hauser
List of programmers
List of transgender people


References 
External links

An interview with Sophie Wilson
Sophie Wilson's home page
  
DEFAULTSORT










 
 
 
 
	Christopher Evans (computer scientist)
 Christopher Riche Evans (29 May 1931 – 10 October 1979) was a British psychologist, computer scientist, and author.
BiographyBorn in Aberdovey, Evans spent his childhood in Wales and was educated at Christ College, Brecon (1941–49). He spent two years in the RAF (1950–52), and worked as a science journalist and writer until 1957, when he began a B.A. course in Psychology at University College, London, graduating with honours in 1960. After a summer fellowship at Duke University, where he first met his  American wife, Nancy Fullmer, he took up a Research Assistant post in the Physics Laboratory, University of Reading, working on eye movements under Professor R.W. Ditchburn. Upon receiving his PhD (the title of his thesis was “Pattern Perception and the Stabilised Retinal Image”), he went to the Division of Computer Science, National Physical Laboratory, Teddington, in 1964, where he remained until his death from cancer in 1979. He had two children, Christopher Samuel Evans and Victoria Evans-Theiler.
WorksIn 1979, Christopher Evans wrote a book about the oncoming microcomputer revolution, The Mighty Micro: The Impact of the Computer Revolution, which included predictions for the future up to the year 2000.  This book was also printed in the USA as The Micro Millennium (New York: The Viking Press, ISBN 0-670-47400-2). He subsequently scripted and presented for ATV a six-part television series based on this book and broadcast posthumously by ITV between October and December 1979. His other books include Cults of Unreason, a study of Scientology and other perceived pseudoscience, and Landscapes of the Night: How and Why We Dream. In the 1970s, Evans undertook a set of interviews with computer pioneers such as Konrad Zuse and Grace Hopper. These were released through the Science Museum, London, as Pioneers of Computing, a set of cassette tapes.Christopher Evans also edited two anthologies of psychological science fiction/horror stories, Mind at Bay and Mind in Chains, a collection of science writings, Cybernetics: Key Papers, a reference book Psychology: A Dictionary of Mind, Brain and Behaviour, and was a contributing editor to the science magazine Omni. A passionate pilot, he also edited a yearly pilot's diary of rural airfields in Great Britain.During the 1970s, Evans was the scientific advisor to the ITV TV series, The Tomorrow People. Christopher Evans died of cancer in 1979, at the age of 48, shortly after The Mighty Micro had been published in hardcover. 
References 

Selected works
 

Cults of Unreason
 
 
 
 
The Mighty Micro
 
 
  
   
DEFAULTSORT






	Gerald of Wales
 Gerald of Wales  (c. 1146 – c. 1223), also known as Gerallt Gymro in Welsh or Giraldus Cambrensis in Latin, archdeacon of Brecon, was a medieval clergyman and chronicler of his times. Born ca. 1146 at Manorbier Castle in Pembrokeshire, Wales, he was of mixed Norman and Welsh descent; he is also known as Gerald de Barri.
Early lifeGerald was son of William FitzOdo de Barry (or Barri), the common ancestor of the Barry family in Ireland and one of the most powerful Anglo-Norman barons in Wales at that time.  He was a maternal nephew of David fitzGerald, the Bishop of St David's and a grandson of Gerald de Windsor (alias FitzWalter),  Constable of Pembroke Castle, and Nest the daughter of Rhys ap Tewdwr. Through their mother, Angharad, Gerald and his siblings were closely related to Angharad's first cousin, Rhys ap Gruffydd, the Lord Rhys (Yr Arglwydd Rhys), and his family.Gerald received his initial education at the Benedictine house of Gloucester, followed by a period of study in Paris from ca 1165-74, where he studied the trivium. He was employed by Richard of Dover, the Archbishop of Canterbury, on various ecclesiastical missions in Wales, wherein he distinguished himself for his efforts to remove supposed abuses of consanguinity and tax laws flourishing in the Welsh church at the time. He was appointed archdeacon of Brecon, to which was attached a residence at Llanddew. He obtained this position by reporting the existence of the previous archdeacon's mistress; the man was promptly fired. While administrating this post, Gerald collected tithes of wool and cheese from the populace; the income from the archdeaconry supported him for many years. Upon the death of his uncle, the Bishop of St David's, in 1176, the chapter nominated Gerald as his successor. St David's had long-term aims of becoming independent of Canterbury, and the chapter may have thought that Gerald was the man to take up the cause. Henry II of England, fresh from his struggle with Thomas Becket, promptly rejected Gerald, possibly because his Welsh blood and ties to the ruling family of Deheubarth made him seem like a troublesome prospect, in favour of one of his Norman retainers Peter de Leia.  According to Gerald, the king said at the time: "It is neither necessary or expedient for king or archbishop that a man of great honesty or vigour should become Bishop of St. David's, for fear that the Crown and Canterbury should suffer thereby. Such an appointment would only give strength to the Welsh and increase their pride". Biography – Gerald of Wales  The chapter acquiesced in the decision; and Gerald, disappointed with the result, withdrew to the University of Paris. From ca 1179-8, he studied and taught canon law and theology. He returned to England and spent an additional five years studying theology. In 1180, he received a minor appointment from the Bishop of St. David's, which he soon resigned because of corruption he saw in the administration.
Royal servant – travels in Wales and IrelandGerald became a royal clerk and chaplain to King Henry II of England in 1184, first acting mediator between the crown and Prince Rhys ap Gruffydd. He was chosen to accompany one of the king's sons, John, in 1185 on an expedition to Ireland. This was the catalyst for his literary career; his work Topographia Hibernica (1188) is an account of his journey there. He followed it up, shortly afterwards, with an account of Henry's conquest of Ireland, the Expugnatio Hibernica. Both works were revised and added to several times before his death, and display a notable degree of Latin learning, as well as a great deal of prejudice against a foreign people. Gerald was proud to be related to some of the Norman invaders of Ireland, such as his maternal uncle Robert Fitz-Stephen and Raymond FitzGerald, and his influential account, which portrays the Irish as barbaric savages, gives important insight into Anglo-Norman views of Ireland and the history of the invasion.Having thus demonstrated his usefulness, Gerald was selected to accompany the Archbishop of Canterbury, Baldwin of Forde, on a tour of Wales in 1188, the object being a recruitment campaign for the Third Crusade. His account of that journey, the Itinerarium Cambriae (1191) was followed by the Descriptio Cambriae in 1194. His two works on Wales remain incredibly valuable historical documents, significant for their descriptions — however untrustworthy and inflected by ideology, whimsy, and his unique style — of Welsh and Norman culture. As a royal clerk, Gerald observed significant political events at first hand, and was offered appointments as bishoprics of Wexford and Leighlin, and apparently at a little later time the bishopric of Ossory and the archbishopric of Cashel, and later the Welsh Bishopric of Bangor and, in 1191, that of Llandaff. He turned them all down, possibly in the hopes of landing a more prominent bishopric in the future. He was acquainted with Walter Map whose career shares some similarities with Gerald. Retiring from royal service, he lived in Lincoln from ca 1196 to 1198 where his friend William de Montibus was now chancellor of the Cathedral. It was in this period that De instructione principis was probably first written, a useful historical source on contemporary events. It was an influential work at the time, spreading, for example, the legend of MacAlpin's treason. Here Gerald is frequently critical of the rule of the Angevin kings, a shift from his earlier praise of Henry II in theTopographia Hibernica.  He also wrote a life of St Hugh of Lincoln.
Battle to become Archbishop of St David'sOn the death of Peter de Leia in 1198, the chapter of St. David's again nominated Gerald for the bishopric; but Hubert Walter, Archbishop of Canterbury, refused confirmation. Representatives of the canons followed Richard I to France, but before they could interview him he died; his successor, King John, received them kindly, and granted them permission to hold an election. They were unanimous in their selection of Gerald, and Gerald acted as Bishop-elect for much of the next four years; and, as Hubert still refused to confirm the election, Gerald started for Rome to have his election confirmed, where he had an interview with Pope Innocent III. He visited Rome on three occasions (1199–1200; 1201; 1202–3) in support of his claims. In 1198 the archbishop, however, had anticipated him and his agents in Rome undermined Gerald's case, and, as the pope was not convinced that St. David's was independent of Canterbury, the mission of Gerald proved a failure. Gerald had pleaded not only his own cause, but that of St David's as an Metropolitan archbishopric (and thus of the same status as Canterbury) reviving the earlier claims of Rhygyfarch and Bernard, Bishop of St David's. It was in connexion with this cause that he wrote his books "De jure Menevensis Ecclesiâ" and "De Rebus a Se Gestis". Gerald returned, and his cause was now supported by the Princes of Wales, most notably Llywelyn the Great, and Gruffydd ap Rhys II, while King John, frequently in conflict with the Welsh, warmly espoused the cause of the Archbishop of Canterbury. In 1202, Gerald was accused of stirring up the Welsh to rebellion and was put on trial, but the trial came to nothing in consequence of the absence of the principal judges. After this long struggle, the chapter of St. David's deserted Gerald, and having been obliged to leave Wales, he fled to Rome. The ports had been closed against him so he travelled in secret.  In April 1203 Pope Innocent III annulled both elections, and Geoffrey of Henlaw was appointed to the See of St. David's, despite the strenuous exertions of Gerald. Travelling back to France, he was briefly imprisoned in France for these actions. He afterwards reconciled with the king, and was forced to make a vow never to support the primacy of St David's over Canterbury ever again. The expenses of his unsuccessful election were paid by the crown. Gerald maintained that fear of the effect that his appointment would have on the national politics in Wales had prevented his appointment. He famously complained in a letter to Innocent III "Because I am a Welshman am I to be debarred from all preferments in Wales? On the same reasoning so would an Englishman in England, a Frenchman in France, and Italian in Italy. But I am sprung from the Princes of Wales and the Barons of the Marches, and when I see injustice in either race I hate it".  At this point he resigned his position as archdeacon of Brecon.
Later life and deathGerald spent the remainder of his life in academic study, most likely in Lincoln, producing works of devotional instruction and politics, and revising the works on Ireland and Wales he had written earlier in his life. He spent two years (1204–6) in Ireland with his relatives and made a fourth visit to Rome, purely as a pilgrimage, in 1206. The controversy over St David's soured his relationship with the crown. In 1216 a baronial plan to put Louis VIII of France on the throne of England in the First Barons' War was warmly welcomed by him. He died in about 1223 in his 77th year, probably in Hereford and he is according to some accounts buried at St David's Cathedral. There is a statue, by Henry Poole of Gerald in City Hall, Cardiff, and he was included in the vote on 100 Welsh Heroes for his Descriptio Kambriae and Itinerarium Kambriae. His reputation in Ireland, due to his negative portrayal of the Irish, is much less friendly. 
WritingsGerald's writings in good quality Latin, based on a thorough knowledge of Classical authors, reflect experiences gained on his travels as well as his great knowledge of the standard authorities. He was respected as a scholar in his time and afterwards. The noted scholar Edward Augustus Freeman said he was "the father of comparative philology," and in the preface to the last volume of Gerald's works in the Rolls Series, he calls him "one of the most learned men of a learned age," "the universal scholar."  His writings were prolific, running to about ten volumes in modern printed editions. Gerald was a man of strong opinions whose works are frequently polemical, including bitter attacks on his enemies, but he also had an intense curiosity, recording much valuable detail of everyday life in his ethnographic works.It is generally agreed today that his most distinguished works are those dealing with Wales and Ireland, with his two books on his beloved Wales the most important: Itinerarium Kambriae and Descriptio Kambriae which tell us much about Welsh history and geography and reflect on the Cultural relationship between the Welsh and the English. Gerald, despite his desire for an independent Welsh Church and admiration for parts of Welsh life, was very loyal to Norman Marcher rule, regarding the Normans as more civilised than the Welsh, a feeling reflected in his writings. Professor Davies tells us that Gerald, whom he calls "an admirable story-teller", is the only source for some of the most famous of the Welsh folk tales including the declaration of the old man of Pencader to Henry II which concludes Descriptio Cambriae: "This nation, O King, may now, as in former times, be harassed, and in a great measure weakened and destroyed by your and other powers, and it will also prevail by its laudable exertions, but it can never be totally subdued through the wrath of man, unless the wrath of God shall concur. Nor do I think that any other nation than this of Wales, nor any other language, whatever may hereafter come to pass, shall on the day of severe examination before the Supreme Judge, answer for this corner of the earth."It was Gerald who also wrote (of the Welsh) that "If they would be inseparable, they would be insuperable", and that, unlike the English hirelings, who fight for power or to procure gain or wealth, the Welsh patriots fight for their country. He had pleasant things to say about the poetic talents of his people, too:
 Gerald could not have predicted the later perfection of cynghanedd, the complex system of sound correspondence that has characterized the strict-meter poetry of the Welsh for so many centuries and that is still practised today, especially in competitions for the eisteddfod chair. Cynghanedd did not become a formal system with strict rules until the fourteenth century, but its uniquely Welsh forms had been honed for centuries before that.Finally, in Descriptio Cambriae, Gerald penned the following words that give so much pride to Welsh singers of today, especially those who participate in the immensely popular Cymanfaoedd Canu (hymn-singing festivals) held throughout Wales and North America:
 Another part of the above work,  however is less positive. As Cambrensis puts it, "an attention to order now requires that, in this second part, we should employ our pen in pointing out those particulars in which it seems to transgress the line of virtue and commendation". David Powel published an abridged version of Itinerarium Cambriae and Descriptio Cambriae in 1585 omitting Gerald's negative comments about the Welsh. Due to translations into English, the first being done by Sir Richard Colt Hoare, Bart., and other translations such as in Everyman's Library and Penguin Classics Gerald's works on Wales are well known today.In his writing on Ireland his love of music is very evident too.
" Chapter Xi of Distinction III    (Topographia Hibernica)
(Of the incomparable skill of the Irish in playing upon musical instruments)The only thing to which I find that this people apply a commendable industry is playing upon musical instruments; in which they are incomparably more skilful than any other nation I have ever seen.  For their modulation on these instruments, unlike that of the Britons to which I am accustomed, is not slow and harsh, but lively and rapid, while the harmony is both sweet and gay.  It is astonishing that in so complex and rapid a movement of the fingers, the musical proportions can be preserved........ it must be remarked however, that both Scotland and Wales strive to rival Ireland in the art of music...... His works on Ireland although invaluable for their detail are obviously biased, and have been attacked by Irish writers such as Stephen White. The following passage from his Topographia Hibernica shows why the Irish might not always be too enamoured with Gerald's views:

Distinction III    *Chapter XXXV    (Of the number of persons in this nation who have bodily defects)
"Moreover, I have never seen in any other nation so many individuals who were born blind, so many lame, maimed or having some natural defect.  The persons of those who are well-formed are indeed remarkably fine, nowhere better; but as those who are favoured with the gifts of nature grow up exceedingly handsome, those from whom she withholds them are frightfully ugly.  No wonder  if among an adulterous and incestuous people, in which both births and marriages are illegitimate, a nation out of the pale of the laws, nature herself should be foully corrupted by perverse habits.  It should seem that by the just judgements of God, nature sometimes produces such objects, contrary to her own laws, in order that those who will not regard Him duly by the light of their own consciences, should often have to lament their privations of the exterior and bodily gift of sight." 


Natural historyGerald was a keen and observant student of natural history, but the value of his observations is lessened by credulity and inability to distinguish fact from legend. He gives a vivid and accurate description of the last colony of the  European Beaver in Wales on the River Teifi, but spoils it by repeating the legend that beavers castrate themselves to avoid danger. Likewise he gives a good description of an Osprey fishing, but adds the mythical detail  that the bird has one webbed foot. His description of Irish wildlife was harshly called "worthless"; the better view perhaps is that despite its faults it gives a valuable glimpse of Irish fauna in the 1180s. Certainly there are valuable details: while the European Kingfisher is now common in Ireland, Gerald states clearly that it was not found in Ireland in his time: on the other hand the European Dipper, which he had evidently not seen before, was very common.
List of works

Topographia Hibernica ("Topography of Ireland", 1187) 
Expugnatio Hibernica ("Conquest of Ireland", 1189) 
Itinerarium Cambriae ("Journey through Wales", 1191)
Liber de Principis instructione c. 1193
Descriptio Cambriae ("Description of Wales", 1194)
De instructione principis ("Education of a prince")
De rebus a se gestis ("Autobiography")
De iure et statu Menevensis ecclesiae ("Rights and privileges of the Church of St David's")
Gemma ecclesiastica ("Jewel of the church")
Speculum ecclesiae ("Mirror of the church")
Symbolum electorum
Invectiones
Retractationes
Speculum duorum
Life of St Hugh of Lincoln
Life of Geoffrey, Archbishop of York
Life of St Ethelbert 
Life of St Remigius
Life of St David



Lost works
Vita sancti Karadoci ("Life of St Caradoc")
De fidei fructu fideique defectu
Totius Kambriae mappa ("Map of all Wales", c. 1205)


In popular culture

Gerald's tour of Wales in 1188 was detailed in a 1988 cartoon voiced by comedian Max Boyce.
Gerald of Wales was 4th in the series of 8 by Nicholas Crane in Great British Journeys
James Goldman's novel Myself As Witness is written from Gerald of Wales' point of view, though in the novel he is referred to as Giraldus Cambrensis.
See also

Adam of Usk
Geoffrey of Monmouth
Laudabiliter


References 
Bibliography

The autobiography of Giraldus Cambrensis tr. H. E. Butler. London: Cape, 1937.
Gerald of Wales, The Journey Through Wales and The Description of Wales tr. Lewis Thorpe. Harmondsworth: Penguin, 1978.
Gerald of Wales, The History and Topography of Ireland tr. John J. O'Meara. Harmondsworth: Penguin, 1982.ISBN 978-0-14-044423-0
Gerald of Wales, Speculum Duorum ed. Yves Lefevre and R. C. Huygens, tr. Brian Dawson. Cardiff: University of Wales Press, 1974.


External links 

Four Works of Giraldus Cambrensis at the Internet Archive
 
G.Cambrensis in Encyclopædia Britannica Eleventh Edition (1911), available at Wikisource.
Latin Chroniclers from the Eleventh to the Thirteenth Centuries: Giraldus Cambrensis from The Cambridge History of English and American Literature, Volume I, 1907–21.
Gerald of Wales at castlewales.com
Full text of Gerald of Wales's The Description of Wales on A Vision of Britain through Time, with links to the places named.
Full text of Gerald of Wales's The Itinerary of Archbishop Baldwin through Wales on A Vision of Britain through Time, with links to the places named.
Giraldus Cambrensis, The Itinerary and Description of Wales, Everyman's Library, Edited by Ernest Rhys, with an Introduction by W. Llewelyn Williams, January 1908

 
DEFAULTSORT
















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Geoffrey of Monmouth
 Geoffrey of Monmouth ( ,  ) (c. 1100 – c. 1155) was a cleric and one of the major figures in the development of British historiography and the popularity of tales of King Arthur. He is best known for his chronicle   ("History of the Kings of Britain"), which was widely popular in its day and was credited, uncritically, well into the 16th century,  being translated into various other languages from its original Latin.
BiographyGeoffrey was probably born some time between 1100 and 1110 J. C. Crick, "Monmouth, Geoffrey of (d. 1154/5)", Oxford Dictionary of National Biography, Oxford University Press, 2004, accessed 7 June 2009  in Wales or the Welsh Marches. He must have reached the age of majority by 1129, when he is recorded as witnessing a charter.In his Historia, Geoffrey refers to himself as Galfridus Monumetensis, "Geoffrey of Monmouth", which indicates a significant connection to Monmouth, Wales, and which may refer to his birthplace.  Geoffrey's works attest to some acquaintance with the place-names of the region.  To contemporaries, Geoffrey was known as Galfridus Artur(us) or variants thereof.   The "Arthur" in these versions of his name may indicate the name of his father, or a nickname based on Geoffrey's scholarly interests. Earlier scholars assumed that Geoffrey was Welsh or at least spoke Welsh.  However, Geoffrey's knowledge of the Welsh language appears to have been slight,  and it is now recognised that there is no real evidence that Geoffrey was of either Welsh or Cambro-Norman descent, unlike for instance, Gerald of Wales. Roberts, "Geoffrey of Monmouth, Historia Regnum Britanniae and Brut y Brenhinedd", p. 98.  He is likely to have sprung from the same French-speaking elite of the Welsh border country as the writers Gerald of Wales and Walter Map, and Robert, Earl of Gloucester, to whom Geoffrey dedicated versions of his Historia Regum Britanniae.  It has been argued, by Frank Stenton among others, that Geoffrey's parents may have been among the many Bretons who took part in William I's Conquest and settled in the southeast of Wales.  Monmouth had been in the hands of Breton lords since 1075  or 1086  and the names Galfridus and Arthur (if interpreted as a patronymic) were more common among the Bretons than the Welsh. He may have served for a while in a Benedictine priory in Monmouth.    However, most of his adult life appears to have been spent outside Wales. Between 1129 and 1151 his name appears on six charters in the Oxford area, sometimes styled magister ("teacher").  He was probably a secular canon of St. George's college. All the charters signed by Geoffrey are also signed by Walter, Archdeacon of Oxford, also a canon at that church. Another frequent co-signatory is Ralph of Monmouth, a canon of Lincoln. On 21 February 1152 Archbishop Theobald consecrated Geoffrey as bishop of St Asaph, having ordained him a priest 10 days before. "There is no evidence that he ever visited his see," writes Lewis Thorpe, "and indeed the wars of Owain Gwynedd make this most unlikely."  He appears to have died between 25 December 1154 and 24 December 1155, in 1155 according to Welsh chronicles, when his apparent successor, Richard, took office. 
 Geoffrey wrote several works of interest, all in Latin, the language of learning and literature in Europe during the medieval period. His major work was the   (History of the Kings of Britain), the work best known to modern readers. It relates the purported history of Britain, from its first settlement by Brutus, a descendant of the Trojan hero Aeneas, to the death of Cadwallader in the 7th century, taking in Julius Caesar's invasions of Britain, two kings, Leir and Cymbeline, later immortalized by William Shakespeare, and one of the earliest developed narratives of King Arthur.Geoffrey claims in his dedication that the book is a translation of an "ancient book in the British language that told in orderly fashion the deeds of all the kings of Britain", given to him by Walter, Archdeacon of Oxford. Modern historians have dismissed this claim.  It is, however, likely that the Archdeacon furnished Geoffrey with some materials in the Welsh language that helped inspire his work, as Geoffrey's position and acquaintance with the Archdeacon would not have afforded him the luxury of fabricating such a claim outright.  Much of it is based on the Historia Britonum, a 9th century Welsh-Latin historical compilation, Bede's Historia ecclesiastica gentis Anglorum and Gildas's sixth-century polemic De Excidio et Conquestu Britanniae expanded with material from Bardic oral tradition, genealogical tracts, and embellished by Geoffrey's own imagination.  In an exchange of manuscript material for their own histories, Robert of Torigny gave Henry of Huntingdon a copy of Historia regum Britanniae, which both Robert and Henry used uncritically as authentic history and subsequently used in their own works,  by which means some of Geoffrey's fictions became embedded in popular history.  is now acknowledged as a literary work of national myth containing little reliable history. This has since led many modern scholars to agree with William of Newburgh, who wrote around 1190 that "it is quite clear that everything this man wrote about Arthur and his successors, or indeed about his predecessors from Vortigern onwards, was made up, partly by himself and partly by others".  Other contemporaries were similarly unconvinced by Geoffrey's "History". For example, Giraldus Cambrensis recounts the experience of a man possessed by demons: "If the evil spirits oppressed him too much, the Gospel of St John was placed on his bosom, when, like birds, they immediately vanished; but when the book was removed, and the History of the Britons by 'Geoffrey Arthur' (as Geoffrey named himself) was substituted in its place, they instantly reappeared in greater numbers, and remained a longer time than usual on his body and on the book." However, his major work was widely disseminated across the whole of Medieval Western Europe: Acton Griscom listed 186 extant manuscripts in 1929, and others have been identified since.  It enjoyed a significant afterlife in a variety of forms, including translations/adaptations such as the Anglo-Norman Roman de Brut of Wace, the Middle English Brut of Layamon, and several anonymous Middle Welsh versions known as   ("Brut of the kings").  where it was generally accepted as a true account.
Other writings 
The earliest of Geoffrey's writings to appear was probably the   (Prophecies of Merlin), which he wrote at some point before 1135, and which appears both independently and incorporated into the  . It consists of a series of obscure prophetic utterances attributed to Merlin, which Geoffrey claimed to have translated from an unspecified language. Geoffrey's structuring and reshaping of the Merlin and Arthur myths engendered the vast popularity of Merlin and Arthur myths in later literature, a popularity that lasts to this day; he is generally viewed by scholars as the major establisher of the Arthurian canon.  The Historias effect on the legend of King Arthur was so vast that Arthurian works have been categorized as "pre-" or "post-Galfridian" depending on whether or not they were influenced by him.The third work attributed to Geoffrey is another hexameter poem   ("Life of Merlin"). The   is based much more closely on traditional material about Merlin than are the other works; here he is known as Merlin of the Woods ( ) or Scottish Merlin (Merlinus Caledonius), and is portrayed as an old man living as a crazed and grief-stricken outcast in the forest. The story is set long after the timeframe of  s Merlin, but the author tries to synchronize the works with references to the mad prophet's previous dealings with Vortigern and Arthur. The   did not circulate widely, and the attribution to Geoffrey appears in only one late 13th century manuscript, but contains recognisably Galfridian elements in its construction and content, and most critics are content to recognise it as his. 
See also 

Adam of Usk
Henry of Huntingdon
Ranulf Higdon
William of Malmesbury


Notes 
References and further reading

Geoffrey of Monmouth.  The History of the Kings of Britain. Edited and translated by Michael Faletra.  Broadview Books: Peterborough, Ontario, 2008.  ISBN 1-55111-639-1
Geoffrey of Monmouth. The History of the Kings of Britain. Translated, with introduction and index, by Lewis Thorpe. Penguin Books: London, 1966. ISBN 0-14-044170-0
Parry, John Jay, and Robert Caldwell. "Geoffrey of Monmouth" in Arthurian Literature in the Middle Ages, Roger S. Loomis (ed.). Clarendon Press: Oxford University. 1959. ISBN 0-19-811588-1
Morris, John. The Age of Arthur: A History of the British Isles from 350 to 650. Barnes & Noble Books: New York. 1996 (originally 1973). ISBN 1-84212-477-3
Roberts, Brynley F.. "Geoffrey of Monmouth, Historia Regnum Britanniae and Brut y Brenhinedd" in The Arthur of the Welsh: The Arthurian Legend in Medieval Welsh Literature, Cardiff, University of Wales Press, 1991, ISBN 0-7083-1307-8
Curley, Michael. Geoffrey of Monmouth. New York: Twayne Publishers, 1994.
Echard, Siân. Arthurian Narrative in the Latin Tradition. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1998. ISBN 978-0521021524
N. J. Higham. King Arthur: Myth-making and History, London and New York, Routledge, 2002, ISBN 0-415-21305-3
Echard, Siân, ed. The Arthur of Medieval Latin Literature: The Development and Dissemination of the Arthurian Legend in Medieval Latin. Cardiff: University of Wales Press, 2011. ISBN 978-0708322017


External links 
 

Latin Chroniclers from the Eleventh to the Thirteenth Centuries: Geoffrey of Monmouth from The Cambridge History of English and American Literature, Volume I, 1907–21.


Editions of the Latin TextHammer, Jacob/ Geoffrey of Monmouth, Historia regum Britanniae, a variant version.
Edited by Jacob Hammer. Medieval Academy Books, No. 57 (1951).  Medieval Academy Electronic Editions.
English translations available on the web

Historia Regum Britanniae:
Histories of the Kings of Britain, tr. by Sebastian Evans, at Sacred Texts
By Aaron Thompson with revisions by J. A. Giles at   (PDF)
(Arthurian passages only) edited and translated by J. A. Giles at   Merlini, Basil Clarke's English translation from Life of Merlin: Vita Merlini (Cardiff: University of Wales Press, 1973).
At Jones the Celtic Encyclopedia
At Sacred-texts.com

 
DEFAULTSORT
















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Leó Szilárd
 
 Leó Szilárd ( , February 11, 1898 – May 30, 1964   until age 2) was a Hungarian American physicist and inventor who conceived the nuclear chain reaction in 1933, patented the idea of a nuclear reactor with Enrico Fermi, and in late 1939 wrote the letter for Albert Einstein's signature that resulted in the Manhattan Project that built the atomic bomb. He also conceived the electron microscope, the linear accelerator (1928, not knowing Gustav Ising's 1924 journal article and Rolf Widerøe's operational device) and the cyclotron.  Szilárd himself did not build all of these devices, or publish these ideas in scientific journals, and so their credit often went to others. As a result, Szilárd never received the Nobel Prize, but others were awarded the Prize as a result of their work on two of his inventions.  He was born in Budapest in the Kingdom of Hungary, and died in La Jolla, California.
Early lifeSzilárd was born in 1898 to middle-class parents in Budapest, Hungary . His parents, both Jewish, Louis Spitz, a civil engineer, and Thekla Vidor, raised Leó on the Városligeti Fasor in Pest, Hungary. Despite having a religious background, he was later said to be an agnostic.   From 1908–1916 Leó attended Reáliskola high school in his home town. Showing an early interest in physics and a proficiency in mathematics, in 1916 took the Eötvös Prize, a national prize for mathematics.  He enrolled as an engineering student at Budapest Technical University during 1916. The following year the Austro-Hungarian Army drafted him as an officer-candidate. Prior to his regiment being sent to the front lines, Szilárd fell ill with Spanish Influenza and he was returned home for hospitalization. Later he was informed that his regiment had been nearly annihilated in battle, so the sickness probably saved his life.  He was discharged honorably at the end of the war.During 1919 he resumed engineering studies at Budapest Technical University but soon decided to leave Hungary due to the chaotic political situation in Hungary following the first World War. Szilárd continued engineering studies at Technische Hochschule (Institute of Technology) in Berlin-Charlottenburg. He soon changed to physics there and took physics classes from Einstein, Planck, and Max von Laue. His dissertation on thermodynamics Über die thermodynamischen Schwankungserscheinungen (On The Manifestation of Thermodynamic Fluctuations), praised by Einstein, won top honors in 1922. In 1923 he was awarded a doctorate in physics from Humboldt University of Berlin.He was appointed as assistant to von Laue at the University of Berlin's Institute for Theoretical Physics during 1924. During 1927 he finished his habilitation and became a Privatdozent (private lecturer) in physics at University of Berlin. During his time in Berlin he worked on numerous technical inventions. For example, in 1928 he submitted a patent application for the linear accelerator and, in 1929, he applied for a patent for the cyclotron. During the 1926-1930 period, he worked with Einstein to develop a refrigerator, notable because it had no moving parts.  Szilárd's 1929 paper, Über die Entropieverminderung in einem thermodynamischen System bei Eingriffen intelligenter Wesen" (On the reduction of entropy in a thermodynamic system by the interference of intelligent beings) Z. Physik 53, 840-856, introduced the thought experiment now called Szilárd's engine and became important in the history of attempts to understand Maxwell's demon.
Developing the idea of the nuclear chain reaction
Szilárd went to London in 1933 where he read an article in The Times summarizing a speech given by Ernest Rutherford in which he rejected the possibility of using atomic energy for practical purposes. Rutherford's speech remarked specifically on the recent 1932 work of his students John Cockcroft and Ernest Walton in "splitting" lithium into alpha particles, by bombardment with protons from a particle accelerator they had constructed:

We might in these processes obtain very much more energy than the proton supplied, but on the average we could not expect to obtain energy in this way. It was a very poor and inefficient way of producing energy, and anyone who looked for a source of power in the transformation of the atoms was talking moonshine. But the subject was scientifically interesting because it gave insight into the atoms. 

Although the atom had been split and energy released, nuclear fission had not yet been discovered. However Szilárd was reportedly so annoyed at Rutherford's dismissal that on the same day the article about the Rutherford speech was printed in the morning paper, Szilárd conceived of the idea of nuclear chain reaction (analogous to a chemical chain reaction), using recently discovered neutrons. The idea did not use the mechanism of nuclear fission, which was not then known, but Szilárd realized that if neutrons could initiate any sort of energy-producting nuclear reaction, such as the one that had occurred in lithium, and could be produced themselves by the same reaction, energy might be obtained with little input, since the reaction would be self-sustaining. The following year he filed for a patent on the concept of the neutron-induced nuclear chain reaction. Richard Rhodes described Szilárd's moment of inspiration:

In London, where Southampton Row passes Russell Square, across from the British Museum in Bloomsbury, Leo Szilárd waited irritably one gray Depression morning for the stoplight to change. A trace of rain had fallen during the night; Tuesday, September 12, 1933, dawned cool, humid and dull. Drizzling rain would begin again in early afternoon. When Szilárd told the story later he never mentioned his destination that morning. He may have had none; he often walked to think. In any case another destination intervened. The stoplight changed to green. Szilárd stepped off the curb. As he crossed the street time cracked open before him and he saw a way to the future, death into the world and all our woes, the shape of things to come. Rhodes (1986:292-293). 

Szilárd first attempted to create a nuclear chain reaction using beryllium and indium, but these elements did not produce a chain reaction. During 1936, he assigned the chain-reaction patent to the British Admiralty to ensure its secrecy ( ). Szilárd also was the co-holder, with Nobel Laureate Enrico Fermi, of the patent on the nuclear reactor ( ).During 1938 Szilárd accepted an offer to conduct research at Columbia University in Manhattan, and moved to New York, and was soon joined by Fermi. After learning about the successful nuclear fission experiment conducted during 1939 in Germany by Otto Hahn, Fritz Strassmann, Lise Meitner, and Otto Robert Frisch, Szilárd and Fermi concluded that uranium would be the element capable of sustaining a chain reaction. Szilárd and Fermi conducted a simple experiment at Columbia and discovered significant neutron multiplication in uranium, proving that the chain reaction was possible and enabling nuclear weapons. Szilárd later described the event: "We turned the switch and saw the flashes. We watched them for a little while and then we switched everything off and went home." He understood the implications and consequences of this discovery, though. "That night, there was very little doubt in my mind that the world was headed for grief." At around that time the Germans and others were in a race to produce a nuclear chain reaction.  German attempts to control the chain reaction sought to do so using graphite, but these attempts proved unsuccessful. Szilárd realized graphite was indeed perfect for controlling chain reactions, just as the Germans had determined, but that the German method of producing graphite used boron carbide rods, and the minute amount of boron impurities in the manufactured graphite was enough to stop the chain reaction. Szilárd had graphite manufacturers produce boron-free graphite.  As a result, the first human-controlled chain reaction occurred on December 2, 1942. 
The Manhattan Project
Szilárd was directly responsible for the creation of the Manhattan Project. He drafted a confidential letter to Franklin D. Roosevelt explaining the possibility of nuclear weapons, warning of Nazi work on such weapons and encouraging the development of a program which could result in their creation. During August 1939 he approached his old friend and collaborator Albert Einstein and convinced him to sign the letter, lending his fame to the proposal.  The Einstein–Szilárd letter resulted in the establishment of research into nuclear fission by the U.S. government and ultimately to the creation of the Manhattan Project; FDR gave the letter to an aide, General Edwin M. "Pa" Watson with the instruction: "Pa, this requires action!"  Later, Szilárd relocated to the University of Chicago to continue work on the project. There, along with Fermi, he helped to construct the first "neutronic reactor", a uranium and graphite "atomic pile" in which the first self-sustaining nuclear chain reaction was achieved, during 1942.As the war continued, Szilárd became increasingly dismayed that scientists were losing control over their research to the military, and argued many times with General Leslie Groves, military director of the project. His resentment towards the U.S. government was exacerbated by his failure to prevent the destructive use of the atomic bomb through having a test explosion that could be witnessed by Japanese observers who would then have the opportunity to surrender and spare lives. Szilárd became a naturalized citizen of the United States during 1943.
Views on the use of nuclear weaponsIn 1932, Szilárd read the science fiction novel The World Set Free by H. G. Wells, a book which he said made a great impression on him. As a scientist, he was the first person to conceive of a device that, using a nuclear chain reaction as fuel, could be used as a bomb.As a survivor of the political and economic devastation in Hungary following World War I, which had been eviscerated by the Treaty of Trianon, Szilárd developed an enduring passion for the preservation of human life and freedom, especially freedom to communicate ideas.He hoped that the U.S. government would not use nuclear weapons because of their potential for use against civilian populations.  Szilárd hoped that the mere threat of such weapons would force Germany and/or Japan to surrender.  He drafted the Szilárd petition advocating demonstration of the atomic bomb.  However with the European war concluded and the U.S. suffering many casualties in the Pacific Ocean region, the new U.S. President Harry Truman agreed with advisers and chose to use atomic bombs against Hiroshima and Nagasaki over the protestations of Szilárd and other scientists.
After the warIn 1947, Szilárd switched topics of study because of his horror of atomic weapons, changing from physics to molecular biology, working extensively with Aaron Novick.  In February 1950 Szilárd proposed  a cobalt bomb, a new kind of nuclear weapon using cobalt as a tamper, which he said might destroy all life on the planet. U.S. News & World Report featured an interview with Szilárd in its August 15, 1960 issue, "President Truman Didn't Understand." He argued that "violence would not have been necessary if we had been willing to negotiate." During 1961 Szilárd published a book of short stories, The Voice of the Dolphins, in which he dealt with the moral and ethical issues raised by the Cold War and his own role in the development of atomic weapons. The title story described an international biology research laboratory in Central Europe. This became reality after a meeting in 1962 with Victor F. Weisskopf, James Watson and John Kendrew.  When the European Molecular Biology Laboratory was established, the library was named The Szilárd Library and the library stamp features dolphins.  Szilárd married Gertrud Weiss in 1951.  During 1960, Szilárd was diagnosed with bladder cancer.  He underwent cobalt therapy at New York's Memorial Sloan-Kettering Hospital using a cobalt 60 treatment regimen that he designed himself. He was familiar with the properties of this isotope from his work on the cobalt bomb. A second round of treatment with an increased dose followed during 1962. The doctors tried to tell him that the increased radiation dose would kill him, but he said it wouldn't, and that anyway he would die without it. The higher dose did its job and his cancer never returned. This treatment became standard for many cancers and is still used.  During 1962, Szilárd was part of a group of scientists who founded the Council for a Livable World.  The Council's goal was to warn the public and Congress of the threat of nuclear war and encourage rational arms control and nuclear disarmament. He spent his last years as a fellow of the Salk Institute in San Diego alongside his old friend Jacob Bronowski. In May 1964, Szilárd died in his sleep of a heart attack at the age of sixty-six.
Honors

American Academy of Arts and Sciences 1954
American Physical Society
Atoms for Peace Award 1959
National Inventors Hall of Fame
Humanist of the Year 1960



The crater Szilárd (34.0°N, 105.7°E, 122 km dia.) on the far side of the Moon is named after him.


See also

Timeline of low-temperature technology


Notes 
References

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


External links Information

Leo Szilárd Online—an "Internet Historic Site" (first created March 30, 1995) maintained by Gene Dannen
Leo Szilárd's page at atomicarchive.com
Einstein's Letter to President Roosevelt—1939
Annotated bibliography for Leo Szilárd from the Alsos Digital Library
Szilárd biography at Hungary.hu
Council for a Livable World
The Szilárd Library at the European Molecular Biology Laboratory
Szilárd lecture on war
Szilárd's math genealogy

Patents

 —Neutronic reactor—E. Fermi, L. Szilárd, filed December 19, 1944, issued May 17, 1955
 —Einstein Refrigerator—co-developed with Albert Einstein filed in 1926, issued November 11, 1930
  
 
DEFAULTSORT

























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Andrew Inglis Clark
  

Andrew Inglis Clark (24 February 1848 14 November 1907) was an Australian barrister, politician, electoral reformer and jurist. He initially qualified engineer, however he re-trained as a barrister in order to effectively fight for social causes which deeply concerned him.  After a long political career, mostly spent as Attorney-General, he was appointed a Senior Justice of the Supreme Court of Tasmania.  Despite being acknowledged as the leading expert on the Australian Constitution, he was never appointed to the High Court of Australia.  He popularised the Hare-Clark voting system, and introduced it to Tasmania. In addition Clark was a prolific author, though most of his writings were never published, rather they were circulated privately.     Clark was also Vice-Chancellor of the University of Tasmania.  Throughout his life, Clark was a progressive.  He championed the rights of worker to organise through trades unions, universal suffrage (including women's suffrage) and the rights to a fair trial - all issues which today we take for granted, but were so radical in the 1880s that he was described as a 'communist' by the Hobart Mercury. "Clark was an Australian Jefferson, who, like the great American Republican, fought for Australian independence; an autonomous judiciary; a wider franchise and lower property qualifications; fairer electoral boundaries; checks and balances between the judicature, legislature and executive; modern, liberal universities; and a Commonwealth that was federal, independent and based on natural rights."   p35 Clark's make significant contributions to the Australian Constitution.  Of the 96 sections of his draft, 86 are recognisable in the 128 sections of the final document.   Yet he also had a rich and warm home life.  He is described as "never too busy to mend a toy for a child, and his wife once wrote on hearing of his imminent return from America: 'to celebrate your return I must do something or bust". 
Early life and marriage
Clark was born in Hobart, Tasmania, the son of a Scottish engineer, Alexander Clark.  He was educated at Hobart High School.   After leaving school, he was apprenticed to  his family's engineering business, becoming a qualified engineer, and finally its business manager. His father had established a highly successful engineering business, based on an iron foundry.  The business was also involved with industrial design and construction of flour mills, water mills, coal mines and other substantial undertaking. H. Reynolds, 'Clark, Andrew Inglis (1848–1907)', Australian Dictionary of Biography, Volume 3, Melbourne University Press, 1969, pp 399–401. He grew to manhood during the 1860s, when the major issue, even in remote Tasmania, was the American Civil War and emancipation.  This last issue had an especial resonance in Tasmania where a form of slavery, transportation, had been abolished as recently as 1853.  Convicts were still a common sight for years later.  As late as 1902, Clark would publicly be moved to tears when discussing slavery. Clark became fascinated by all things American.In 1872, Clark disappointed his father by leaving to study law, becoming an Articled clerk with R. P. Adams. He was called to the bar in 1877. Clark, as a child attended a Baptist Sabbatical School until 1872 when the chapel was dissolved on a motion put by Clark due to the "lack of discipline and proper order of government in worship."  He then joined a Unitarian chapel, which led him into contact with leading American Unitarians, including Moncure Conway and Oliver Wendell Holmes, Jr.  The friendship formed with the latter would strongly influence his views and the development of the Clarks' draft of the Australian Constitution. Early in his life, Clark developed a passion for justice and liberty.  He joined the Minerva Club where he participated in debate on contemporary social issues.  In 1874, he edited its journal Quadrilateral.  As a 'young ardent republican', he was also a member of theAmerican Club, where at the 1876 annual dinner, he declared "We have met here tonight in the name of the principles which were proclaimed by the founders of the Anglo-American Republic…  and we do so because we believe those principles to be permanently applicable to the politics of the world".   He was inspired by Italian Risorgimento, especially by Joseph Mazzini of whom he had a picture in every room.  He became a radical, a democrat and a republican.   In 1878 he married Grace Ross, the daughter of a local shipbuilder John Ross, with whom he had five sons and two daughters: 


Esma (1878)
Alexander (1879) Marine engineer
Andrew (1882) Justice of the Supreme Court of Tasmania 1928-1953.
Conway (1883) Architect
Wendell (1885) Doctor
Melvyn (1886/1887?) 
Correl (1888) Clerk of Tasmanian Legislative Council
Ethel (1889)

One of the many mysteries of Clark's private life is the circumstances of his marriage.  As the son of a prominent family, and a leading figure of his church who was marrying the daughter of a well-known business man, his marriage might have been expected to be a major social event.  Instead, they slipped away to Melbourne, where they were married in the presence of a few friends.
Political career
In 1878, Clark stood for election to the House of Assembly, despite his reputation as an extreme ultra-republican.  He was attacked by the Hobart Mercury for "holding such very extreme ultra-republican, if not revolutionary, ideas" that his proper place should be among the 'Communists', and the Launceston Examiner as "stranger from Hobart".  He was elected, unopposed to the electorate of Norfolk Plains. His election was largely due to the influence of Thomas Reiby, a political power broker and a recent Premier.  Clark was the founder of the Southern Tasmania Political Reform Association, whose agenda included manhood suffrage, fixed term parliaments, and electoral reform.   While a member of the House of Assembly, Clark was regarded as republican and ultra-progressive.  He was one of the few members legislate as a backbencher and introduce a private members bill.  He failed to reform industrial law by amending the Master and Servant Act, but he succeeded with the Criminal Procedure Amendment Act in 1881.    He also assisted with reframing the customs tariff.In the 1882 election, Clark was defeated.  He failed when he stood for election in 1884 (East Hobart) and 1886 (South Hobart). In 1887, Clark was re-elected, in a by-election as member for East Hobart. In 1888, he was re-elected as member for South Hobart and remained there until the seat was abolished 1897.  He was then the member for Hobart until he resigned upon his appointment to the Supreme Court in 1898.   In March 1888, he became Attorney General in the government of Sir Philip Fysh.  Since the Premier was in the Legislative Council, Clark was responsible for introducing legislation into the Assembly.  Over the next five years he shepharded through the lower house much progressive and humanitarian legislation.  His goal was to break the power of property in Tasmanian politics. The legislation covered such diverse reforms as legalising trades unions, providing parliamentary salaries, preventing cruelty to animals, reforming laws on lunacy, trusteeship and companies, the custody of children and the protection of children from neglect and abuse.  He also introduced laws to restrict the immigration of Chinese.  Clark failed in his attempts to impose a land tax, introduce universal (including female) suffrage and centralise the police.    Clark was the most important 19th-century Attorney-General of Tasmania.  His considerable drafting skills enabled him to modernise and simplify the law over a number of areas. He introduced a total of 228 bills into the Assembly. His best known achievement as Attorney-General was the introduction of proportional representation based on the Hare-Clark system of the single transferrable vote; One of the major political issues addressed by Clark during his career concerned the Tasmanian Main Line Railway - a railway which connected the two main cites of Tasmainia, Hobart and Laucestion.  In 1873, the Main Line Railway Company began the construction of the line, which opened in 1876.  There were a series of disputes between the Company and the government over payments due to the Company under its Deed of Concession.  ADB Audley Coote, Chief Engineer of the Mainline Railway Co   Clark had spoken about the problem, advocating the acquisition of the Company by the government as early as 1878.  With his dual qualifications as both an engineer and a lawyer, Clark was in a unique position to understand the issues involved.  As Attorney-General, he was the government's chief negotiator.In 1889, the Supreme Court awarded the Company arrears of interest.  Clark urged the government to appeal, and in 1890 he went to England to argue the case before the Privy Council.  Clark may have been a poor speaker in court, but he was a superb negotiator. It was his forte.  With full powers, he settled the case out of court by arranging the purchase of the Company's property by the government In 1891, Clark returned to Tasmania from London by way of the United States.  It was a fateful choice.  He was introducued to a fellow Unitarian Oliver Wendell Holmes Jr, with whom he corresponded for the rest of his life.  The contacts and people he met in Boston were to profoundly inform his views about political constitutions. Not the least of the consequences was the introduction of the term Commonwealth to describe the Australian polity.In 1892, the fall of the Fysh government ended Clarks term as Attorney-General.  When Sir Edward Braddon formed a government in 1894, Clark again became Attorney-General. He resigned in 1897, when his colleagues failed to consult him over the lease of Crown land to private interests, after which he became Leader of the Opposition. Clark left politics to become a Justice of the Supreme Court of Tasmania in 1898.  
Hare-Clark electoral system
In 1896, after several failed attempts, Clark was able to get a system of proportional representation adopted by the Tasmanian Parliament, but it was to be only on a trial basis for both Hobart (to elect 6 MPs) and Launceston (to elect 4 MPs).  The Hare-Clark system was abandoned in 1901 and then re-adopted in 1907.  It continues in use to the current day."The specific modification introduced by Mr A I Clark, Attorney-General for Tasmania, is the provision devised by him for eliminating the element of chance in the selection and distribution of quota-excesses or surplus transfer votes." The provision described as Clark's own was to transfer all votes to 'next order of preference', rather than a random sample. This first 'Hare-Clark system', as it was immediately known, was renewed annually until suspended in 1902 and then finally re-introduced for the whole State in 1907. 
In 1896, after several failed attempts Clark was able to get a system of proportional representation adopted by the Tasmanian Parliament:- see Single Transferable Vote. The Tasmanian system of STV (now copied by the Australian Capital Territory) has become known as "Hare-Clark" in his honour (and in honour of Thomas Hare.) Clark published Studies in Australian Constitutional Law (Melbourne) in 1901. 
Early legal career
Clark was called to bar in 1877.  He soon gained a reputation as a criminal lawyer in a 'poisoning case', but went on to gain a large practice in civil and commercial law as well. He practiced law both while in and out of parliament.  During those periods when he was not serving as Attorney-General, he worked hard to build a successful practice. He failed to find his fortune in the law due to his generosity and refusal 'to accept anything beyond a reasonable and modest fee'. In 1887 he went into partnership with Matthew Wilkes Simmons.His career in private practice gave him a broad grounding in the law which stood him in good stead once he was promoted to the bench.  Clark was knowledgeable in all branches of the law, but pre-eminent as a constitutional lawyer and jurist. Clark, never in robust health, in fact described as "small, spare and nervous" by Alfred Deakin, died in 1907. He is buried in the old Queenborough Cemetery at Sandy Bay.
References 
External links 

Dictionary of Australian Biography
University of Tasmania digital collections containing many letters to and from Andrew Inglis Clark

  
DEFAULTSORT








 
 
	Steven Brust
 Steven Karl Zoltán Brust (born November 23, 1955) is an American fantasy and science fiction author of Hungarian descent. He was a member of the writers' group The Scribblies, which included Emma Bull, Pamela Dean, Will Shetterly, Nate Bucklin, Kara Dalkey, and Patricia Wrede; he also belongs to the Pre-Joycean Fellowship.He is best known for his novels about the assassin Vlad Taltos.  His novels have been translated into German, Russian, Polish, Dutch, Czech, French, Spanish, Hebrew and Bulgarian.  Most of his short stories are set in shared universes.  These include Emma Bull's and Will Shetterly's Liavek, Robert Asprin's Thieves' World, Neil Gaiman's Sandman and Terri Windling's Borderland Series.
Bibliography

DragaeraThere are two series set in the world of Dragaera, namely The Khaavren Romances and The Vlad Taltos novels. They are set in different periods in the world, but some characters are common to both series.
Vlad TaltosThere are currently 13 novels in the series (19 are planned).

Jhereg (1983)
Yendi (1984)
Teckla (1987)
Taltos (1988)
Phoenix (1990)
Athyra (1993)
Orca (1996)
Dragon (1998)
Issola (2001)
Dzur (2006)
Jhegaala (2008)
Iorich (2010)
Tiassa (2011)
Hawk, TBR (2013) 
Chronological order of novels:

Taltos (1988)
Yendi (1984)
Dragon (1998)
Tiassa, section 1 (2011)
Jhereg (1983)
Teckla (1987)
Phoenix (1990)
Jhegaala (2008)
Athyra (1993)
Orca (1996)
Issola (2001)
Dzur (2006)
Tiassa, section 2 (2011)
Iorich (2010)
Tiassa, section 3 (2011)

Omnibus volumes:

The Book of Jhereg (contains Jhereg, Yendi and Teckla)
The Book of Taltos (contains Taltos and Phoenix)
The Book of Athyra (contains Athyra and Orca)
Dragon & Issola (contains Dragon and Issola - SFBC hardcover)
The Book of Dragon (contains Dragon and Issola - Tor paperback)
The Book of Dzur (contains Dzur and Jhegaala)


The Khaavren Romances 
The series consists of three books and has been completed.

The Phoenix Guards (1991)
Five Hundred Years After (1994)
The Viscount of Adrilankha, published in three volumes:
The Paths of the Dead (2002)
The Lord of Castle Black (2003)
Sethra Lavode (2004)


Stand-alone

Brokedown Palace (1986)


Other novels

To Reign in Hell (1984)
The Sun, the Moon, and the Stars (1987)
Cowboy Feng's Space Bar and Grille (1990)
The Gypsy (1992) with Megan Lindholm
Agyar (1993)
Freedom & Necessity (1997) with Emma Bull
My Own Kind of Freedom (written 2005, released  under the Creative Commons license February 8, 2008), a novel based on the Firefly television series


Short stories

“An Act of Contrition” in Liavek (1985, edited by Emma Bull and Will Shetterly; Locus Poll Award, Best Anthology)
“An Act of Trust” in Liavek: The Players of Luck (1986, edited by Emma Bull and Will Shetterly)
“A Dream of Passion” in the convention chapbook for Ad Astra (1986)
“An Act of Mercy” in Liavek: Wizard's Row (1987, with Megan Lindholm; edited by Emma Bull and Will Shetterly)
“An Act of Love” in Liavek: Spells of Binding (1988, with Gregory Frost and Megan Lindholm; edited by Emma Bull and Will Shetterly)
“Csucskári” (Excerpt from The Sun, The Moon, and the Stars) in The Year's Best Fantasy and Horror: First Annual Collection (1988, edited by Ellen Datlow and Terri Windling)
“A Hot Night at Cheeky's” in Liavek: Festival Week (1990, edited by Emma Bull and Will Shetterly)
“Looking Forward: Excerpt from Athyra” in Amazing Stories, March 1993 (1993, edited by Kim Mohan)
“Attention Shoppers” in Xanadu (1993, edited by Jane Yolen)
“Abduction from the Harem” in Timewalker Issue 14 (October 1996, published by Valiant Comics)
“Drift” in Space Opera (1996, edited by Anne McCaffrey and Elizabeth Ann Scarborough)
“Valóság and Élet” in Sandman: Book of Dreams (1996, edited by Neil Gaiman and Edward E. Kramer)
"Calling Pittsburgh" in Lord of the Fantastic:  Stories in Honor of Roger Zelazny (1998, edited by Martin H. Greenberg)
“When the Bow Breaks” in The Essential Bordertown (1998, edited by Terri Windling and Delia Sherman)
“The Man From Shemhaza” in Thieves' World: Enemies of Fortune (2004, edited by Lynn Abbey), reprinted in Year's Best Fantasy 5 (2005, edited by David Hartwell and Kathryn Cramer)
"Klava with Honey" in Eeriecon Chapbook #4 for the convention EerieCon (2005, via the Buffalo Fantasy League)
"Chapter One" in Eeriecon Chapbook #6 for the convention EerieCon (2007, via the Buffalo Fantasy League)


Convention chapbooks


In 1986, Steven Brust was a Guest of Honor at the Per Ardua Ad Astra science fiction convention in Toronto, and he contributed the Vlad Taltos short story "A Dream of Passion" to the convention chapbook.
Brust included "Klava with Honey" in Eeriecon Chapbook #4 for the 2005 EerieCon convention.  This very brief excerpt was initially part of the novel Dzur. He could not attend the convention for medical reasons.
He also contributed "Chapter One" for Eeriecon Chapbook #6 which was featured at EerieCon 9, 2007.


Introductions by Steven Brust

In 1987, Tor Books published the gamebook Dzurlord (A Crossroads Adventure in the World of Steven Brust's Jhereg). Steven Brust wrote the introduction for this book, which introduced readers to the world of Dragaera and its inhabitants.
Tor also published The Three Musketeers in paperback in 1994.  Steven Brust introduced the edition, saying that this translation (anonymous, originally published in 1888) was his favorite.
Steven Brust contributed the introduction for Manna from Heaven.  Wildside Press published this collection of stories from the late Roger Zelazny in 2003.


The Dragaeran books
The Vlad Taltos series is set on what is apparently another planet, in an Empire mostly inhabited and ruled by the Dragaerans, who are humanoid but have such differences as greatly extended lifespans and heights averaging about 7 feet. Referred to as "elfs" by some humans, they refer to themselves as "human". The Dragaeran Empire controls the majority of the landmass known to it on the planet, and does not greatly concern itself with the rest. Vlad Taltos is one of the human minority (known by Dragaerans as "Easterners"), which exists as a lower class in the Empire. Vlad also practices the human art of witchcraft; "táltos" is Hungarian for a kind of supernatural person in folklore.  Though human, he is a citizen of the Empire because his social-climbing father bought a title in one of the less reputable of the 17 Dragaeran Great Houses. The only Great House that sells memberships this way is, not coincidentally, also the one that maintains a criminal organization.  Vlad proves surprisingly successful in this organization.  Despite being a human and a criminal, he has a number of high-ranking Dragaeran friends, and often gets caught up in important events.Brust has written thirteen novels in the series, which is proposed to run to nineteen novels — one named for each of the Great Houses, one named for Vlad himself, and a final novel which Brust has said will be titled The Final Contract.  The first three novels resemble private-eye detective stories, perhaps the closest being Robert B. Parker's Spenser series.  The later novels are more varied than the first three.  Though they read like fantasy, there are science-fictional explanations for some things.Brust has also written another series set in Dragaera, the Khaavren Romances, set centuries before Vlad's time.  Since Dragaerans live for thousands of years, many characters appear in both series.  It is partly an homage to Alexandre Dumas, père's novels about the Three Musketeers, and is five volumes long, following the pattern of Dumas' series.  The books are presented as historical novels written by Paarfi of Roundwood, a Dragaeran roughly contemporary with Vlad.  Paarfi's old-fashioned, elaborate, and highly verbose writing is explicitly based on Dumas', though with a dialogue style that is, at times, based on Tom Stoppard's wordgames in Rosencrantz & Guildenstern Are Dead (according to Pamela Dean's introduction to Five Hundred Years After). The two series are finally brought together in the thirteenth novel in the Vlad series, Tiassa, which can also be viewed as the sixth novel in the Khaavren series. Tiassa comprises what are in effect three related novellas, each told in a different style and connected by a common theme. The first section reads like the first three novels in the series, with a first-person narration by Vlad but including Khaavren’s son, Piro; the second section has a different viewpoint character in each of its chapters; and the third section is narrated by Paarfi in the style of the earlier Khaavren Romances, with Khaavren as the viewpoint character and interacting with Vlad.There is a certain amount of variation in the writing style amongst the Taltos novels as well. Brust uses a different narrative approach in almost every novel in the series. Some of these approaches are more purely stylistic and have minor effects on the actual story-telling; some are profound and involve the point of view of characters whom the reader never expected to get to know so well.  Further, as the writing of the Taltos novels has spanned over two decades, they have been influenced by events in Steven Brust's own life. A fascination with the Mafia — subsequently brought into a somewhat shocking perspective by the murder of a friend — profoundly influenced his storylines, as did the breakup of his marriage. The events and arguments of his books, especially Teckla, are acknowledged by Brust to be influenced by his life-long interest in Marxist theory and practice, especially as advocated by Leon Trotsky. Since Brust is a self-identified "Trotskyist sympathizer", this topic frequently comes up in interviews with him. Lastly, Brust has a decided knack for slipping absorbing mysteries into the minor details of his stories; mysteries that tend to fascinate his readers, once they notice them, and often form the kernel around which later books coalesce, even though their resolution still springs upon the reader unexpectedly when it finally comes.
Trivia

Devera
The same character, usually a cute brown-eyed girl of about nine, appears as a motif in all of Brust's novels.  In the Dragaeran books her name is Devera. She is the (future) daughter of another character and seems to be able to appear anywhere in time and space. In Brust's non-Dragaeran books her appearances are usually brief and not always obvious.
Title nicknames
Brust is known for his propensity to give his books alternate titles for his own amusement.  These have cropped up in numerous interviews and online forums, starting with "Jarhead" for Jhereg.
 Examples are:

The Rain in Spain (To Reign in Hell)
Aw Gee (Agyar)
The Kleenex Guards (The Phoenix Guards)
Tacky (Teckla)
Tucson (Phoenix)
Ripple (Brokedown Palace)
Crosby, Stills and Nash (The Sun, The Moon, And The Stars)
Jar Head (Jhereg)
Milqtoast   (Taltos)
Stir (Dzur)
Giggolo   (Jhegaala)
Your Itch (Iorich)
My Own Kind of Whedon (My Own Kind of Freedom, his Firefly fanfic)
Hadassah (Tiassa)

Only his collaborative books escape being nicknamed.
Influences

Music & other media
Brust played drums, specifically in the Minneapolis-based folk rock band Cats Laughing and also in the Albany Free Traders.   He released his only solo album, A Rose for Iconoclastes, in 1993.  Two songs from this album were played by Doctor Demento:  "I Was Born About Ten Million Songs Ago" (co-written with Nathan A. Bucklin) and "Backward Message." The 1995 Boiled in Lead enhanced CD Songs from the Gypsy featured songs by Brust and Adam Stemple, as well as the full text of the novel The Gypsy. Cats Laughing also appears in issue #5 of a Marvel comic book called Excalibur.  Steve is the only member of the band who is both seen onstage and named.  Emma Bull also appears but names everyone in the band except herself.   Steve was seen again in a one-shot special issue, Excalibur: Mojo Mayhem, in which the mutant superhero Shadowcat attends a Cats Laughing concert in Edinburgh and mentions previously having seen the band at Windycon.In addition, Chris Claremont inserted a reference to "Cats Laughing — the Excalibur Sessions" into the DC Comics graphic novel Star Trek Debt of Honor.Brust owned a Cadillac ambulance in Minnesota. It was painted yellow, light blue and dark blue, with murals. Known as the Catmobile, the car was the band vehicle for Cats Laughing. The same car is also depicted on the "Another Way to Travel" album with the band members.  This album, noted by its picture, has a cameo in the beginning of Emma Bull's novel Bone Dance.Brust performed in several Shockwave Radio Theater productions, notably Closing Ceremonies (aka The Fall of the House of Usherette) and PBS Liavek.Dragon gets argued over in the webcomic Penny Arcade.   Tycho elaborates on "Fine Distinctions"  that same day.
Award nominations (and dubious honors)
Brust's short story "When The Bow Breaks" was nominated for the 1999 Nebula Award, although it did not reach the final ballot. Five Hundred Years After was nominated for the 1995 Locus Poll Award (Best Fantasy Novel).  Other novels nominated for various Locus Poll Awards were Brokedown Palace, The Gypsy, Agyar, and Freedom & Necessity. Dragon was a finalist for the 1999 Minnesota Book Awards in the Fantasy & Science Fiction category.  Freedom and Necessity was a 1998 finalist for the same category, while The Phoenix Guards was a finalist in 1992. Brust discovered in August 2006 that he had made the New York Times extended bestseller list at number 30 with Dzur.  He mentioned his ambivalence on this subject online. SCI FI Wire posted an email interview with Brust after Dzur came out. 
References 
External links 

The Dream Café - Steven Brust's own homepage
Steven Brust's LiveJournal
Dragaera - a site authorized by Brust, with a mailing list, resources, and links to many fan pages
 
Bibliography on SciFan
Cracks and Shards - Observations on Dragaera
Steven Brust at Fantasy Literature
Lyorn Records - a wiki dedicated to information and informed speculation about the world of Dragaera

 
 
DEFAULTSORT
 









 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Jeff Bridges
 
Jeffrey Leon "Jeff" Bridges (born December 4, 1949) is an American actor, musician, producer, photographer, cartoonist, storyteller, and occasional vintner. He comes from a well-known acting family and began his first televised acting in 1958 as child with his father, Lloyd Bridges, and brother Beau on television's Sea Hunt. Among his best-known major motion films are: Tron (and its sequel), Fearless, Iron Man,  , Starman, The Fabulous Baker Boys, Jagged Edge, Against All Odds,  , Thunderbolt and Lightfoot, Seabiscuit, Arlington Road, and The Big Lebowski. He won the Academy Award for Best Actor for his role as Otis "Bad" Blake in the 2009 film Crazy Heart and earned his sixth Academy Award nomination for his portrayal of Rooster Cogburn in 2010's True Grit. He is currently filming in Calgary, Alberta for his next film.
Early lifeJeffrey Leon Bridges was born in Los Angeles, California on December 4, 1949. He is son of showbiz parents, actor Lloyd Bridges,   and actress and writer Dorothy Bridges (née Simpson). His older brother, Beau Bridges, is also an actor. He has a younger sister, Lucinda, and had another brother, Garrett, who died of sudden infant death syndrome in 1948. Growing up, Bridges shared a close relationship with his brother Beau, who acted as a surrogate father when their father was working.  Bridges and his siblings were raised in the Holmby Hills section of Los Angeles.  He graduated from University High School in 1967. At age seventeen, Jeff toured with his father in a stage production of Anniversary Waltz.After graduating from high school, Bridges journeyed to New York City where he studied acting at the Herbert Berghof Studio. Also, after turning 18, Bridges joined the United States Coast Guard Reserve, where he served for eight years. 
Career

Film
Bridges made his first screen appearance at the age of four months in The Company She Keeps in 1950. In his youth, Bridges and brother Beau made occasional appearances on their father's show Sea Hunt (1958–1961) and the CBS anthology series, The Lloyd Bridges Show (1962–1963). In 1971 he played the lead role Mike in the TV movie In Search of America.  His first major role came in the 1971 film The Last Picture Show, for which he garnered a nomination for the Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor. Stated on Inside the Actors Studio, 2003  He co-starred in the 1972 critically acclaimed neo-noir boxing film Fat City, directed by legendary director, John Huston. He was nominated again for Best Supporting Actor for his performance opposite Clint Eastwood in the 1974 film Thunderbolt and Lightfoot.  In 1976, he starred as the protagonist Jack Prescott in the first remake of King Kong, opposite Jessica Lange. This film was a commercial success, earning $90 million worldwide, more than triple its $23 million budget, and also winning an Academy Award for special effects.One of his better known roles was in the 1982 science fiction cult classic Tron, in which he played Kevin Flynn, a video game programmer (a role he reprised in late 2010 with the sequel Tron: Legacy). He was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Actor in 1984, for playing the alien in Starman.  He was also acclaimed for his roles in the thriller Against All Odds (1984) and the crime drama Jagged Edge (1985). His role in Fearless (1993) is recognized by some critics to be one of his best performances.  One critic dubbed it a masterpiece;  Pauline Kael wrote that he "may be the most natural and least self-conscious screen actor that has ever lived".  In 1998, he starred as what is arguably his most famous role, "The Dude", in the Coen Brothers' cult-classic film The Big Lebowski.  He has said that he relates to "The Dude" more than any of his other roles. In 2000, he received his fourth Academy Award nomination, for his role in The Contender.  He also starred in the 2005 Terry Gilliam film Tideland, his second with the director (the first being 1991's The Fisher King). He shaved his trademark  mane of hair to play the role of Obadiah Stane in the 2008 Marvel comic book adaptation Iron Man.  In July 2008, at the San Diego Comic-Con International, he appeared in a teaser for Tron: Legacy, shot as concept footage for director Joseph Kosinski; this developed into a full 3D feature release in 2010.Bridges is one of the youngest actors ever to be nominated for an Academy Award (1972, age 22, Best Supporting Actor, The Last Picture Show), and one of the oldest ever to win (2010, age 60, Best Actor, Crazy Heart).   Crazy Heart also won him the Golden Globe for Best Actor in a Drama, and the Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Male Actor in a Leading Role.Bridges received his sixth Academy Award nomination for his role in True Grit, a collaboration with the Coen brothers in which he starred alongside Matt Damon, Josh Brolin, Barry Pepper, and Hailee Steinfeld. Both the film, and Bridges's performance as Rooster Cogburn, were critically praised. Bridges lost to Colin Firth, whom he had beaten for the Oscar in the same category the previous year.
Music
Referring to his career as an actor and his passion for music, Bridges says, "I dug what an actor did, but it took me a while to feel it, to truly appreciate the craft and the preparation. Plus, I was still playing music a lot, and I guess I had a hard time choosing: was I an actor or a musician, or could I be both?" Bridges studied piano at a young age strongly encouraged by his mother. Interview/Testimonial video.    He released his debut album Be Here Soon on January 1, 2000. In 2005, Bridges, known as "The Dude" in the film Big Lebowski, showed up at a Lebowski Fest in Los Angeles singing and playing the film's theme song written by Bob Dylan, "Man in Me".On January 15, 2010, Bridges performed the song "I Don't Know" from Crazy Heart on The Tonight Show with Conan O'Brien. In the film The Contender, in which he co-starred, Bridges recorded a version of Johnny Cash's standard "Ring of Fire" with Kim Carnes that played over the pivotal opening credits. In February 2010, he was among the nearly 80 musicians to sing on the charity-single remake of We Are the World.  On October 24, 2010, Bridges appeared at Neil Young's annual Bridge School Benefit concert and played a set with Neko Case.On April 19, 2011, Country Music Television announced that Bridges had signed a recording contract with Blue Note Records/EMI Music Group. He worked with producer T-Bone Burnett and released his second album, Jeff Bridges, on August 16, 2011.  On November 5, 2011, Bridges played Austin City Limits in support of this album.  Bridges plays guitars such as: Gretsch Chet Atkins Country Gentlemen Model G6122-1959. 
Testimonials"He set up a little recording studio in his trailer and we would go in and work on songs together, singing harmonies all the time." Karen Allen, when filming Starman in 1984. "Jeff was a lot of fun to have around. He's a fabulous musician so he always had a guitar with him on set." Glenn Close, in reference to filming the 1985 movie, Jagged Edge. 
Other work as
PhotographerJeff Bridges has been an amateur photographer since high school, and began taking photographs on film sets during Starman, at the suggestion of co-star Karen Allen.   Since 1980, he began photographing on and off set shot with his favorite camera, a Widelux F8. He published many of these photographs online and published a book in 2003 entitled, Pictures: Photographs by Jeff Bridges.    
NarratorBridges narrated the documentary Lost in La Mancha (2002), about the "unmaking" of a Terry Gilliam retelling of Don Quixote, tentatively titled The Man Who Killed Don Quixote, which would have starred Johnny Depp as Sancho Panza and Jean Rochefort as the quixotic hero. Bridges had previously appeared in Gilliam's The Fisher King. Bridges also narrated the documentaries National Geographic's Lewis & Clark: Great Journey West (2002, IMAX), Discovery Channel's Raising the Mammoth (2000), and ABC's Heroes of Rock and Roll (1979). He also voiced the character Big Z in the animated picture Surf's Up. 
Bridges has performed TV commercial voice-over work as well, including Hyundai's 2007 "Think About It" advertisement campaign 
   
  as well as the Duracell advertisements in the "Trusted Everywhere" campaign. On December 18, 2010, Bridges hosted NBC's Saturday Night Live; he had hosted the show before in 1983 with his brother, Beau. With the December 18, 2010 episode, Bridges beat Sigourney Weaver's record for longest gap between hosting appearances on SNL (Weaver had a 24-year gap between her first time hosting in 1986 and her second time hosting in 2010, while Bridges had a 27-year gap between his first appearance in 1983 and his most recent one, also in 2010).
Personal lifeBridges married Susan Geston in 1977. [1]   They met on the film shoot of Rancho Deluxe, which was filmed on a ranch where Geston was working as a maid.   They have three daughters: Isabelle Annie (born August 6, 1981), Jessica Lily "Jessie" (born June 14, 1983), and Hayley Roselouise (born October 17, 1985). He became a grandfather on March 31, 2011, when Isabelle gave birth to a daughter, Grace. Jeff once stated, "I had a great '70s. Today, being a parent with three daughters, I look back on it thinking, "Oh, man, the things I did!"" Bridges has studied Buddhism. He meditates for half an hour before beginning work on a film set. Tricycle: The Buddhist Review Fall 2010 Vol. 20, No. 1 pg. 54  He currently lives in Montecito, California.
Humanitarian effortsIn 1984, Bridges and other entertainment industry leaders founded the End Hunger Network aimed at encouraging, stimulating and supporting action to end childhood hunger. He supports President Obama's initiative to End Childhood Hunger by 2015. He has teamed up with the Zen Peacemakers who operate a non-traditional soup kitchen that builds a cross-class community and provides food and wellness offerings with dignity.  In November 2010, Bridges became spokesman for the No Kid Hungry Campaign of the organization Share our Strength. Its goal is to present and undertake a state-by-state strategy to end childhood hunger in the United States by 2015. 
Filmography and television programs 

Film
Year Title Role Note 
1950 The Company She Keeps Himself (Infant) Lady in the train terminal with the two unruly kids is Dorothy Bridges, the wife of actor Lloyd Bridges. And the tots are Dorothy and Lloyd's sons Beau and Jeff. 
1958–1960 Sea Hunt Davey Crane/Jimmy/Boy/Kelly Bailey The Lost Ones episode. Season 1, Episode 28. Airdate: Saturday July 19, 1958 The Birthday Present episode. Season 1, Episode 32. Airdate: Saturday August 16, 1958 Water Nymphs episode. Season 3, Episode 2. Airdate: January 16, 1960 Pirate Gold episode. Season 3, Episode 14. Airtime: April 9, 1960 
1965 The Loner Bud Windom The Ordeal of Bud Windom Episode (#15). Airdate: Saturday December 25, 1965 
1969 The F.B.I. Terry Shelton Boomerang episode (Season 5, No. 4). Airdate: Sunday October 5, 1969 
Silent Night, Lonely Night John Young  
1970 The Don Knotts Show Himself Season 1, Episode 15. Airdate: Tuesday January 12, 1971 
Halls of Anger Douglas (Doug)  
1971   Duane Jackson Nominated—Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor 
The Yin and the Yang of Mr. Go Nero Finnighan  
In Search of America Mike Olson  
1972 Fat City Ernie Munger  
Bad Company Jake Rumsey  
1973 Lolly-Madonna XXX Zack Feather  
  Elroy Jackson, Jr.  
  Don Parritt  
1974 Thunderbolt and Lightfoot Lightfoot Nominated—Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor 
1975 Rancho Deluxe Jack McKee  
Hearts of the West Lewis Tater  
1976 Stay Hungry Craig Blake  
King Kong Jack Prescott  
1978 Somebody Killed Her Husband Jerry Green  
1979 Winter Kills Nick Kegan  
The American Success Company Harry Flowers  
1980 Heaven's Gate John L. Bridges  
1981 Cutter's Way Richard Bone  
1982 Tron Kevin Flynn/Clu  
Kiss Me Goodbye Dr. Rupert Baines  
  Prince Lír Voice Only 
1984 Against All Odds Terry Brogan  
Starman Starman/Scott Hayden Saturn Award for Best Actor Nominated—Academy Award for Best Actor Nominated—Golden Globe Award for Best Actor - Motion Picture Drama 
1985 Jagged Edge Jack Forrester  
1986 8 Million Ways to Die Matthew "Matt" Scudder  
  Turner Kendall  
1987 Nadine Vernon Hightower  
1988 Tucker: The Man and His Dream Preston Tucker  
1989 See You in the Morning Larry Livingstone  
  Jack Baker  
1990 Texasville Duane Jackson  
1991   Jack Lucas Nominated—Golden Globe Award for Best Actor - Motion Picture Musical or Comedy Nominated—Saturn Award for Best Actor 
1992 American Heart Jack Kelson Also Producer Independent Spirit Award for Best Male Lead 
1993   Barney Cousins Nominated—Saturn Award for Best Actor 
Fearless Max Klein  
1994 Blown Away Jimmy Dove/Liam McGivney  
1995 Wild Bill James Butler 'Wild Bill' Hickok  
1996 White Squall Captain Christopher 'Skipper' Sheldon  
  Gregory Larkin  
Hidden in America Vincent TV Also Executive Producer 
1998   Jeffrey "The Dude" Lebowski Nominated—Satellite Award for Best Actor – Motion Picture Musical or Comedy 
1999 Arlington Road Michael Faraday  
  Jack Warrick  
Simpatico Lyle Carter  
2000   President Jackson Evans Nominated—Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor Nominated—Golden Globe Award for Best Supporting Actor – Motion Picture Nominated—Satellite Award for Best Supporting Actor - Motion Picture Nominated—Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Male Actor in a Supporting Role 
2001 Scenes of the Crime Jimmy Berg  
K-PAX Dr. Mark Powell  
2002 Lost in La Mancha Narrator Voice Only Documentary 
2003 Masked and Anonymous Tom Friend  
Seabiscuit Charles S. Howard Nominated—Satellite Award for Best Supporting Actor - Motion Picture Nominated—Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Cast in a Motion Picture 
2004   Ted Cole Nominated—Independent Spirit Award for Best Male Lead 
2005   Andy  
Tideland Noah  
2006 Stick It Burt Vickerman  
2007 Surf's Up Ezekiel 'Big Z' Topanga/Geek Voice Only 
2008   Jon Katz TV Movie Nominated—Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Lead Actor – Miniseries or a Movie  
Iron Man Obadiah Stane / Iron Monger Nominated—Saturn Award for Best Supporting Actor 
How to Lose Friends & Alienate People Clayton Harding  
2009   Kyle  
Crazy Heart Otis "Bad" Blake Also Executive Producer Academy Award for Best Actor Broadcast Film Critics Association Award for Best Actor Golden Globe Award for Best Actor – Motion Picture Drama Independent Spirit Award for Best Male Lead Los Angeles Film Critics Association Award for Best Actor Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Male Actor in a Leading Role Nominated—BAFTA Award for Best Actor in a Leading Role Nominated—Chicago Film Critics Association Award for Best Actor Nominated—Houston Film Critics Society Award for Best Actor Nominated—London Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actor Nominated—Online Film Critics Society Award for Best Actor Nominated—Satellite Award for Best Actor – Motion Picture Drama Nominated—St. Louis Gateway Film Critics Association Award for Best Actor 
  Bill Django  
2010 Tron: Legacy Kevin Flynn/Clu 2 Saturn Award for Best Actor 
True Grit Rooster Cogburn Nominated—Academy Award for Best Actor Nominated—BAFTA Award for Best Actor in a Leading Role Nominated—Broadcast Film Critics Association Award for Best Actor Nominated—Chicago Film Critics Association Award for Best Actor Nominated—Detroit Film Critics Society Award for Best Actor Nominated—Houston Film Critics Society Award for Best Actor Nominated—Las Vegas Film Critics Society Award for Best Actor Nominated—London Film Critics Circle Award for Best Actor Nominated—Online Film Critics Society Award for Best Actor Nominated—Phoenix Film Critics Society Award for Best Actor Nominated—Screen Actors Guild Award for Outstanding Performance by a Male Actor in a Leading Role Nominated—St. Louis Gateway Film Critics Association Award for Best Actor Nominated—Utah Film Critics Association Award for Best Actor 
2012 Hunger Hits Home Narrator  
2012 Pablo Narrator/Professor Post-Production  
2013 The Seventh Son Master Gregory Filming  
R.I.P.D. Roy Powell Post-Production 

Discography

Studio albums

Title Details Peak chart positions 
US Country     US   US Folk     US Rock   
Be Here Soon 

Release date: January 1, 2000
Label: Ramp Records
Formats: CD
     
Jeff Bridges 

Release date: August 16, 2011
Label: Blue Note Records
Formats: CD, music download
 10 25 2 5 
"—" denotes releases that did not chart 

Singles

Year Single Album 
2011 "What a Little Bit of Love Can Do" Jeff Bridges 

Music videos

Year Title Director 
2011 "What a Little Bit of Love Can Do"  Alan Kozlowski 

See also

List of oldest and youngest Academy Award winners and nominees


References 
External links 

 
 
 
Jeff Bridges at Emmys.com

 
  
 
DEFAULTSORT
















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Cassava
 Cassava (Manihot esculenta), also called yuca, mogo, manioc, mandioca, tapioca and kamoteng kahoy, a woody shrub of the Euphorbiaceae (spurge family) native to South America, is extensively cultivated as an annual crop in tropical and subtropical regions for its edible starchy, tuberous root, a major source of carbohydrates. It differs from the similarly-spelled yucca, an unrelated fruit-bearing shrub in the Asparagaceae family. Cassava, when dried to a starchy, powdery (or pearly) extract is called tapioca, while its fermented, flaky version is named garri.Cassava is the third-largest source of food carbohydrates in the tropics.   Cassava is a major staple food in the developing world, providing a basic diet for around 500 million people.  It is one of the most drought-tolerant crops, capable of growing on marginal soils. Nigeria is the world's largest producer of cassava.Cassava root is a good source of carbohydrates, but a poor source of protein. A predominantly cassava root diet can cause protein-energy malnutrition. Cassava is classified as sweet or bitter. Like other roots and tubers, Cassava contains anti-nutrition factors and toxins.  It must be properly prepared before consumption. Improper preparation of cassava can leave enough residual cyanide to cause acute cyanide intoxication and goiters, and may even cause ataxia or partial paralysis. Food and Agriculture Organization of the United Nations, "Roots, tubers, plantains and bananas in human nutrition", Rome, 1990, Ch. 7 "Toxic substances and antinutritional factors". Document available online at   Ch. 7 appears at   (Accessed 25 June 2011.)  Nevertheless, farmers often prefer the bitter varieties because they deter pests, animals, and thieves. Linley Chiwona-Karltun, Chrissie Katundu, James Ngoma, Felistus Chipungu, Jonathan Mkumbira, Sidney Simukoko, Janice Jiggins (2002) Bitter cassava and women: an intriguing response to food securityLEISA Magazine, volume 18 Issue 4. Online version accessed on 2009-08-11.  The more-toxic varieties of Cassava are a fall-back resource (a "food security crop") in times of famine in some places. 
Description
The cassava root is long and tapered, with a firm, homogeneous flesh encased in a detachable rind, about 1mm thick, rough and brown on the outside. Commercial varieties can be 5 to 10 cm in diameter at the top, and around 15 cm to 30 cm long. A woody cordon runs along the root's axis. The flesh can be chalk-white or yellowish. Cassava roots are very rich in starch, and contain significant amounts of calcium (50 mg/100g), phosphorus (40 mg/100g) and vitamin C (25 mg/100g). However, they are poor in protein and other nutrients. In contrast, cassava leaves are a good source of protein (rich in lysine), but deficient in the amino acid methionine and possibly tryptophan. 
HistoryWild populations of M. esculenta subspecies flabellifolia, shown to be the progenitor of domesticated cassava, are centered in west-central Brazil, where it was likely first domesticated more than 10,000 years BP.  By 6,600 BC, manioc pollen appears in the Gulf of Mexico lowlands, at the San Andrés archaeological site.  The oldest direct evidence of cassava cultivation comes from a 1,400-year-old Maya site, Joya de Cerén, in El Salvador,  but the species Manihot esculenta likely originated   further south in Brazil and Paraguay. With its high food potential, it had become a staple food of the native populations of northern South America, southern Mesoamerica, and the Caribbean by the time of the Spanish conquest, and its cultivation was continued by the colonial Portuguese and Spanish. Forms of the modern domesticated species can be found growing in the wild in the south of Brazil. While several Manihot species are wild, all varieties of M. esculenta are cultigens.Cassava was a staple food for pre-Columbian peoples in the Americas and is often portrayed in indigenous art. The Moche people often depicted yuca in their ceramics. Since being introduced by Portuguese traders from Brazil in the 16th century, maize and cassava have replaced traditional African crops as the continent's most important staple food crops.  Cassava is sometimes described as the 'bread of the tropics'  but should not to be confused with the tropical and equatorial bread tree (Encephalartos), the breadfruit (Artocarpus altilis) or the African breadfruit (Treculia africana).
Economic importance
World production of cassava root was estimated to be 184 million tonnes in 2002, rising to 230 million tonnes in 2008 (FAO). The majority of production in 2002 was in Africa, where 99.1 million tonnes were grown; 51.5 million tonnes were grown in Asia and 33.2 million tonnes in Latin America and the Caribbean. Nigeria is the world's largest producer of cassava. However, based on the statistics from the FAO of the United Nations, Thailand is the largest exporting country of dried cassava, with a total of 77% of world export in 2005. The second-largest exporting country is Vietnam, with 13.6%, followed by Indonesia (5.8%) and Costa Rica (2.1%). Worldwide cassava production increased by 12.5% between 1988 and 1990.  .In 2010, the average yield of cassava crops worldwide was 12.5 tonnes per hectare. The most productive cassava farms in the world were in India, with a nationwide average yield of 34.8 tonnes per hectare in 2010. Cassava, yams (Dioscorea spp.) and sweet potatoes (Ipomoea batatas) are important sources of food in the tropics. The cassava plant gives the highest yield of carbohydrates per cultivated area among crop plants, except for sugarcane and sugar beets.  Cassava plays a particularly important role in agriculture in developing countries, especially in sub-Saharan Africa, because it does well on poor soils and with low rainfall, and because it is a perennial that can be harvested as required. Its wide harvesting window allows it to act as a famine reserve and is invaluable in managing labor schedules. It also offers flexibility to resource-poor farmers because it serves as either a subsistence or a cash crop. 
No continent depends as much on root and tuber crops in feeding its population as does Africa. In the humid and subhumid areas of tropical Africa, it is either a primary staple food or a secondary costaple. In Ghana, for example, cassava and yams occupy an important position the agricultural economy, and contribute about 46% of the agricultural gross domestic product. Cassava accounts for a daily caloric intake of 30% in Ghana, and is grown by nearly every farming family. The importance of cassava to many Africans is epitomised in the Ewe (a language spoken in Ghana, Togo and Benin) name for the plant, agbeli, meaning "there is life". The price of cassava has risen significantly in the last half decade, and lower-income people have turned to other carbohydrate-rich foods, such as rice.  In Tamil Nadu, India, the National Highway 68 between Thalaivasal and Attur has many cassava-processing factories alongside it—indicating an abundance of it locally. Cassava is widely cultivated and eaten as a staple food in Andhra Pradesh and in Kerala.In the subtropical region of southern China, cassava is the fifth-largest crop in term of production, after rice, sweet potato, sugar cane and maize. China is also the largest export market for cassava produced in Vietnam and Thailand. Over 60% of cassava production in China is concentrated in a single province, Guangxi, averaging over seven million tons annually.
Uses
CulinaryCassava-based dishes are widely consumed wherever the plant is cultivated; some have regional, national, or ethnic importance.  Cassava must be cooked properly to detoxify it before it is eaten.Cassava can be cooked in various ways. The soft-boiled root has a delicate flavor and can replace boiled potatoes in many uses: as an accompaniment for meat dishes, or made into purées, dumplings, soups, stews, gravies, etc. This plant is used in cholent, in some households, as well. Deep fried (after boiling or steaming), it can replace fried potatoes, with a distinctive flavor. In Brazil, detoxified manioc is ground and cooked to a dry, often hard or crunchy meal which is used as a condiment, toasted in butter, or eaten alone as a side dish.
Africa

Fufu, eba and tapioca
Fufu is made from the starchy cassava-root flour. Tapioca (or fecula), essentially a flavorless, starchy ingredient produced from treated and dried cassava (manioc) root, is used in cooking. It is similar to sago and is commonly used to make milky pudding similar to rice pudding. Boba tapioca pearls are made from cassava root. It is also used in cereals for which several tribes in South America have used it extensively. It is also used in making cassava cake, a popular pastry.Cassava is used in making eba, a popular food in Nigeria.
GariGari is a creamy-white, granular flour with a slightly sour, fermented flavor from fermented, gelatinized fresh cassava tubers. Gari soakings is a delicacy that cost less than US$1 in Nigeria, Ghana and other parts of Africa, where cassava is cultivated. One can simply soak gari in cold water, add a bit of sugar and roasted groundnut (peanut) to taste, and add whatever quantity of evaporated milk one desires. Gari soakings prepared with coconut water may taste better.
PalaverThe leaves can be pounded to a fine chaff and cooked as a palaver sauce (as is done in Liberia and Sierra Leone), usually with palm oil, but other vegetable oils can also be used. Palaver sauces contain meat and fish, as well. The leaf chaff must be washed several times to remove the bitterness.
Cassava in CongoIn the Democratic Republic of the Congo, the leaves are finely cut and boiled and are called mpondu in Lingala, sombe in Swahili or sakasaka in Kikongo. The cassava root flour is also used to make a cassava bread by boiling flour until it is a thick, rubbery ball (bukari in Swahili or luku in Kikongo. The flour is also made into a paste and fermented before boiling after wrapping in banana or other forest leaves. This fermented state is called chikwangue in French or kwanga or nkwanga in Lingala and Kikongo. This last form has a long shelf life and is a preferred food to take on long trips where refrigeration is not possible.
Asia

Tapai, getuk and krupukIn Indonesia, cassava is an important food. It can be cooked by frying or boiling, or processed by fermentation to make tapai and getuk cake, while the starch is made into krupuk crackers. In time of famine or food shortage, cassava is used to replace rice. In 2011, modified cassava flour became common, and some instant noodle producers have used it silently, especially for low-end instant noodles as a part substitute of pricy flour.  
Americas

CassareepThe juice of the bitter cassava, boiled to the consistency of thick syrup and flavored with spices, is called cassareep. It is used as a basis for various sauces and as a culinary flavoring, principally in tropical countries. It is exported chiefly from Guyana, where it started as a traditional recipe with its origins in Amerindian practices.
Farinha de mandiocaIn Brazil, a crunchy meal called farinha de mandioca ( , "manioc flour") of varying coarseness is produced for use as a condiment, a base for farofa, or a stand-alone side dish. Detoxified manioc roots are ground to a pulp called a massa and squeezed with a device called a tipiti to dry it out (the liquid produced by this may be collected and dried to produce tapioca, locally known as polvilho). The dried massa is then toasted over a large copper stove to produce the dried meal. This process varies regionally and by manioc species, and may include additional steps of re-soaking, dying and re-toasting the flour. Manioc agriculture and refinement to farinha is a major economic activity in the Western Amazon.Farinha de mandioca and tapioca are the most important caloric staples of the Indigenous peoples of Brazil which already practiced agriculture when Europeans colonized the country, so for Brazilians manioc would be included in its equivalent of the North American three sister crops or the Mesoamerican milpa.
BeveragesCassava was also used to make alcoholic beverages. The English explorer and naturalist Charles Waterton reported in Wanderings in South America (1836) that the natives of Guyana used cassava to make liquor, which they abandoned when rum became available.  Hamilton Rice, in 1913, also remarked on liquor being made from cassava in the Brazilian rainforest.  The Wapishana peoples of Guyana use cassava to produce a fermented alcoholic beverage called parakari. The production of parakari involves a complicated process with thirty different stages, and the use of a sophisticated fermentation technology. The fermentation of parakari involves the use of an amylolytic mold (Rhizopus), and it is the only known fermented drink to be produced by the indigenous peoples of the Americas that involves the use of an amylolytic process.     The native tribes from all over Brazil used made alcoholic beverages made from this native root. These beverages were known by many different names, being most well known as Kasiri and Cauim. In the 16th century Jean de Léry's published a book named 'Voyage to the land of Brazil, otherwise called America' in which it has an account on how the Tupynambas used to make the beverage.The Tiriós and Erwarhoyanas, indian tribes from northern Brazil and Surinam, make a beverage called sakurá with the sweet manioc variety of cassava, yuca. The same beverage is made by the Jivaro in Ecuador and Peru (the Shuara, Achuara, Aguaruna and Mayna people); they call it nijimanche. As Michael Harner  describes it:"The sweet manioc beer (nihamanci or nijiamanchi), is prepared by first peeling and washing the tubers in the stream near the garden. Then the water and manioc are brought to the house, where the tubers are cut up and put in a pot to boil. ... The manioc is then mashed and stirred to a soft consistency with the aid of a special wooden paddle. While the woman stirs the mash, she chews handfuls   of and spits them back into the pot, a process that may take half an hour or longer.
After the mash has been prepared, it is transferred to a beer storage jar and left to ferment. ... The resultant liquid tastes somewhat like a pleasingly alcoholic buttermilk and is most refreshing. The Jivaros consider it to be far superior to plain water, which they drink only in emergencies.'
Nutritional profile of cassavaCassava root is essentially a carbohydrate source.  Its composition shows 60–65 percent moisture, 20–31 percent carbohydrate, 1–2 percent crude protein and a comparatively low content of vitamins and minerals. However, the roots are rich in calcium and vitamin C and contain a nutritionally significant quantity of thiamine, riboflavin and nicotinic acid. Cassava starch contains 70 percent amylopectin and 20 percent amylose. Cooked cassava starch has a digestibility of over 75 percent.Cassava root is a poor source of protein. Despite the very low quantity, the quality of cassava root protein is fairly good in terms of essential amino acids. Methionine, cysteine and cystine are, however, limiting amino acids in cassava root.Cassava is attractive as nutrition source in certain ecosystems because cassava is one of the most drought-tolerant crops, can be successfully grown on marginal soils, and gives reasonable yields where many other crops do not grow well. Cassava is well adapted within latitudes 30° north and south of the equator, at elevations between sea level and 2000 meters above sea level, in equatorial temperatures, with rainfalls of 50 millimeters to five meters annually, and to poor soils with a pH ranging from acidic to alkaline. These conditions are common in certain parts of Africa and South America.Cassava is a highly productive crop in terms of food calories produced per unit land area per unit of time, significantly higher than other staple crops. Cassava can produce food calories at rates exceeding 250,000 cal/hectare/day compared with 176,000 for rice, 110,000 for wheat, and 200,000 for maize (corn).Cassava, like other foods, also has antinutritional and toxic factors. Of particular concern are the cyanogenic glucosides of cassava (linamarin and lotaustralin). These, on hydrolysis, release hydrocyanic acid (HCN). The presence of cyanide in cassava is of concern for human and for animal consumption. The concentration of these antinutritional and unsafe glycosides varies considerably between varieties and also with climatic and cultural conditions. Selection of cassava species to be grown, therefore, is quite important. Once harvested, cassava must be treated and prepared properly prior to human or animal consumption.
Comparison of cassava with other major staple foodsThe following table shows the nutrient content of cassava and compares it with major staple foods in a raw form. Raw forms of these staples, however, are not edible and cannot be digested. These must be sprouted, or prepared and cooked as appropriate for human consumption. In sprouted or cooked form, the relative nutritional and antinutritional contents of each of these grains is remarkably different from that of raw form of these grains reported in this table. The nutrition value for each staple food in cooked form depends on the cooking method (boiling, baking, steaming, frying, etc.).The table shows that cassava is a good energy source, but like potato, cassava's protein and essential nutrients density is lower than other staple foods.
 
BiofuelIn many countries, significant research has begun to evaluate the use of cassava as an ethanol biofuel feedstock. Under the Development Plan for Renewable Energy in the Eleventh Five-Year Plan in the People's Republic of China, the target is to increase the application of ethanol fuel by nongrain feedstock to 2 million tonnes, and that of biodiesel to 200 thousand tonnes by 2010. This will be equivalent to a substitute of 10 million tonnes of petroleum. As a result, cassava (tapioca) chips have gradually become a major source for ethanol production.  On December 22, 2007, the largest cassava ethanol fuel production facility was completed in Beihai, with annual output of 200 thousand tons, which would need an average of 1.5 million tons of cassava.  In November 2008, China-based Hainan Yedao Group reportedly invested $51.5m (£31.8m) in a new biofuel facility that is expected to produce   a year of bioethanol from cassava plants. 
Animal feedCassava is used worldwide for animal feed, as well. Cassava hay is produced at a young growth stage at three to four months, harvested about 30–45 cm above ground, and sun-dried for one to two days until it has final dry matter of less than 85%. The cassava hay contains high protein (20–27% crude protein) and condensed tannins (1.5–4% CP). It is used as a good roughage source for dairy or beef cattle, buffalo, goats, and sheep by either direct feeding or as a protein source in the concentrate mixtures.
Ethnomedicine

The bitter variety leaves are used to treat hypertension, headache, and pain.
Cubans commonly use cassava to treat irritable bowel syndrome; the paste is eaten in excess during treatment. 
As cassava is a gluten-free, natural starch, its use in Western cuisine as a wheat alternative for sufferers of celiac disease is becoming common.


Food use processing and toxicity
Cassava roots and leaves should not be consumed raw because they contain two cyanogenic glucosides, linamarin and lotaustralin. These are decomposed by linamarase, a naturally-occurring enzyme in cassava, liberating hydrogen cyanide (HCN).    Cassava varieties are often categorized as either sweet or bitter, signifying the absence or presence of toxic levels of cyanogenic glucosides, respectively. The so-called sweet (actually not bitter) cultivars can produce as little as 20 milligrams of cyanide (CN) per kilogram of fresh roots, whereas bitter ones may produce more than 50 times as much (1 g/kg). Cassavas grown during drought are especially high in these toxins.   A dose of 40 mg of pure cassava cyanogenic glucoside is sufficient to kill a cow.  Excess cyanide residue from improper preparation is known to cause acute cyanide intoxication, and goiters, and has been linked to ataxia (a neurological disorder affecting the ability to walk, also known as konzo).  It has also been linked to tropical calcific pancreatitis in humans, leading to chronic pancreatitis. Societies that traditionally eat cassava generally understand some processing (soaking, cooking, fermentation, etc.) is necessary to avoid getting sick.  Symptoms of acute cyanide intoxication appear four or more hours after ingesting raw or poorly processed cassava: vertigo, vomiting, and collapse. In some cases, death may result within one or two hours. It can be treated easily with an injection of thiosulfate (which makes sulfur available for the patient's body to detoxify by converting the poisonous cyanide into thiocyanate). "Chronic, low-level cyanide exposure is associated with the development of goiter and with tropical ataxic neuropathy, a nerve-damaging disorder that renders a person unsteady and uncoordinated. Severe cyanide poisoning, particularly during famines, is associated with outbreaks of a debilitating, irreversible paralytic disorder called konzo and, in some cases, death. The incidence of konzo and tropical ataxic neuropathy can be as high as 3% in some areas." 
Brief soaking (four hours) of cassava is not sufficient, but soaking for 18–24 hours can remove up to half the level of cyanide. Drying may not be sufficient, either. Food and Agriculture Organization of the United Nations, "Roots, tubers, plantains and bananas in human nutrition", Rome, 1990, Ch. 7 "Toxic substances and antinutritional factors", sixth paragraph. Document available online at   Ch. 7 appears at   (Accessed 25 June 2011.) 
TABLE 7.1, TABLE 7.2 and TABLE 7.3 compare the effectiveness of different preparation methods for removing toxicity. For some smaller-rooted, sweet varieties, cooking is sufficient to eliminate all toxicity. The cyanide is carried away in the processing water and the amounts produced in domestic consumption are too small to have environmental impact.  The larger-rooted, bitter varieties used for production of flour or starch must be processed to remove the cyanogenic glucosides. and then ground into flour, which is then soaked in water, squeezed dry several times, and toasted. The starch grains that float to the surface during the soaking process are also used in cooking.  The flour is used throughout South America and the Caribbean. Industrial production of cassava flour, even at the cottage level, may generate enough cyanide and cyanogenic glycosides in the effluents to have a severe environmental impact.  A safe processing method used by the pre-Columbian indigenous people of the Americas is to mix the cassava flour with water into a thick paste and then let it stand in the shade for five hours in a thin layer spread over a basket. In that time, about 5/6 of the cyanogenic glycosides are broken down by the linamarase; the resulting hydrogen cyanide escapes to the atmosphere, making the flour safe for consumption the same evening. The traditional method used in West Africa is to peel the roots and put them into water for three days to ferment. The roots then are dried or cooked. In Nigeria and several other west African countries, including Ghana, Benin, Togo, Ivory Coast, and Burkina Faso, they are usually grated and lightly fried in palm oil to preserve them. The result is a foodstuff called gari. Fermentation is also used in other places such as Indonesia (see Tapai). The fermentation process also reduces the level of antinutrients, making the cassava a more nutritious food. The reliance on cassava as a food source and the resulting exposure to the goitrogenic effects of thiocyanate has been responsible for the endemic goiters seen in the Akoko area of southwestern Nigeria.   People dependent on cassava risk cyanide poisoning and malnutrition diseases such as kwashiorkor and endemic goiter.A project called "BioCassava Plus" is developing a cassava with lower cyanogen glucosides and fortified with vitamin A, iron and protein to help the nutrition of people in sub-Saharan Africa.   In 2011, the director of the program said he hoped to obtain regulatory approvals by 2017. 
Farming
HarvestingCassava is harvested by hand by raising the lower part of the stem and pulling the roots out of the ground, then removing them from the base of the plant. The upper parts of the stems with the leaves are plucked off before harvest. Cassava is propagated by cutting the stem into sections of approximately 15 cm, these being planted prior to the wet season. 
Postharvest handling and storageCassava undergoes postharvest physiological deterioration, or PPD, once the tubers are separated from the main plant. The tubers, when damaged, normally respond with a healing mechanism. However, the same mechanism, which involves coumaric acids, initiates about 15 minutes after damage, and fails to switch off in harvested tubers. It continues until the entire tuber is oxidized and blackened within two to three days after harvest, rendering it unpalatable and useless.PPD is one of the main obstacles currently preventing farmers from exporting cassavas abroad and generating income. Cassava can be preserved in various ways such as coating in wax or freezing. 
The major cause of losses during cassava chip storage is infestation by insects. A wide range of species that feed directly on the dried chips have been reported as the cause of weight loss in the stored produce. Some loss assessment studies and estimations on dried cassava chips have been carried out in different countries. Hiranandan and Advani (1955) measured 12 - 14% post-harvest weight losses in India for chips stored for about five months. Killick (1966) estimated for Ghana that 19% of the harvest cassava roots are lost annually, and Nicol (1991) estimated a 15–20% loss of dried chips stored for eight months. Pattinson (1968) estimated for Tanzania a 12% weight loss of cassava chips stored for five months, and Hodges et al. (1985) assessed during a field survey postharvest losses of up to 19% after 3 months and up to 63% after four to five months due to the infestation of Prostephanus truncatus (Horn). In Togo, Stabrawa (1991) assessed postharvest weight losses of 5% after one month of storage and 15% after three months of storage due to insect infestation, and Compton (1991) assessed weight losses of about 9% for each store in the survey area in Togo. Wright et al. (1993) assessed postharvest losses of chips of about 14% after four months of storage, about 20% after seven month of storage and up to 30% when P. truncatus attacked the dried chips. In addition, Wright et al. (1993) estimated about 4% of the total national cassava production in Togo is lost during the chip storage. This was about equivalent to 0.05% of the GNP in 1989.Plant breeding has resulted in cassava that is tolerant to PPD. Sánchez et al.  identified four different sources of tolerance to PPD. One comes from Walker's Manihot (M. walkerae) of southern Texas in the United States and Tamaulipas in Mexico. A second source was induced by mutagenic levels of gamma rays, which putatively silenced one of the genes involved in PPD genesis. A third source was a group of high-carotene clones. The antioxidant properties of carotenoids are postulated to protect the roots from PPD (basically an oxidative process). Finally, tolerance was also observed in a waxy-starch (amylose-free) mutant. This tolerance to PPD was thought to be cosegregated with the starch mutation, and is not a pleiotropic effect of the latter.
Pests In Africa, the cassava mealybug (Phenacoccus manihoti) and cassava green mite (Mononychellus tanajoa) can cause up to 80% crop loss, which is extremely detrimental to the production of subsistence farmers. These pests were rampant in the 1970s and 1980s, but were brought under control following the establishment of the Biological Control Center for Africa of the IITA under the leadership of Dr. Hans Rudolf Herren.  The Centre investigated biological control for cassava pests; two South American natural enemies Apoanagyrus lopezi (a parasitoid wasp) and Typhlodromalus aripo (a predatory mite) were found to effectively control the cassava mealybug and the cassava green mite, respectively.The cassava mosaic virus causes the leaves of the cassava plant to wither, limiting the growth of the root. The virus caused a major African famine in the 1920s. "Virus Ravages Cassava Plants in Africa". The New York Times. May 31, 2010  The virus is spread by the whitefly and by the transplanting of diseased plants into new fields. Sometime in the late 1980s, a mutation occurred in Uganda that made the virus even more harmful, causing the complete loss of leaves. This mutated virus has been spreading at a rate of 50 miles per year, and as of 2005 may be found throughout Uganda, Rwanda, Burundi, the Democratic Republic of the Congo and the Republic of the Congo. Recently, brown streak disease has been identified as a major threat to cassava cultivation worldwide. A wide range of plant parasitic nematodes have been reported associated with cassava worldwide. These include Pratylenchus brachyurus., Rotylenchulus reniformis, Helicotylenchus spp., Scutellonema spp. and Meloidogyne spp., of which Meloidogyne incognita and Meloidogyne javanica are the most widely reported and economically important.  Meloidogyne spp. feeding produces physically damaging galls with eggs inside them. Galls later merge as the females grow and enlarge, and they interfere with water and nutrient supply.  Cassava roots become tough with age and restrict the movement of the juveniles and the egg release. It is therefore possible that extensive galling can be observed even at low densities following infection. Coyne, D. L. 1994. Nematode pests of cassava. African Crop Science Journal, Vol. 2. No.4, pp355-359  Other pest and diseases can gain entry through the physical damage caused by gall formation, leading to rots. They have not been shown to cause direct damage to the enlarged storage roots, but plants can have reduced height if there was loss of enlarged root weight.  Research on nematode pests of cassava is still in the early stages; results on the response of cassava is, therefore, not consistent, ranging from negligible to seriously damaging.     Since nematodes have such a seemingly erratic distribution in cassava agricultural fields, it is not easy to clearly define the level of direct damage attributed to nematodes and thereafter quantify the success of a chosen management method. The use of nematicides has been found to result in lower numbers of galls per feeder root compared to a control, coupled with a lower number of rots in the storage roots.  The nematicide Femaniphos, when used, did not affect crop growth and yield parameter variables measured at harvest. Nematicide use in cassava is neither practical nor sustainable; currently the use of tolerant and resistant varieties is the most practical and sustainable management method. 
See also

Attiéké  a side dish made from cassava that is a part of the cuisine of Côte d'Ivoire in Africa
Maní (Amazonian legend)
Kasiri


References 

Revista Brasileira de Zoologia 23 (3): 888–890
 
 


External links 
 

Cassava - Purdue University Horticulture
Cassave Research at the International Institute of Tropical Agriculture (IITA) 
Cassava Biz – information service provided by the Integrated Cassava Project (ICP) of the International Institute of Tropical Agriculture (IITA), to encourage, promote, and expand agribusiness development in the cassava subsector in Nigeria.
Cassava Pests: From Crisis to Control
GE cassava plants that have reduced cyanogens
GE cassava plants whose roots are over 2.5 times normal size
The Inoculated Mind - Interview with Dr. Richard Sayre, credited with lowering cyanogen content and engineering giant cassava
Global Cassava Development Strategy
The Case for Cassava
Mayans grew Manioc
CATISA: Cassava Transformation in Southern Africa

 
 
 








  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Benjamin Netanyahu
 
 
 
Benjamin "Bibi" Netanyahu ( ,  , Binyyameen Netanyahu; born 21 October 1949) is an Israeli leader and the current Prime Minister of Israel. He serves also as the Chairman of the Likud Party, as a Knesset member, as the Health Minister of Israel, as the Pensioner Affairs Minister of Israel and as the Economic Strategy Minister of Israel.Netanyahu is the first Israeli prime minister born in Israel after the founding of the state. Netanyahu joined the Israeli Defense Forces during the 1967 Six-Day War, and became a team leader in the Sayeret Matkal special forces unit. He took part in many missions, including Operation Gift (1968) and Operation Isotope (1972), during which he was shot in the shoulder. He fought on the front lines in the Yom Kippur War in 1973, taking part in special forces raids along the Suez Canal, and then leading a commando assault deep into Syrian territory.  He achieved the rank of captain before being discharged. Netanyahu served as the Israeli ambassador to the United Nations from 1984 to 1988, member of the Likud Party, and was Prime Minister from June 1996 to July 1999.Netanyahu moved from the political arena to the private sector after being defeated in the 1999 election for Prime Minister by Ehud Barak. He returned to politics in 2002 as Foreign Minister (2002–03) and Finance Minister (2003 – August 2005) in Ariel Sharon's governments, but he departed the government over disagreements regarding the Gaza Disengagement Plan.  He retook the Likud leadership on 20 December 2005, after Sharon left to form a new party.  In the 2006 election, Likud did poorly, winning 12 seats.   In December 2006, Netanyahu became the official Opposition Leader in the Knesset and Chairman of the Likud Party.  In August 2007, he retained the Likud leadership by beating Moshe Feiglin in party elections.   Following the February 2009 parliamentary election, in which Likud placed second and right-wing parties won a majority,  Netanyahu formed a coalition government.       Netanyahu's brother, Yonatan Netanyahu, commander of Israeli Special Forces, was killed in 1976 while commanding a counter-terrorist hostage-rescue mission in Entebbe.  Another brother, Iddo Netanyahu, is an Israeli playwright. His father, Benzion Netanyahu, worked as a prominent Israeli historian for decades.
Biography

Early life, military service, education, and early public careerNetanyahu was born in 1949 in Tel Aviv, to Zila (née Segal; 28 August 1912 – 31 January 2000) and professor Benzion Netanyahu (1910-2012), the middle of three children. He was initially raised and educated in Jerusalem, where he attended the Henrietta Szold Elementary School.  A copy of his evaluation from his 6th grade teacher Ruth Rubenstein revealed that Netanyahu was courteous, polite, helpful, his work was "responsible and punctual," and that Netanyahu was friendly, disciplined, cheerful, brave, active and obedient.   Between 1956 and 1958, and again in 1963–67,    his family lived in the United States in Cheltenham, Pennsylvania, a suburb of Philadelphia, where he attended and graduated from the Cheltenham High School and was active in a debate club. To this day, he speaks American English with a Philadelphia accent.   After graduating from high school in 1967, Netanyahu returned to Israel to enlist in the IDF. He trained as a combat soldier and became a team leader in an elite special forces unit of the IDF, Sayeret Matkal. He took part in numerous cross-border assault raids during the 1969-70 War of Attrition. He was involved in many other missions, including the rescue of the hijacked Sabena Flight 571 in May 1972 in which he was wounded by friendly fire. After his army service, Netanyahu returned to the United States in late 1972 to study architecture at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.  He returned to Israel in October of 1973 to serve in the Yom Kippur War for a 40 day period.  While there, he fought in special forces raids along the Suez Canal, as well as leading a commando team deep into Syrian territory.  He then returned to the United States and eventually completed an S.B.    degree in architecture  in 1975 and earned an S.M.  degree from the MIT Sloan School of Management in 1977. Concurrently, he studied political science at Harvard University.    At that time he changed his name to Benjamin Ben Nitai (Nitai, a reference to both Mount Nitai and to the eponymous Jewish sage Nittai of Arbela, was a pen name often used by his father for articles).  Years later, in an interview with the media, Netanyahu clarified that he decided to do so to make it easier for Americans to pronounce his name. This fact has been used by his political rivals to accuse him indirectly of a lack of Israeli national identity and loyalty. In 1976 Netanyahu lost his older brother Yonatan Netanyahu. Yonatan was serving as the commander of Benjamin's former unit, the Sayeret Matkal, and was killed in action during the counter-terrorism hostage-rescue mission Operation Entebbe in which his unit rescued more than 100 Israeli hostages hijacked by Palestinian terrorists and flown to the Entebbe Airport in Uganda.At MIT, Netanyahu graduated near the top of his class, and was recruited as a management consultant for the Boston Consulting Group in Boston, Massachusetts, working at the company between 1976-1978.  At the Boston Consulting Group, he was a colleague of Mitt Romney. Romney remembers that Netanyahu at the time was: “[A] strong personality with a distinct point of view.” In 1978, Netanyahu returned to Israel. Between 1978 and 1980 he ran the Jonathan Netanyahu anti-Terror Institute,  a non-governmental organization devoted to the study of terrorism; the Institute held a number of international conferences focused on the discussion of international terrorism. From 1980–82 he was director of marketing for Rim Industries in Jerusalem.  During this period Netanyahu made his first connections with several Israeli politicians, including Minister Moshe Arens, who appointed him as his Deputy Chief of Mission at the Israeli Embassy in Washington, D.C., a position he held from 1982 until 1984. Between 1984 and 1988 Netanyahu served as the Israeli ambassador to the United Nations. In 2005, he was voted the 18th-greatest Israeli of all time, in a poll by the Israeli news website Ynet to determine whom the general public considered the 200 Greatest Israelis.   In 2010, the British magazine New Statesman listed Netanyahu at 11th on the list of "The World's 50 Most Influential Figures 2010".   
Early political career: 1988–96 
Prior to the 1988 Israeli legislative election Netanyahu returned to Israel and joined the Likud party. In the internal elections in the Likud center Netanyahu became the fifth place on the list. Later on he was elected to as a Knesset member of the 12th Knesset, and was appointed as a deputy of the foreign minister Moshe Arens, and later on David Levy. Netanyahu and Levy did not cooperate and the rivalry between the two only intensified afterwards. During the Madrid Conference of 1991 Netanyahu was among members the Israeli delegation headed by Prime Minister Yitzhak Shamir. After the Madrid Conference Netanyahu was appointed as Deputy Minister in the Israeli Prime Minister's Office. Following the defeat of the Likud party in the 1992 Israeli legislative elections the Likud party held a primary election in 1993 to select its leader, and Netanyahu was victorious, defeating Benny Begin, son of the late Prime Minister Menachem Begin, and veteran politician David Levy  (Sharon initially sought Likud party leadership as well, but quickly withdrew when it was evident that he was attracting minimal support). Shamir retired from politics shortly after the Likud's defeat in the 1992 elections. Following the assassination of Yitzhak Rabin, his temporary successor Shimon Peres decided to call early elections in order to give the government a mandate to advance the peace process.  Netanyahu was the Likud's candidate for Prime Minister in the 1996 Israeli legislative election which took place on 26 May 1996 and were the first Israeli elections in which Israelis elected their Prime Minister directly. Netanyahu hired American Republican political operative Arthur Finkelstein to run his campaign, and although the American style of sound bites and sharp attacks elicited harsh criticism from inside Israel, it proved effective. (The method was later copied by Ehud Barak during the 1999 election campaign in which he beat Netanyahu.) Netanyahu won the election, becoming the youngest person in the history of the position and the first Israeli Prime Minister to be born in the State of Israel. (Yitzhak Rabin was born in Jerusalem, under the British Mandate of Palestine, prior to the 1948 founding of the Israeli state.)Netanyahu's victory over the pre-election favorite Shimon Peres surprised many. The main catalyst in the downfall of the latter was a wave of suicide bombings shortly before the elections; on 03 and 4 March 1996, Palestinians carried out two suicide bombings, killing 32 Israelis, with Peres seemingly unable to stop the attacks. Unlike Peres, Netanyahu did not trust Yasser Arafat and conditioned any progress at the peace process on the Palestinian National Authority fulfilling its obligations – mainly fighting terrorism, and ran with the campaign slogan "Netanyahu – making a safe peace". However, although Netanyahu won the election for Prime Minister, Labor won the Knesset elections, beating the Likud–Gesher–Tzomet alliance, meaning Netanyahu had to rely on a coalition with the Ultra-orthodox parties, Shas and UTJ (whose social welfare policies flew in the face of his capitalistic outlook) in order to govern. 
First Prime Ministership: 1996–99
A spate of suicide bombings reinforced the Likud position for security. Hamas claimed responsibility for most of the bombings.As Prime Minister Netanyahu raised many questions about many central premises of the Oslo peace process. One of his main points was disagreement with the Oslo premise that the negotiations should proceed in stages, meaning that concessions should be made to Palestinians before any resolution was reached on major issues, such as the status of Jerusalem, and the amending of the Palestinian National Charter. Oslo supporters had claimed that the multi-stage approach would build goodwill among Palestinians and would propel them to seek reconciliation when these major issues were raised in later stages. Netanyahu said that these concessions only gave encouragement to extremist elements, without receiving any tangible gestures in return. He called for tangible gestures of Palestinian goodwill in return for Israeli concessions. Despite his stated differences with the Oslo Accords, Prime Minister Netanyahu continued their implementation, but his Prime Ministership saw a marked slow-down in the Peace Process.In 1996, Netanyahu and Jerusalem's mayor Ehud Olmert decided to open an exit in the Arab Quarter for the Western Wall Tunnel, which prior Prime Minister Shimon Peres had instructed to be put on hold for the sake of peace.  This sparked three days of rioting by Palestinians, resulting in both Israelis and Palestinians being killed. In January 1997 Netanyahu signed the Hebron Protocol with the Palestinian Authority which resulted in the redeployment of Israeli forces in Hebron and the turnover of civilian authority in much of the area to the Palestinian Authority.Eventually, the lack of progress of the peace process led to new negotiations which produced the Wye River Memorandum in 1998 which detailed the steps to be taken by the Israeli government and Palestinian Authority to implement the earlier Interim Agreement of 1995. It was signed by Netanyahu and PLO Chairman Yasser Arafat, and on 17 November 1998, Israel's 120 member parliament, the Knesset, approved the Wye River Memorandum by a vote of 75–19.As Prime Minister Netanyahu emphasized a policy of "three no(s)": no withdrawal from the Golan Heights, no discussion of the case of Jerusalem, no negotiations under any preconditions. Hawas, Akram T. The new alliance: Turkey and Israel. The fourth Nordic conference on Middle Eastern Studies:
The Middle East in globalizing world. Oslo, 13–16 August 1998. Netanyahu was opposed by the political left wing in Israel and also lost support from the right because of his concessions to the Palestinians in Hebron and elsewhere, and due to his negotiations with Arafat generally. Netanyahu lost favor with the Israeli public after a long chain of scandals involving his marriage and corruption charges. In 1997, police recommended that Netanyahu be indicted on corruption charges for influence-peddling. He was accused of appointing an attorney general who would reduce the charges and prosecutors ruled that there was insufficient evidence to go to trial.    In 1999, Netanyahu faced another scandal when the Israel Police recommended that he be tried for corruption for $100,000 in free services from a government contractor; Israel's attorney general did not prosecute, citing difficulties with evidence.   After being defeated by Ehud Barak in the 1999 election for Prime Minister, Netanyahu temporarily retired from politics.    He subsequently  served as a senior consultant with Israeli communications equipment developer BATM for two years.  
Political downturn and recovery: 2000–03With the fall of the Barak government in late 2000, Netanyahu expressed his desire to return to politics. By law, Barak's resignation was supposed to lead to elections for the prime minister position only. Netanyahu insisted that general elections should be held, claiming that otherwise it would be impossible to have a stable government. Netanyahu decided eventually not to run for the prime minister position, a move which facilitated the surprising rise to power of Ariel Sharon, who at the time was considered less popular than Netanyahu.In 2002, after the Israeli Labor Party left the coalition and vacated the position of foreign minister, Prime Minister Ariel Sharon appointed Netanyahu as Foreign Minister. On 9 September 2002, a scheduled speech by Netanyahu at Concordia University in Montreal, Quebec, Canada was canceled after hundreds of pro-Palestinian protesters overwhelmed security and smashed through a glass window. Netanyahu was not present at the protest, having remained at Montreal's Ritz-Carlton Hotel throughout the duration. He later accused the activists of supporting terrorism and "mad zealotry."   Weeks later on 1 October 2002 around 200 protesters met Netanyahu outside his Heinz Hall appearance in Pittsburgh although Pittsburgh Police, Israeli security and a Pittsburgh SWAT unit allowed his speeches to continue downtown at the hall and the Duquesne Club as well as suburban Robert Morris University.  Netanyahu challenged Sharon for the leadership of the Likud party, but failed to oust Sharon. 
Finance Minister: 2003–05
After the 2003 Israeli legislative election, in what many observers regarded as a surprise move, Sharon offered the Foreign Ministry to Silvan Shalom and offered Netanyahu the Finance Ministry. Some pundits speculated that Sharon made the move because he deemed Netanyahu a political threat given his demonstrated effectiveness as Foreign Minister, and that by placing him in the Finance Ministry during a time of economic uncertainty, he could diminish Netanyahu's popularity. Netanyahu accepted the new appointment after Sharon agreed to provide him with an unprecedented level of independence in running the ministry. As Finance Minister, Netanyahu undertook an economic plan in order to restore Israel's economy from its low point during the al-Aqsa Intifada. The plan involved a move toward more liberalized markets, although it was not without its critics.  Netanyahu succeeded in passing several long-unresolved reforms, including an important reform in the banking system.  However, opponents in the Labor party (and even a few  within his own Likud) viewed Netanyahu's policies as "Thatcherite" attacks on the venerated Israeli social safety net. Netanyahu threatened to resign from office in 2004 unless the Gaza pullout plan was put to a referendum. He later modified the ultimatum and voted for the program in the Knesset, indicating immediately thereafter that he would resign unless a referendum was held within 14 days.  He submitted his resignation letter on 7 August 2005, shortly before the Israeli cabinet voted 17 to 5 to approve the initial phase of withdrawal from Gaza. 
Likud leader and opposition leader: 2005–09Following the withdrawal of Sharon from the Likud, Netanyahu was one of several candidates who vied for the Likud leadership. His most recent attempt prior to this was in September 2005 when he had tried to hold early primaries for the position of the head of the Likud party, while the party held the office of Prime Minister – thus effectively pushing Ariel Sharon out of office. The party rejected this initiative. Netanyahu retook the leadership on 20 December 2005, with 47% of the primary vote.    In the March 2006 Knesset elections, Likud took the third place behind Kadima and Labor and Netanyahu served as Leader of the Opposition.   On 14 August 2007, Netanyahu was reelected as chairman of the Likud and its candidate for the post of Prime Minister with 73% of the vote, against far-right candidate Moshe Feiglin and World Likud Chairman Danny Danon.    He opposed the 2008 Israel–Hamas ceasefire, like others in the Knesset opposition. Specifically, Netanyahu said, "This is not a relaxation, it's an Israeli agreement to the rearming of Hamas... What are we getting for this?"   Following Livni's election to head Kadima and Olmert's resignation from the post of Prime Minister, Netanyahu declined to join the coalition Livni was trying to form and supported new elections, which were held in February 2009.  
Netanyahu was the Likud's candidate for Prime Minister in the 2009 Israeli legislative election which took place on 10 February 2009, as Tzipi Livni, the previous Designated Acting Prime Minister under the Olmert government, had been unable to form a viable governing coalition. Opinion polls showed Likud in the lead, but with as many as a third of Israeli voters undecided. In the election itself, Likud won the second highest number of seats, Livni's party having outnumbered the Likud by one seat. A possible explanation for Likud's relatively poor showing is that some Likud supporters defected to Avigdor Lieberman's Yisrael Beiteinu party. Netanyahu, however, claimed victory on the basis that right wing parties won the majority of the vote, and on 20 February 2009, Netanyahu was designated by Israeli President Shimon Peres to succeed Ehud Olmert as Prime Minister, and began his negotiations to form a coalition government.Despite right wing parties winning a majority of 65 seats in the Knesset, Netanyahu preferred a broader centrist coalition and turned to his Kadima rivals, chaired by Tzipi Livni, to join his government. This time it was Livni's turn to decline to join, with a difference of opinion on how to pursue the peace process being the stumbling block. Netanyahu did manage to entice a smaller rival, the Labour party, chaired by Ehud Barak, to join his government, giving him a certain amount of centrist tone.Netayahu presented his cabinet for a Knesset "Vote of Confidence" on 31 March 2009. The 32nd Government was approved that day by a majority of 69 lawmakers to 45 (with five abstaining) and the members were sworn in.  
Second Prime Ministership: 2009–present 


In March 2009 US Secretary of State Hillary Rodham Clinton traveled to Israel.  She warned that Israeli settlements and demolition of Arab homes in East Jerusalem were "unhelpful" to the peace process.  Clinton also voiced support for the establishment of a Palestinian state—a solution not endorsed by Prime Minister-designate Benjamin Netanyahu,  with whom she had earlier pledged the United States' cooperation.  Upon the arrival of President Obama administration's special envoy, George Mitchell, Netanyahu said that any furtherance of negotiations with the Palestinians will be conditioned on the Palestinians recognizing Israel as a Jewish state,  as this issue had not been sufficiently clarified.During a 19 May 2009 meeting with US President Barack Obama at the White House, Obama said a two state solution was a priority and called for settlement growth to be frozen, while Netanyahu refused to support the creation of a Palestinian state and stated that Israel has the right to continue settlements.During President Obama's Cairo speech on 4 June 2009 in which Obama addressed the Muslim world, Obama stated, among other things, that "The United States does not accept the legitimacy of continued Israeli settlements". "This construction violates previous agreements and undermines efforts to achieve peace. It is time for these settlements to stop." Following Obama's Cairo speech Netanyahu immediately called a special government meeting. On 14 June, ten days after Obama's Cairo speech, Netanyahu gave a speech at Bar-Ilan University in which he endorsed a "Demilitarized Palestinian State", though said that Jerusalem must remain the unified capital of Israel.    The speech was widely seen as a response to Obama's speech.    In a rejoinder to Obama's mentioning of the founding of Israel in the context of the Holocaust, Netanyahu remarked, "[t]here are those who say that if the Holocaust had not occurred, the State of Israel would never have been established. But I say that if the State of Israel would have been established earlier, the Holocaust would not have occurred."  Netanyahu stated that he would accept a Palestinian state if Jerusalem were to remain the united capital of Israel, the Palestinians would have no army, and the Palestinians would give up their demand for a right of return. He also argued the right for a "natural growth" in the existing Jewish settlements in the West Bank while their permanent status is up to further negotiation. The address represented a renewal in Netanyahu's willingness to appeal for Palestinian leadership to accept peace.   The overture was quickly rejected by Palestinian leaders such as Hamas spokesman Sami Abu Zuhri, who called the speech "racist". Three months after starting his term, Netanyahu remarked that his cabinet already had achieved several notable successes, such as the establishment of a working national unity government, and a broad consensus for a "Two-state solution".  The Kadima-led opposition submitted a no-confidence measure to the Knesset shortly after Netanyahu concluded his first 100 days in office.  A July 2009 survey by Ha'aretz found that most Israelis support the Netanyahu government, giving him a personal approval rating of about 49 percent,  a spike from 28 percent prior to his Bar-Ilan speech.As part of his "economic peace", to boost the Palestinian economy, while insisting not a substitute to political negotiations, Netanyahu has lifted checkpoints in the West Bank, in order to allow freedom of movement and a flow of imports as a "highway to peace", a step that resulted in an economic boost in the West Bank.   On 23 July 2009, Netanyahu welcomed the Arab Peace initiative (also known as the "Saudi Peace Initiative"), stating that "The Arab initiative provides a tailwind to the Peace Process", and also lauded a call by Bahrain's Crown Prince, Salman bin Hamad bin Isa Al Khalifa to normalize relations with Israel.   On 31 July, the Saudi Foreign Minister, Saud El Faisal, at a press conference with U.S Secretary of State Hillary Clinton rejected the U.S pressure on Arab states to make  gestures toward normalizing ties with Israel as "confidence-building" measures, stating that "'step-by-step' diplomatic approach, have not and will not lead to peace", and that "temporary security arrangement as well, so-called 'confidence-building' measures will not lead to peace either." He added that a comprehensive approach is needed in order to tackle the core issues of the conflict, that include "The future of the Palestinian State, control over Jerusalem, the return of the refugees to their country, and water and security arrangements". He also argued that Israel was diverting attention "From the occupation that had began on 1967, and the establishment of a Palestinian State, towards secondary issues, such as flying methods (referring to one of the gestures) and academic arguments, and said that "It is time all the inhabitants of the Middle East will live a normal life". On 10 August 2009, Netanyahu warned that "If Hezbollah will enter the (Lebanese) government as an official factor, let it be clear that the Lebanese government will be held responsible for any attack carried out from its territory. Once they [Hezbullah] are part of the government, the sovereign government of Lebanon is the one responsible. I hope we will not be forced to make such responses".  However, he maintained his assessment that "There are no 'winds of war' brewing in the North" the next day. On 23 August 2009, Netanyahu announced in his weekly cabinet meeting that negotiations with the Palestinians will begin in September and will be officially launched on his visit to New York, after he had accepted an invitation from President Barack Obama for a "Triple Summit" there.  He added that there is progress with special envoy George Mitchell, though there is no full agreement on everything,  and there will be more rounds of meetings [until September].  On the same day, a spokesman for PA President Mahmoud Abbas said he refused to participate in peace negotiations as long as there was any building going on in settlements. On 26 August 2009, Netanyahu and special envoy George Mitchell met, in what was perceived as a critical meeting towards an understanding on a settlement freeze between Israel and the U.S, in which they reaffirmed in a joint statement the need for a meaningful negotiation between the Israelis and Palestinians that will lead to a comprehensive peace agreement, and Abbas declared the same day that he will be willing to meet with Prime Minister Netanyahu at the U.N General Assembly, where Netanyahu had accepted president Obama's invitation for a "triple summit", although he said it would not necessarily lead to negotiations.  Netanyahu was reported to be in a pivotal moment over these understandings, that were reported to include a compromise over permission on continuing the already approved construction in the West Bank, in exchange for freezing all settlements thereafter, as well as continuing building in East Jerusalem, and at the same time stopping the demolition of houses of Arab inhabitants there.    It was also reported that the U.S Administration was planning a "modest" summit with a principle declaration and stiff timetable, rather than a "Grand Plan". On 4 September 2009, it was reported that Netanyahu was to agree to settlers' political demands to approve more settlement constructions before a temporary settlement freeze agreement took place.  White House spokesman Robert Gibbs expressed "regret" over the move;  however, one U.S official said the move will not "derail [the] train". On 7 September 2009, Netanyahu left his office without reporting where he was headed, his schedule was mysteriously cleared, and his whereabouts were unknown for a several hours. The prime minister's military secretary, Maj. Gen. Meir Kalifi, later reported Netanyahu had visited a security facility in Israel.    At the same time, a Palestinian newspaper reported that Netanyahu had left for a visit in an Arab state that does not have diplomatic ties with Israel.  On 9 September 2009, Yedioth Ahronoth reported that the Israeli leader had made a secret flight to Moscow to try to persuade Russian officials not to sell S-300 anti-aircraft missile systems to Iran.    The report caused a local media storm, with angry journalists accusing Netanyahu’s office of lying.  Headlines branded Netanyahu a "liar" and dubbed the affair a "fiasco."   It was later reported that the PM's military secretary will be dismissed due to the affair.  The Sunday Times reported that the trip was made to share the names of Russian scientists that Israel believes are abetting the Iranian nuclear weapons program. On 16 September 2009, special envoy George Mitchell arrived in Israel for one of his last rounds before a triple summit at the U.N. between President Obama, Netanyahu and PA president Mahmoud Abbas, in order to secure such a summit. Despite shuttling between the Israelis and the Palestinians, he failed to secure such a summit.  However, it was reported that he had expected his trip to be extended, that he would meet Prime Minister Netanyahu again two days later, and that there might be a three-way summit without relaunching the peace process, after which negotiations on understandings between Israel and the U.S would continue. On 18 September, Netanyahu and Mitchell met again, but failed to reach an agreement that will secure the summit. Later that day, Haaretz reported that Israeli officials blamed the Palestinian Authority for thwarting the peace talks. 

On 20 September 2009, the White House announced that it will host a three-way meeting between President Obama, Prime Minister Netanyahu and PA President Mahmoud Abbas, within the framework of the United Nations General Assembly, "in an effort to lay the groundwork for renewed negotiations on Mideast peace."   The meeting took place on 22 September, in New York. Afterwards, Netanyahu said that he agreed with Abbas during the meeting that peace talks should be relaunched as soon as possible. On 24 September 2009, in an address to the United Nations General Assembly in New York, Netanyahu said Iran poses a threat to the peace of the world and that it is incumbent on the world body to prevent the Islamic Republic from obtaining nuclear weapons.       Waving the blueprints for Auschwitz and invoking the memory of his own family members murdered by the Nazis, Netanyahu delivered his most passionate and public riposte yet to Iranian president Mahmoud Ahmadinejad's questioning of the Holocaust, asking: "Have you no shame?" In response to pressure from the Obama administration urging the sides to resume peace talks, on 25 November 2009 Netanyahu announced a partial 10 month settlement construction freeze plan. The announced partial freeze had no significant effect on actual settlement construction, according to an analysis by the major Israeli daily Haaretz.  U.S special envoy George Mitchell said, "while the United States shares Arab concerns about the limitations of Israel's gesture, it is more than any Israeli government has ever done".   In his announcement Netanyahu called the move "a painful step that will encourage the peace process" and urged the Palestinians to respond.  However, the Palestinians rejected the call. On 7 December 2009, a bill with Netanyahu's backing  obligating a national referendum on any withdrawals from land passed 68–22 in the Knesset.  Opponents of the bill claim it would be another obstacle to peace, by tying a Prime Minister's hand in any future peace accord.  Source in Syrian foreign ministry says Israel 'provoking... international community' with referendum bill. On 10 March 2010, Israel's government approved construction of an additional 1,600 apartments in a large Jewish housing development in northeastern Jerusalem called Ramat Shlomo    despite the position of the current U.S. Government that acts such as this thwart the peace talks between Israel and the Palestinians. The Israeli government's announcement occurred during a visit by U.S. Vice-President Joe Biden and the U.S. government subsequently issued a strongly worded condemnation of the plan.    The European Union also condemned the announcement and issued a statement calling on the Israeli government to reverse the decision.    Netanyahu subsequently issued a statement that all previous Israeli governments had continuously permitted construction in the neighborhood, and that certain neighborhoods such as Ramat Shlomo and Gilo have always been included as part of Israel in any final agreement plan that has been proposed by either side to date.   Netanyahu regretted the timing of the announcement but asserted that "our policy on Jerusalem is the same policy followed by all Israeli governments for the 42 years, and it has not changed. As far as we are concerned, building in Jerusalem is the same as building in Tel Aviv." 
In September 2010, Netanyahu agreed to enter direct talks, mediated by the Obama administration, with the Palestinians for the first time in a long while.    The ultimate aim of these direct talks is to forge the framework of an official "final status settlement" to the Israeli-Palestinian conflict by forming a two-state solution for the Jewish people and the Palestinian people. Nevertheless, the Israeli government publicly stated that a lasting peace wouldn't take effect immediately due to Hamas and Hezbollah presence threatening the progress. In addition the Israeli government clearly rejected any possible agreement with the Palestinian side as long as that side refuses to recognize Israel as a Jewish state. On 27 September, the 10 month settlement freeze ended, and the Israeli government approved new construction in the West Bank and East Jerusalem. In January 2011, Labor Party leader Ehud Barak formed a breakaway party, Independence, which enabled Barak to maintain his loyal Labor MK faction within the Netanyahu coalition government, and prevented the departure of Labor as a whole from the government. Labor previously threatened to force Barak to do so. After Barak's move, Netanyahu was able to maintain a majority of 66 MKs (out 120 in the Knesset), previously having 74 MKs within his majority coalition. In March and April 2011 the Israeli media published a series of articles claiming that interest groups had paid for foreign trips of Netanyahu and his wife.  In response, Netanyahu filed two libel suits on a total of one million NIS each against the newspaper Ma'ariv and several of its employees,  and against the news division of Israeli channel 10 Hadashot 10, against the Israeli web portal Nana 10 and several employees.  Later on, the couple filed another libel suit in the amount of 3.5 million NIS against the Israeli channel 10, Nana 10, Hadashot 10 and the Israeli journalists Raviv Drucker and Mickey Rosenthal.  In 2011, it was revealed that, on retiring from office in July of that year, former U.S. Secretary of Defense Robert Gates had said that Netanyahu was ungrateful to the United States and endangering Israel. Responding, the Likud party defended Netanyahu by saying that most Israelis supported the prime minister and that he had broad support in the United States.   The depth of this support was demonstrated during his 2012 reelection campaign when half of his donations came from the Falics family in the United States. In 2012, Netanyahu initially planned to call early elections, but subsequently oversaw the creation of a controversial government of national unity that will see Israel through until the national elections of 2013.  In May 2012, in a letter to Mahmoud Abbas, Netanyahu officially recognised for the first time the right for Palestinians to have their own state, though as before  he declared it would have to be demilitarised,  and said his new unity government furnished an opportunity to renew negotiations and move forward. On 9 October 2012, Netanyahu announced he would seek an early Israeli election that would likely happen in January or February 2013. Shortly afterwards, on October 25, 2012, Netanyahu and Foreign Minister Avigdor Lieberman announced that their respective political parties, Likud and Yisrael Beiteinu, had merged and would run together on a single ballot in Israel's January 22, 2013 general elections. “A joining of forces will give us the strength to defend Israel from military threats, and the strength to spearhead social and economic changes in the country,” Netanyahu said. 
Political positions

Oslo AccordsFrom the inception of the Oslo accords, Netanyahu opposed them. During his term as prime minister in the late 1990s, Netanyahu consistently reneged on commitments made by previous Israeli governments as part of the Oslo peace process, leading American peace envoy Dennis Ross to note that “neither President Clinton nor Secretary [of State Madeleine] Albright believed that Bibi had any real interest in pursuing peace.” In a 2001 video, Netanyahu, reportedly unaware he was being recorded, said: "They asked me before the election if I'd honor [the Oslo Accords]," "I said I would, but ... I'm going to interpret the accords in such a way that would allow me to put an end to this galloping forward to the '67 borders. How did we do it? Nobody said what defined military zones were. Defined military zones are security zones; as far as I'm concerned, the entire Jordan Valley is a defined military zone. Go argue."   
Prior to second term as Prime MinisterNetanyahu had previously called U.S.-backed peace talks a waste of time,  while at the same time refusing to commit to the same two-state solution as had other Israeli leaders,  until a speech in June 2009. He repeatedly made public statements which advocated an "economic peace" approach, meaning an approach based on economic cooperation and joint effort rather than continuous contention over political and diplomatic issues. This is in line with many significant ideas from the Peace Valley plan.    He raised these ideas during discussions with former U.S. Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice.  Netanyahu continued to advocate these ideas as the Israeli elections approached. 
Netanyahu has said:  Right now, the peace talks are based on only one thing, only on peace talks. It makes no sense at this point to talk about the most contractible issue. It's Jerusalem or bust, or right of return or bust. That has led to failure and is likely to lead to failure again....We must weave an economic peace alongside a political process. That means that we have to strengthen the moderate parts of the Palestinian economy by handing rapid growth in those areas, rapid economic growth that gives a stake for peace for the ordinary Palestinians."   In January 2009, prior to the February 2009 Israeli elections Netanyahu informed Middle East envoy Tony Blair that he would continue the policy of the Israeli governments of Ariel Sharon and Ehud Olmert by expanding settlements in the West Bank, in contravention of the Road Map, but not building new ones. 
June 2009 peace address; "Bar-Ilan Speech"On 14 June 2009, Netanyahu delivered a seminal address  at Bar-Ilan University (also known as "Bar-Ilan Speech"), at Begin-Sadat Center for Strategic Studies, that was broadcast live in Israel and across parts of the Arab world, on the topic of the Middle East peace process. He endorsed for the first time the notion of a Palestinian state alongside Israel.  Netanyahu's speech could be viewed in part as a response to Obama's 4 June speech at Cairo. Yedioth Ahronoth claimed that Obama's words had "resonated through Jerusalem's corridors". As part of his proposal, Netanyahu demanded the full demilitarization of the proposed state, with no army, rockets, missiles, or control of its airspace, and said that Jerusalem would be undivided Israeli territory. He stated that the Palestinians should recognize Israel as the Jewish national state with an undivided Jerusalem. He rejected a right of return for Palestinian refugees, saying, "any demand for resettling Palestinian refugees within Israel undermines Israel's continued existence as the state of the Jewish people." He also stated that a complete stop to settlement building in the West Bank, as required by the 2003 Road Map peace proposal, was not possible and the expansions will be limited based on the "natural growth" of the population, including immigration, with no new territories taken in. Nevertheless, Netanyahu affirmed that he accepted the Road Map proposal.  He did not discuss whether or not the settlements should be part of Israel after peace negotiations, simply saying that the "question will be discussed".    In a response to U.S. President Barack Obama's statements in his Cairo speech, Netanyahu remarked, "there are those who say that if the Holocaust had not occurred, the State of Israel would never have been established. But I say that if the State of Israel would have been established earlier, the Holocaust would not have occurred." He also said, "this is the homeland of the Jewish people, this is where our identity was forged." He stated that he would be willing to meet with any "Arab leader" for negotiations without preconditions, specifically mentioning Syria, Saudi Arabia, and Lebanon.  In general, the address represented a new position for Netanyahu's government on the peace process. Some right-wing members of Netanyahu's governing coalition criticized his remarks for the creation of a Palestinian State; believing that all of the land should remain under Israeli sovereignty. Likud MK Danny Danon said that Netanyahu went "against the Likud platform",  while MK Uri Orbakh of Habayit Hayehudi said that it had "dangerous implications".  Opposition party Kadima leader Tzipi Livni remarked after the address that she thinks Netanyahu does not really believe in the two-state solution at all; she thought that he only said what he did as a feigned response to international pressure.    Peace Now blasted the speech, highlighting the fact that, in the group's opinion, it did not address the Palestinians as equal partners in the peace process. The Secretary General of Peace Now, Yariv Oppenheimer, said, "It's a rerun of Netanyahu from his first term". On 9 August 2009, speaking at the opening of government meeting Netanyahu repeated his claims from the Palestinians: "We want an agreement with two factors, the first of which is the recognition of Israel as the national state of the Jewish people and (the second of which is) a security settlement". 
International reactionNetanyahu's "Bar-Ilan Speech" provoked mixed reaction from the International community:   

  – The Palestinian National Authority rejected the conditions on a Palestinian State given by Netanyahu. Senior official Saeb Erekat said, "Netanyahu's speech closed the door to permanent status negotiations". Hamas spokesman Fawzi Barhoum said it reflected a "racist and extremist ideology"  and called on Arab nations to "form stronger opposition".    Palestinian Islamic Jihad labeled it "misleading" and, like Hamas, demanded stronger opposition to Israel from Arab nations.    According to The Jerusalem Post, some leaders advocated a third intifada in response to the speech. 



  – The Arab League dismissed the address, declaring in a statement that "Arabs would not make concessions regarding issues of Jerusalem and refugees" and that "we know his history and style of evasion", adding that the Arab League would not recognize Israel as a Jewish state. 



  – The Czech Republic, which held the presidency of the European Union, praised Netanyahu's address. "In my view, this is a step in the right direction. The acceptance of a Palestinian state was present there," said Czech Foreign Minister Jan Kohout, whose country held the EU's six-month presidency at the time of the speech.   



  – President Barack Obama's press secretary, Robert Gibbs, said that the speech was an "important step forward".   President Obama stated that "this solution can and must ensure both Israel's security and the Palestinians' legitimate aspirations for a viable state". 



  – Swedish Foreign Minister Carl Bildt stated that "the fact that he uttered the word state is a small step forward". He added that "whether what he mentioned can be defined as a state is a subject of some debate".  



  – France praised the speech but called on Israel to cease building settlements in the West Bank. French Foreign Minister Bernard Kouchner stated that "I can only welcome the prospect of a Palestinian state outlined by the Israeli Prime Minister."  



  – The Foreign Ministry of Russia called the speech "a sign of readiness for dialogue" but said that "it does not open up the road to resolving the Israeli-Palestinian problem. The conditions on the Palestinians would be unacceptable." 



  – Referring to Netanyahu's demand that Palestinians recognize Israel as the state of the Jewish people, Egypt's then President Hosni Mubarak remarked, "You won't find anyone to answer that call in Egypt, or in any other place." Issuing a less blunt response, the Egyptian Foreign Ministry said that the speech was "not complete" and that it hoped for another, "different Israeli proposal which is built on the commitment to the two-state solution". 
   
 
 

  – Syrian state media condemned the speech and wrote that "Netanyahu has confirmed that he rejects the Arab peace initiative for peace along with all the initiatives and resolutions of the Security Council to relative peace."  



  – Lebanese President Michel Suleiman called  for unity among Arab leaders, saying that "Arab leaders should be more united and preserve the spirit of resistance to face the Israeli stands regarding the peace process and the Palestinian refugee issue." He called on the international community to exert more pressure on the Israeli government to accept the Arab Peace Initiative, as he said Israel still has a will of military confrontation which can be proved in its offensives on Lebanon and the Gaza Strip. 



  – Jordanian Minister of State for Media affairs and Communications, and Government spokesperson Nabil Sharif issued a statement saying "The ideas presented by Netanyahu do not live up to what was agreed on by the international community as a starting point for achieving a just and comprehensive peace in the region." 



  – Iranian president Mahmoud Ahmadinejad referred to the speech as "bad news". 


Opinion on unilateral withdrawalsOn 9 August 2009, speaking at the opening of his weekly cabinet meeting, Netanyahu promised not to repeat the "mistake" of the Gaza unilateral pullout, saying, "We will not repeat this mistake. We will not create new evacuees", and adding that "the unilateral evacuation brought neither peace nor security. On the contrary", and that "We want an agreement with two factors, the first of which is the recognition of Israel as the national state of the Jewish people and [the second is] a security settlement. In the case of Gaza, both of these factors were lacking".  He also said, "Should we achieve a turn toward peace with the more moderate partners, we will insist on the recognition of the State of Israel and the demilitarization of the future Palestinian state".    
IranOn 20 February 2009, after being asked to be the prime minister of Israel, Netanyahu described Iran as the greatest threat that Israel has ever  faced: "Iran is seeking to obtain a nuclear weapon and constitutes the gravest  threat to our existence since the war of independence." Speaking before the UN General Assembly in New York on 24 September 2009, Netanyahu expressed a different opinion than Iranian President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad's speech at the forum, saying those who believe Tehran is a threat only to Israel are wrong. "The Iranian regime", he said, "is motivated by fanaticism… They want to see us go back to medieval times. The struggle against Iran pits civilization against barbarism. This Iranian regime is fueled by extreme fundamentalism."  "By focusing solely on Iran," columnist Yossi Melman speculated that Netanyahu's foreign policy, "...took the Palestinian issue off the world agenda." After four days of shelling from the Iranian-funded Palestinian Islamic Jihad, Melman asked, "Is it worth initiating a crisis with Iran? Will the Israeli public be able to cope with Iran’s response?"    Netanyahu is reported to have formed a close, confidential relationship with Defense Minister Ehud Barak as the two men consider possible Israeli military action against Iran's nuclear facilities.   The pair were accused of acting on "messianic" impulses by Yuval Diskin, former head of the Shin Bet, who added that their warmongering rhetoric appealed to "the idiots within the Israeli public".  Diskin's remarks were supported by former Mossad chief Meir Dagan,  who himself had previously said that an attack on Iran was "the stupidest thing I have ever heard".  A few weeks later, the RAND Corporation (a leading American think tank that advises the Pentagon) also openly disagreed with Netanyahu's belligerent stance: "In doing so, and without naming names, RAND sided with former Mossad chief Meir Dagan and former head of the Shin Bet Yuval Diskin." In an 8 March 2007 interview with CNN, Netanyahu asserted that there is only one difference between Nazi Germany and the Islamic Republic of Iran, namely that the first entered a worldwide conflict and then sought atomic weapons, while the latter is first seeking atomic weapons and, once it has them, will then start a world war. Netanyahu repeated these remarks at a news conference in April 2008.     This was similar to earlier remarks that  "...it's 1938, and Iran is Germany, and Iran is racing to arm itself with atomic bombs".  In 2012, he used the opening ceremony for Israel's Holocaust Remembrance Day to warn against the dangers of an Iranian nuclear bomb, saying he was following the example of Jewish leaders during WWII who struggled to raise the alarm about the Nazis' genocidal intentions.    Israeli academic Avner Cohen accused Netanyahu of showing "contempt" for the Holocaust by putting it to "political use",    and former Israeli foreign minister Shlomo Ben-Ami similarly condemned Netanyahu's "vulgar manipulation of the memory of the Holocaust". Immediately after the 2012 Burgas bus bombing, Netanyahu confirmed that the attack had been undertaken in coordination with Iran. Netanyahu stated during a 29 July meeting that, in his opinion, "all the sanctions and diplomacy so far have not set back the Iranian programme by one iota."  And in August he stated that the United States only might respond to a massive attack against Israel. On 28 September 2012, Netanyahu gave a speech to the UN General Assembly in which he set forward a "red line" of 90% uranium enrichment, stating that if Iran were to reach this level, it would become an intolerable risk for Israel.  Netanyahu used a cartoon graphic of a bomb to illustrate his point, indicating three stages of uranium enrichment, noting that Iran had already completed the first stage, and stating that "By next spring, at most by next summer at current enrichment rates, [Iran] will have finished the medium enrichment and move on to the final stage. From there, it’s only a few months, possibly a few weeks before they get enough enriched uranium for the first bomb.” Netanyahu delivered his speech the day after Iranian President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad spoke on the Jewish holy day of Yom Kippur, a presentation that the American, Canadian, and Israeli delegations had deliberately not attended. 
Jonathan PollardNetanyahu has repeatedly called for the release of Jonathan Pollard, an American serving a life sentence for passing secret U.S. documents to Israel.   Netanyahu has called for his release over the course of several presidential administrations.       He raised the issue at the Wye River Summit in 1998, where he claimed that U.S. President Bill Clinton had privately agreed to release Pollard; Clinton denied the assertion.  In 2002, Netanyahu visited Pollard at his North Carolina prison.   The Israeli Prime Minister maintains contact with Pollard's wife, and has been active in pressing the Obama administration to release Pollard.     Netanyahu has characterized Pollard as "a warmhearted Jew, proud and a real Zionist." 
Defense and securityThe Israeli General Staff concluded that the armed forces cannot maintain their battle readiness under Netanyahu's proposed cuts.  However Netanyahu decided to cut social programs instead, and promised to increase the defense budget by about six percent.   In spite of this, the Israeli military still fell NIS 3.7 million short from its projected budget, which could damage their war capabilities. Netanyahu arranged for 1000 prisoners to be swapped for Gilad Shalit, including terrorists with "blood on their hands."  About 60% of the released terrorists were expected to return to terrorism. According to a U.S. State Department representative in November 2011, under the leadership of Netanyahu and Obama, Israel and the United States have enjoyed unprecedented security cooperation. 
Personal relations with foreign leadersDuring the 2011 G-20 Cannes summit, French president Nicholas Sarkozy was overheard saying to U.S. president Barack Obama, "I cannot bear Netanyahu, he's a liar". To this Obama reportedly responded, "You're fed up with him, but I have to deal with him every day." Journalists covering the event were requested to sign an agreement not to report the incident. Report: Sarkozy calls Netanyahu 'liar' Ynet News, 7 November 2011.  Sarkozy to Obama: I'm fed up with Netanyahu, CBS News, 8 November 2011. Apart from his relationship with the Obama admistration, Netanyahu has close ties with the U.S. Republican Party and its leadership in the House of Representatives.   Netanyahu and 2012 Republican presidential nominee Mitt Romney have a close relationship that dates back to their work together at the Boston Consulting Group in the mid-1970s. U.S. Vice President Joe Biden has been friendly with Netanyahu for many years. In November 2011  and in the 2012 U.S. vice presidential debate,  Biden stated that the relationship has lasted for 39 years. Netanyahu remarked in March 2010 during a joint statement with Biden during his visit of Israel  that their friendship had started almost three decades prior.Former French President Nicolas Sarkozy and Netanyahu originally became acquainted when Sarkozy was the mayor of Neuilly-sur-Seine, after an introduction by a mutual friend. The two used to dine together in Paris and Israel.   
Family and personal life 
 
 
 
 
 
  Related to the Rabbi Eliyahu of Vilna (the Vilna Gaon) on his paternal side,  Netanyahu was born in Tel Aviv,  to Benzion Netanyahu (original name Mileikowsky) and Cela (Tsilah; née Segal). His mother was born in 1912 in Petah Tikva, part of the future British Mandate of Palestine that eventually became Israel. Though all his grandparents were born in the Russian Empire (now Belarus, Lithuania and Poland), his mother's parents emigrated to Minneapolis in the United States. Netanyahu's father, Benzion, was a professor of Jewish history at Cornell University,  editor of the Encyclopaedia Hebraica, and a senior aide to Ze'ev Jabotinsky, who remained active in research and writing into his nineties. Regarding the Palestinian people, he stated: "That they won't be able to face [anymore] the war with us, which will include withholding food from Arab cities, preventing education, terminating electrical power and more. They won't be able to exist, and they will run away from here. But it all depends on the war, and whether we will win the battles with them."  Netanyahu has dismissed those who note similarities between his relentlessly hawkish views and those of his late father as "psychobabble". For example, David Remnick has written: "To understand Bibi, you have to understand the father."   Netanyahu's paternal grandfather was Rabbi Natan Mileikowsky, a leading Religious Zionist rabbi and JNF fundraiser.  Netanyahu's older brother, Yonatan, was killed in Uganda during Operation Entebbe in 1976. His younger brother, Iddo, is a radiologist and writer. All three brothers served in the Sayeret Matkal reconnaissance unit of the Israel Defense Forces.Netanyahu's first marriage was to Miriam Weizmann, whom he met in Boston. The couple had one daughter, Noa (born 29 April 1978). The marriage ended in 1978. In 1981, he married Fleur Cates, a British citizen whom he met while they were both living in Boston, but the couple divorced in 1984. In 1991 Netanyahu married his third wife, Sara Ben-Artzi, a psychology major working as a flight attendant, whom he met while traveling on an El Al flight from New York to Israel. He and Sara have two sons, Yair (born 26 July 1991) and Avner (born 10 October 1994).  Yair is a Corporal in the IDF Spokesperson's Unit.  Avner is a national Bible champion and winner of the prestigious National Bible Quiz for Youth in Kiryat Shmona.  Sara has been the defendant of numerous lawsuits filed by former housekeepers, alleging abuse and underpayment. In the first half of 2008, doctors removed a small colon polyp that proved to be benign. Netanyahu became a grandfather on 1 October 2009, when his daughter Noa Netanyahu-Roth (married to Daniel Roth) gave birth to a boy, Shmuel.   In 2011, Noa and her husband Daniel had a second son named David. 
Books and articlesBooks: 
Through the years Netanyahu authored five books, three of which focus on counter-terrorism. The books he authored include:

International Terrorism: Challenge and Response (The Jonathon Institute, 1980) (ISBN 0-87855-894-2)
Terrorism: How the West Can Win (Farrar Straus & Giroux, 1986) (ISBN 0-380-70321-1)
A Place Among the Nations (Bantam, 1993) (ISBN 0-553-08974-9)
Fighting Terrorism: How Democracies Can Defeat Domestic and International Terrorism (Diane Pub Co, 1995) (ISBN 0-374-52497-1)
A Durable Peace: Israel and Its Place Among the Nations (Warner Books, 2000) (ISBN 0-446-52306-2)

Articles:

"On Terrorism"


References 
External links 

Official
Prime Minister – Curriculum Vitae; Prime Minister office  
The 32nd Government, official Knesset website;Profiles
Official YouTube Channel of Israeli Prime Minister
 
Benjamin Netanyahu Profile on Israeli Lexicon (Ynetnews)
Cheltenham High School Hall of Fame Biography 
Sara Netanyahu, Sara Netanyahu biography and photos
Statements
 
Netanyahu: Pullout will worsen Israel's security The Jerusalem Post, 5 August 2005
Benjamin Netanyahu on the definition of terror (BBC)(5 min.)
2009 Speech to the United Nations General Assembly
Transcript: June 2009 peace address, "Bar-Ilan Speech"
 
 
 
Coverage
 
 
 
 
Netanyahu’s Fortification Plan
Demilitarized Palestinian State Meaning, context & implications, Reut Institution (a Think Tank)

 
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
    
DEFAULTSORT



















  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Raymond Smullyan
 
 Raymond Merrill Smullyan (born May 25, 1919)  is an American mathematician, concert pianist, logician, Taoist philosopher, and magician.Born in Far Rockaway, New York, his first career (like Persi Diaconis a generation later) was stage magic. He then earned a BSc from the University of Chicago in 1955 and his Ph.D. from Princeton University in 1959. He is one of many logicians to have studied under Alonzo Church.   
LifeBorn in Far Rockaway, New York, he showed musical talent, winning a gold medal in a piano competition when he was aged 12.  The following year, his family moved to Manhattan and he attended Theodore Roosevelt High School in The Bronx as this school offered courses suited to his musical talents, but he left to study on his own as the school did not offer similar courses in mathematics. He attended several colleges, studying mathematics and music. While a Ph.D. student, Smullyan published a paper in the 1957 Journal of Symbolic Logic showing that Gödelian incompleteness held for formal systems considerably more elementary than that of Gödel's 1931 landmark paper. The contemporary understanding of Gödel's theorem dates from this paper. Smullyan later made a compelling case that much of the fascination with Gödel's theorem should be directed at Tarski's theorem, which is much easier to prove and equally disturbing philosophically. The culmination of Smullyan's lifelong reflection on the classic limitative theorems of mathematical logic is quite readable:

Smullyan, R M (2001) "Gödel's Incompleteness Theorems" in Goble, Lou, ed., The Blackwell Guide to Philosophical Logic. Blackwell (ISBN 0-631-20693-0).

Smullyan is the author of many books on recreational mathematics, recreational logic, etc. Most notably, one is titled What Is the Name of This Book?.He was a professor of philosophy at City College in New York.He is also an amateur astronomer, using a six inch reflecting telescope for which he ground the mirror. 
Logic problemsMany of his logic problems are extensions of classic puzzles. Knights and Knaves involves knights (who always tell the truth) and knaves (who always lie). This is based on a story of two doors and two guards, one who lies and one who doesn't. One door leads to heaven and one to hell, and the puzzle is to find out which door leads to heaven by asking one of the guards a question. One way to do this is to ask "Which door would the other guard say leads to hell?". This idea was famously used in the 1986 film Labyrinth.In more complex puzzles, he introduces characters who may lie or tell the truth (referred to as "normals"), and furthermore instead of answering "yes" or "no", use words which mean "yes" or "no", but the reader does not know which word means which. The puzzle known as "the hardest logic puzzle ever" is based on these characters and themes. In his Transylvania puzzles, half of the inhabitants are insane, and believe only false things, whereas the other half are sane and believe only true things. In addition, humans always tell the truth, and vampires always lie. For example, an insane vampire will believe a false thing (2 + 2 is not 4) but will then lie about it, and say that it is. A sane vampire knows 2 + 2 is 4, but will lie and say it isn't. And mutatis mutandis for humans. Thus everything said by a sane human or an insane vampire is true, while everything said by an insane human or a sane vampire is false.His book Forever Undecided popularizes Gödel's incompleteness theorems by phrasing them in terms of reasoners and their beliefs, rather than formal systems and what can be proved in them. For example, if a native of a knight/knave island says to a sufficiently self-aware reasoner, "You will never believe that I am a knight", the reasoner cannot believe either that the native is a knight or that he is a knave without becoming inconsistent (i.e., holding two contradictory beliefs). The equivalent theorem is that for any formal system S, there exists a mathematical statement that can be interpreted as "This statement is not provable in formal system S". If the system S is consistent, neither the statement nor its opposite will be provable in it. See also Doxastic logic.Inspector Craig is a frequent character in Smullyan's "puzzle-novellas."  He is generally called into a scene of a crime that has a solution that is mathematical in nature.  Then, through a series of increasingly harder challenges, he (and the reader) begin to understand the principles in question. Finally the novella culminates in Inspector Craig (and the reader) solving the crime, utilizing the mathematical and logical principles learned. Inspector Craig generally does not learn the formal theory in question, and Smullyan usually reserves a few chapters after the Inspector Craig adventure to illuminate the analogy for the reader. Inspector Craig gets his name from William Craig.His book To Mock a Mockingbird (1985) is a recreational introduction to the subject of combinatory logic.Apart from writing about and teaching logic, Smullyan has recently released a recording of his favorite classical piano pieces by composers such as Bach, Scarlatti, and Schubert. Some recordings are available on the Piano Society website, along with the video "Rambles, Reflections, Music and Readings". He has also written an autobiography titled Some Interesting Memories: A Paradoxical Life (ISBN 1-888710-10-1).In 2001, documentary filmmaker Tao Ruspoli made a film about Smullyan called This Film Needs No Title: A Portrait of Raymond Smullyan.
Philosophy 
Smullyan has written several books about Taoist philosophy, which he believes neatly solves most or all traditional philosophical problems as well as integrating mathematics, logic, and philosophy into a cohesive whole.
See also


To Mock a Mockingbird
Logic
Paradox
The Lady, or the Tiger
Alice's Adventures in Wonderland


References 
Selected publications 
Logic puzzles

(1978) What Is the Name of This Book? The Riddle of Dracula and Other Logical Puzzles - knights, knaves, and other logic puzzles
(1979) The Chess Mysteries of Sherlock Holmes - introducing retrograde analysis in the game of chess.
(1981) The Chess Mysteries of the Arabian Knights - second book on retrograde analysis chess problems.
(1982) The Lady or the Tiger? - ladies, tigers, and more logic puzzles
(1982) Alice in Puzzle-Land
(1985) To Mock a Mockingbird - puzzles based on combinatory logic
(1987) Forever Undecided - puzzles based on undecidability in formal systems
(1992) Satan, Cantor and Infinity 
(1997) The Riddle of Scheherazade
(2007) The Magic Garden of George B. And Other Logic Puzzles, Polimetrica (Monza/Italy)
(2009) Logical Labyrinths, A K Peters


Philosophy/Memoir

(1977) The Tao is Silent
(1980) This Book Needs No Title
(1983) 5000 B.C. and other philosophical fantasies
(2002) Some Interesting Memories: A Paradoxical Life
(2003) Who Knows?: A Study of Religious Consciousness
(2009) Rambles Through My Library, Praxis International


Academic

(1961) Theory of Formal Systems
(1968) First-Order Logic
(1992) Gödel's Incompleteness Theorems
(1993) Recursion Theory for Metamathematics
(1994) Diagonalization and Self-Reference
(1996) Set Theory and the Continuum Problem


Bibliography

Is God a Taoist? by Raymond Smullyan, 1977.
Planet Without Laughter by Raymond Smullyan, 1980.
An Epistemological Nightmare by Raymond Smullyan, 1982.


External links 

Raymond Smullyan's website at Indiana University.
Raymond Smullyan at the MacTutor History of Mathematics archive.
Raymond Smullyan at the Mathematics Genealogy Project.
Raymond Smullyan at Piano Society

  
 
DEFAULTSORT
















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Frances Burney

For playwright Frances Burney(1776–1828), niece of novelist Fanny Burney Madame d'Arblay 1752-1840, see Frances Burney (1776–1828)
 
Frances Burney (13 June 1752 – 6 January 1840), also known as Fanny Burney and, after her marriage, as Madame d’Arblay, was an English novelist, diarist and playwright. She was born in Lynn Regis, now King’s Lynn, England, on 13 June 1752, to musical historian Dr Charles Burney (1726–1814) and Mrs Esther Sleepe Burney (1725–62). The third of six children, she was self-educated and began writing what she called her “scribblings” at the age of ten. In 1793, aged forty-two, she married a French exile, General Alexandre D'Arblay. Their only son, Alexander, was born in 1794. After a lengthy writing career, and travels that took her to France for more than ten years, she settled in Bath, England, where she died on 6 January 1840.
Overview of her careerFrances Burney was a novelist, diarist and playwright. In total, she wrote four novels, eight plays, one biography and twenty volumes of journals and letters. In addition to the critical respect she receives for her own writing, she is recognised as a literary precursor to prominent authors who came after her, including Jane Austen and William Makepeace Thackeray. She published her first novel, Evelina, anonymously in 1778. When the book's authorship was revealed, it brought her almost immediate fame due to its unique narrative and comic strengths. She followed with Cecilia in 1782, Camilla in 1796 and The Wanderer in 1814. All of Burney’s novels explore the lives of English aristocrats, and satirise their social pretensions and personal foibles, with an eye to larger questions such as the politics of female identity. With one exception, Burney never succeeded in having her plays performed, largely due to objections from her father, who thought that publicity from such an effort would be damaging to her reputation. The exception was Edwy and Elgiva, which unfortunately was not well received by the public and closed after the first night’s performance.Although her novels were hugely popular during her lifetime, following her death Burney’s reputation as a writer suffered at the hands of biographers and critics who felt that the extensive diaries, published posthumously in 1841, offered a more interesting and accurate portrait of eighteenth-century life. Today, however, critics are returning to her novels and plays with a renewed interest in her perspective on the social lives and struggles of women in a predominantly male-oriented culture. Scholars continue to value Burney’s diaries as well, for their candid depictions of eighteenth-century English society. Commire, Klezmer 231. Throughout her career as a writer, her wit and talent for satirical caricatures were widely acknowledged: literary figures such as Dr Samuel Johnson, Edmund Burke, Hester Thrale and David Garrick were among her admirers. Her early novels were read and enjoyed by Jane Austen, whose own title Pride and Prejudice derives from the final pages of Cecilia. William Makepeace Thackeray is reported to have drawn on the first-person account of the Battle of Waterloo, recorded in her diaries, while writing Vanity Fair. Frances Burney’s early career was deeply affected by her relationship with her father, and by the critical attentions of their family friend Samuel Crisp. Both men encouraged her writing, but also employed their influence in a critical fashion, dissuading her from publishing or performing her dramatic comedies because they felt that working in the genre was inappropriate for a lady. Many feminist critics thus see her as an author whose natural talent for satire was stifled by the social pressures exerted on female authors of the age. Commire, Anne and Deborah Klezmer. Women in World History: a biographical encyclopedia. (Waterford: Yorkin Publications, 1999-2002) 231.  In spite of setbacks, however, Burney persisted in writing. When her comedies received criticism, she returned to novel writing, and later tried her hand at tragedies. She supported both herself and her family with the proceeds of her later novels, Camilla and The Wanderer. While some early historians derided the “feminine sensibility” of her writing, her fiction is now widely acknowledged for its critical wit and for its deliberate exploration of the lives of women.
Family lifeFrances was the third child in a family of six. Her elder siblings were Esther (Hetty) (1749–1832) and James (1750–1821), the younger Susanna Elizabeth (1755–1800), Charles (1757–1817) and Charlotte Ann (1761–1838). Of her brothers, James became an admiral and sailed with Captain James Cook on his second and third voyages. The younger Charles Burney was a well-known classical scholar. Her younger half-sister, Sarah Burney (1772–1844), also became a novelist, publishing seven works of fiction of her own. Commire, Klezmer 228.  Esther Sleepe Burney also bore two other boys, both named Charles, who died in infancy in 1752 and 1754.Burney scholar Margaret Anne Doody  has investigated conflicts within the Burney family that affected Frances’ writing and her personal life. Doody alleged that one strain was an incestuous relationship between James Burney and his half-sister Sarah in 1798-1803, but there is no direct evidence for this and it is hard to square with Frances's affection and financial assistance to Sarah in later life. Frances Burney’s mother, described by historians as a woman of “warmth and intelligence,” was the daughter of a French refugee named Dubois and had been brought up a Catholic. This French heritage influenced Frances Burney’s self-perception in later life, possibly contributing to her attraction and subsequent marriage to Alexandre D’Arblay. Esther Burney died when Frances was ten years old, in 1762, a loss which Frances felt throughout her life. Her father, Charles Burney, was respected not only for his personal charm, but also for his talents as a musician, musicologist and composer, and as a man of letters.  In 1760 he moved his family to London, a decision that improved their access to the cultured elements of English society, and as a consequence their own social standing as well.  They lived in the midst of a brilliant social circle that gathered around Charles at their home on Poland Street in Soho.In 1766 Charles Burney eloped in order to marry for a second time, to Elizabeth Allen, the wealthy widow of a King’s Lynn wine merchant. Allen had three children of her own, and several years after the marriage the two families merged into one. This new domestic situation was unfortunately fraught with tension. The Burney children found their new stepmother overbearing and quick to anger, and they took refuge from the situation by making fun of the woman behind her back. However, their collective unhappiness served in some respects to bring them closer to one another. In 1774 the family moved again to what had been the house of Isaac Newton in St Martin’s Street, Westminster, London.
EducationFrances’ sisters Esther and Susanna were favoured over Frances by their father, for what he perceived as their superior attractiveness and intelligence. At the age of eight, Frances had not yet learned the alphabet, and some scholars suggest that Burney suffered from a form of dyslexia. Julia Epstein,The Iron Pen: Frances Burney and the Politics of Women’s Writing.(Wisconsin: University of Wisconsin Press, 1989) 23.  By the age of ten, however, she had begun to write for her own amusement. Esther and Susanna were sent by their father to be educated in Paris, while at home Frances educated herself by reading from the family collection, including Plutarch’s Lives, works by Shakespeare, histories, sermons, poetry, plays, novels and courtesy books.  She drew on this material, along with her journals, when writing her first novels. Scholars who have looked into the extent of Burney’s reading and self-education find a child who was unusually precocious and ambitious, working hard to overcome a childhood disability. Encyclopædia Britannica 450. A critical aspect of Frances’ literary education was her relationship with the Burneys’ family friend, the “cultivated littérateur” Samuel Crisp.  He encouraged Burney’s writing by soliciting frequent journal-letters from her that recounted to him the goings-on in her family and social circle in London. Frances paid her first formal visit to Crisp at Chessington Hall in Surrey in 1766. Dr Burney had first made Crisp's acquaintance in about 1745 at the house of Charles Cavendish Fulke Greville. Crisp's play Virginia, staged by David Garrick in 1754 at the request of the Countess of Coventry (née Maria Gunning), had been unsuccessful, and Crisp had retired to Chessington Hall, where he frequently entertained Dr Burney and his family.
Journal-diaries and The History of Caroline EvelynThe first entry in her journal was made on 27 March 1768, addressed to "Miss Nobody," and it extended over seventy-two years. A talented storyteller with a strong sense of character, Burney often wrote these “journal-diaries” as a form of correspondence with family and friends, recounting to them events from her life and her observations upon them. Her diary contains the record of her extensive reading out of her father’s library, as well the visits and behaviour of the various important artists who paid visits to their home. Frances and her sister Susanna were particularly close, and it was to this sister that Frances would correspond throughout her adult life, in the form of these journal-letters.Burney was fifteen by the time her father remarried, in 1767. Entries in her diaries suggest that she was beginning to feel pressured to give up her writing, which was “unladylike” and “might vex Mrs. Allen”.  Feeling that she had transgressed what was proper, she set fire that same year to her first manuscript, The History of Caroline Evelyn, which she had written in secrecy. Despite this repudiation of writing, however, Frances did maintain her diaries and she wrote an account of the emotions that led to her dramatic act. She eventually recouped some of the effort that went into the first manuscript by using it as a foundation for her first novel, Evelina, which follows the life of the fictional Caroline Evelyn’s daughter.In keeping with this sense of impropriety that Burney felt towards her own writing, she savagely edited earlier parts of her diaries in later life. Burney destroyed much of her own diary material in revising the manuscripts. Editors Lars Troide and Joyce Hemlow recovered some of this obscured material while researching their late twentieth-century editions of the journals and letters.
EvelinaFrances Burney’s first novel, Evelina or the History of a Young Lady’s Entrance into the World, was published anonymously in 1778, without her father’s knowledge or permission. Evelina was published by Thomas Lowndes, who voiced his interest after reading its first volume, agreeing to publish it upon receipt of the finished work. The novel was rejected by a previous publisher, Robert Dodsley, who refused to print an anonymous work. Encyclopædia Britannica 451.  Burney, who worked as her father's amanuensis, had copied the manuscript in a "disguised hand" to prevent any identification of the book with the Burneys, thinking that her own handwriting might be recognised by a publisher. It was unthinkable at the time that a young woman would deliberately put herself into the public eye by writing, and Burney’s second attempt to publish the work involved the collusion of her eldest brother, who posed as its author to Lowndes. Inexperienced at negotiating with a publisher, Burney only received twenty guineas as payment for the manuscript.The novel was a critical success, receiving praise from respected individuals, including the statesman Edmund Burke and literary critic Dr Johnson.  It was admired for its comic view of wealthy English society, and for its realistic portrayal of working-class London dialects. Burney’s father read public reviews of the novel before learning that the author was his own daughter. Although the act of publication was radical for a woman at that time and of her age, he was impressed by the favourable reactions to the book and largely supported her. Certainly, he saw social advantages to having a successful published writer in the family, and was pleased that Frances had achieved recognition through her work. Commire, Klezmer 229. 
Critical receptionWritten in epistolary form, Evelina portrays the English upper middle class from the perspective of a seventeen-year-old woman who has reached marriageable age. A comic and witty novel, the work is ultimately a satire of the kind of oppressive masculine values that shaped a young woman’s life in the eighteenth century, as well as of other forms of social hypocrisy.  Encyclopædia Britannica describes Evelina as a "landmark in the development of the novel of manners”. In choosing to narrate the novel through a series of letters written by the protagonist, Burney made use of her own previous writing experience to recount the protagonist’s views and experiences to the reader. This tactic has won praise from critics, past and present, for the direct access to events and characters that it allows to the reader, and for the narrative sophistication that it demonstrates in reversing the roles of narrator and heroine.  The authors of Women in World History argue that she draws attention to difficulties faced by women in the eighteenth century, especially those surrounding questions of romance and marriage.  She is described as a “shrewd observer of her times and a clever recorder of its charms and its follies”. What critics have consistently found unique and interesting about her writing is the introduction and careful treatment of a female protagonist, complete with character flaws, “who must make her way in a hostile world”. These are recognisable as features of Jane Austen’s writing, and show Burney’s influence on the later author’s work. A testament to its popularity, the novel went through four editions before the end of its print run. In 1971 it was still considered a classic by the writers of Encyclopædia Britannica, which stated that “addressed to the young, the novel has a quality perennially young”. 
Hester Thrale and StreathamThe novel brought Frances Burney to the attention of patron of the arts Hester Thrale, who invited the young author to visit her home in Streatham. The house was a centre for literary and political conversation, and though shy by nature, Frances impressed those she met, including Dr Johnson, who would remain her friend and correspondent throughout the period of her visits, from 1779 to 1783. Mrs Thrale wrote to Dr Burney on 22 July, stating that: "Mr. Johnson returned home full of the Prayes of the Book I had lent him, and protesting that there were passages in it which might do honour to Richardson: we talk of it for ever, and he feels ardent after the dénouement; he could not get rid of the Rogue, he said." Dr Johnson's best compliments were eagerly transcribed in Frances’ diary. Sojourns at Streatham occupied months at a time, and on several occasions the guests, including Frances Burney, made trips to Brighton and to Bath. As with other notable events, these experiences were recorded in letters to her family. 
The WitlingsIn 1779, encouraged by the public’s warm reception of comic material in Evelina, and with offers of help from Arthur Murphy and Richard Brinsley Sheridan, Burney began to write a dramatic comedy called The Witlings.The play satirised a wide segment of London Society, including the literary world and its pretensions. It was not published at the time because Burney's father Dr. Charles Burney and a good friend, Samuel Crisp, thought the work would offend the public and seem to mock the Bluestockings. The play tells the story of Celia and Beaufort, lovers kept apart by their families due to “economic insufficiency”.  Frances was convinced by her father and by Samuel Crisp not to have it performed, because they had reservations about the propriety of a woman writing comedy. Her plays came to light in 1945 when her papers were acquired by the Berg Collection of the New York Public Library.  A complete edition of the plays was published in Montreal in 1995, edited by Peter Sabor, Geoffrey Sill, and Stewart Cooke. 
CeciliaIn 1782 she published Cecilia, or Memoirs of an Heiress, written partly at Chessington Hall and after much discussion with Mr Crisp. The publishers, Messrs Payne & Cadell, paid Frances £250 for her novel, printed 2000 copies of the first edition, and reprinted it at least twice within a year. The plot of Cecilia revolves around the heroine, Cecilia Beverley, whose inheritance from her uncle comes with the stipulation that she find a husband who will accept her name. Beset on all sides by would-be suitors, the beautiful and intelligent Cecilia's heart is captivated by a man whose family's pride in its birth and ancestry would forbid the only son-and-heir's change of name.  This young man finally persuades Cecilia, against all her good judgement, to agree to marry him secretly, so that their union - and, thus, the change of name - can be presented to the family as a fait accompli. The work received praise for the mature tone of its ironic third-person narration, but was viewed as less spontaneous than her first work, and as weighed down by the author’s self-conscious awareness of her own audience.  Some critics claim to have found the narration intrusive, while some of her friends found the writing too closely modelled on Johnson's.  Edmund Burke greatly admired the novel, but moderated his praise with a criticism of the enormous array of characters and convoluted intertwined plots. The title of Jane Austen's Pride and Prejudice appears in a sentence in Cecilia.
The Royal CourtIn 1775 Frances Burney turned down a marriage proposal from one Thomas Barlow, probably on the grounds of his inadequate wealth. Commire, Klezmer 230.  Her side of the Barlow courtship is amusingly told in her journal.  During the period 1782-85 she enjoyed the rewards of her successes as a novelist; she was received at fashionable literary gatherings throughout London. In 1781 Samuel Crisp died. In 1784 Dr Johnson died, and that year also saw the failure of her romance with a young clergyman, George Owen Cambridge. She was 33 years old.In 1785, thanks to her association with Mary Granville Delany, a woman known in both literary and royal circles, Frances travelled to the court of King George III and Queen Charlotte, where the Queen offered her the post of “Second Keeper of the Robes”, with a salary of £200 per annum. Frances hesitated in taking the office, not wishing to be separated from her family, and especially resistant to any employment that would restrict the free use of her time in writing.  However, unmarried at 34, she felt pressured to accept, and she thought that perhaps improved social status and an income would allow her greater freedom to write.  She accepted the post in 1786. She developed a warm relationship with the queen and princesses that lasted into her later years, yet her anxieties proved to be accurate: this position exhausted her and left her little time to write. She was unhappy and her feelings were intensified by a poor relationship with her superior Mrs Schwellenburg, the Keeper of the Robes. She felt dominated by her superior, who has been described as "a peevish old person of uncertain temper and impaired health, swaddled in the buckram of backstairs etiquette”.During her years in court, Burney continued to produce her journals. To her friends and to Susanna, she recounted her life in court as well as significant political events, including the public trial of Warren Hastings for “official misconduct in India”. She also recorded the speeches of Edmund Burke at the trial.  She was courted by an official of the royal household, Colonel Stephen Digby, but he eventually married another woman of greater wealth.  The disappointment, combined with the other frustrations of her office, contributed to her failing health at this time. In 1790 she prevailed on her father (whose own career had taken a new turn when he was appointed organist at Chelsea Hospital in 1783) to request that she be released from the post, which she was. She returned to her father’s house in Chelsea, but continued to receive a yearly pension of £100. She maintained a friendship with the royal family and received letters from the princesses from 1818 until 1840. 
MarriageIn 1790-91 Burney wrote four blank-verse tragedies: Hubert de Vere, The Siege of Pevensey, Elberta and Edwy and Elgiva. Only the last was performed. Although it was one of a profusion of paintings and literary works about the early English king Eadwig to appear in the later 18th century, it met with public failure, opening in London in March for one night. The French Revolution began in 1789 and Burney was among the many literate English figures who sympathised with its early ideals of equality and social justice.  During this period Frances became acquainted with a group of French exiles known as “Constitutionalists,” who had fled to England in August 1791 and were living at Juniper Hall, near Mickleham, where Frances' sister Susanna lived. She quickly became close to Gen. Alexandre D'Arblay, an artillery officer who had been adjutant-general to Lafayette, a hero of the French Revolution whose political views lay between those of Royalist and of Republicans. D’Arblay taught her French and introduced her to the writer Germaine de Staël.Burney's father disapproved of the alliance because of Alexandre’s poverty, his Catholicism, and his ambiguous social status as an émigré, but in spite of this they were married on 28 July 1793. The same year she produced her pamphlet Brief Reflections relative to the Emigrant French Clergy. This short work was similar to other pamphlets produced by French sympathisers in England, calling for financial support for the revolutionary cause. It is noteworthy for the way that Burney employed her rhetorical skills in the name of tolerance and human compassion. On 18 December 1794, Frances gave birth to their son Alexander (†19. January 1837). Her sister Charlotte's remarriage in 1798 to the pamphleteer Ralph Broome caused her and her father consternation, as did the move by her sister Susanna and penurious brother-in-law Molesworth Phillips and their family to Ireland in 1796.
CamillaThe struggling young family was saved from poverty in 1796 by the publication of Frances’ “courtesy novel” Camilla, or a Picture of Youth, a story of frustrated love and impoverishment.  The first edition sold out; she made £1000 on the novel and sold the copyright for another £1000. This money was sufficient to allow them to build a house in Westhumble, which they called “Camilla Cottage”. Their life at this time was, by all accounts, a happy one, but the illness and death in 1800 of Frances’ sister, and close friend, Susanna overshadowed their contentment and brought to an end to a lifelong correspondence that had been the motive and basis for most of Burney’s journal writing. However, she resumed her journal writing at the request of her husband, for the benefit of her son. 
ComediesIn the period from 1797 to 1801 she wrote three comedies that were not to be published in her lifetime: Love and Fashion, A Busy Day and The Woman Hater. The latter is partially a reworking of themes from The Witlings, but with the satiric elements softened, with more emphasis on reforming her characters’ negative traits. The play, first performed in December 2007 at the Orange Tree Theatre in Richmond, London, retains one of the central characters, Lady Smatter – an absent-minded but inveterate quoter of poetry, perhaps perceived as a comic rendering of a bluestocking type of literary woman. All the other characters differ.
Life in France: revolution and mastectomyIn 1801 D'Arblay was offered service with the government of Napoleon Bonaparte in France, and in 1802 Burney and her son followed him to Paris, where they expected to remain for a year. The outbreak of the war between France and England overtook their visit, and they remained for ten years altogether. Although the conditions of their time in France left her isolated from her family, Burney was supportive of her husband’s decision to move to Passy, outside Paris.In August 1810 Burney developed pains in her breast, which her husband suspected could be due to breast cancer. Through her royal network of acquaintances she was eventually treated by several leading physicians and finally, a year later, on 30 September 1811, she underwent a mastectomy performed by "7 men in black, Dr. Larrey, M. Dubois, Dr. Moreau, Dr. Aumont, Dr. Ribe, & a pupil of Dr. Larrey, & another of M. Dubois". The operation was performed in the manner of a battlefield operation under the command of M. Dubois, then accoucheur to the Empress Marie Louise, Duchess of Parma, and considered to be the best doctor in France. Burney was later able to describe the operation in detail, since she was conscious through most of it, as it took place before the development of anaesthetics. 
 I mounted, therefore, unbidden, the Bed stead – & M. Dubois placed me upon the Mattress, & spread  a cambric handkerchief upon my face.  It was transparent, however, & I saw, through it, that the Bed stead was instantly surrounded by the 7 men & my nurse.  I refused to be held; but when, Bright  through the cambric, I saw the glitter of polished Steel –  I closed my Eyes.  I would not trust to convulsive fear the sight of the terrible incision. Yet -- when the dreadful steel was plunged into the breast – cutting through veins – arteries – flesh – nerves – I needed no injunctions not to restrain my cries.  I began a scream that lasted unintermittingly during the whole time of the incision – & I almost marvel that it rings not in my Ears still?  so excruciating was the agony. When the wound was made, & the instrument was withdrawn, the pain seemed undiminished, for the air that suddenly rushed into those delicate parts felt like a mass of minute but sharp & forked poniards, that were tearing the edges of the wound. I concluded the operation was over – Oh no! presently the terrible cutting was renewed – & worse than ever, to separate the bottom, the foundation of this dreadful gland from the parts to which it adhered – Again all description would be baffled – yet again all was not over, – Dr. Larry rested but his own hand, & -- Oh heaven! – I then felt the knife (rack)ling against the breast bone – scraping it!  She sent her first-person account of this experience months later to her sister Esther without rereading it, and it remains one of the most compelling early accounts of a mastectomy.  It is impossible to know today whether the breast removed was indeed cancerous or whether she suffered from mastopathy. She survived and returned to England in 1812 to visit her ailing father and to avoid young Alexander’s conscription into the French army, while still in recovery from her own illness.Charles Burney died in 1814. In 1815 Napoleon escaped from Elba. D’Arblay was then serving with the King’s Guard, and he became involved in the military actions that followed. After her father’s death, Burney joined her wounded husband at Trèves (Trier), and together they returned to Bath in England. Burney wrote an account of this experience and of her Paris years in her Waterloo Journal, written between 1818 and 1832. D’Arblay was rewarded with promotion to lieutenant-general but died shortly afterwards of cancer, in 1818.
The Wanderer and Memoirs of Dr. BurneyBurney published her fourth novel, The Wanderer: Or, Female Difficulties, a few days prior to Charles Burney’s death. Described as “a story of love and misalliance set in the French Revolution”, it criticizes the English treatment of foreigners during the war years.  It also pillories the hypocritical social curbs put on women in general—as the heroine tries one means after another to earn an honest penny—as well as the elaborate class criteria for social inclusion or exclusion. That strong social message sits uneasily within a strange structure that might be called a melodramatic proto-mystery novel with elements of the picaresque. The heroine is no scalliwag, in fact a bit too innocent for modern taste, but she is wilful and for obscure reasons will not reveal her name or origin. So as she darts about the South of England as a fugitive, she arouses suspicions that it is not always easy to agree with the author are unfair or unjustified. There are a dismaying number of coincidental meetings of characters. Burney made £1500 from the first run, but the work disappointed her followers and it did not go into a second English printing, although it met her immediate financial needs. Critics felt it lacked the insight of her earlier novels.  It remains interesting today for the social opinions that it conveys and for some flashes of Burney's humour and discernment of character. It was reprinted with an introduction by the novelist Margaret Drabble in the "Mothers of the Novel" series. After her husband’s death, Burney moved to London to be nearer to her son, who was a fellow at Christ's College.  In homage to her father she gathered and in 1832 published, in three volumes, the Memoirs of Doctor Burney. The memoirs were written in a laudatory style, praising her father's accomplishments and character, and she cannibalised many of her own personal writings from years before in order to produce them. Always protective of her father and the family’s reputation, she deliberately destroyed evidence of facts that were painful or unflattering, and was soundly criticised by her contemporaries and later by historians for doing so.  Otherwise, she lived essentially in retirement, outliving her son, who died in 1837, and her sister Charlotte Broome, who died in 1838. Burney was visited in Bath by younger members of the Burney family, who found her a fascinating storyteller with a talent for imitating the personalities that she described.  She continued to write to her family often.Frances Burney died on 6 January 1840. She was buried with her son and her husband in Walcot cemetery in Bath, and a gravestone was later erected in the churchyard of St Swithin's across the road. A Royal Society of Arts blue plaque commemorates Burney at 11 Bolton Street in Mayfair.   
List of works
Fiction

The History of Caroline Evelyn, (ms. destroyed by author, 1767.)
Evelina: Or The History of A Young Lady's Entrance into the World, London: Thomas Lowndes, 1778.
Cecilia: Or, Memoirs of an Heiress, 1782.
Camilla: Or, A Picture of Youth, 1796.
The Wanderer: Or, Female Difficulties, London: Longmans, 1814.


Non-fiction

Brief Reflections Relative to the French Emigrant Clergy, 1793.
Memoirs of Doctor Burney, London: Moxon, 1832.


Journals and letters

The Early Diary of Frances Burney 1768-1778, (2 vols.) ed. Annie Raine Ellis. London: 1889.
The Diary and Letters of Madame D'Arblay, ed. Austin Dobson. Macmillan, 1904.
The Diary of Fanny Burney, ed. Lewis Gibbs. Everyman; Dent, 1971.
Dr. Johnson & Fanny Burney, (HTML at Virginia) by Fanny Burney. Ed. Chauncy Brewster Tinker. London: Jonathan Cape, 1912.
The Early Journals and Letters of Fanny Burney, 1768-1786, (4 vols.) Vols. 1-2, ed. Lars Troide; Vol. 3, ed. Lars Troide and Stewart Cooke; Vol. 4, ed. Betty Rizzo.[1]
The Journals and Letters of Fanny Burney (Madame D'Arblay) 1791-1840, (12 vols.) Vols. I-VI, ed. Joyce Hemlow, with Patricia Boutilier and Althea Douglas; Vol. VII, eds. Edward A. and Lillian D. Bloom; Vol. VIII, ed. Peter Hughes; Vols. IX-X, ed. Warren Derry; Vols. XI-XII, ed. Joyce Hemlow with Althea Douglas and Patricia Hawkins. Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1972-1984.[2]


Plays

The Witlings, 1779, (satiric comedy). [3]
Edwy and Elgiva, 1790, (verse tragedy). Produced at Drury Lane, 21 March 1795.
Hubert de Vere, 1788-91? (verse tragedy).
The Siege of Pevensey, 1788-91? (verse tragedy).
Elberta, (fragment) 1788-91? (verse tragedy).
Love and Fashion, 1799, (satiric comedy).
The Woman Hater, 1800–1801, (satiric comedy).
A Busy Day, 1800–1801, (satiric comedy).


References

Adelstein, Michael E. Fanny Burney. New York: Twayne Publishers Inc., 1968.
“Burney, Fanny, 1752-1840,” Literature Online biography. Bell & Howell Information and Learning Company (2000). University of New Brunswick, Fredericton N.B. Dec 3, 2006.
Commire, Anne and Deborah Klezmer. Women in World History: a biographical encyclopedia. Waterford, Ct: Yorkin Publications, 1999-2002.
The Complete Plays of Frances Burney (Vol 1 Comedies; Vol 2 Tragedies), ed Peter Sabor and Geoffrey Sill, McGill-Queen's University Press, Montreal, (1995). ISBN 0-7735-1333-7
Devlin, D.D. The Novels and Journals of Frances Burney. Hampshire: Macmillan Press Ltd., 1987.
D'Ezio, Marianna. Transcending National Identity: Paris and London in Frances Burney’s novels, Synergies Royaume-Uni et Irlande 3 (2010), pp. 59–74
Doody, Margaret Anne. Frances Burney: The Life in The Works. New Jersey: Rutgers University Press, 1988.
Epstein, Julia. The Iron Pen: Frances Burney and the Politics of Women’s Writing. Wisconsin: University of Wisconsin Press, 1989.
Simons, Judy. Diaries and Journals of Literary Women from Fanny Burney to Virginia Woolfe. Hampshire: Macmillan Press Ltd., 1990.
Stepankowsky, Paula. “Frances Burney d”Arblay” [4]
The Witlings and The Woman-Hater, plays by Fanny Burney; ed Peter Sabor and Geoffrey Sill, Broadview Press (2002) ISBN 1-55111-378-3
Encyclopædia Britannica. Vol 4. Chicago, London: Encyclopædia Britannica Inc, 1971.
The Bloomsbury Guide to Women’s Literature. Ed. Claire Buck. London, New York: Prentice Hall, 1992.


Footnotes 
External links 
 

Works by Fanny Burney at A Celebration of Women Writers
Camilla: Or, A Picture of Youth; (1796)
Evelina: Or The History of A Young Lady's Entrance into the World (1778)
Works by Fanny Burney at Project Gutenberg
Essays by Fanny Burney at Quotidiana.org
Fanny Burney's own account of the mastectomy she underwent in 1811
Burney Centre at McGill University
The Burney Society
Valerie Patten, author biography of Frances Burney (1752-1840)
Archival material relating to Frances Burney listed at the UK National Register of Archives
Frances d'Arblay ('Fanny Burney') at the National Portrait Gallery, London

 
 
DEFAULTSORT

]

















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Fish (singer)
 
 
Derek William Dick, better known as Fish, (born 25 April 1958, Dalkeith, Midlothian, Scotland) is a Scottish singer, lyricist and occasional actor, best known as the former lead singer of the neo-progressive rock band Marillion.
BiographyFish was educated at Dalkeith High School. He was inspired by the music of many of the rock artists of the late 1960s and early 1970s, including Genesis, Pink Floyd, The Moody Blues, Yes, Van der Graaf Generator, The Kinks, T. Rex, David Bowie, Argent and The Alex Harvey Band. As well as his love for music, he was also a voracious reader, and his literary inspirations included Jack Kerouac, Truman Capote, Robert Burns and Dylan Thomas.After working as a petrol pump attendant,  gardener and forestry worker, Fish came to the public's attention in 1981 with the British rock group Marillion. The band achieved chart success in the UK, attaining top-ten hits in 1985 with "Kayleigh" and "Lavender", and again in 1987 with "Incommunicado". In 1988, Fish left Marillion in order to pursue his solo career. Many of Fish's later works contain lengthy spoken word lyrics, shorter examples of which can be heard on earlier Marillion albums. Vocally, Fish has sometimes been compared to Peter Gabriel, lead singer of Genesis in the 1970s. Music journalist David Hepworth described his voice as a “conflation of Roger Daltrey and Peter Gabriel”.  Peter Hammill of Van der Graaf Generator was also a major influence on his songwriting and vocal delivery, which is especially notable on the first two Marillion albums.According to Fish himself, his nickname originates from the amount of time he spent in the bathtub.    Fish has one daughter, Tara.On 26 August 2007, Fish performed at the 'Hobble on The Cobbles' show at the Market Square  in Aylesbury, UK. He was accompanied on stage by his four former Marillion bandmates from the classic lineup (Mark Kelly, Steve Rothery, Ian Mosley and Pete Trewavas) for one song: 'Market Square Heroes'. This was the first time they had performed together in nearly two decades. In a press interview following the event, Fish denied this would lead to a full reunion, claiming that "Hogarth does a great job with the band... We forged different paths over the 19 years."   His most recent studio album, 13th Star, was released on 12 September 2007 as a specially-packaged pre-release version available to order from his website. A UK tour for this album commenced in March 2008, supported by Glyder. In February 2008, Fish was confirmed to be the Friday night headline act at NEARFest X. He also appeared with BBC Radio 2's Bob Harris on GMTV to promote Childline Rocks, a charity concert.In 2008, Fish presented a Friday evening radio show "Fish on Friday" for digital radio station Planet Rock. When the station was faced with closure, Malcolm Bluemel with the help of Fish, Tony Iommi, Ian Anderson and Gary Moore helped save Planet Rock by buying the station.     On 9 June 2008, Fish embarked on his first full North American tour in eleven years. At each stop, he hosted a pre-show meet-and-greet with his fans. Two days prior, he was interviewed by Vince Font of the progressive rock podcast Prog'opolis, which was aired a week later on The Dividing Line Broadcast Network (DLBN) as "My Lunch With Fish". In 2008, Fish revealed that he would be taking at least six months off from singing due to an "irregular cell growth" in his throat. This was later determined not to be cancerous. Fish is a supporter of Scottish Premier League side Hibernian F.C. In 2005, Fish won a Celebrity Music edition of The Weakest Link, beating Eggsy of Goldie Lookin Chain in the final round, sharing £18,750 with Eggsy's charity and his own.On October 20th and 21th, 2012, Fish hosted Fish Convention 2012 in Leamington Spa, United Kingdom.  He performed two acoustic sets and two electric sets including material from his upcoming release, Feast of Consequences.  He also performed fan favorite Marillion B-Side Grendel, twice.
Record labelsFollowing a legal dispute with EMI and an unsuccessful contract with Polydor, Fish established the Dick Bros Record Company in 1993. He released a number of "official bootleg" albums to finance the company before selling it to Roadrunner Records. Another financially unsuccessful period followed before he re-established his own Chocolate Frog Records record label in 2001. In 2005, Fish signed with Snapper Music but later returned to Chocolate Frog Records.
AwardsIn May 2008, Fish's Planet Rock show won the Silver award in the Music Broadcaster of the Year category at the UK Sony Radio Academy Awards 2008.    In June 2008, at the New York Festivals Radio Broadcasting Awards, he and Gary Moore jointly received the Gold World Medal in the Regularly Scheduled Music Program category for their respective shows on Planet Rock. 
ActingFish's first prominent role was as the thug "Ferguson" alongside John Sessions in Jute City, a four-part 1991 BBC drama based on a group of Masonic ruffians. In 1994, he appeared in Chasing the Deer, a film set during the 1745 Jacobite Rebellion, as "Angus Cameron".In 1998 he appeared in one episode of the ITV TV series The Bill, credited as David Lawson. It was episode 44 of series 14, named 'Manhunt' and was aired on 16 April. He also appeared in a 2000 episode of the TV detective series Rebus alongside John Hannah and, in 2003, appeared as the old gay man "Old Nick" in 9 Dead Gay Guys.In the 2005 movie, The Jacket, Fish appeared alongside Adrien Brody and Keira Knightley as a patient in a mental institution.He also played Derek Trout, a record producer in the 1999 series, The Young Person's Guide To Becoming A Rock Star.
Current live band

Derek William Dick (Fish) - lead vocals
Frank Usher - lead/rhythm guitars
Chris Johnson - rhythm/lead guitars, backing vocals
Gavin Dickie - bass guitars, backing vocals
Foss Patterson - keyboards, backing vocals
Gavin Griffiths - drums


Discography
Studio albums

1990: Vigil in a Wilderness of Mirrors
1991: Internal Exile
1993: Songs from the Mirror (covers album)
1994: Suits
1997: Sunsets on Empire
1999: Raingods with Zippos
2001: Fellini Days
2004: Field of Crows
2007: 13th Star
2012: Feast of Consequences (forthcoming album)


Live albumsSome of these live albums were first released as "official bootlegs" sold via mail-order and on tour. Several of these have later been released to retail.

1993: Pigpen's Birthday
1993: Derek Dick and his Amazing Electric Bear
1993: Uncle Fish and the Crypt Creepers
1993: For Whom the Bells Toll
1993: Toiling in the Reeperbahn
1994: Sushi
1994: Acoustic Sessions
1996: Fish Head Curry (limited edition live album, 5000 copies only)
1996: Krakow
1998: Tales from the Big Bus
1998: Fortunes of War
1999: The Haddington Tapes (From the 1998 Haddington Convention)
1999: The Complete BBC Sessions
2000: Issue 30 CD (From the 1999 Haddington Convention)
2000: Candlelight in Fog (limited edition live album, 3000 copies only)
2001: Sashimi
2002: Fellini Nights
2002: Mixed Company
2005: Scattering Crows Live In Europe 2004
2005: Scattering Crows Live At The Robin 2, Bilston Feb. 18th 2004
2006: Return to Childhood
2007: Communion


Compilation albums

1995: Yin and Yang
1998: Kettle of Fish (88-98)
2005: Bouillabaisse


Singles

1986: "Shortcut to Somewhere" (Fish & Tony Banks)
1989: "State of Mind"
1989: "Big Wedge"
1990: "A Gentleman's Excuse Me"
1990: "The Company" (Germany only)
1991: "Internal Exile"
1991: "Credo"
1992: "Something In The Air"
1992: "Never Mind The Bullocks" (feat. Hold Your Head Up)
1994: "Lady Let It Lie"
1994: "Fortunes of War"
1995: "Just Good Friends" (feat. Sam Brown)
1997: "Brother 52"
1997: "Change of Heart"
1999: "Incomplete" (feat. Liz Antwi)
2008: "Arc of the Curve"
2008: "Zoë 25"


Collaborations

1981-1988: Sang for Marillion.
1986: "Shortcut To Somewhere" on the album Soundtracks by Tony Banks, lead vocals by Fish, produced by Richard James Burgess
1991: "Angel Face" and "Another Murder Of A Day" on the album Still by Tony Banks, lead vocals by Fish.
1992:  Sang the part of "Crixus the Gaul" on the album Jeff Wayne's Musical Version of Spartacus.
1993: "Out Of My Life" (Acoustic), "The Seeker" and "Time And A Word" on the album Outpatients '93.
1994; "Lady Let It Lie", backing vocals by Knox Academy Junior Choir on the album, Suits.
1994: "Spirit Of The Forest" on the album Earthrise. 
1998:  Sang the part of the "Highlander" character on the album Into the Electric Castle by Ayreon.
1998:  Played a cameo role in the TV series The Young Person's Guide To Becoming A Rock Star as the character Derek Trout.
2000: Sang on the single "Scotland By Our Side" credited to Scotia Nostra.
2003: Sang on the track "Caledonia" on the Frankie Miller tribute album, A Tribute To Frankie Miller


References 
External links 

 
 
  provides information on Fish and his acting career.
Marillion's website

 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT










 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Arnold Bennett
 Enoch Arnold Bennett (27 May 1867 – 27 March 1931) was an English writer.  He is best known as a novelist, but he also worked in other fields such as journalism, propaganda and film.
Early lifeBennett was born in a modest house in Hanley in the Potteries district of Staffordshire.  Hanley is one of a conurbation of six towns which were joined together at the beginning of the 20th century as Stoke-on-Trent. Enoch Bennett, his father, qualified as a solicitor in 1876, and the family moved to a larger house between Hanley and Burslem.  Bennett was educated locally in Newcastle-under-Lyme.Bennett was employed by his father—his duties included rent collecting.  He was unhappy working for his father for little financial reward, and the theme of parental miserliness is important in his novels.  In his spare time he was able to do a little journalism, but his breakthrough as a writer came after he had moved from the Potteries.  At the age of 21, he left his father's practice and went to London as a solicitor's clerk.
Career

Journalism and nonfiction
Bennett won a literary competition in Tit-Bits magazine in 1889 and was encouraged to take up journalism full-time. In 1894, he became assistant editor of the periodical Woman. He noticed that the material offered by a syndicate to the magazine was not very good, so he wrote a serial which was bought by the syndicate for 75 pounds. He then wrote another. This became The Grand Babylon Hotel. Just over four years later, his first novel, A Man from the North, was published to critical acclaim and he became editor of the magazine.From 1900 he devoted himself full-time to writing, giving up the editorship. He continued to write journalism despite the success of his career as a novelist.
In 1926, at the suggestion of Lord Beaverbrook, he began writing an influential weekly article on books for the Evening Standard newspaper.As well as the novels, much of Bennett's non-fiction work has stood the test of time.  One of his most popular non-fiction works, which is still read to this day, is the self-help book How to Live on 24 Hours a Day.  His diaries have yet to be published in full, but extracts from them are often quoted in the British press. 
Move to FranceIn 1903, he moved to Paris, where other great artists from around the world had converged on Montmartre and Montparnasse. Bennett spent the next eight years writing novels and plays. Bennett believed that ordinary people had the potential to be the subject of interesting books.   In this respect, an influence which Bennett himself acknowledged was the French writer Maupassant whose "Une Vie" inspired "The Old Wives' Tale."  Maupassant is also one of the writers on whom Richard Larch, the protagonist of Bennett's first (and obviously semi-autobiographical) novel, A Man from the North, tries in vain to model his own writing.In 1908 The Old Wives' Tale was published and was an immediate success throughout the English-speaking world. After a visit to America in 1911, where he had been publicized and acclaimed as no other visiting writer since Dickens, he returned to England where Old Wives' Tale was reappraised and hailed as a masterpiece.
Public service
During the First World War he became Director of Propaganda for France at the Ministry of Information.  (At that time the word propaganda did not have the negative implications it acquired later in the twentieth century). His appointment was made directly on the recommendation of Lord Beaverbrook, who also recommended him as Deputy Minister of that Department at the end of the war.  He refused a knighthood in 1918.Osbert Sitwell,  in a letter to James Agate,  notes that Bennett was not, despite current views, "the typical businessman, with his mean and narrow outlook."  Sitwell cited a letter from Bennett to a friend of Agate, who remains anonymous, in Ego 5: 
I find I am richer this year than last; so I enclose a cheque for 500 pounds for you to distribute among young writers and artists and musicians who may need the money.  You will know, better than I do, who they are.  But I must make one condition, that you do not reveal that the money has come from me, or tell anyone about it.
 
Final yearsHe separated from his French wife in 1922 and fell in love with the actress Dorothy Cheston, with whom he stayed for the rest of his life. He won the 1923 James Tait Black Memorial Prize for his novel Riceyman Steps.He died of typhoid at his home in Baker Street, London, on 27 March 1931, after returning from a visit  to France. His ashes are buried in Burslem cemetery. Their daughter, Virginia Eldin, lived in France and was president of the Arnold Bennett Society.
References to the potteries in his worksIn 1902, Anna of the Five Towns, the first of a succession of stories which detailed life in the Potteries, appeared.
His most famous works are the Clayhanger trilogy and The Old Wives' Tale.  These books draw on his experience of life in the Potteries, as did most of his best work.
In his novels the Potteries are referred to as "the Five Towns"; Bennett felt that the name was more euphonious than "the Six Towns" so Fenton was omitted. The real towns and their Bennett counterparts are:

The Six Towns of Stoke-on-Trent Bennett's Five Towns 
Tunstall Turnhill 
Burslem  Bursley 
Hanley  Hanbridge 
Stoke  Knype 
Fenton  The 'forgotten town' 
Longton  Longshaw All but one of these are mild disguises; "Knype" may possibly be taken from the nearby village of Knypersley near Biddulph, and Knypersley Hall. Neighbouring Oldcastle, where Edwin Clayhanger went to school, is Newcastle under Lyme. Axe, towards which Tertius Ingpen lived, is Leek.Several of his books set in the Potteries have been made into films (for example The Card starring Alec Guinness) and television mini-series (such as "Anna of the Five Towns" and "Clayhanger").
Criticism
Critically, Bennett has not always had an easy ride. His output was prodigious and, by his own admission, based on maximizing his income rather than from creative necessity.As Bennett put it: 
Am I to sit still and see other fellows pocketing two guineas apiece for stories which I can do better myself? Not me. If anyone imagines my sole aim is art for art’s sake, they are cruelly deceived.
 Contemporary critics—Virginia Woolf in particular—perceived weaknesses in his work. To her and other Bloomsbury authors, Bennett represented the "old guard" in literary terms. His style was traditional rather than modern, which made him an obvious target for those challenging literary conventions.   Max Beerbohm criticized him as a social climber who had forgotten his origins. He drew a mature and well fed Bennett expounding, "All to plan, you see" to a younger tougher version of himself, who replies: "Yes—but MY plan."For much of the 20th Century, Bennett's work was tainted by this perception; it was not until the 1990s that a more positive view of his work became widely accepted. The noted English critic John Carey was a major influence on his rehabilitation. He praises him in his 1992 book,  , declaring Bennett to be his "hero" because his writings "represent a systematic dismemberment of the intellectuals' case against the masses" (p. 152).In his notable work, The Intellectuals and the Masses (1992), John Carey offers a well considered assessment of Bennett and his works in the more general context of the sentiments prevailing during his lifetime.
Quotations

My mother is far too clever to understand anything she doesn't like.
Any change, even a change for the better, is always accompanied by drawbacks and discomforts.


List of works 
For further guidance consult Studies in the Sources of Arnold Bennett's Novels by Louis Tillier (Didier, Paris 1949), and Arnold Bennett and Stoke-on-Trent by E. J. D. Warrilow (Etruscan Publications, 1966). Also, Arnold Bennett: A Biography by Margaret Drabble (Weidenfeld & Nicolson, London 1974).
In gastronomyBennett is one of a select number of celebrities to have a dish named after them. While staying at the Savoy Hotel in London, the chefs perfected an omelette incorporating smoked haddock, Parmesan cheese and cream, which pleased the author so much he insisted on it being prepared wherever he travelled. The 'Omelette Arnold Bennett' has remained a Savoy standard dish ever since. The George Hotel in Burslem, Stoke-on-Trent, has a restaurant named after Bennett. It is adorned with Arnold Bennett photographs and memorabilia.
Other geographical links

1907/8 Paris: Old Wives Tale written here.
1908 French Riviera: convalescence after typhoid fever. Married and moved to Fountainbleau.
1914: Camarques, Thorpe-le-Soken, Essex coast: here he had the yacht Velsa and trips from this 'home in the country' to Frinton-on-Sea gave rise to one of the characters in The Price of Love.
1917 Bennett's bachelor pad is at Thames Yacht Club: a couple of rooms 'furnished to his own taste'
1920 A month trip to Portugal with Frank Swinnerton, as Bennett was at a particularly low ebb.
May–June 1926, Bennett stayed in the village of Amberley, West Sussex where he wrote the last two thirds of The Vanguard in 44 days, noting 'I have never worked more easily than in the last six weeks.  
1928 house rented in Le Touquet for the summer 



London
Strand Palace Hotel London: on London trips, he frequented as it offered a bedside light during his periods of insomnia.
His wife Marguerite's London flat was over a bank on the corner of New Oxford Street and Rathbone Place.
"large flat" George Street, Hanover Square, which subsequently Marguerite came to live in
1921-ish: 75, Cadogan Square; Dorothy moved in here. From here, they moved in 1930 (according to plaque on the building) to Chiltern Court, an "impressive block of flats" at Baker Street Railway Station (where H. G. Wells also lived).
1931 Bennett dies at Chiltern Court on March 27. 


Notes 
External links 
 
 

 
Arnold Bennett's biography by his biographer Frank Swinnerton
The Potteries
Portraits of Arnold Bennett at the National Portrait Gallery (London).
Omelette Arnold Bennett A late supper dish that was created at the Savoy Hotel specially for Mr. Bennett
The Literary Debate Between Arnold Bennett and Virginia Woolf
Stoke-on-Trent Museums cares for a historic collection of Benett's letters and personal effects
Images of England Photo of the Bennett family home
Free book downloads in HTML, PDF, text formats at ebooktakeaway.com
Public domain audio books of works by Arnold Bennett at Librivox
Arnold Bennett Society

 
 
DEFAULTSORT











 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Anita O'Day
 
 Anita O'Day (October 18, 1919 – November 23, 2006) was an American jazz singer.Born Anita Belle Colton, O'Day was admired for her sense of rhythm and dynamics, and her early big band appearances shattered the traditional image of the "girl singer". Refusing to pander to any female stereotype, O'Day presented herself as a "hip" jazz musician, wearing a band jacket and skirt as opposed to an evening gown. She changed her surname from Colton to O'Day, pig Latin for "dough," slang for money.   
StyleO'Day, along with Mel Tormé, is often grouped with the West Coast cool school of jazz. Like Tormé, O'Day had some training in jazz drums (courtesy of her first husband Don Carter); her longest musical collaboration was with jazz drummer John Poole. While maintaining a central core of hard swing, O'Day's skills in improvisation of rhythm and melody put her squarely among the pioneers of bebop.She cited Martha Raye as the primary influence on her vocal style, also expressing admiration for Mildred Bailey, Ella Fitzgerald, and Billie Holiday. She always maintained that the accidental excision of her uvula during a childhood tonsillectomy left her incapable of vibrato, and unable to maintain long phrases. That botched operation, she claimed, forced her to develop a more percussive style based on short notes and rhythmic drive. However, when she was in good voice she could stretch long notes with strong crescendos and a telescoping vibrato, e.g. her live version of "Sweet Georgia Brown" at the 1958 Newport Jazz Festival, captured in Bert Stern's film Jazz on a Summer's Day. 
Early careerBorn to James and Gladys M. (née Gill) Colton in Chicago, Anita Belle Colton (who later took the surname "O'Day") took the first chance to leave her unhappy home when, at age 14, she became a contestant in the popular Walk-a-thons as a dancer. She toured with the Walk-a-thons circuits for two years, occasionally being called upon to sing. In 1934, she began touring the Midwest as a marathon dance contestant and singing "The Lady in Red" for tips.  In 1936, she left the endurance contests, determined to become a professional singer. She started out as a chorus girl in such Uptown venues as the Celebrity Club and the Vanity Fair, then found work as a singer and waitress at the Ball of Fire, the Vialago, and the Planet Mars. At the Vialago, O'Day met the drummer Don Carter, who introduced her to music theory; they wed in 1937. Her first big break came in 1938 when Down Beat editor Carl Cons hired her to work at his new club at 222 North State Street, the Off-Beat, which became a popular hangout for musicians. Also performing at the Off-Beat was the Max Miller Quartet, which backed O'Day for the first 10 days of her stay there. While performing at the Off Beat, she met Gene Krupa, who promised to call her if Irene Daye, his then vocalist, ever left his band, and, in 1939, O'Day was hired as vocalist for Miller's Quartet, which had a stay at the Three Deuces club in Chicago.  
Work with Krupa, Herman, and KentonThe call from Krupa came in early 1941. Of the 34 sides she recorded with Krupa, it was "Let Me Off Uptown", a novelty duet with Roy Eldridge, that became her first big hit. That same year, Down Beat named O'Day "New Star of the Year". In 1942, she appeared with the Krupa band in two "soundies" (short musical films originally made for jukeboxes), singing "Thanks for the Boogie Ride" and "Let Me Off Uptown". The same year Down Beat magazine readers voted her into the top five big band singers. O'Day came in fourth, with Helen O'Connell first, Helen Forrest second, Billie Holiday third, and Dinah Shore fifth. O'Day married golf pro and jazz fan Carl Hoff in 1942.When Krupa's band broke up after he was arrested for possession of marijuana in 1943, O'Day joined Woody Herman for a month-long gig at the Hollywood Palladium, followed by two weeks at the Orpheum. Unwilling to tour with another big band, she left Herman after the Orpheum engagement and finished out the year as a solo artist. Despite her initial misgivings about the compatibility of their musical styles, she joined Stan Kenton's band in April 1944. During her 11 months with Kenton, O'Day recorded 21 sides, both transcription and commercial, and appeared in a Universal Pictures short Artistry in Rhythm (1944). "And Her Tears Flowed Like Wine" became a huge seller and put Kenton's band on the map. She also appeared in one soundie with Kenton, performing "I'm Going Mad for a Pad" and "Tabby the Cat". O'Day later said, "My time with Stanley helped nurture and cultivate my innate sense of chord structure." In 1945 she rejoined Krupa's band and stayed almost a year. The reunion yielded only 10 sides. After leaving Krupa late in 1946, O'Day once again became a solo artist.  
Post-war workDuring the late 1940s, she recorded two dozen sides, mostly for small labels. The quality of these singles varies: O'Day was trying to achieve popular success without sacrificing her identity as a jazz singer. Among the more notable recordings from this period are "Hi Ho Trailus Boot Whip", "Key Largo", "How High the Moon", and "Malaguena". O'Day's drug problems began to surface late in 1947, when she and her husband Carl Hoff were arrested for possession of marijuana and sentenced to 90 days in jail. Her career was back on the upswing in September 1948, when she sang with Count Basie at the Royal Roost in New York City, resulting in five airchecks. What secured O'Day's place in the jazz pantheon, however, are the 17 albums she recorded for Norman Granz's Norgran and Verve labels between 1952 and 1962.Her first album, Anita O'Day Sings Jazz (reissued as The Lady Is a Tramp), was recorded in 1952 for the newly established Norgran Records (it was also the label's first LP). The album was a critical success and further boosted her popularity. In October 1952 O'Day was again arrested for possession of marijuana, but found not guilty. The following March, she was arrested for possession of heroin. The case dragged on for most of 1953; O'Day was finally sentenced to six months in jail. Not long after her release from jail on February 25, 1954, she began work on her second album, Songs by Anita O'Day (reissued as An Evening with Anita O'Day). She recorded steadily throughout the 1950s, accompanied by small combos and big bands. In person, O'Day was generally backed by a trio which included John Poole, the drummer with whom she would work for the next 40 years.

As a live performer O'Day also began performing in festivals and concerts with such musicians as Louis Armstrong, Oscar Peterson, Dinah Washington, George Shearing, Cal Tjader, and Thelonious Monk. She appeared in the documentary Jazz on a Summer's Day, filmed at the 1958 Newport Jazz Festival, which increased her popularity. She admitted later that she was probably high on heroin during the concert. Als, Hilton, Critic's Notebook: Voice of Choice, New Yorker, August 11–18, 2008, found at Notebook: Voice of Choice from the New Yorker official website. Accessed August 7, 2008.  She also said that it was the best day of her life in that hers was the star performance of the festival and she made the cover of national magazines for it.
The following year O'Day made a cameo appearance in The Gene Krupa Story, singing "Memories of You". Late in 1959, she toured Europe with Benny Goodman to great personal acclaim.  O'Day later wrote in her 1981 autobiography that when Goodman's attempts to upstage her failed to diminish the audience's enthusiasm, he cut all but two of her numbers from the show.O'Day went back to touring as a solo artist and appeared on such TV specials as the Timex All-Star Jazz Show and The Swingin' Years hosted by Ronald Reagan. She recorded infrequently after the expiration of her Verve contract in 1962 and her career seemed over when she nearly died of a heroin overdose in 1968. After kicking the habit, she made a comeback at the 1970 Berlin Jazz Festival. She also appeared in the films Zigzag a.k.a. False Witness with George Kennedy (1970) and The Outfit (1974) with Robert Duvall. She resumed making live and studio albums under the new management of Alan Eichler, many recorded in Japan, and several were released on her own label, Emily Records.
Memoir and later lifeO'Day spoke candidly about her drug addiction in her 1981 memoir High Times, Hard Times, which led to a string of TV appearances on 60 Minutes, The Tonight Show Starring Johnny Carson, The Today Show with Bryant Gumbel, The Dick Cavett Show, Over Easy with Hugh Downs, The Tomorrow Show with Tom Snyder, and several others. She also toured Europe, performed a 50th Anniversary Concert at Carnegie Hall and headlined New York's JVC Jazz Festival.In 2005, her version of the standard "Sing, Sing, Sing" was remixed by RSL and was included in the compilation album Verve Remixed 3. The following year, she released Indestructible!, her first album in 13 years.One of her best-known late-career audio performances is "Is You Is Or Is You Ain't My Baby", which opens the film Shortbus (2006) by John Cameron Mitchell.A feature-length documentary, Anita O'Day: The Life of a Jazz Singer, directed by Robbie Cavolina and Ian McCrudden, premiered at the Tribeca Film Festival on April 30, 2007.  In November 2006, Robbie Cavolina (her last manager) entered her into a West Hollywood, California convalescent hospital, while she recovered from pneumonia. Two days before her death, she had demanded to be released from the hospital. On Thanksgiving Day, November 23, 2006, at age 87, O'Day died in her sleep. The official cause of death was cardiac arrest.
Discography 
Filmography

The Gene Krupa Story (1959)
Zigzag (1970)
The Outfit (1973)
Shortbus (2006)


Documentary

Jazz on a Summer's Day (1960)
Anita O'Day: The Life of a Jazz Singer (2006)
Anita O'Day - Live at Ronnie Scott's (2006)
Live In Tokyo '63 (2007)
Jazz Icons (2009)


References 
External links 
 

Bio at Jazz Profiles
 
 

 DEFAULTSORT






 






 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Paul Lynde
 Paul Edward Lynde (June 13, 1926 – January 10, 1982)   was an American comedian and actor. A noted character actor with a distinctively campy and snarky persona that often poked fun at his barely in the closet homosexuality, Lynde was well known for his roles as Uncle Arthur on Bewitched and Harry MacAfee, the befuddled father in Bye Bye Birdie – both the stage musical and the film-version. He was also the regular "center square" guest on the game show Hollywood Squares from 1968 to 1981 and was the voice of The Hooded Claw in the animated Hanna Barbera series, The Perils of Penelope Pitstop, though never credited.
Early lifePaul Lynde was born in Mount Vernon, Ohio, and studied drama at Northwestern University in Evanston, Illinois, where his fellow students included Cloris Leachman, Charlotte Rae, Patricia Neal, Jeffrey Hunter and Claude Akins. At Northwestern, he joined the Upsilon chapter of Phi Kappa Sigma and is listed amongst the most famous members of the fraternity. He graduated in 1948 and moved to New York City, where he initially worked as a stand-up comic.   
CareerLynde made his Broadway debut in the hit revue New Faces of 1952 in which he co-starred with fellow newcomers Eartha Kitt, Alice Ghostley, and Carol Lawrence.    In his monologue from that revue, the "Trip of the Month Club," Lynde portrayed a man on crutches recounting his misadventures on the African safari he took with his late wife.  The show was filmed and released as New Faces in 1954.After the revue's run, Lynde co-starred in the short-lived 1956 sitcom Stanley opposite Buddy Hackett and Carol Burnett, both of whom were also starting out their careers in show business. That same year, he guest starred on NBC's The Martha Raye Show, a comedy/variety show.In 1960, Lynde returned to Broadway when he was cast as "Harry MacAfee," the father in Bye Bye Birdie. He reprised the role in the play's film adaptation, which was released in 1963. That same year, he recorded a live album, Recently Released, issued as an LP record (no other formats are available). All six tracks were written by him. Once he could afford writers, he rarely used his own material until his tenure on Hollywood Squares years later.Over the years, Lynde made regular appearances on sitcoms such as The Phil Silvers Show, The Munsters, and I Dream of Jeannie, and variety shows such as The Perry Como Show and The Dean Martin Show. Lynde first appeared in episode 26 of Bewitched, "Driving is the Only Way to Fly," as Samantha's driving instructor Harold Harold, before taking on the recurring role of Uncle Arthur, Endora's brother. He was also a frequent guest on the 1976-79 variety show, Donny and Marie.Lynde also did extensive voice work on animated cartoons, particularly those of Hanna-Barbera Productions. His most notable roles included The Hooded Claw in The Perils of Penelope Pitstop (though he was uncredited), Mildew Wolf from It's the Wolf (a segment of Cattanooga Cats), and Pertwee from Where's Huddles?. He also voiced the role of Templeton the gluttonous rat in the animated feature Charlotte's Web. Lynde's sardonic inflections added a dimension to such lines as the sly, drawn-out whine, "What's in it for meeee?"  Lynde's distinctive voice is popular among impressionists. In the 1999 animated series Queer Duck the character Bi-Polar Bear (voiced by Billy West) speaks with an imitation of Lynde's voice.  Although it is sometimes assumed that actress Alice Ghostley based her speech patterns and mannerisms on Lynde's, according to actress Kaye Ballard "it was Paul who was influenced by Alice". 
The Hollywood SquaresIn 1966, Lynde debuted on the fledgling game show Hollywood Squares and quickly became its iconic guest star.  Eventually he assumed a permanent spot as the "center square," a move which ensured that he would be called upon by contestants at least once in almost every round.  Despite an urban legend to the contrary, Paul Lynde remained in the center at the producers' discretion. Many NBC tour guides have claimed that Lynde was afraid of earthquakes and the center square proved to be the safest square of the show's set.  An anecdote related during the A&E Biography on Lynde described an earthquake that occurred during the Hollywood Squares taping that frightened and alarmed many of the guests. Lynde remained in his seat, tapping his fingers, asking if they were going to finish the show.It was on Hollywood Squares that Lynde was best able to showcase his comedic talents with short, salty one-liners, delivered in his trademark sniggering delivery.  Many of these gags were thinly-veiled allusions to his homosexuality. Asked "You're the world's most popular fruit.  What are you?" Lynde replied, "Humble."   Asked whether it was against the law in Texas to call a Marine a "sissy," Lynde quipped, "I guess I’ll have to take the law into my own hands." Other jokes relied on double entendre, an alleged fondness for deviant behaviors, or dealt with "touchy" subject matter for 1970s television. One example:

Q: The great writer George Bernard Shaw once wrote, 'It's such a wonderful thing, what a crime to waste it on children.' What is it?	
Lynde: A whipping.  



Q:  Paul, any good boat enthusiast should know that when a man falls out of your boat and into the water, you should yell 'Man overboard!'  Now what should you yell if a woman falls overboard?
Lynde: Full speed ahead!  

Lynde garnered considerable fame from the series, as well as money.  He bought Errol Flynn's old Hollywood Mansion   and spent an enormous amount of money on renovations and decorations.
The Paul Lynde Show and The New Temperatures RisingIn 1972, Lynde starred in the short-lived ABC sitcom, The Paul Lynde Show, playing an uptight attorney and father at odds with his liberal-minded son-in-law.  The series was a contractual fulfillment to ABC in place of a final season of Bewitched. The series starred Lynde as Paul Simms, the father of a family that consisted of his wife Martha (Elizabeth Allen) and daughters Barbara (Jane Actman) and Sally (Pamelyn Ferdin). It also starred John Calvin as Barbara's husband, Howie, and Jerry Stiller and Anne Meara as Howie's parents. Critics perceived the show as derivative of All in the Family, then television's most-popular primetime program, although many admitted the writing was top notch and the sexual connotations gave it an extra bit of spice. For his role in the series, Lynde was nominated for a Best Actor Golden Globe.Scheduled opposite the first half of the Top 30 hit The Carol Burnett Show on CBS and the Top 20 hit Adam-12 on NBC, the series garnered low ratings and was canceled after one season (26 episodes). Media reports at the time about ABC programs indicated that research showed viewers liked another ABC show,  Temperatures Rising but disliked James Whitmore, whereas viewers liked Paul Lynde but not The Paul Lynde Show. Therefore, the network and producer William Asher decided to fire Whitmore and combine the positive elements of both series. Lynde was "transferred" to Temperatures Rising for the 1973-74 season. The trick did not work and the ratings for The New Temperatures Rising sank within weeks of the premiere.Due to plummeting ratings, the network cancelled the show mid-season, its time slot taken by a mid-season replacement, the long-running Happy Days. ABC resuscitated it - with still more changes in cast (most notably, Alice Ghostley replaced Sudie Bond in the role of Paul's sister Edwina) and premise - in the summer of 1974, when it ran for two months. Neither actor's presence in the cast helped the show's flagging ratings and this series, too, was not renewed and was replaced permanently by Happy Days.
Personal lifePaul Lynde's sexual orientation was something of an open secret in Hollywood, although, in keeping with the prejudices and social mores of the time, it was not acknowledged or discussed in public.  In 1965, Lynde was involved in an accident in which a young actor, reputed to be his lover, fell to his death from the window of their hotel room in San Francisco's Sir Francis Drake Hotel. The two had been drinking for hours before 24-year-old James "Bing" Davidson slipped    and fell eight stories, an event witnessed by two policemen, yet the event was largely kept out of the press, thus saving Lynde's career. Despite his campy television persona, Lynde never publicly came out as gay and the press generally refrained from commenting about it. In 1976, a People magazine article on Lynde featured him and Stan Finesmith; the latter was dubbed Lynde's "suite mate" and “chauffeur-bodyguard.” In the 1970s, this was as close as the press would come to hinting at his sexuality. mikesacks.com 
Alcoholism, arrests and final yearsAlthough he was voted America’s favorite comedian in a 1974 poll and highly sought out for every manner of TV game and variety show, it was the failure of his two series that reportedly exacerbated Lynde’s drinking problem, leading to numerous run-ins with the law and frequent arrests for public intoxication.    According to Peter Marshall (Florence Henderson Show, 2008) and Kaye Ballard (E True Hollywood Story, 2000) the comedic actor would sometimes verbally ridicule his friends when inebriated.Despite this, Lynde's amazing popularity led to his being signed by ABC to host a series of specials from 1975 to 1979, including: The Paul Lynde Comedy Hour (November 6, 1975) with Jack Albertson, Nancy Walker and the Osmond Brothers; The Paul Lynde Halloween Special (October 29, 1976) featuring the first prime-time network appearance of KISS, along with Margaret Hamilton recreating her role as the Wicked Witch of the West from The Wizard of Oz. Hamilton and Billie Hayes (as H.R. Pufnstuf's Witchiepoo) teamed up in a skit to kidnap Paul in one of the campiest holiday celebrations of all time. Other guests included Betty White, Donny Osmond and Marie Osmond, Tim Conway and Roz Kelly as Happy Days' Pinkie Tuscadero; The Paul Lynde Comedy Hour (April 23, 1977) with Cloris Leachman and Tony Randall; T'was the Night Before Christmas   with Alice Ghostley, Martha Raye, George Gobel and Foster Brooks; The Paul Lynde Comedy Hour (May 20, 1978) with Juliet Prowse, Brenda Vaccaro and Harry Morgan of M*A*S*H.Lynde also suffered from weight control problems, and was honored in 1977 by Weight Watchers. That same year, Lynde's beloved dog, Harry MacAfee, died.   Lynde could not stay in the house without him, and bought a new home later in the year. Once again, he spent a great deal of money to renovate the house.In 1978, Lynde also guest starred as a weatherman for WSPD-TV in Toledo, Ohio. In January 1978, Lynde was in Salt Lake City for an appearance on the Donny and Marie Show. At about 1:30 in the morning on January 4, he was arrested outside of a gay bar for interfering with a police officer. The officer, who was investigating a car burglary, claimed Lynde kept insisting that the officer "...attend to Lynde's complaint that his briefcase with $1,000 in cash and valuables inside had been stolen."   The complaint was later dropped, but as a result of the arrest, he lost his guest starring role on The Donny and Marie Show. After the airing of his final programs for ABC, Paul Lynde at the Movies (March 1979) with guests Betty White, Vicki Lawrence, Robert Urich and Gary Coleman and Paul Lynde Goes M-A-A-A-AD (May 20, 1979) with Marie Osmond, Charo and Vicki Lawrence, Lynde's disenchantment with being "boxed into" the The Hollywood Squares led him to leave the series despite not having any other offers of work.After this, acting jobs became harder for him to find, although it is unclear if this was because of anti-gay prejudice or his substance abuse problems and noted erratic behavior, which often made him difficult to work with.   He had been arrested for drunk driving and, while under the influence of alcohol, he was known to make rude and racist public comments towards people. Lynde finally became sober and drug free in early 1980. At this time, The Hollywood Squares was experiencing a downward trend in ratings. Lynde did not want to return, but according to Peter Marshall, they made Lynde an offer he could not refuse - including co-star billing with Marshall - and he returned to the series in the spring of that year. He remained with the show until it was cancelled in February 1981.
Death and legacyOn Monday, January 11, 1982 after Lynde had failed to turn up for a birthday celebration, his friend Paul Barresi became alarmed. When he and other friends could not get an answer on the phone or from knocking on his door, they finally broke into his Beverly Hills, California home where Lynde was found dead in his bed.    Rush & Molloy (1 September 2005). Lynde bio squarely denies he OD'd. New York Daily News  The coroner ruled the death a heart attack.   Lynde's cremated remains are interred at Amity Cemetery, in Amity, Ohio, where he is buried next to his brother Johnny and sister Helen.Paul Lynde's  popularity has continued after his death. According to cartoon creator/voice actor, Seth MacFarlane, the voice of Roger the Alien on the Fox television show American Dad! was modelled after him.   The voice and humor of Queer Duck character Bi-Polar Bear – voiced by Ren & Stimpy and Futurama actor Billy West – is also done in the style of Paul Lynde, as was the supervillain The Scoutmaster in the Simpsons episode Radioactive Man.  Steve Carell reprised Lynde's role as "Uncle Arthur" in the 2005 film Bewitched, very much in Lynde's style.  The voice of Big Cheese on Samurai Pizza Cats was a Paul Lynde impersonation. The voice and humor of William A. Mummy on the GSN game show Late Night Liars is performed in the vein of Paul Lynde as well.Actor/comedian Michael Airington also plays Paul Lynde in the show Oh My Goodness it's Paul Lynde and An Evening with Paul Lynde, recreating Lynde's 1976 live show, and in Off Center: The Paul Lynde Show.   Airington licenses the rights from the Paul Lynde Estate. 
Filmography 
 
Television

The Red Buttons Show (1955)
Stanley (1956–1957)
The Perry Como Show (1961–1963)
The Patty Duke Show (1963)
Howie (1962 CBS comedy series unsold pilot)
The Munsters (1964-65, three episodes)
Two's Company (1965, ABC comedy series unsold pilot)
Bewitched (1965) (1966–1971)
Sedgewick Hawk-Styles: Prince of Danger (1966 unsold ABC comedy pilot)
Manley and the Mob (1967 unsold ABC comedy pilot)
The Hollywood Squares (1968–1981)
Dean Martin Presents the Golddiggers (1968–1969)
The Cattanooga Cats (1969–1971) (voice)
Love, American Style (1969–1974)
The Perils of Penelope Pitstop (1969–1971) (voice)
Where's Huddles (1970) (voice)
The Jonathan Winters Show (1968-1969)
I Dream of Jeannie (1966–1968)
The Paul Lynde Show (1972–1973)
The New Temperatures Rising Show (1973–1974)
Donny & Marie (1975)
The Paul Lynde Halloween Special (1976)
'Twas the Night Before Christmas (1977)
Paul Lynde at the Movies (1979)
 
Film

New Faces (1954) (also writer)
The Good Fairy (1956 TV movie) 
Son of Flubber (1963)
Bye Bye Birdie (1963)
Under the Yum Yum Tree (1963)
For Those Who Think Young (1964)
Send Me No Flowers (1964)
Beach Blanket Bingo (1965)
The Glass Bottom Boat (1966)
How Sweet It Is! (1968)
Gidget Grows Up (1969 TV movie) 
Gidget Gets Married (1972 TV movie) 
Charlotte's Web (1973) (voice)
Journey Back to Oz (1974) (voice)
Hugo the Hippo (1975) (voice)
Rabbit Test (1978)
The Villain (1979)


Recordings

Recently Released (1960) Vinyl, LP, Mono; Columbia Records CL1534
 
See also

 


References

Notes
 
External links

 
 
 
What Happened to Paul Lynde? at TVParty.com
Paul Lynde at the Rotten Library (also contains a list of Hollywood Squares quips)
 
Paul Lynde quips from Hollywood Squares
Sacks, Mike. Queer as folk Salon.com, August 23, 2005.
Center Square: The Paul Lynde Story (2005) by Steve Wilson and Joe Florenti

 
DEFAULTSORT
















 
 
 
 
 
 
	Mick Jagger
 
Sir Michael Philip "Mick" Jagger (born 26 July 1943) is an English musician, singer, songwriter and actor, best known as the lead vocalist and a   founder member of the Rolling Stones.Jagger's career has spanned over fifty years. His performance style has been said to have "opened up definitions of gendered masculinity and so laid the foundations for self-invention and sexual plasticity which are now an integral part of contemporary youth culture". Sheila Whiteley, Sexing the groove: popular music and gender, Routledge, 1997, p.67. ISBN 0-415-14670-4  Allmusic has described Jagger as "one of the most popular and influential frontmen in the history of rock & roll".    His distinctive voice and performance, along with Keith Richards' guitar style, have been the trademark of the Rolling Stones throughout the career of the band. In 1989, he was inducted into the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame with the Rolling Stones.Jagger gained much press notoriety for admitted drug use and romantic involvements, and was often portrayed as a counterculture figure. In the late 1960s Jagger began acting in films (starting with Performance and Ned Kelly), to mixed reception. In 1985, Jagger released his first solo album, She's the Boss, and was knighted in 2003. In early 2009, he joined the eclectic supergroup SuperHeavy.
Early life 
Jagger was born into a middle-class family at Livingstone Hospital, in Dartford, Kent, England.  His father, Basil Fanshawe ("Joe") Jagger (13 April 1913 – 11 November 2006), and his grandfather David Ernest Jagger were both teachers. His mother, Eva Ensley Mary (née Scutts; 6 April 1913 – 18 May 2000), born in New South Wales, Australia,   was a hairdresser  and an active member of the Conservative Party. Jagger is the elder of two sons (his brother Chris Jagger was born on 19 December 1947)  and was brought up to follow in his father's career path.In the book According to the Rolling Stones, Jagger states "I was always a singer. I always sang as a child. I was one of those kids who just liked to sing. Some kids sing in choirs; others like to show off in front of the mirror. I was in the church choir and I also loved listening to singers on the radio – the BBC or Radio Luxembourg – or watching them on TV3 and in the movies."   From September 1950, Keith Richards and Jagger (known as "Mike" to his friends) were classmates at Wentworth Primary School in Dartford, Kent. In 1954, Jagger passed the eleven-plus, and went to Dartford Grammar School, where there is now the Mick Jagger Centre, as part of the school. Having lost contact with each other when they went to different schools, Richards and Jagger resumed their friendship in July 1960 after a chance encounter and discovered that they had both developed a love for rhythm and blues music, which began for Jagger with Little Richard. White, Charles. (2003), p.119-120 The Life and Times of Little Richard: The Authorised Biography. Omnibus Press. Jagger left school in 1961. He obtained seven O-levels and three A-levels. Jagger and Richards moved into a flat in Edith Grove in Chelsea with a guitarist they had encountered named Brian Jones. While Richards and Jones were making plans to start their own rhythm and blues group, Jagger continued his business courses at the London School of Economics, "Mick Jagger." Contemporary Musicians, Volume 53. Thomson Gale, 2005.  and had seriously considered becoming either a journalist or a politician. Jagger had compared the latter to a pop star.  
Career 
Early years: 1960s
In their earliest days, the members played for no money in the interval of Alexis Korner's gigs at a basement club opposite Ealing Broadway tube station (subsequently called "Ferry's" club). At the time, the group had very little equipment and needed to borrow Alexis' gear to play. This was before Andrew Loog Oldham became their manager.The group's first appearance under the name the Rollin' Stones (after one of their favourite Muddy Waters tunes) was at the Marquee Club, a jazz club, on 12 July 1962. They would later change their name to “the Rolling Stones” as it seemed more formal. Victor Bockris states that the band members included Mick Jagger, Keith Richards, Brian Jones, Ian Stewart on piano, Dick Taylor on bass and Tony Chapman on drums. However, Richards states in Life, "The drummer that night was Mick Avory—not Tony Chapman, as history has mysteriously handed it down..."  Some time later, the band went on their first tour in the United Kingdom; this was known as the “training ground” tour because it was a new experience for all of them.  The line-up did not at that time include drummer Charlie Watts and bassist Bill Wyman. By 1963, they were finding their stride as well as popularity. By 1964, two unscientific opinion polls rated them as Britain's most popular group, outranking even the Beatles. By the autumn of 1963, Jagger had left the London School of Economics in favour of his promising musical career with the Rolling Stones. The group continued to mine the works of American rhythm and blues artists such as Chuck Berry and Bo Diddley, but with the strong encouragement of Andrew Loog Oldham, Jagger and Richards soon began to write their own songs. This core songwriting partnership would flourish in time; one of their early compositions, "As Tears Go By", was a song written for Marianne Faithfull, a young singer being promoted by Loog Oldham at the time. Jagger, Richards, Watts & Wood 2003. p. 84.  For the Rolling Stones, the duo would write "The Last Time", the group's third number-one single in the UK (their first two UK number-one hits had been cover versions). Another of the fruits of this collaboration was their first international hit, "(I Can't Get No) Satisfaction". It also established the Rolling Stones’ image as defiant troublemakers in contrast to the Beatles' "lovable moptop" image. 
Jagger told Stephen Schiff in a 1992 Vanity Fair profile: "I wasn't trying to be rebellious in those days; I was just being me. I wasn't trying to push the edge of anything. I'm being me and ordinary, the guy from suburbia who sings in this band, but someone older might have thought it was just the most awful racket, the most terrible thing, and where are we going if this is music?... But all those songs we sang were pretty tame, really. People didn't think they were, but I thought they were tame." The group released several successful albums including December's Children (And Everybody's), Aftermath, and Between the Buttons, but their reputations were catching up to them. In 1967, Jagger and Richards were arrested on drug charges and were given unusually harsh sentences: Jagger was sentenced to three months' imprisonment for possession of four over-the-counter pep pills he had purchased in Italy. On appeal, Richards' sentence was overturned and Jagger's was amended to a conditional discharge (he ended up spending one night inside Brixton Prison)  after an article appeared in The Times, written by its traditionally conservative editor William (now Lord) Rees-Mogg,  but the Rolling Stones continued to face legal battles for the next decade. Around the same time, internal struggles about the direction of the group had begun to surface.
1970s
After Jones' death and their move in 1971 to the south of France as tax exiles,  Jagger and the rest of the band changed their look and style as the 1970s progressed. For the Rolling Stones' highly publicised 1972 American tour, Jagger wore glam-rock clothing and glittery makeup on stage. Later in the decade, they ventured into genres like disco and punk with the album Some Girls (1978). Their interest in the blues, however, had been made manifest in the 1972 album Exile on Main St. His emotional singing on the gospel-influenced "Let It Loose", one of the album's tracks, has been described by music critic Russell Hall as having been Jagger's finest ever vocal achievement. After the band's acrimonious split with their second manager, Allen Klein, in 1971, Jagger took control of their business affairs after speaking with an up and coming front man JB Silver and has managed them ever since in collaboration with his friend and colleague, Rupert Löwenstein. Mick Taylor, Brian Jones's replacement, left the band in December 1974 and was replaced by Faces guitarist Ronnie Wood in 1975, who also operated as a mediator within the group, and between Jagger and Richards in particular. 
1980s While continuing to tour and release albums with the Rolling Stones, Jagger began a solo career. In 1985, he released his first solo album She's the Boss produced by Nile Rodgers and Bill Laswell, featuring Herbie Hancock, Jeff Beck, Jan Hammer, Pete Townshend and the Compass Point All Stars. It sold fairly well, and the single "Just Another Night" was a Top Ten hit. During this period, he collaborated with the Jacksons on the song "State of Shock", sharing lead vocals with Michael Jackson. For his own personal contributions in the 1985 Live Aid multi-venue charity concert, he performed at Philadelphia's JFK Stadium; he did a duet with Tina Turner of "It's Only Rock and Roll", and the performance was highlighted by Jagger tearing away a part of Turner's dress. He also did a cover of "Dancing in the Street" with David Bowie, who himself appeared at Wembley Stadium. The video was shown simultaneously on the screens of both Wembley and JFK Stadiums. The song reached number one in the UK the same year.In 1987, he released his second solo album, Primitive Cool. While it failed to match the commercial success of his debut, it was critically well received.In 1988, he produced the songs "Glamour Boys" and "Which Way to America" on Living Colour's album Vivid. 15–28 March, he had a solo concert tour in Japan (Tokyo, Nagoya and Osaka). The 22 March show was the Japanese artist Tokyo Dome's first performance.
1990sWandering Spirit was the third solo album by Jagger and was released in 1993. It would be his only solo album release of the 1990s. Jagger aimed to re-introduce himself as a solo artist in a musical climate vastly changed from that of his first two albums, She's the Boss and Primitive Cool.Following the successful comeback of the Rolling Stones' Steel Wheels (1989), which saw the end of Jagger and Richards' well-publicised feud, Jagger began routining  new material for what would become Wandering Spirit. In January 1992, after acquiring Rick Rubin as co-producer, Jagger recorded the album in Los Angeles over seven months until September 1992, recording simultaneously as Richards was making Main Offender.Jagger would keep the celebrity guests to a minimum on Wandering Spirit, only having Lenny Kravitz as a vocalist on his cover of Bill Withers' "Use Me" and bassist Flea from Red Hot Chili Peppers on three tracks.Following the end of the Rolling Stones' Sony Music contract and their signing to Virgin Records, Jagger signed with Atlantic Records (which had signed the Stones in the 1970s) to distribute what would be his only album with the label.Released in February 1993, Wandering Spirit was commercially successful, reaching No.12 in the UK and No.11 in the US, going gold there. The track "Sweet Thing" was the lead single, although it was the third single, "Don't Tear Me Up", which found moderate success, topping Billboard's Album Rock Tracks chart for one week. Critical reaction was very strong, noting Jagger's abandonment of slick synthesisers in favour of an incisive and lean guitar sound. Contemporary reviewers tend to consider Wandering Spirits a high point of Jagger's later career.
2000s
In 2001, Jagger released Goddess in the Doorway spawning the hit single "Visions of Paradise". In the same year, he also joined Keith Richards in the the Concert for New York City, a charity concert in response to the 11 September attacks, to sing "Salt of the Earth" and "Miss You".He celebrated the Rolling Stones' 40th anniversary by touring with them on the year-long Licks Tour in support of their career retrospective Forty Licks double album. In 2007, the Rolling Stones made US$437 million on their A Bigger Bang Tour, which got them into the current edition of Guinness World Records for the most lucrative music tour.  Jagger has refused to say when the band will retire, stating in 2007: "I'm sure the Rolling Stones will do more things and more records and more tours. We've got no plans to stop any of that really." In October 2009, Jagger and U2 performed "Gimme Shelter" (with Fergie and will.i.am) and "Stuck in a Moment You Can't Get Out Of" at the 25th Anniversary Rock & Roll Hall of Fame Concert. 
2010sOn 20 May 2011, Jagger announced the formation of a new supergroup, SuperHeavy, which includes Dave Stewart, Joss Stone, Damian Marley and A.R. Rahman. Jagger has featured on will.i.am's 2011 single "T.H.E (The Hardest Ever)". It was officially released to iTunes on 4 February 2012. On 21 February 2012, Mick Jagger, B.B. King, Buddy Guy and Jeff Beck along with a blues ensemble performed at the White House concert series before President Barack Obama. When Jagger held out a mic to him, Obama sang twice the line "Come on, baby don't you want to go" of the blues cover 'Sweet Home Chicago', the blues anthem of Obama's home town. Jagger hosted the season finale of "Saturday Night Live" on 19 and 20 May 2012, doing several comic skits and playing some of the Rolling Stones' hits with Foo Fighters, Jeff Beck and Arcade Fire. 
Friendship with Keith Richards
Jagger's relationship with band mate Richards is frequently described as "love/hate" by the media.   Richards himself said in a 1998 interview: "I think of our differences as a family squabble. If I shout and scream at him, it's because no one else has the guts to do it or else they're paid not to do it. At the same time I'd hope Mick realises that I'm a friend who is just trying to bring him into line and do what needs to be done."  Richards, along with Johnny Depp, tried unsuccessfully to persuade Jagger to appear in Pirates of the Caribbean: On Stranger Tides, alongside Depp and Richards. Richards' autobiography, Life, was released 26 October 2010.  On 15 October 2010, the Associated Press published an article stating that Richards refers to Mick Jagger as "unbearable" in the book and notes that their relationship has been strained "for decades." 
Acting and film productionJagger has also had an intermittent acting career, most notably in Donald Cammell and Nicolas Roeg's Performance (1968) and as Australian bushranger Ned Kelly (1970).  He composed an improvised soundtrack for Kenneth Anger's film Invocation Of My Demon Brother on the Moog synthesiser in 1969. He auditioned for the role of Dr. Frank N. Furter in the 1975 film adaptation of The Rocky Horror Picture Show, a now iconic role that was eventually played by the original performer from its run on London's West End, Tim Curry. Appeared as himself in the Rutles' film All You Need Is Cash in 1978. In the late 1970s, Jagger was cast as Wilbur, a main character in Werner Herzog's Fitzcarraldo. However, a delay and the illness of main actor Jason Robards (later replaced by Klaus Kinski) in the film's notoriously difficult production resulted in his being unable to continue due to schedule conflicts with a band tour; some of the footage of his work is shown in the documentary Burden of Dreams. He developed a reputation for playing the heavy later in his acting career in films including Freejack (1992), Bent (1997), and The Man From Elysian Fields (2002).In 1995, Jagger founded Jagged Films with Victoria Pearman "[to] start my own projects instead of just going in other people's and being involved peripherally or doing music."  Its first release was the World War II drama Enigma in 2001. That same year, it produced a documentary on Jagger entitled Being Mick. The programme, which first aired on television 22 November, coincided with the release of his fourth solo album, Goddess in the Doorway. In 2008, the company began work on The Women, an adaptation of the George Cukor film of the same name. It was directed by Diane English.   Reviving the 1939 film met with countless delays, but Jagger's company was credited with obtaining $24 million of much-needed financing to finally begin casting. English told Entertainment Weekly: "This was much easier in 1939, when all the ladies were under contract, and they had to take the roles they were told to."The Rolling Stones have been the subjects of numerous documentaries, including Gimme Shelter, which was made as the band was gaining fame in the United States. Martin Scorsese worked with Jagger on Shine a Light, a documentary film featuring the Rolling Stones with footage from the A Bigger Bang Tour during two nights of performances at New York's Beacon Theatre. It screened in Berlin in February 2008.  Varietys Todd McCarthy said the film "takes full advantage of heavy camera coverage and top-notch sound to create an invigorating musical trip down memory lane, as well as to provoke gentle musings on the wages of ageing and the passage of time."  He predicted the film would fare better once released to video than in its limited theatrical runs.Jagger was a producer of, and guest-starred in the first episode of the short-lived comedy The Knights of Prosperity, which aired in 2007 on ABC. 
Personal life

Jagger is known for his many high-profile relationships. He has been married twice and has had numerous romantic connections.In 1970, Mick Jagger purchased Stargroves at East Woodhay in Hampshire as his country estate. It was often used as a recording venue.In the same year, he began a relationship with Nicaraguan-born Bianca De Macias, whom he married on 12 May 1971, in a Catholic ceremony in Saint-Tropez, France. The couple separated in 1977 and in May 1978, she filed for divorce on the grounds of his adultery.    Bianca later said "My marriage ended on my wedding day."  In late 1977, he began seeing model Jerry Hall,  while still married to Bianca. After a lengthy cohabitation and several children together, the couple married on 21 November 1990, in a Hindu beach ceremony in Indonesia and moved together to Downe House in Richmond, Surrey. Jagger later contested the validity of the ceremony, and the marriage was annulled in August 1999. Jagger has also been romantically linked to other women: Linda Ronstadt, Marianne Faithfull, Carly Simon, Margaret Trudeau, Mackenzie Phillips, Chrissie Shrimpton, Anita Pallenberg, Marsha Hunt, Pamela Des Barres, Uschi Obermaier, Bebe Buell, Janice Dickinson, Carla Bruni, Sophie Dahl and Angelina Jolie,  among others.      In the December 1983 issue of The Face, Jagger admitted to having some homosexual encounters.   Jagger has seven children with four women: Richard Simpson. "Mick has more children to see than Santa." The Daily Mail, 20 December 2004. Retrieved 6 January 2009. 


With Marsha Hunt, he has daughter Karis Jagger Hunt (born 4 November 1970).
With Bianca De Macias, he has daughter Jade Sheena Jezebel Jagger (born 21 October 1971).  
With Jerry Hall he has daughter Elizabeth Scarlett Jagger (born 2 March 1984), son James Leroy Augustin Jagger (born 28 August 1985), daughter Georgia May Ayeesha Jagger (born 12 January 1992) and son Gabriel Luke Beauregard Jagger (born 9 December 1997)  
With Luciana Gimenez, he has son Lucas Maurice Morad Jagger (born 18 May 1999). 

He also has four grandchildren.    His father, Joe, died of pneumonia on Saturday, 11 November 2006, at the age of 93.  Although the Rolling Stones were on the A Bigger Bang Tour, Jagger flew to Britain on Friday to see his father before returning to Las Vegas the same day, where he was to perform on Saturday night. The show went ahead as scheduled. In 2008, it was revealed that members of the Hells Angels had plotted to murder Jagger in 1975. They were angered by Jagger's public blaming of the Hells Angels, who had been hired to provide security at the Altamont Free Concert in December 1969, for much of the crowd violence at the event. The conspirators reportedly used a boat to approach a residence where Jagger was staying on Long Island, New York; the plot failed when the boat was nearly sunk by a storm. Jagger is an avid cricket fan.    He founded Jagged Internetworks so he could get coverage of English cricket. His personal fortune was estimated in 2010, at £190 million (~$298 million US). He said in September 2010 that he has a daily meditation and Buddhist practice.  
KnighthoodOn 12 December 2003, Jagger was made a Knight Bachelor for services to music, as Sir Michael Jagger by The Prince of Wales.  Stones frontman becomes Sir Mick, BBC News, 12 December 2003.  Mick Jagger's knighthood received mixed reactions. Some fans were disappointed when he accepted the honour as it seemed to contradict his anti-establishment stance. Gimson, Andrew (13 December 2003). "I thought people got knighthoods for saving lives".  The Daily Telegraph. As United Press International noted, the honour is odd, for unlike other knighted rock musicians, he has no "known record of charitable work or public services," although he is a patron of the British Museum.  Jagger was on record as saying "apart from the Rolling Stones, the Queen is the best thing Britain has got" but was absent from the Queen's Golden Jubilee pop concert at Buckingham Palace that marked her 50 years on the throne. Charlie Watts was quoted in the book According to the Rolling Stones as saying, "Anybody else would be lynched: 18 wives and 20 children and he's knighted, fantastic!"  The ceremony took place in December 2003. Jagger’s father and daughters Karis and Elizabeth were in attendance. Jagger's knighthood also caused some friction between him and bandmate Keith Richards, who was irritated when Jagger accepted the "paltry honour".  Richards said that he did not want to take the stage with someone wearing a "coronet and sporting the old ermine. It's not what the Stones is about, is it?"  Jagger retorted: "I think he would probably like to get the same honour himself. It's like being given an ice cream—one gets one and they all want one." 
Mick Jagger in popular culture
From the time that the Rolling Stones developed their anti-establishment image in the mid-1960s, Mick Jagger, with guitarist Keith Richards, has been an enduring icon of the counterculture. This was enhanced by his controversial drug-related arrests, sexually charged on stage antics, provocative song lyrics, and his role of the bisexual Turner in the 1970 film Performance. One of his biographers, Christopher Andersen, describes him as "one of the dominant cultural figures of our time", adding that Jagger was "the story of a generation". Jagger, who at the time described himself as an anarchist  and espoused the leftist slogans of the era, took part in a demonstration against the Vietnam War outside the US Embassy in London in 1968. This event inspired him to write "Street Fighting Man" that same year. A variety of celebrities attended a lavish party at New York's St. Regis Hotel to celebrate Jagger's 29th birthday and the end of the band's 1972 American tour. The party made the front pages of the leading New York newspapers. Pop artist Andy Warhol painted a series of silkscreen portraits of Jagger in 1975, one of which was owned by Farah Diba, wife of the Shah of Iran. It hung on a wall inside the royal palace in Teheran.  In 1967, Cecil Beaton photographed Jagger's naked buttocks, a photo that sold at Sotheby's auction house in 1986 for $4,000. Jagger was allegedly a contender for the anonymous subject of Carly Simon's 1973 hit song "You're So Vain", in which he sings backing vocals.  Although Don McLean does not use Jagger's name in his famous song "American Pie", he alludes to Jagger onstage at Altamont, calling him Satan. Jagger's spirited vocal delivery is recognized by rapper Kanye West during the first verse of the 2008 T.I. and Jay-Z single "Swagga Like Us". In 2010, a retrospective exhibition of portraits of Mick Jagger was presented at the festival Rencontres d'Arles, in France. The catalogue of the exhibition is the first photo album of Mick Jagger and shows his evolution over 50 years. Maroon 5's popular song "Moves Like Jagger" is about Jagger. Jagger himself acknowledged the song in an interview, calling the concept "very flattering."  Jagger is also referenced in Ke$ha's song "Tik Tok" and the Black Eyed Peas hit "The Time (Dirty Bit)".
LegacyIn the words of British dramatist and novelist Philip Norman, "the only point concerning Mick Jagger's influence over 'young people' that doctors and psychologists agreed on was that it wasn't, under any circumstances, fundamentally harmless." Philip Norman, Symphony for the devil: the Rolling Stones story, p.173. Linden Press/Simon & Schuster, 1984.  According to Norman, even Elvis Presley at his most scandalous had not exerted a "power so wholly and disturbingly physical": "Presley", he wrote in 1984, "while he made girls scream, did not have Jagger's ability to make men feel uncomfortable."  Norman also associates the early performances of Jagger with the Rolling Stones in the 1960s as a male ballet dancer, with "his conflicting and colliding sexuality: the swan's neck and smeared harlot eyes allied to an overstuffed and straining codpiece." Other authors also attribute similar connotations to Jagger. His performance style has been studied in the academic field as an analysis concerning gender, image and sexuality.  It has been written for example that his performance style "opened up definitions of gendered masculinity and so laid the foundations for self-invention and sexual plasticity which are now an integral part of contemporary youth culture". Sheila Whiteley, Sexing the groove: popular music and gender, Routledge, 1997, p.67. ISBN 0-415-14670-4  His stage personas also contributed significantly to the British tradition popular music that always featured the character song and where the art of singing becomes a matter of acting—which creates a question concerning the singer's relationship to his own words.  His voice, often cited as "thin and unexceptional", has been described as a powerful expressive tool for communicating feelings to his audience and expressing an alternative vision of society. Australasian journal of American studies, Volume 20, 2001, p.107. Available at 1. Consulted on 3 October 2011.  In order to express "virility and unrestrained passion" he developed techniques previously used by African American preachers and gospel singers such as "the roar, the guttural belt style of singing, and the buzz, a more nasal and raspy sound".  Steven Van Zandt also wrote: "The acceptance of Jagger's voice on pop radio was a turning point in rock & roll. He broke open the door for everyone else. Suddenly, Eric Burdon and Van Morrison weren't so weird — even Bob Dylan." Allmusic has described Jagger as "one of the most popular and influential frontmen in the history of rock & roll". 
In fact, musicians such as David Bowie joined many rock bands with blues, folk and soul orientations in his first attempts as a musician in the mid-60s, and he was to recall: "I used to dream of being their Mick Jagger".  Ever competitive with Jagger, Bowie also would say later: "he is not a sex symbol, but a mother image."  Lenny Kravitz, in the Rolling Stone magazine edition for their List of 100 Greatest Singers, in which Jagger was placed in 16º, wrote: "I sometimes talk to people who sing perfectly in a technical sense who don't understand Mick Jagger. [...] His sense of pitch and melody is really sophisticated. His vocals are stunning, flawless in their own kind of perfection." Lenny Kravitz. "{  100 Greatest Singers: Mick Jagger]". Rolling Stone. Consulted on 3 October 2011.  This edition also cites Mick Jagger as a key influence on Jack White, Steven Tyler and Iggy Pop. More recently, his cultural legacy is also associated with his ageing accompanied by some vitality. Bon Jovi frontman Jon Bon Jovi, also a veteran, has said: "We continue to make Number One records and fill stadiums. But will we still be doing 150 shows per tour? I just can't see it. I don't know how the hell Mick Jagger does it at 67. That would be the first question I'd ask him. He runs around the stage as much as I do yet he's got almost 20 years on me."  Since his early career, Jagger embodied what some authors describes as a "Dionysian archetype" of "eternal youth" personified by many rock stars and the rock culture.  As wrote biographer Laura Jackson, "It is impossible to imagine current culture without the unique influence of Mick Jagger." 
Discography
Solo albums

Year Album details  UK      US   BPI / RIAA Certification  
1985 She's the Boss

Released: 21 February 1985
Label: CBS Records
 6  
(11 wks)  13  
(29 wks)  UK: Silver
US: Platinum 
1987 Primitive Cool

Released: 14 September 1987
Label: CBS Records
 26  
(5 wks)  41  
(20 wks)   
1993 Wandering Spirit

Released: 9 February 1993
Label: Atlantic Records
 12  
(7 wks)  11  
(16 wks)  US: Gold 
2001 Goddess in the Doorway

Released: 19 November 2001
Label: Virgin Records
 44  
(10 wks)  39  
(8 wks)  UK: Silver 

Compilation

Year Album details  UK   US  
2007 The Very Best of Mick Jagger

Released: 1 October 2007
Label: Atlantic/Rhino Records
 57  
(2 wks)  77  
(2 wks)  

Collaborative albums

Year Album details  UK   US  
2004 Alfie (soundtrack, with Dave Stewart)

Release date: 18 October 2004
Label: Virgin Records
 171  
(2 wks)  
2011 SuperHeavy (by SuperHeavy)

Released: 19 September 2011
Label: A&M Records
 13  
(5 wks)  26  
(5 wks)  

Singles

Release date A-side  UK    UK Airplay   US   US Main   US Dance  
November 1970 "Memo from Turner" 32  (5 wks)  – – – – 
October 1978 "Don't Look Back"  (with Peter Tosh)  43  (7 wks)  – 81  (5 wks)  – – 
June 1984 "State of Shock"  (with The Jacksons)  14  (10 wks)  – 3  (14 wks)  – 3  (8 wks)  
February 1985 "Just Another Night" 32  (6 wks)  – 12  (14 wks)  1  (13 wks)  11  (10 wks)  
March 1985 "Lonely at the Top" – – – 9  (12 wks)  – 
May 1985 "Lucky in Love" 91  (3 wks)  – 38  (11 wks)  5  (12 wks)  11  (9 wks)  
August 1985 "Dancing in the Street"  (with David Bowie)  1  (15 wks)  – 7  (14 wks)  3  (9 wks)  4  (6 wks)  
July 1986 "Ruthless People" – – 51  (8 wks)  14  (10 wks)  29  (6 wks)  
September 1987 "Let's Work" 31  (7 wks)  – 39  (9 wks)  7  (6 wks)  32  (5 wks)  
November 1987 "Throwaway" – – 67  (9 wks)  7  (11 wks)  – 
December 1987 "Say You Will" – – – 39  (1 wk)  – 
January 1993 "Sweet Thing" 24  (4 wks)  9  (5 wks)  84  (6 wks)  34  (2 wks)  – 
March 1993 "Wired All Night" – – – 3  (15 wks)  – 
April 1993 "Don't Tear Me Up" 86  (2 wks)  – – 1  (18 wks)  – 
July 1993 "Out of Focus" – 70  (3 wks)  – – – 
November 2001 "God Gave Me Everything" – – – 24  (16 wks)  – 
March 2002 "Visions of Paradise" 43  (1 wk)  57  (5 wks)  – – – 
October 2004 "Old Habits Die Hard"  (with Dave Stewart)  45  (2 wks)  – – – – 
January 2008 "Charmed Life" – – – – 18  (12 wks)  
August 2011 "Miracle Worker"  (with SuperHeavy)  136  (3 wks)  66  (4 wks)  – –  
November 2011 "T.H.E (The Hardest Ever)"  (with will.i.am & Jennifer Lopez)  3  (1 wk)   36  (3 wks)  –  
"—" denotes releases did not chart 

FilmographyJagger has appeared in the following movies:

Year Title 
1966 Charlie Is My Darling 
1968 Sympathy for the Devil 
Performance 
1969 Invocation of My Demon Brother 
1970 Gimme Shelter 
Ned Kelly 
1972 Umano non umano 
1978 Wings of Ash  (TV pilot for a dramatisation of the life of Antonin Artaud)  
1978 All You Need is Cash  (Mockumentary)  
1981 Fitzcarraldo  
1982 Burden of Dreams 
Let's Spend the Night Together 
1987 Running Out of Luck 
1991 At the Max 
1992 Freejack 
1997 Bent 
1999 Mein liebster Feind (aka My Best Fiend) 
2001 Enigma  (cameo only, plus co-producer)  
The Man from Elysian Fields 
Being Mick 
2003 Mayor of the Sunset Strip 
2008 Shine a Light 
2010 Stones in Exile 
Ladies and Gentlemen: The Rolling Stones 
2011 The Rolling Stones: Some Girls Live In Texas '78 

References 
External links 
 

 
 
 
Sir Michael Philip ('Mick') Jagger (1943–), Singer and composer: Sitter associated with 33 portraits (National Portrait Gallery)
The Rolling Stones – Mick Jagger
Mick Jagger Joins a New ABC Sitcom
1983 Audio interview with Mick Jagger-discusses "Undercover" album Classic Rock Central
 

 
 
  
   
 
DEFAULTSORT






















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Adi Shamir
 
Adi Shamir ( ; born July 6, 1952) is an Israeli cryptographer. He is a co-inventor of the RSA algorithm (along with Ron Rivest and Len Adleman), a co-inventor of the Feige–Fiat–Shamir identification scheme (along with Uriel Feige and Amos Fiat), one of the inventors of differential cryptanalysis and has made numerous contributions to the fields of cryptography and computer science.
EducationBorn in Tel Aviv, Shamir received a BSc degree in mathematics from Tel Aviv University in 1973 and obtained his MSc and PhD degrees in Computer Science from the Weizmann Institute in 1975 and 1977 respectively. His thesis was titled, "Fixed Points of Recursive Programs and their Relation in Differential Agard Calculus". After a year postdoc at University of Warwick, he did research at MIT from 1977–1980 before returning to be a member of the faculty of Mathematics and Computer Science at the Weizmann Institute. Starting from 2006, he is also an invited professor at École Normale Supérieure in Paris.
ResearchIn addition to RSA, Shamir's other numerous inventions and contributions to cryptography include the Shamir secret sharing scheme, the breaking of the Merkle-Hellman knapsack cryptosystem, visual cryptography, and the TWIRL and TWINKLE factoring devices. Together with Eli Biham, he discovered differential cryptanalysis, a general method for attacking block ciphers. (It later emerged that differential cryptanalysis was already known — and kept a secret — by both IBM   (subscription required)  and the NSA.   )Shamir has also made contributions to computer science outside of cryptography, such as finding the first linear time algorithm for 2-satisfiability  .  and showing the equivalence of the complexity classes PSPACE and IP.
AwardsShamir has received a number of awards, including the following:

the 2002 ACM Turing Award, together with Rivest and Adleman, in recognition of his contributions to cryptography 
the Paris Kanellakis Theory and Practice Award; 
the Erdős Prize of the Israel Mathematical Society,
the 1986 IEEE W.R.G. Baker Award 
the UAP Scientific Prize;
The Vatican's PIUS XI Gold Medal;
the 2000 IEEE Koji Kobayashi Computers and Communications Award 
the Israel Prize, in 2008, for computer sciences.  
an honorary DMath (Doctor of Mathematics) degree from the University of Waterloo 


See also 

List of Israel Prize recipients
NDS Group


References 
External links 

List of Adi Shamir's publications on DBLP
Adi Shamir's US Patents, 1976-present

 
  
DEFAULTSORT


















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Prince (musician)
 
 Prince (born Prince Rogers Nelson; June 7, 1958) is an American singer, songwriter, musician, and actor. He has produced ten platinum albums and thirty Top 40 singles during his career.    He established his own recording studio and label; writing, self-producing and playing most, or all, of the instruments on his recordings.  In addition, he has been a "talent promoter" for the careers of Sheila E., Carmen Electra, The Time and Vanity 6,  and his songs have been recorded by these artists and others (including Chaka Khan, The Bangles, Sinéad O'Connor, and even Kim Basinger).  He also has several hundred unreleased songs in his "vault".   Born in Minneapolis, Minnesota, Prince developed an interest in music at an early age, writing his first song at age seven.  After recording songs with his cousin's band 94 East, seventeen-year-old Prince recorded several unsuccessful demo tapes before releasing his debut album, For You, in 1978.  His 1979 album, Prince, went platinum due to the success of the singles "Why You Wanna Treat Me So Bad?" and "I Wanna Be Your Lover".  His next three records, Dirty Mind (1980), Controversy (1981), and 1999 (1982) continued his success, showcasing Prince's trademark of prominently sexual lyrics and incorporation of elements of funk, dance and rock music.  In 1984, he began referring to his backup band as The Revolution and released the album Purple Rain, which served as the soundtrack to his film debut of the same name.After releasing the albums Around the World in a Day (1985) and Parade (1986), The Revolution disbanded and Prince released the critically acclaimed double album Sign "O" the Times (1987) as a solo artist.  He released three more solo albums before debuting the The New Power Generation band in 1991, which saw him changing his stage name to an unpronounceable symbol known as "The Love Symbol".  In 1994, he began releasing new albums at a faster pace to remove himself from contractual obligations to Warner Bros, releasing five records in a span of two years before signing to Arista Records in 1998.  In 2000, he began referring to himself as "Prince" once again.  He has released thirteen albums since the beginning of the 21st century, including his latest, 20Ten, released in 2010.Prince has a wide vocal range and is known for his   stage presence and costumes. His releases have sold over 80 million copies worldwide.   He has won seven Grammy Awards,  a Golden Globe,  and an Academy Award.  He was inducted into the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame in 2004, the first year he was eligible.   Rolling Stone has ranked Prince No. 27 on its list of the 100 Greatest Artists of All Time.     Prince's music has been influenced by rock, R&B, soul, funk, rap, blues, New Wave, electronica, disco, psychedelia, folk, jazz, and pop.  His artistic influences include Sly & the Family Stone, Parliament-Funkadelic, Joni Mitchell, The Beatles, Johnny "Guitar" Watson, Miles Davis, Carlos Santana,  Jimi Hendrix, James Brown, Led Zeppelin, Marvin Gaye, the Isley Brothers, Todd Rundgren  Duke Ellington,  Curtis Mayfield,  
  and Stevie Wonder.  Prince pioneered the "Minneapolis sound", a hybrid mixture of funk, rock, pop, R&B and New Wave that has influenced many other musicians. 
Early lifePrince Rogers Nelson was born June 7, 1958, in Minneapolis, Minnesota, to John L. Nelson and Mattie Shaw.  Prince's father was a pianist and songwriter and his mother was a jazz singer. Prince was named after his father, whose stage name was Prince Rogers, and who performed with a jazz group called the Prince Rogers Trio. In a 1991 interview with A Current Affair, Prince's father said, "I named my son Prince because I wanted him to do everything I wanted to do."  Prince's childhood nickname was Skipper. In a PBS interview Prince told Tavis Smiley that he was "born epileptic" and "used to have seizures" when he was young. During the interview Prince also said that "my mother told me one day I walked in to her and said, 'Mom, I'm not going to be sick anymore,' and she said 'Why?' and I said 'Because an angel told me so.' " Prince's sister Tika Evene (usually called Tyka) was born in 1960.    Both siblings developed a keen interest in music, and this was encouraged by their father. Obituary: John Nelson. Retrieved December 11, 2010.  Prince wrote his first tune, "Funk Machine" on his father's piano when he was seven.  Prince's parents then separated when Prince was ten years old. Following their separation, Prince constantly switched homes: sometimes he lived with his father, and sometimes with his stepfather.  Finally he moved into the home of a neighbor, the Andersons, and befriended their son, Andre Anderson who later became known as André Cymone. Prince and Anderson joined Prince's cousin, Charles Smith, in a band called Grand Central while they were attending Minneapolis's Central High School. Smith was later replaced by Morris Day on the drums. Prince played piano and guitar for the band which performed at clubs and parties in the Minneapolis area. Grand Central later changed its name to Champagne and started playing original music influenced by Sly & the Family Stone, James Brown, Earth, Wind & Fire, Miles Davis, Parliament-Funkadelic, Carlos Santana, Jimi Hendrix, and Todd Rundgren.   Prince also played basketball in high school. 
Career
Musical beginnings: 1974–80In 1975, Pepe Willie, the husband of Prince's cousin, Shauntel, formed the band 94 East with Marcy Ingvoldstad and Kristie Lazenberry. Willie hired André Cymone and Prince to record tracks with 94 East. Those songs were written by Willie and Prince contributed guitar tracks. Prince also co-wrote, with Willie, the 94 East song, "Just Another Sucker". The band recorded tracks which later became the album Minneapolis Genius – The Historic 1977 Recordings. Prince also recorded, but never released, a song written by Willie, "If You See Me" (also known as, "Do Yourself A Favor"). In 1995, Willie released the album 94 East featuring Prince, Symbolic Beginning which included original recordings by Prince and Cymone.In 1976, Prince created a demo tape with producer Chris Moon in Moon's Minneapolis studio. Unable to secure a recording contract, Moon brought the tape to Minneapolis businessman Owen Husney. Husney signed Prince, at the age of 17, to a management contract and helped Prince create a demo recording at Sound 80 Studios in Minneapolis using producer/engineer David Z. The demo recording, along with a press kit produced at Husney's ad agency, resulted in interest from several record companies including Warner Bros. Records, A&M Records, and Columbia Records. With the help of Husney, Prince signed a recording contract with Warner Bros.. Warner Bros. agreed to give Prince creative control for three albums and ownership of the publishing rights.   Husney and Prince then left Minneapolis and moved to Sausalito, California where Prince's first album, For You, was recorded at Record Plant Studios. Subsequently, the album was mixed in Los Angeles and released in on April 7, 1978.  According to the For You album notes, Prince produced, arranged, composed and played all 27 instruments on the recording. The album was written and performed by Prince, except for the song "Soft and Wet" which had lyrics co-written by Moon.The cost of recording the album was twice Prince's initial advance. Prince used the Prince's Music Co. to publish his songs. "Soft and Wet" reached No. 12 on the Hot Soul Singles chart and No. 92 on the Billboard Hot 100. The song "Just as Long as We're Together" reached No.91 on the Hot Soul Singles chart.In 1979 Prince created a band which included André Cymone on bass, Dez Dickerson on guitar, Gayle Chapman and Doctor Fink on keyboards, and Bobby Z. on drums. Their first show was at the Capri Theater on January 5, 1979. Warner Bros. executives attended the show but decided that Prince and the band needed more time to develop his music. In October 1979, Prince released a self-titled album, Prince, which was No.4 on the Billboard Top R&B/Black Albums charts, and No.22 on the Billboard 200, going platinum. It contained two R&B hits: "Why You Wanna Treat Me So Bad?" and "I Wanna Be Your Lover". "I Wanna Be Your Lover" sold over a million copies, and reached No.11 on the Billboard Hot 100, and No.1 for two weeks on the Hot Soul Singles chart. Prince performed both these songs on January 26, 1980 on American Bandstand. On this album, Prince used Ecnirp Music – BMI. 
Controversy era, 1999 and breakthrough: 1980–84In 1980 Prince released the album, Dirty Mind, which he recorded in his own studio. The album was certified gold and the attendant single "Uptown" reached No.5 on the Billboard Dance chart and No.5 on the Hot Soul Singles charts. Prince was also the opening act for Rick James' 1980 Fire it Up tour. Dirty Mind contained sexually explicit material, including the title song, "Head", and the song  "Sister". In February 1981, Prince made his first appearance on Saturday Night Live, performing "Partyup".In October 1981, Prince released the album, Controversy. He played several dates in support of it, at first as one of the opening acts for The Rolling Stones, who were then on tour in the U.S. He began 1982 with a small tour of college towns where he was the headlining act. The songs on Controversy were published by Controversy Music  – ASCAP, a practice he continued until the Emancipation album in 1996.In 1981, Prince formed a side project band called The Time. The band released four albums between 1981 and 1990, with Prince writing and performing most of the instrumentation and backing vocals, with lead vocals by Morris Day. In late 1982, Prince released a double album, 1999, which sold over three million copies.  The title track was a protest against nuclear proliferation and became his first top ten hit in countries outside the U.S. Prince's "Little Red Corvette" was one of the first two videos by a black artist played in heavy rotation on MTV, along with Michael Jackson's "Billie Jean". The song "Delirious" also placed in the top ten on the Billboard Hot 100 chart.
The Revolution and Purple Rain: 1984–87During this period Prince referred to his band as The Revolution. The band's name was also printed, in reverse, on the cover of 1999 inside the letter "I" of the word "Prince". The band consisted of Lisa Coleman and Doctor Fink on keyboards, Bobby Z. on drums, Brown Mark on bass, and Dez Dickerson on guitar. Jill Jones, a backing singer, was also part of The Revolution line up for the 1999 album and tour. Following the 1999 Tour, Dickerson left the group for religious reasons. In the 2003 book Possessed: The Rise and Fall of Prince, author Alex Hahn says that Dickerson was reluctant to sign a three year contract and wanted to pursue other musical ventures. Dickerson was replaced by Wendy Melvoin, a childhood friend of Coleman. At first the band was used sparsely in the studio but this gradually changed during the mid-1980s. Prince's 1984 album Purple Rain sold more than thirteen million copies in the U.S. and spent twenty-four consecutive weeks at No.1 on the Billboard 200 chart. The film of the same name won an Academy Award and grossed more than $80 million in the U.S. 

Songs from the film were hits on pop charts around the world, while "When Doves Cry" and "Let's Go Crazy" reached No.1 and the title track reached No.2 on the Billboard Hot 100. At one point in 1984, Prince simultaneously had the number one album, single, and film in the U.S.; it was the first time a singer had achieved this feat.  Prince won the Academy Award for Best Original Song Score for Purple Rain, and the album is ranked 72nd Rolling Stones 500 Greatest Albums of All Time. "The RS 500 Greatest Albums of All Time," November 18, 2003, at RollingStone.com. Retrieved September 9, 2006.  The album is included on the list of Time magazine's All-Time 100 Albums.   After Tipper Gore heard her 12-year-old daughter Karenna listening to Prince's song "Darling Nikki", she founded the Parents Music Resource Center.  The center advocates the mandatory use of a warning label ("Parental Advisory: Explicit Lyrics") on the covers of records that have been judged to contain language or lyrical content unsuitable for minors. The recording industry later voluntarily complied with this request.  Of what is considered the Filthy Fifteen Prince's compositions appear no. 1 and no. 2, with the fourth position occupied by his protégée Vanity. In 1985 Prince announced that he would discontinue live performances and music videos after the release of his next album. His subsequent recording Around the World in a Day held the No.1 spot on the Billboard 200 for three weeks.In 1986 his album Parade reached No.3 on the Billboard 200 and No.2 on the R&B charts. The first single, "Kiss", with the video choreographed by Louis Falco, reached No.1 on the Billboard Hot 100. The song was originally written for a side project called Mazarati. That same year the song "Manic Monday", which was written by Prince and recorded by The Bangles, reached No.2 on the Hot 100 chart.The album Parade served as the soundtrack for Prince's second film, Under the Cherry Moon. Prince directed and starred in the movie, which also featured Kristen Scott Thomas. He received the Golden Raspberry Award for his efforts in acting and directing.  In 1986, Prince began a series of sporadic live performances called the Hit n Run – Parade Tour. The European tour went to Europe in the summer and ended that September in Japan.After the tour Prince abolished The Revolution, fired Wendy & Lisa and replaced Bobby Z. with Sheila E. Brown Mark quit the band while keyboardist Doctor Fink remained. Prince then recruited new band members Miko Weaver on guitar, Atlanta Bliss on trumpet, Eric Leeds on saxophone, Boni Boyer on keyboards, Levi Seacer, Jr. on bass and dancer Cat Glover. 
Solo again, Sign "O" the Times and spiritual rebirth: 1987–91Prior to the disbanding of The Revolution, Prince was working on two separate projects, The Revolution album Dream Factory and a solo effort, Camille. Draper, p. 76–78  Unlike the three previous band albums, Dream Factory included significant input from the band members and even featured a number of songs with lead vocals by Wendy & Lisa,  while the Camille project saw Prince create a new persona primarily singing in a sped up, female-sounding voice. With the dismissal of The Revolution, Prince consolidated material from both shelved albums, along with some new songs, into a three-LP album to be titled Crystal Ball.  However, Warner Bros. forced Prince to trim the triple album to a double album and Sign "O" the Times was released on March 31, 1987.     The album peaked at No.6 on the Billboard 200 albums chart.  The first single, "Sign o' the Times", would chart at No.3 on the Hot 100.    The follow-up single, "If I Was Your Girlfriend" charted poorly at No.67 on the Hot 100, but went to No.12 on R&B chart.  The third single, a duet with Sheena Easton, "U Got the Look" charted at No.2 on the Hot 100, No.11 on the R&B chart,  and the final single "I Could Never Take the Place of Your Man" finished at No.10 on Hot 100 and No.14 on the R&B chart. Despite receiving the greatest critical acclaim of any album in Prince's career, including being named the top album of the year by the Pazz & Jop critics' poll, and eventually selling 3.2 million copies, album sales steadily declined.  In Europe, however, it performed well and Prince promoted the album overseas with a lengthy tour. Putting together a new backing band from the remnants of The Revolution, Prince added bassist Levi Seacer, Jr., Boni Boyer on keyboards, and dancer/choreographer Cat Glover to go with new drummer Sheila E. and holdovers Miko Weaver, Doctor Fink, Eric Leeds, Atlanta Bliss, and the Bodyguards (Jerome, Wally Safford, and Greg Brooks) for the Sign o' the Times Tour.The tour was a success overseas, with Warner Bros. and Prince's managers wanting to bring it to the U.S. to resuscitate sagging sales of Sign "O" the Times Draper, p. 86–87  ; however, Prince balked at a full U.S. tour, as he was ready to produce a new album.  As a compromise the last two nights of the tour were filmed for release in movie theaters. The film quality was deemed subpar and reshoots were performed at his Paisley Park studios.  The film Sign o' the Times was released on November 20, 1987. Much like the album, the film garnered more critical praise than the previous year's Under the Cherry Moon; however, its box office receipts were minimal, and it quickly left theaters. The next album intended for release was to be The Black Album.  More instrumental and funk and R&B themed than recent releases,  The Black Album also saw Prince experiment with hip hop music on the songs "Bob George" and "Dead on It." Prince was set to release the album with a monochromatic black cover with only the catalog number printed, but after 500,000 copies had been pressed,  Prince had a spiritual epiphany that the album was evil and had it recalled.  It would later be released by Warner Bros. as a limited edition album in 1994. Prince went back in the studio for eight weeks and recorded Lovesexy.Released on May 10, 1988, Lovesexy serves as a spiritual opposite to the dark The Black Album.  Every song is a solo effort by Prince, with exception of "Eye No" which was recorded with his backing band at the time, dubbed the "Lovesexy Band" by fans. Lovesexy would reach No.11 on the Billboard 200 and No.5 on the R&B albums chart.      The lead single, "Alphabet St.", peaked at No.8 on the Hot 100 and No.3 on the R&B chart,  but finished with only selling 750,000 copies. Prince again took his post-Revolution backing band (minus the Bodyguards) on a three leg, 84-show Lovesexy World Tour; although the shows were well received by huge crowds, they lost money due to the expensive sets and incorporated props.  

In 1989, Prince appeared on Madonna's studio album Like a Prayer, co-writing and singing the duet "Love Song" and playing electric guitar (uncredited) on the songs "Like a Prayer", "Keep It Together", and "Act of Contrition". He also began work on a number of musical projects, including Rave Unto the Joy Fantastic and early drafts of his Graffiti Bridge film,   but both were put on hold when he was asked by Batman director Tim Burton to record several songs for the upcoming live-action adaptation. Prince went into the studio and produced an entire nine-track album that Warner Bros. released on June 20, 1989. Batman peaked at No.1 on the Billboard 200,     selling 4.3 million copies.  The single "Batdance" topped the Billboard and R&B charts. Additionally, the single "The Arms of Orion" with Sheena Easton charted at #36, and "Partyman" (also featuring the vocals of Prince's then-girlfriend, nicknamed Anna Fantastic) charted at No.18 on the Hot 100 and at No.5 on the R&B chart, while the love ballad "Scandalous!" went to No.5 on the R&B chart.  However, he did have to sign away all publishing rights to the songs on the album to Warner Bros. as part of the deal to do the soundtrack.In 1990, Prince went back on tour with a revamped band for his stripped down, back-to-basics Nude Tour. With the departures of Boni Boyer, Sheila E., the horns, and Cat, Prince brought in Rosie Gaines on keys, drummer Michael Bland, and dancing trio The Game Boyz (Tony M., Kirky J., and Damon Dickson). The European and Japanese tour was a financial success with its short, greatest hits setlist.  As the year progressed, Prince finished production on his fourth film, Graffiti Bridge, and the album of the same name. Initially, Warner Bros. was reluctant to fund the film, but with Prince's assurances it would be a sequel to Purple Rain as well as the involvement of the original members of The Time, the studio greenlit the project.  Released on August 20, 1990, the album reached No.6 on the Billboard 200 and R&B albums chart.      The single "Thieves in the Temple" reaching No.6 on the Hot 100 and No.1 on the R&B chart.  Also from that album, "Round and Round" placed at number 12 on the U.S. charts and Number 2 on the R&B charts. The song featured the teenage Tevin Campbell (who also had a role in the film) on lead vocals. The film, released on November 20, 1990, was a critical and box office flop, grossing just $4.2 million.  After the release of the film and album, the last remaining members of The Revolution, Miko Weaver and Doctor Fink, left Prince's band.
The New Power Generation, Diamonds and Pearls and name change: 1991–94
1991 marked the debut of Prince's new band, The New Power Generation. With guitarist Miko Weaver and long-time keyboardist Doctor Fink gone, Prince added bass player Sonny T., Tommy Barbarella on keyboards, and a brass section known as the Hornheads to go along with Levi Seacer (taking over on guitar), Rosie Gaines, Michael Bland, and the Game Boyz. With significant input from his band members, Diamonds and Pearls was released on October 1, 1991. Reaching No.3 on the Billboard 200 album chart,  Diamonds and Pearls saw 4 hit singles released in the United States. "Gett Off" peaked at No.21 on the Hot 100 and No.6 on the R&B charts, followed by "Cream" which gave Prince his fifth U.S. number one single. The title track "Diamonds and Pearls" became the album's third single, reaching No.3 on the Hot 100 and the top spot on the R&B charts. "Money Don't Matter 2 Night" peaked at No.23 and No.14 on the Hot 100 and R&B charts respectively.     1992 saw Prince and The New Power Generation release his twelfth album, 'Love Symbol Album',  bearing only an unpronounceable symbol on the cover (later copyrighted as Love Symbol #2).    The album, generally referred to as the Love Symbol Album, would peak at No.5 on the Billboard 200.  While the label wanted "7" to be the first single, Prince fought to have "My Name Is Prince" as he "felt that the song's more hip-hoppery would appeal to the same audience" that had purchased the previous album.  Prince got his way but "My Name Is Prince" only managed to reach No.36 on the Billboard Hot 100 and No.23 on the R&B chart. The follow-up single "Sexy MF" fared worse, charting at No.66 on the Hot 100 and No.76 on the R&B chart. The label's preferred lead single choice "7" would be the album's lone top ten hit, reaching #7.  'Love Symbol Album' would go on to sell 2.8 million copies worldwide. 
After two failed attempts in 1990 and 1991,  Warner Bros. finally released a greatest hits compilation with the three-disc The Hits/The B-Sides in 1993. The first two discs were also sold separately as The Hits 1 and The Hits 2. In addition to featuring the majority of Prince's hit singles (with the exception of "Batdance" and other songs that appeared on the Batman soundtrack), The Hits includes an array of previously hard-to-find recordings, notably B-sides spanning the majority of Prince's career, as well as a handful of previously unreleased tracks such as the Revolution-recorded "Power Fantastic" and a live recording of "Nothing Compares 2 U" with Rosie Gaines. Two new songs, "Pink Cashmere" and "Peach", were chosen as promotional singles to accompany the compilation album.1993 also marked the year in which Prince changed his stage name to the Love Symbol (see left), which was explained as a combination of the symbols for male (♂) and female (♀).  In order to use the symbol in print media, Warner Bros. had to organize a mass mailing of floppy disks with a custom font.   Because the symbol had no stated pronunciation, he was often referred to as "The Artist Formerly Known as Prince", as well as "The Artist".
Increased output and The Gold Experience: 1994–2000In 1994, Prince's attitude towards his artistic output underwent a notable shift. He began to view releasing albums in quick succession as a means of ejecting himself from his contractual obligations to Warner Bros. The label, he believed, was intent on limiting his artistic freedom by insisting that he release albums more sporadically. He also blamed Warner Bros. for the poor commercial performance of the Love Symbol Album, claiming that it was insufficiently marketed by Warner. It was out of these developments that the aborted The Black Album was officially released, approximately seven years after its initial recording and near-release. The "new" release, which was already in wide circulation as a bootleg, sold relatively poorly.Following that disappointing venture, Warner Bros. succumbed to Prince's wishes to release an album of new material, to be entitled Come. When Come was eventually released, it confirmed all of Warner's fears. It became Prince's poorest-selling album to date, struggling to even shift 500,000 copies. Even more frustrating was the fact that Prince insisted on crediting the album to "Prince 1958–1993".Prince pushed to have his next album The Gold Experience released simultaneously with Love Symbol-era material. Warner Bros. allowed the single "The Most Beautiful Girl in the World" to be released via a small, independent distributor, Bellmark Records, in February 1994. The release was successful, reaching No.3 on the U.S. Billboard Hot 100 and No.1 in many other countries, but it would not prove to be a model for subsequent releases. Warner Bros. still resisted releasing The Gold Experience, fearing poor sales and citing "market saturation" as a defense. When eventually released in September 1995, The Gold Experience failed to sell well, although it reached the top 10 of the Billboard 200 initially, and many reviewed it as Prince's best effort since Sign "O" the Times. The album is now out-of-print.
Chaos and Disorder, released in 1996, was Prince's final album of new material for Warner Bros., as well as one of his least commercially successful releases. Prince attempted a major comeback later that year when, free of any further contractual obligations to Warner Bros., he released Emancipation, a 36-song, 3-CD set (each disc was exactly 60 minutes long). The album was released via his own NPG Records with distribution through EMI. To publish his songs on Emancipation, Prince did not use Controversy Music – ASCAP, which he had used for all his records since 1981, but rather used Emancipated Music Inc.  – ASCAP.Certified Platinum by the RIAA, Emancipation is the first record featuring covers by Prince of songs of other artists: Joan Osborne's top ten hit song of 1995 "One of Us";  "Betcha by Golly Wow!" (written by Thomas Randolf Bell and Linda Creed);  "I Can't Make You Love Me" (written by James Allen Shamblin II and Michael Barry Reid);  and "La-La (Means I Love You)" (written by Thomas Randolf Bell and William Hart). Prince released Crystal Ball, a 5-CD collection of unreleased material, in 1998. The distribution of this album was disorderly, with some fans pre-ordering the album on his website up to a year before it was eventually shipped to them; these pre-orders were eventually delivered months after the record had gone on sale in retail stores. The retail edition has only four discs, as it is missing the Kamasutra disc. There are also two different packaging editions for retail, one being in a 4-disc sized jewel case with a simple white cover and the Love Symbol in a colored circle; the other is all four discs in a round translucent snap jewel case. The discs are the same, as is the CD jacket. The Newpower Soul album released three months later failed to make much of an impression on the charts. His collaboration on Chaka Khan's Come 2 My House, and Larry Graham's GCS2000, both released on the NPG Records label around the same time as Newpower Soul met with the same fate, despite heavy promotion and live appearances on Vibe with Sinbad, and the NBC Today show's Summer Concert Series.In 1999, Prince once again signed with a major label, Arista Records, to release a new record, Rave Un2 the Joy Fantastic. In an attempt to make his new album a success, Prince easily gave more interviews than at any other point in his career, appearing on MTV's Total Request Live (with his album cover on the front of the Virgin Megastore, in the background on TRL throughout the whole show), Larry King Live (with Larry Graham) and other media outlets. Nevertheless, Rave Un2 the Joy Fantastic failed to perform well commercially. A few months earlier, Warner Bros. had also released The Vault: Old Friends 4 Sale, a collection of unreleased material recorded by Prince throughout his career, and his final recording commitment on his contract with Warner Bros. The greatest success he had during the year was with the EP 1999: The New Master, released in time for Prince to collect a small portion of the sales dollars Warner Bros. had been seeing for the album and singles of the original 1999.The pay-per-view concert, Rave Un2 the Year 2000, was broadcast on December 31, 1999 and consisted of footage from the December 17 and December 18 concerts of his 1999 tour. The concert featured appearances by many guest musicians including Lenny Kravitz, George Clinton, Jimmy Russell, and The Time. It was released to home video the following year. A remix album, Rave In2 the Joy Fantastic (as opposed to "Un2") was released exclusively through Prince's NPG Music Club in April 2000.
Turnaround and Musicology: 2000–05On May 16, 2000, Prince ceased using the Love Symbol moniker and returned to using "Prince" again, after his publishing contract with Warner/Chappell expired. In a press conference, he stated that, after being freed from undesirable relationships associated with the name "Prince", he would formally revert to using his real name. Prince still frequently uses the symbol as a logo and on album artwork and continues to play a Love Symbol-shaped guitar.For several years following the release of Rave Un2 the Joy Fantastic, Prince primarily released new music through his Internet subscription service, NPGOnlineLtd.com (later NPGMusicClub.com). Two albums that show substantive jazz influence were available commercially at record stores: 2001's The Rainbow Children, and the 2003 instrumental record N.E.W.S which was nominated for a Best Pop Instrumental Album Grammy Award. Another album of largely jazz-influenced music, Xpectation, was released via download in 2003 to members of the NPGMusicClub. Xpectation is jazz themed along with new age and atmospheric themes.In 2002, Prince released his first live album, One Nite Alone... Live!, which features performances from the One Nite Alone...Tour. The 3-CD box set, which also includes a disc of "aftershow" music entitled It Ain't Over!, failed to chart. During this time, Prince sought to engage more effectively with his fan base via the NPG Music Club, pre-concert sound checks, and at yearly "celebrations" at Paisley Park, his music studios. Fans were invited into the studio for tours, interviews, discussions and music-listening sessions. Some of these fan discussions were filmed for an unreleased documentary, directed by Kevin Smith. Smith discusses what happened during those days at length in his An Evening with Kevin Smith DVD. Performances were also arranged to showcase Prince's talents, as well as to collaborate with popular and well-established artists and guests including Alicia Keys, The Time, Erykah Badu, Nikka Costa, George Clinton, and Norah Jones.On February 8, 2004, Prince appeared at the Grammy Awards with Beyoncé Knowles. In a performance that opened the show, Prince and Knowles performed a medley of "Purple Rain", "Let's Go Crazy", "Baby I'm a Star", and Knowles' "Crazy in Love" to positive reviews. The following month, Prince was inducted into the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame. The award was presented to him by Alicia Keys along with Big Boi and André 3000 of OutKast. As well as performing a trio of his own hits during the ceremony, Prince also participated in a tribute to fellow inductee George Harrison in a rendering of Harrison's "While My Guitar Gently Weeps", playing a long guitar solo that ended the song.  In addition he performed "Purple House" on the album Power of Soul: A Tribute to Jimi Hendrix.On February 19, The Tavis Smiley Show broadcast included a performance of "Reflection" from Prince's Musicology album. Prince was accompanied by Wendy Melvoin, formerly of The Revolution.In April 2004, Prince released Musicology through a one-album agreement with Columbia Records. The album rose as high as the top five on a number of international charts (including the U.S, UK, Germany and Australia). The U.S. chart success was assisted by the CD being included as part of the concert ticket purchase, and each CD thereby qualifying (as chart rules then stood) towards U.S. chart placement. Musicology is R&B and soul themed along with funk, pop, quiet storm, and rock.That same year, Rolling Stone magazine named Prince as the highest-earning musician in the world, with an annual income of $56.5 million,  largely due to his Musicology Tour, which Pollstar named as the top concert draw among musicians in U.S. The artist played an impressive run of 96 concerts; the average ticket price for a show was U.S.$61. Further highlighting the success of the album, Prince's Musicology went on to receive two Grammy wins, for Best Male R&B Vocal Performance for "Call My Name" and Best Traditional R&B Vocal Performance for the title track. Musicology was also nominated for Best R&B Song and Best R&B Album, while "Cinnamon Girl" was nominated for Best Male Pop Vocal Performance. The album became the artist's most commercially successful since Diamonds and Pearls, partly due to a radical scheme devised which included in Billboard's sales figures those that were distributed to each customer during ticket sales for the Musicology tour, with concert figures accounting for 25% of the total album sales. Rolling Stone magazine has ranked Prince No.27 on their list of 100 Greatest Artists of All Time. In April 2005, Prince played guitar (along with En Vogue singing backing vocals) on Stevie Wonder's single "So What the Fuss", Wonder's first since 1999. In the aftermath of Hurricane Katrina, which devastated the city of New Orleans on August 29, 2005, Prince offered a personal response by recording two new songs, "S.S.T." and the instrumental "Brand New Orleans", at Paisley Park in the early hours of September 2. Prince again performed all instrumental and vocal parts. These recordings were quickly dispersed to the public via Prince's NPG Music Club, and "S.S.T." was later picked up by iTunes, where it reached No.1 on the store's R&B chart. On October 25, Sony Records released a version of the single on CD.
Move to Universal and 3121: 2005–06In late 2005 Prince signed with Universal Records to release his album, 3121, on March 21, 2006 (3/21). The first single was the Latin-tinged "Te Amo Corazón", the video for which was directed by actress Salma Hayek and filmed in Marrakech, Morocco, featuring Argentine actress and singer Mía Maestro. The video for the second single, "Black Sweat", was nominated at the MTV VMAs for Best Cinematography. The immediate success of 3121 gave Prince his first No.1 debut on the Billboard 200 with the album.To promote the new album, Prince was the musical guest on Saturday Night Live on February 4, 2006, seventeen years after his last SNL appearance on the 15th anniversary special and nearly 25 years since his first appearance on a regular episode in 1981, making Prince the only SNL musical guest to have that long of a gap between appearances. He performed two songs from the album, "Fury" and "Beautiful, Loved & Blessed", with Támar. Prince also held a contest to win a trip to see a 'Purple Ticket Concert' at his private residence in Hollywood, California. Seven winning tickets were placed inside 3121 CD packages in the U.S., and other tickets were given away in various contests on the Internet and around the world. On May 6, 2006, twenty-four prize winners (with a guest each) attended a star-studded private party and performance at Prince's home.On June 12, 2006, Prince received a Webby Lifetime Achievement Award in recognition of his "visionary" use of the Internet; Prince was the first major artist to release an entire album, 1997's Crystal Ball, exclusively on the Internet (although he did take phone orders for it as well...1-800-NEW-FUNK).Only weeks after winning a Webby Award, Prince abruptly shut down his then-official NPG Music Club website at 12:00 am on July 4, 2006 after over five years of operation. The NPG Music Club sent out an email, claiming that "in its current 4m there is a feeling that the NPGMC gone as far as it can go. In a world without limitations and infinite possibilities, has the time come 2 once again make a leap of faith and begin anew? These r ?s we in the NPG need 2 answer. In doing so, we have decided 2 put the club on hiatus until further notice." On the day of the music club's shutdown, a lawsuit was filed against Prince by the British company HM Publishing (owners of the Nature Publishing Group, also NPG). Despite these events occurring on the same day, Prince's attorney has called it pure coincidence and stated that the site did not close due to the trademark dispute. Prince appeared at multiple award ceremonies in 2006. On February 15, 2006, Prince performed at the BRIT Awards along with Wendy & Lisa and Sheila E. He played "Te Amo Corazón" and "Fury" from 3121 and "Purple Rain" and "Let's Go Crazy" from Purple Rain. On June 27, 2006, Prince appeared at the BET Awards, where he was awarded Best Male R&B Artist. In addition to receiving his award, Prince performed a medley of Chaka Khan songs for Khan's BET Lifetime Award. Prince had previously written and performed several songs with the singer. In November 2006, Prince was inducted into the UK Music Hall of Fame, appearing to collect his award but not performing. Also in November 2006, Prince opened a nightclub named 3121 in Las Vegas at the Rio All Suite Hotel and Casino. He performed weekly on Friday and Saturday nights until April 2007, when his contract with the Rio ended.On August 22, 2006, Prince released Ultimate Prince. The double disc set contains one CD of previous hits, and another of extended versions and mixes of material that had largely only previously been available on vinyl record B-sides.Prince wrote and performed a song for the hit 2006 animated film Happy Feet. The song, entitled "The Song of the Heart", appears on the film's soundtrack, which also features a cover of Prince's earlier hit "Kiss", sung by Nicole Kidman and Hugh Jackman. In January 2007, "The Song of the Heart" won a Golden Globe for Best Original Song.   Prince arrived late, apparently due to traffic problems, and thus was unable to make an acceptance speech, but actor Hugh Grant prompted him later in the ceremony to take a bow.
Super Bowl XLI and Planet Earth: 2007–08
On February 2, 2007, Prince played at the Super Bowl XLI press conference. He and the band played a set comprising Chuck Berry's hit, "Johnny B. Goode", "Anotherloverholenyohead" from Parade and "Get On the Boat" from 3121. Prince performed at the Super Bowl XLI halftime show in Miami, Florida on February 4, 2007. The performance consisted of three Purple Rain tracks ("Let's Go Crazy", "Baby I'm a Star" and the title track), along with cover versions of "We Will Rock You" by Queen, "All Along the Watchtower" by Bob Dylan, the Foo Fighters song "Best of You" and "Proud Mary" by Creedence Clearwater Revival. Coincidentally, Miami had rain on the day of the Super Bowl, which was lit purple during the performance of "Purple Rain". He played on a large stage shaped as his symbol. The event was carried to 140 million television viewers, the largest audience of his life. On February 4, 2010, Billboard.com ranked the performance as the greatest Super Bowl performance ever.   Retrieved on February 5, 2007 Prince played 21 concerts in London during the summer of 2007. The Earth Tour included 21 nights at the 20,000 capacity O2 Arena, with Maceo Parker in his band. Tickets for the O2 Arena were priced at £31.21 (including a free copy of Prince's latest album), in order to make the concerts "affordable for everybody". The residency at the O2 Arena was increased to 15 nights after all 140,000 tickets for the original seven sold out in just 20 minutes.  It was then further extended to 21 nights. On May 10, 2007, Prince performed a 'secret' gig at London's KOKO in front of a small crowd of fans and celebrities. Tickets went on sale that morning on a first-come-first-served basis (again at £31.21). A prelude to the forthcoming summer gigs in London, Prince played a relaxed set of classic hits ("Kiss", changing the lyric from "You don't have to watch Dynasty" to Desperate Housewives, "Girls & Boys", and "Nothing Compares 2 U") alongside more recent tracks, plus a well-received cover version of Gnarls Barkley's "Crazy".Prince made an appearance at the 2007 ALMA Awards, performing with Sheila E. in June 2007. On June 28, 2007, the UK national newspaper The Mail on Sunday revealed that it had made a deal to give Prince's new album, Planet Earth, away for free with an "imminent" edition of the paper, making it the first place in the world to get the album. This move sparked controversy among music distributors and also led the UK arm of Prince's distributor, Sony BMG, to withdraw from distributing the album in UK stores.  The UK's largest high street music retailer, HMV, decided to stock the paper on release day due to the giveaway. Planet Earth is rock-oriented along with disco, and other various music styles.On July 7, 2007 Prince returned to his hometown of Minneapolis to perform three shows in what was unofficially declared Prince Day in Minnesota. He performed concerts at the Macy's Auditorium (to promote his new perfume "3121") on Nicollet Mall, the Target Center arena, and First Avenue.  It was the first time he had played at First Avenue (the club appeared in the film Purple Rain) since 1987. On April 25, 2008, Prince performed on The Tonight Show with Jay Leno, where he debuted a new song, "Turn Me Loose". Days after, he headlined the Coachella Festival 2008. Prince was paid more than $5 million for his performance at Coachella, according to Reuters. Prince cancelled a concert, planned at Dublin's Croke Park on June 16, 2008, at just 10 days' notice. In October 2009 promoters MCD Productions went to court to sue Prince for €1.6 million, after paying him $1.5 million, half his agreed fee of $3 million for the concert. MCD claim they had to refund 55,126 tickets purchased and its total losses exceeded $1.66 million. Prince's lawyers argued the MCD claim was "greatly inflated".   Prince settled the case out of court in February 2010 for $2.95 million.   During the trial, it was revealed that Prince had been offered $22 million for seven concerts as part of a proposed 2008 European tour. In October 2008, Prince released a live album entitled Indigo Nights, as well as 21 Nights, an accompanying book of poems, lyrics and photos. The book chronicled his record-breaking tenure at London's O2 Arena in 2007, while the album is a collection of songs performed live at aftershows in the IndigO2.
LOtUSFLOW3R and beyond: 2008–10On December 18, 2008, Prince premiered four songs from his new album on LA's Indie rock radio station Indie 103.1.  The radio station's programmers Max Tolkoff and Mark Sovel had been invited to Prince's home to hear the new rock oriented music. Prince then surprised the two by giving them a CD with 4 songs to premiere on their radio station. The music debuted the next day on Jonesy's Jukebox, hosted by Sex Pistol Steve Jones.   The music comprised a cover of "Crimson and Clover" by Tommy James and the Shondells, together with "Colonized Mind", "Wall of Berlin" and "4ever". The same day, another new Prince composition entitled "(There'll Never B) Another Like Me" premiered on the now obsolete and defunct website, mplsound.com — replacing a shorter, instrumental version of the song which streamed several days previously.On January 3, 2009, a new website LotusFlow3r.com was launched, streaming some of the recently-aired material ("Crimson and Clover", "(There'll Never B) Another Like Me" and "Here Eye Come") and promising opportunities to listen to and buy music by Prince and guests, watch videos and buy concert tickets for future events. On January 31, Prince released two more songs on LotusFlow3r.com: "Disco Jellyfish", and "Another Boy". "Chocolate Box", "Colonized Mind", and "All This Love" have since been released on the website.Prince released a triple album set containing LOtUSFLOW3R, MPLSoUND, and an album credited to his new protégé, Bria Valente, called Elixer, on March 24, 2009, followed by a physical release on March 29. The release was preceded by performances on The Tonight Show with Jay Leno and The Ellen DeGeneres Show. It was released in other countries digitally, with official physical release dates yet to be announced. The album peaked at No.2 on the Billboard 200, and critics' opinions were mixed to positive.On July 18, 2009, Prince performed two shows at the Montreux Jazz Festival, being backed by The New Power Generation including Rhonda Smith, Renato Neto and John Blackwell. There he played "A Large Room with No Light" which had been in Prince's "vault" for some time.On October 11, 2009, Prince gave two surprise concerts at the glass-and-iron Grand Palais exhibition hall after visiting the landmark Paris building on the banks of the Seine.  On October 12, he gave another surprise gig at La Cigale. On October 24, Prince played a concert at his own Paisley Park complex in Minneapolis, Minnesota. 
20Ten, rejection of the Internet and Welcome 2: 2010–presentIn January 2010, Prince wrote a new song, "Purple and Gold", inspired by his visit to a Minnesota Vikings football game against the Dallas Cowboys.    The song is a simple, drumline-driven track. The following month, Prince let Minneapolis-area public radio station 89.3 The Current premiere his new song "Cause and Effect" as a gesture in support of independent radio. In a poll by BBC Radio 6 Music listeners in April 2010, Prince was ranked the eighth-best guitarist of the previous 30 years.    Prince was also listed in TIME magazine's 2010 annual ranking of the "100 Most Influential People in the World". Prince released a new single on Minneapolis radio station 89.3 The Current called "Hot Summer" on June 7, his 52nd birthday. Also in June, Prince appeared on the cover of the July 2010 issue of Ebony,  and he received the Lifetime Achievement Award at the 2010 BET Awards. Prince released his album 20Ten in July 2010 as a free covermount with publications in the UK, Belgium, Germany, and France.  Prince has refused access to the album to digital download services. He also closed his official website, LotusFlow3r.com. In an interview with the Daily Mirror, Prince said, "The Internet's completely over. I don't see why I should give my new music to iTunes or anyone else. They won't pay me an advance for it and then they get angry when they can't get it... Anyway, all these computers and digital gadgets are no good. They just fill your head with numbers and that can't be good for you." On July 4, 2010 Prince began his 20Ten Tour, a concert tour in two legs with shows in Europe. The second leg began on October 15  and ended with a concert following the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix on November 14.  The second half of the tour has a new band, John Blackwell, Ida Kristine Nielsen, and Sheila E.  Prince let Europe 1 debut the snippet of his new song "Rich Friends" from the "new" album 20Ten Deluxe on October 8, 2010.  Prince started the Welcome 2 Tour on December 15, 2010. Prince was inducted in the Grammy Hall of Fame on December 7, 2010. On February 12, 2011, Prince presented Barbra Streisand with an award and donated $1.5 million to charities.  On the same day, it was reported that he was unimpressed about Glee covering his hit "Kiss", and that he had not authorised this. On the May 18, 2011, it was announced that Prince would be headlining Hop Farm Festival on July 3, 2011, marking his first UK show since 2007 and his first ever UK festival appearance. Despite having previously rejected the internet for music distribution, on 24 November 2011 Prince re-released a reworked version of the song "Extraloveable". The track first appeared on his 1999 album Bootleg Collection Vol. 1 and is available online through both iTunes and Spotify.    Purple Music, a Switzerland based record label releases a cd single "Dance 4 Me" on Dec 12th, 2011 as part of a club remixes package including Bria Valente CD single "2 Nite" released on Feb 23rd, 2012 . The Cd features club remixes by Jamie Lewis and David Alexander, produced by Prince.  
Personal lifeOver the years Prince has been romantically linked with many celebrities, including Kim Basinger, Madonna, Vanity, Sheila E., Carmen Electra, Susanna Hoffs, Anna Fantastic,  Sherilyn Fenn,  and Susan Moonsie of Vanity 6 and Apollonia 6.   Prince was engaged to Susannah Melvoin in 1985. He married his backup singer and dancer, Mayte Garcia, on Valentine's Day, 1996. They had a son, Boy Gregory (born October 16, 1996), who was born with Pfeiffer syndrome and died a week after birth.  Prince and Mayte divorced in 1999. In 2001, Prince married Manuela Testolini in a private ceremony. Testolini filed for divorce in May 2006.  He has been in a relationship with protégée Bria Valente since 2007.   Prince became a member of the Jehovah's Witnesses in 2001 following a two-year-long debate with friend and fellow Jehovah's Witness, musician Larry Graham. Prince said he didn't consider it a conversion, but a "realization"; "It's like Morpheus and Neo in The Matrix", he explained. He attends meetings at a local Kingdom Hall and occasionally knocks on people's doors to discuss his faith.  Prince has reportedly needed double-hip-replacement surgery since 2005 but won't undergo the operation unless it is a bloodless surgery because Jehovah's Witnesses do not accept blood transfusions.  The condition is rumored to be aggravated by repeated onstage dancing in high-heeled boots.  However, when Prince was interviewed in 2010, journalist Peter Willis said he believed the rumors of Prince needing double hip surgery to be unfounded and untrue as Prince appeared to be agile. Prince is a vegetarian. In 2006 he was voted the "world's sexiest vegetarian" in PETA's annual online poll.   The liner notes for his album Rave Un2 the Joy Fantastic featured a message about the cruelty involved in wool production. Since 2008, Prince has been managed by UK based Kiran Sharma owner of Kikit Entertainment.  Prince is a supporter of the Minneapolis football team Minnesota Vikings.  He resides near Minneapolis, Minnesota and is considering buying a home in France. In June 2011, Prince was quoted in The Guardian as saying "It's fun being in Islamic countries, to know there's only one religion. There's order. You wear a burqa. There's no choice. People are happy with that." 
Stage namesIn 1993, during negotiations regarding the release of Prince's album The Gold Experience, a legal battle ensued between Warner Bros. and Prince over the artistic and financial control of Prince's output. During the lawsuit, Prince appeared in public with the word "slave" written on his cheek. Prince explained his name change as follows: Prince is a trademark owned by Paisley Park Enterprises Inc. It was initially filed with the United States Patent and Trademark Office (USPTO) in 2005 in the categories of printed materials, clothing, electronic commerce, and entertainment services based on first commercial in 1978.  Various searches to the USPTO did not find any registrations or transfers of "Prince" or related names by Warner Bros. In 1991, PRN Music Corporation assigned the trademarks Prince, The Time, Paisley Park, New Power Generation, and Prince and the Revolution to Paisley Park Enterprises. Prince has used pseudonyms to separate himself from the music (either his own or that of others) for which he has had input;  "I was just getting tired of seeing my name," he said, "If you give away an idea, you still own that idea. In fact, giving it away strengthens it. Why do people feel they have to take credit for everything they do? Ego, that's the only reason."  These pseudonyms include: Jamie Starr and The Starr Company (for the songs he wrote for The Time and many other artists from 1981–1984),   Joey Coco (for many unreleased Prince songs in the late 1980s, as well as songs written for Sheena Easton & Kenny Rogers),  Paisley Park (occasionally used in the early 1990s for his production credits on songs, including those written for Martika and Kid Creole),  Alexander Nevermind (for writing the 1984 song "Sugar Walls" by Sheena Easton),  and Christopher (used for his song writing credit of "Manic Monday" for The Bangles). 
Copyright issuesOn September 14, 2007, Prince announced that he was going to sue YouTube and eBay because they "are clearly able [to] filter porn and pedophile material but appear to choose not to filter out the unauthorized music and film content which is core to their business success."  Web Sheriff, the international Internet policing company he hired, told Reuters: "The problem is that one can reduce it to zero and then the next day there will be 100 or 500 or whatever. This carries on ad nauseam at Prince's expense."  In October 2007, Stephanie Lenz filed a lawsuit against Universal Music Publishing Group, claiming they were abusing copyright law, after the music publisher had YouTube take down Lenz's home movie in which the Prince song "Let's Go Crazy" played faintly in the background. On November 5, 2007, several fan sites of Prince formed "Prince Fans United" to fight back against legal requests they claim Prince made to cease and desist all use of photographs, images, lyrics, album covers and anything linked to Prince's likeness.  While Prince's lawyers claimed that the use of such representations constituted copyright infringement, the Prince Fans United claimed that the legal actions were "attempts to stifle all critical commentary about Prince." A few days later, Prince released a statement denying the fansites' claims, stating "The action taken earlier this week was not to shut down fansites, or control comment in any way. The issue was simply to do with in regards to copyright and trademark of images and only images, and no lawsuits have been filed." The statement from AEG, Prince's promoter, asserted that the only "offending items" on the three fansites were live shots from Prince's 21 nights in London at the O2 Arena earlier in the year. On November 8, 2007, Prince Fans United received a song named "PFUnk", providing a kind of "unofficial answer" to their movement. The song, originally debuted on the PFU main site,  was retitled "F.U.N.K." and is available on iTunes.On November 14, 2007, it was reported that the satirical website b3ta.com had pulled their "image challenge of the week" devoted to Prince after legal threats from the star under the Digital Millennium Copyright Act. B3ta co-founder Rob Manuel wrote on the site:
"Under threat of legal action from Prince's legal team of 'potential closure of your web site' – We have removed the Prince image challenge and B3ta apologizes unreservedly to AEG / NPG and Prince for any offence caused. We also ask our members to avoid photoshopping Prince and posting them on our boards. At the 2008 Coachella Music Festival, Prince performed a cover of Radiohead's "Creep", but immediately after he forced YouTube and other sites to remove footage that fans had taken of the performance, despite Radiohead's demand for it to remain on the website.  Days later, YouTube reinstated the videos, while Radiohead claimed "it's our song, let people hear it." In 2009, Prince put the video of that Coachella performance on his then-official website LotusFlow3r.com.
Discography 
Prince has sold over 100 million records worldwide in his career. 
 
 

For You (1978)
Prince (1979)
Dirty Mind (1980)
Controversy (1981)
1999 (1982)
Purple Rain (1984)
Around the World in a Day (1985)
Parade (1986)
Sign "O" the Times (1987)
Lovesexy (1988)
Batman (1989)
Graffiti Bridge (1990)
Diamonds and Pearls (1991)
Love Symbol Album  (1992)
Come (1994)
The Black Album (1994)
The Gold Experience (1995)
Chaos and Disorder (1996)
Emancipation (1996)
Crystal Ball (1998)
Rave Un2 the Joy Fantastic (1999)
The Rainbow Children (2001)
One Nite Alone... (2002)
Xpectation (2003)
C-Note (2003)
N.E.W.S (2003)
The Chocolate Invasion (2004)
The Slaughterhouse (2004)
Musicology (2004)
3121 (2006)
Planet Earth (2007)
Lotusflow3r / MPLSound (2009)
20Ten (2010)
 
Filmography

Year Film Role Director 
1984 Purple Rain The Kid   
1986 Under the Cherry Moon Christopher Tracy Prince 
1987 Sign o' the Times Himself Prince 
1990 Graffiti Bridge The Kid Prince 

Tours 

Prince Tour (1979–80)
Dirty Mind Tour (1980–81)
Controversy Tour (1981–82)
1999 Tour (1982–83)
Purple Rain Tour (1984–85)
Parade Tour (1986)
Sign o' the Times Tour (1987)
Lovesexy Tour (1988–89)
Nude Tour (1990)
Diamonds and Pearls Tour (1992)
Act I and II (1993)
The Ultimate Live Experience (1995)
Gold Tour (1996)
Love 4 One Another Charities Tour (1997)
Jam of the Year Tour (1997–98)
New Power Soul Tour/Festival (1998)
Hit n Run Tour (2000–01)
A Celebration (2001)
One Nite Alone... Tour (2002)
2003–2004 World Tour (2003–04)
Musicology Live 2004ever (2004)
Per4ming Live 3121 (2006–07)
21 Nights in London: The Earth Tour (2007)
20Ten Tour (2010)
Welcome 2 (2010–12)
 
Awards and nominations
Grammy AwardsEarning 33 nominations, Prince has won seven Grammys. He also has had two albums − 1999 and Purple Rain − awarded the Grammy Hall of Fame Award.

Year Nominated work Award category Result 
1984 "International Lover" Best Male R&B Vocal Performance   
1985 Purple Rain Album of the Year   
Purple Rain Best Rock Performance by a Duo or Group with Vocal   
Purple Rain Best Score Soundtrack Album for a Motion Picture, Television or Other Visual Media   
"I Feel for You" Best R&B Song   
1987 "Kiss" Best R&B Performance by a Duo or Group with Vocal   
"Kiss" Best R&B Song   
1988 Sign "O" the Times Album of the Year   
"U Got the Look" Best R&B Performance by a Duo or Group with Vocal   
"U Got the Look" Best R&B Song   
1990 Batman Best Male Pop Vocal Performance   
"Batdance" Best Male R&B Vocal Performance   
1991 "Nothing Compares 2 U" Song of the Year   
1992 "Gett Off" Best R&B Performance by a Duo or Group with Vocal   
1993 "Diamonds and Pearls" Best Pop Performance by a Duo or Group with Vocal   
1995 "The Most Beautiful Girl in the World" Best Male Pop Vocal Performance   
1996 "Eye Hate U" Best Male R&B Vocal Performance   
The Gold Experience Best R&B Album   
2004 N.E.W.S. Best Pop Instrumental Album   
2005 "Cinnamon Girl" Best Male Pop Vocal Performance   
"Call My Name" Best Male R&B Vocal Performance   
"Call My Name" Best R&B Song   
"Musicology" Best Traditional R&B Vocal Performance   
Musicology Best R&B Album   
2007 "Black Sweat" Best Male R&B Vocal Performance   
"Beautiful, Loved and Blessed" Best R&B Performance by a Duo or Group with Vocal   
"3121" Best Urban/Alternative Performance   
"Black Sweat" Best R&B Song   
3121 Best R&B Album   
2008 "Future Baby Mama" Best Male R&B Vocal Performance   
"The Song of the Heart" Best Song Written for a Motion Picture, Television or Other Visual Media   
2010 "Dreamer" Best Solo Rock Vocal Performance   

MTV Video Music AwardsThe MTV Video Music Awards (VMAs) is an award show by cable network MTV to honor the top music videos of the year. It was first held in September of 1984 and was originally meant as an alternative to the Grammy Awards in the video category.  Prince has won four awards from twelve nominations throughout his career.

Year Nominated work Award category Result 
   "When Doves Cry"  Best Choreography in a Video    
   "Raspberry Beret"  Best Choreography in a Video    
  "U Got the Look" Best Male Video    
Best Stage Performance in a Video    
Best Choreography in a Video    
Best Editing in a Video    
   "I Wish U Heaven"  Best Special Effects in a Video    
   "Batdance"  Best Video from a Film    
   "Cream"  Best Dance Video    
   "7"  Best R&B Video    
   "Musicology"  Best Male Video    
   "Black Sweat"  Best Cinematography in a Video    

See also 

List of best-selling music artists
List of best-selling music artists in the United States
Unreleased Prince projects


References 
Further reading

 
 
 
 


External links 

 
 
 
Prince at Billboard.com
 
  
 
DEFAULTSORT





































 
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Julius Caesar (play)
 
 
 

The Tragedy of Julius Caesar, also known simply as Julius Caesar, is a tragedy by William Shakespeare, believed to have been written in 1599.  It portrays the 44 BC conspiracy against
the Roman dictator Julius Caesar, his assassination and the defeat of the conspirators at the Battle of Philippi. It is one of several Roman plays that Shakespeare wrote, based on true events from Roman history, which also include Coriolanus and Antony and Cleopatra.Although the title of the play is Julius Caesar, Caesar is not the most visible character in its action; he appears in only three scenes, and is killed at the beginning of the third act.  Marcus Brutus speaks more than four times as many lines, and the central psychological drama is his struggle between the conflicting demands of honour, patriotism, and friendship.
Characters 
 

Julius Caesar
Calpurnia: Wife of Caesar
Octavius, Mark Antony, Lepidus: Triumvirs after the death of Julius Caesar
Cicero, Publius, Popilius Lena: Senators
Brutus, Cassius, Casca, Trebonius, Ligarius, Decius Brutus, Metellus Cimber, Cinna: Conspirators against Julius Caesar
Portia: Wife of Brutus
Flavius and Marullus: Tribunes
Artemidorus: a Sophist of Cnidos
A Soothsayer
 

Cinna: A poet, who is not related to the conspiracy
Lucilius, Titinius, Messala, Cato the Younger, Volumnius, Strato: Friends to Brutus and Cassius
Varro, Clitus, Claudius: Soldiers in the armies of Brutus and Cassius
Labe, Flavius: Officers in the army of Brutus
Lucius, Dardanius: Servants to Brutus
Pindarus: Servant to Cassius
A Poet (believed to be based on Marcus Favonius) 
A messenger
A cobbler
A carpenter
Other soldiers, senators, plebeians, and attendants
 
SynopsisMarcus Brutus is Caesar's close friend and a Roman praetor. Brutus allows himself to be cajoled into joining a group of conspiring senators because of a growing suspicion—implanted by Caius Cassius—that Caesar intends to turn republican Rome into a monarchy under his own rule.The early scenes deal mainly with Brutus's arguments with Cassius and his struggle with his own conscience. The growing tide of public support soon turns Brutus against Caesar (this public support was actually faked; Cassius wrote letters to Brutus in different handwritings over the next month in order to get Brutus to join the conspiracy). A soothsayer warns Caesar to "beware the Ides of March,"  which he ignores, culminating in his assassination at the Capitol by the conspirators that day, despite being warned by the soothsayer and Artemidrous, one of Caesar's supporters at the entrance of the Capitol.Caesar's assassination is one of the most famous scenes of the play, occurring in Act 3 (the other is Mark Antony's oration "Friends, Romans, countrymen".) After ignoring the soothsayer as well as his wife's own premonitions, Caesar comes to the Senate. The conspirators create a superficial motive for the assassination by means of a petition brought by Metellus Cimber, pleading on behalf of his banished brother. As Caesar, predictably, rejects the petition, Casca grazes Caesar in the back of his neck, and the others follow in stabbing him; Brutus is last. At this point, Caesar utters the famous line "Et tu, Brute?"  ("And you, Brutus?", i.e. "You too, Brutus?"). Shakespeare has him add, "Then fall, Caesar," suggesting that Caesar did not want to survive such treachery.The conspirators make clear that they committed this act for Rome, not for their own purposes and do not attempt to flee the scene. After Caesar's death, Brutus delivers an oration defending his actions, and for the moment, the crowd is on his side. However, Mark Antony, with a subtle and eloquent speech over Caesar's corpse—beginning with the much-quoted "Friends, Romans, countrymen, lend me your ears" —deftly turns public opinion against the assassins by manipulating the emotions of the common people, in contrast to the rational tone of Brutus's speech. Antony rouses the mob to drive the conspirators from Rome. Amid the violence, the innocent poet, Cinna, is confused with the conspirator Lucius Cinna and is murdered by the mob.The beginning of Act Four is marked by the quarrel scene, where Brutus attacks Cassius for soiling the noble act of regicide by accepting bribes ("Did not great Julius bleed for justice' sake? / What villain touch'd his body, that did stab, / And not for justice?" ) The two are reconciled; they prepare for war with Mark Antony and Caesar's adopted son, Octavian (Shakespeare's spelling: Octavius). That night, Caesar's ghost appears to Brutus with a warning of defeat ("thou shalt see me at Philippi" ).At the battle, Cassius and Brutus knowing they will probably both die, smile their last smiles to each other and hold hands. During the battle, Cassius commits suicide after hearing of the capture of his best friend, Titinius. After Titinius, who wasn't really captured, sees Cassius's corpse, he commits suicide. However, Brutus wins that stage of the battle - but his victory is not conclusive. With a heavy heart, Brutus battles again the next day. He loses and commits suicide.The play ends with a tribute to Brutus by Antony, who proclaims that Brutus has remained "the noblest Roman of them all"  because he was the only conspirator who acted for the good of Rome. There is then a small hint at the friction between Mark Antony and Octavius which will characterise another of Shakespeare's Roman plays, Antony and Cleopatra.
 
Date and text
Julius Caesar was originally published in the First Folio of 1623, but a performance was mentioned by Thomas Platter the Younger in his diary in September 1599. The play is not mentioned in the list of Shakespeare's plays published by Francis Meres in 1598. Based on these two points, as well as a number of contemporary allusions, and the belief that the play is similar to Hamlet in vocabulary, and to Henry V and As You Like It in metre,  scholars have suggested 1599 as a probable date. The text of Julius Caesar in the First Folio is the only authoritative text for the play. The Folio text is notable for its quality and consistency; scholars judge it to have been set into type from a theatrical prompt-book.   The source used by Shakespeare was Sir Thomas North's translation of Plutarch's Life of Brutus and Life of Caesar The play contains many anachronistic elements from the Elizabethan period. The characters mention objects such as hats and doublets (large, heavy jackets) – neither of which existed in ancient Rome. Caesar is mentioned to be wearing an Elizabethan doublet instead of a Roman toga. At one point a clock is heard to strike and Brutus notes it with "Count the clock".
Deviations from Plutarch

Shakespeare makes Caesar's triumph take place on the day of Lupercalia (15 February) instead of six months earlier. 
For greater dramatic effect he has made the Capitol the venue of Caesar's death rather than the Theatrum Pompeium (Theatre of Pompey).
Caesar's murder, the funeral, Antony's oration, the reading of the will and the arrival of Octavius all take place on the same day in the play. However, historically, the assassination took place on 15 March (The Ides of March), the will was published on 18 March, the funeral was on 20 March and Octavius arrived only in May.
Shakespeare makes the Triumvirs meet in Rome instead of near Bolonia, so as to avoid an additional locale.
He has combined the two Battles of Philippi although there was a 20 day interval between them.
Shakespeare gives Caesar's last words as "Et tu, Brute? Then fall, Caesar!" ("And you, Brutus? Then fall, Caesar."). Plutarch says he said nothing, pulling his toga over his head when he saw Brutus among the conspirators.  However, Suetonius reports his last words, which he spoke in Greek, as "καί σύ τέκνον" ("Kai su, teknon?"; "Even you too, child?") directed at Brutus.  The Latin words Et tu, Brute?, however, were not devised by Shakespeare for this play, since they are attributed to Caesar in earlier Elizabethan works and had become conventional by 1599.

Shakespeare deviated from these historical facts in order to curtail time and compress the facts so that the play could be staged more easily. The tragic force is condensed into a few scenes for heightened effect.
Analysis and criticism 
Historicism
Maria Wyke has written that the play reflects the general anxiety of Elizabethan England over succession of leadership. At the time of its creation and first performance, Queen Elizabeth, a strong ruler, was elderly and had refused to name a successor, leading to worries that a civil war similar to that of Rome might break out after her death. 
Protagonist debateCritics of Shakespeare’s play Julius Caesar differ greatly on their views of Caesar and Brutus. Many have debated whether Caesar or Brutus is the protagonist of the play, because of the title character's death in 3.1. But Caesar compares himself to the Northern Star, and perhaps it would be foolish not to consider him as the axial character of the play, around whom the entire story turns. Intertwined in this debate is a smattering of philosophical and psychological ideologies on republicanism and monarchism. One author, Robert C. Reynolds, devotes attention to the names or epithets given to both Brutus and Caesar in his essay “Ironic Epithet in Julius Caesar”. This author points out that Casca praises Brutus at face value, but then inadvertently compares him to a disreputable joke of a man by calling him an alchemist, “Oh, he sits high in all the people’s hearts,/And that which would appear offence in us/ His countenance, like richest alchemy,/ Will change to virtue and to worthiness” (I.iii.158-60). Reynolds also talks about Caesar and his “Colossus” epithet, which he points out has its obvious connotations of power and manliness, but also lesser known connotations of an outward glorious front and inward chaos.  In that essay, the conclusion as to who is the hero or protagonist is ambiguous because of the conceit-like poetic quality of the epithets for Caesar and Brutus.Myron Taylor, in his essay “Shakespeare’s Julius Caesar and the Irony of History”, compares the logic and philosophies of Caesar and Brutus. Caesar is deemed an intuitive philosopher who is always right when he goes with his gut, for instance when he says he fears Cassius as a threat to him before he is killed, his intuition is correct. Brutus is portrayed as a man similar to Caesar, but whose passions lead him to the wrong reasoning, which he realises in the end when he says in V.v.50–51, “Caesar, now be still:/ I kill’d not thee with half so good a will”.  This interpretation is flawed by the fact it relies on a very odd reading of "good a will" to mean "incorrect judgements" rather than the more intuitive "good intentions."Joseph W. Houppert acknowledges that some critics have tried to cast Caesar as the protagonist, but that ultimately Brutus is the driving force in the play and is therefore the tragic hero. Brutus attempts to put the republic over his personal relationship with Caesar and kills him. Brutus makes the political mistakes that bring down the republic that his ancestors created. He acts on his passions, does not gather enough evidence to make reasonable decisions and is manipulated by Cassius and the other conspirators. Traditional readings of the play may maintain that Cassius and the other conspirators are motivated largely by envy and ambition, whereas Brutus is motivated by the demands of honour and patriotism. But one of the central strengths of the play is that it resists categorising its characters as either simple heroes or villains. The political journalist and classicist Garry Wills maintains that "This play is distinctive because it has no villains".   It is a drama famous for the difficulty of deciding which role to emphasize. The characters rotate around each other like the plates of a Calder mobile. Touch one and it affects the position of all the others. Raise one, another sinks. But they keep coming back into a precarious balance.  Wills' contemporary interpretation leans more toward recognition of the conscious, sub-conscious nature of human actions and interactions.  And in this the role of Cassius becomes paramount.The conspirators know Caesar.  He has defeated opponents on the battlefield and conquered for Rome, half the known world.  He has vanquished his political, governmental, military and bureaucratic, opponents in Italy and Rome.  He has beaten them in fair and unfair fights; he has outmaneuvered them into hopelessness; he has cajoled them to declaim their positions and accept his mastery; he has appeased them, allied with them, and then absorbed them, leaving only Caesar standing alone, in the place an opponent was.The “republican” faction in the Roman Senate knows that Caesar is “still on the march”, and this time his opponent is them, the Senate, as an institution.  They know that “their” Senate, as an institution has, in opposition to Caesar, only two choices; surrender or oblivion.  They should disappear like the fog or mist vanishes in plain sight with the rising of the sun. The conspirators in general; and, Brutus in particular, each have, like a Wills’ Calder analogy, an unacknowledged, yet very, real binding relationship to one another.  It is their both singular and collective growing hostility and fear of Caesar the political and personal man.  Their fears are both self-sustaining, and mutually reinforcing, one upon the other.Cassius like a modern psychoanalyst perceives in Brutus, his sub-conscious, inchoate fear, hostility, even loathing, of a man (Caesar) that he outwardly claims he both loves and admires.  It is Cassius who perceives this colorless, odorless, “something in the air”; which, if he can tap into its organizing and animating power in and over Brutus, will motivate Brutus to enlist, to organize, to persuade, and to sustain to completion, the act of conspiracy and brutal murder; as an action of loyal, loving, patriotism.  It is Shakespeare at his most dramatically sophisticated, psychological best.Cassius does not lead himself, Brutus, or the rest of the conspiracy, as lambs to the slaughter.  He knows what he is doing; and, unlike Iago in Othello, he does not occasionally turn to the audience and literally tell us what is going to happen as a result of his subtle psychological manipulation of people and/or events.  But if the dialog is followed closely, Casssius’ recognition of what he has to do, and how he has to coordinate the interaction of pieces of his “Calder” mobiles, is perfectly clear.But in the final analysis these men are drawn together not by external forces they do not perceive or understand, but by their motivations of greed, ambition, fear, loathing, mistrust; and, the realities of their all too human ignorance, misjudgment, bad judgment, bad luck, and their refusal to “see” the truth of the individual and collective motivations that underlay their actions. As usual that human failing always leads ordinary men, real (as opposed to fictional ideal) men into the tragedy that is their lives.
Performance historyThe play was likely one of Shakespeare's first to be performed at the Globe Theatre.  Thomas Platter the Younger, a Swiss traveller, saw a tragedy about Julius Caesar at a Bankside theatre on 21 September 1599 and this was most likely Shakespeare's play, as there is no obvious alternative candidate. (While the story of Julius Caesar was dramatised repeatedly in the Elizabethan/Jacobean period, none of the other plays known are as good a match with Platter's description as Shakespeare's play.) After the theatres re-opened at the start of the Restoration era, the play was revived by Thomas Killigrew's King's Company in 1672. Charles Hart initially played Brutus, as did Thomas Betterton in later productions. Julius Caesar was one of the very few Shakespearean plays that was not adapted during the Restoration period or the eighteenth century. 
Notable performances

1864: Junius, Jr., Edwin and John Wilkes Booth (later the assassin of U.S. president Abraham Lincoln) made their only appearance onstage together in a benefit performance of Julius Caesar on 25 November 1864, at the Winter Garden Theatre in New York City. Junius, Jr. played Cassius, Edwin played Brutus and John Wilkes played Mark Antony. This landmark production raised funds to erect a statue of Shakespeare in Central Park, which remains to this day.
May, 1916: A one-night performance in the natural bowl of Beachwood Canyon, Hollywood drew an audience of 40,000 and starred Tyrone Power, Sr. and Douglas Fairbanks, Sr. The student bodies of Hollywood and Fairfax High Schools played opposing armies, and the elaborate battle scenes were performed on a huge stage as well as the surrounding hillsides. The play commemorated the tercentenary of Shakespeare's death. A photograph of the elaborate stage and viewing stands can be seen on the Library of Congress website.
1926: Another elaborate performance of the play was staged as a benefit for the Actors' Fund of America at the Hollywood Bowl. Caesar arrived for the Lupercal in a chariot drawn by four white horses. The stage was the size of a city block and dominated by a central tower eighty feet in height. The event was mainly aimed at creating work for unemployed actors. Three hundred gladiators appeared in an arena scene not featured in Shakespeare's play; a similar number of girls danced as Caesar's captives; a total of three thousand soldiers took part in the battle sequences.
1937: Orson Welles' famous production at the Mercury Theatre drew fervoured comment as the director dressed his protagonists in uniforms reminiscent of those common at the time in Fascist Italy and Nazi Germany, as well as drawing a specific analogy between Caesar and Benito Mussolini. Opinions vary on the artistic value of the resulting production: some see Welles's mercilessly pared-down script (the running time was around 100 minutes without an interval, several characters were eliminated, dialogue was moved around and borrowed from other plays, and the final two acts were reduced to a single scene) as a radical and innovative way of cutting away peripheral elements of Shakespeare's tale; others thought Welles's version was a mangled and lobotomised version of Shakespeare's tragedy which lacked the psychological depth of the original.   Most agreed that the production owed more to Welles than it did to Shakespeare.  However, Time Magazine gave the production a rave review,  and Welles's innovations have been echoed in many subsequent modern productions, which have seen parallels between Caesar's fall and the downfalls of various governments in the twentieth century. The production was most noted for its portrayal of the slaughter of Cinna (Norman Lloyd).   It is the longest-running Broadway production of this play at 157 performances. Welles's Julius Caesar opened at the Comedy Theater in the fall of 1937, and then was transferred to the National Theater on West 41st Street, later renamed the Nederlander Theater. This famous production also toured the country in 1938.
1950: John Gielgud played Cassius at the Shakespeare Memorial Theatre under the direction of Michael Langham and Anthony Quayle. The production was considered one of the highlights of a remarkable Stratford season, and led to Gielgud (who had done little film work to that time) playing Cassius in Joseph L. Mankiewicz's 1953 film version.
1977: John Gielgud made his final appearance in a Shakespearean role on stage as Julius Caesar in John Schlesinger's production at the Royal National Theatre. The cast also included Ian Charleson as Octavius.
1994: Arvind Gaur directed this play in India with Jaimini Kumar as Brutus and Deepak Ochani as Caesar (24 shows); later on he revived it with Manu Rishi as Caesar and Vishnu Prasad as Brutus for the Shakespeare Drama Festival, Assam in 1998. Arvind Kumar translated Julius Caesar into Hindi. This production was also performed at the Prithvi international theatre festival, at the India Habitat Centre, New Delhi.
2005: Denzel Washington played Brutus in the first Broadway production of the play in over fifty years. The production received universally terrible reviews, but was a sell-out because of Washington's popularity at the box office. 


Screen performances

See also Shakespeare on screen (Julius Caesar)



Julius Caesar (1950), starring Charlton Heston as Antony and Harold Tasker as Caesar.
Julius Caesar (1953), starring James Mason as Brutus, Marlon Brando as Antony and Louis Calhern as Caesar.
Julius Caesar (1970), starring Jason Robards Jr. as Brutus, Charlton Heston as Antony and John Gielgud as Caesar.


Adaptations and cultural references
The Canadian comedy duo Wayne and Shuster parodied Julius Caesar in their 1958 sketch Rinse the Blood off My Toga. Flavius Maximus, Private Roman Eye, is hired by Brutus to investigate the death of Caesar. The police procedural combines Shakespeare, Dragnet, and vaudeville jokes and was first broadcast on The Ed Sullivan Show. The 1960 film An Honourable Murder is a modern reworking of the play.In 1973 the BBC made a television play Heil Caesar, written by John Griffith Bowen. This was an adaptation of the play put into a modern setting in an unnamed country, with references to recent events in a few countries. It was intended as an introduction to Shakespeare's play for schoolchildren, but it proved good enough to be shown on adult television, and a stage version was later produced.  In 1984 the Riverside Shakespeare Company of New York City produced a modern dress Julius Caesar set in contemporary Washington, called simply CAESAR!, starring Harold Scott as Brutus, Herman Petras as Caesar, Marya Lowry as Portia, Robert Walsh as Antony, and Michael Cook as Cassius, directed by W. Stuart McDowell at The Shakespeare Center. In 2006, Chris Taylor from the Australian comedy team The Chaser wrote a comedy musical called Dead Caesar which was shown at the Sydney Theatre Company in Sydney.The line "The Evil That Men Do", from the speech made by Mark Antony following Caesar's death ("The evil that men do lives after them; The good is oft interred with their bones.") has had many references in media, including the titles of ...


An Iron Maiden song
A politically-oriented film directed by J. Lee Thompson in 1984
A Buffy the Vampire Slayer novel.

The 2009 movie Me and Orson Welles, based on a book of the same name by Robert Kaplow, is a fictional story centred around Orson Welles' famous 1937 production of Julius Caesar at the Mercury Theatre. British actor Christian McKay is cast as Welles, and costars with Zac Efron and Claire Danes.The 2012 Italian drama film Caesar Must Die ( ), directed by Paolo and Vittorio Taviani, follows convicts in their rehearsals ahead of a prison performance of Julius Caesar.In the Ray Bradbury book Fahrenheit 451, some of the character Beatty's last words are "There is no terror, Cassius, in your threats, for I am armed so strong in honesty that they pass me as an idle wind, which I respect not!"The play's line "the fault dear Brutus lies not in our stars but in ourselves" gave its name to the J.M. Barrie play Dear Brutus. The line also gave its name to a John Green novel named The Fault in Our Stars. The same line was quoted in Edward R. Murrow's epilogue of his famous 1954 See It Now documentary broadcast concerning Senator Joseph R. McCarthy.
See also

Assassinations in fiction
Comet Caesar
Mark Antony's Funeral Speech
The dogs of war (phrase)


References
Footnotes 
Secondary sources 

Boyce, Charles. 1990. Encyclopaedia of Shakespeare, New York, Roundtable Press.
Chambers, Edmund Kerchever. 1923. The Elizabethan Stage. 4 volumes, Oxford: Oxford University Press. ISBN 0-19-811511-3.
Halliday, F. E. 1964. A Shakespeare Companion 1564–1964. Shakespeare Library ser. Baltimore, Penguin, 1969. ISBN 0-14-053011-8.
Houppert, Joseph W. “Fatal Logic in ‘Julius Caesar’ ”. South Atlantic Bulletin. Vol. 39, No.4. Nov. 1974. 3–9.
Kahn, Coppelia. "Passions of some difference": Friendship and Emulation in Julius Caesear. Julius Caesar: New Critical Essays. Horst Zander, ed. New York: Routledge, 2005. 271–283.
Parker, Barbara L. "The Whore of Babylon and Shakespeares's Julius Caesar." Studies in English Literature (Rice); Spring95, Vol. 35 Issue 2, p. 251, 19p.
Reynolds, Robert C. “Ironic Epithet in Julius Caesar”. Shakespeare Quarterly. Vol. 24. No.3. 1973. 329–333.
Taylor, Myron. "Shakespeare’s Julius Caesar and the Irony of History". Shakespeare Quarterly. Vol. 24, No. 3. 1973. 301–308.
Wells, Stanley and Michael Dobson, eds. 2001. The Oxford Companion to Shakespeare Oxford University Press
 
External links 
 

Text of Julius Caesar, fully edited by John Cox, as well as original-spelling text, facsimiles of the 1623 Folio text, and other resources, at the Internet Shakespeare Editions
Julius Caesar Navigator Includes Shakespeare's text with notes, line numbers, and a search function.
No Fear Shakespeare Includes the play line by line with interpretation.
All Julius Caesar Provides a summary of the play, background on Shakespeare and Julius Caesar, including historical background on Julius Caesar, and a character analysis of Caesar.
Julius Caesar – searchable, indexed e-text
Julius Caesar – from Project Gutenberg
Julius Caesar – by The Tech
Julius Caesar – Searchable and scene-indexed version.
Julius Caesar in modern English
Lesson plans for Julius Caesar at Web English Teacher
Quicksilver Radio Theater adaptation of "Julius Caesar", which may be heard online, at PRX.org (Public Radio Exchange).
Julius Caesar study guide, themes, quotes, analysis, multimedia, & teaching guide

 
 DEFAULTSORT






 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Thurgood Marshall
 
 
 
 
Thurgood Marshall (July 2, 1908 January 24, 1993) was an Associate Justice of the United States Supreme Court, serving from October 1967 until October 1991. Marshall was the Court's 96th justice and its first African-American justice.Before becoming a judge, Marshall was a lawyer who was best known for his high success rate in arguing before the Supreme Court and for the victory in Brown v. Board of Education. He argued more cases before the United States Supreme Court than anyone else in history.    He served on the United States Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit after being appointed by President John F. Kennedy and then served as the Solicitor General after being appointed by President Lyndon Johnson in 1965. President Johnson nominated him to the United States Supreme Court in 1967.
Early life
Marshall was born in Baltimore, Maryland on July 2, 1908, the great-grandson of a slave  who was born in modern-day Democratic Republic of the Congo.  His grandfather was also a slave.  His original name was Thoroughgood, but he shortened it to Thurgood in second grade because he disliked spelling it. His father, William Marshall, who was a railroad porter, and his mother Norma, a teacher, instilled in him an appreciation for the Constitution of the United States and the rule of law. 
EducationMarshall graduated from Frederick Douglass High School in Baltimore in 1925 and from Lincoln University in Pennsylvania in 1930. At Lincoln University, Marshall was initiated as a member of the first black fraternity, Alpha Phi Alpha,      ISBN 9780870675843    ISBN 978-1604739213  and was threatened with expulsion from the University for fraternity hazing with Langston Hughes.      His membership is to be memorialized by a sculpture by artist Alvin Pettit to be erected on campus in 2013.   Marshall wanted to apply to his hometown law school, the University of Maryland School of Law, but the dean said he would not be accepted because of the school's segregation policy. Marshall instead attended Howard University School of Law, and in 1933 he graduated from there first in his class. Three years later, Marshall would successfully represent his client  bringing suit against the University of Maryland Law School for its policy, ending segregation there (see Murray v. Pearson).
Marriage and familyMarshall was married twice. He married Vivian "Buster" Burey in 1929. After her death in February 1955, Marshall married Cecilia Suyat in December of that year. They were married until he died 1993, having two sons together, American Public Radio: Cissy Marshall  Thurgood Marshall, Jr., a former top aide to President Bill Clinton, and John W. Marshall, a former United States Marshals Service Director and Virginia Secretary of Public Safety.
Law career 

Marshall set up a private practice in Baltimore in 1936. That year, he began working with the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People (NAACP) in Baltimore.He won his first major civil rights case, Murray v. Pearson, 169 Md. 478 (1936). This was the first challenge of the "separate but equal" doctrine that was part of the Plessy v. Ferguson decision. His co-counsel on the case, Charles Hamilton Houston, developed the strategy. Marshall represented Donald Gaines Murray, a black Amherst College graduate with excellent credentials, who was denied admission to the University of Maryland Law School because of its segregation policy. Black students in Maryland wanting to study law had to accept one of three options, attend: Morgan College, the Princess Anne Academy, or out-of-state black institutions.In 1935, Thurgood Marshall argued the case for Murray, showing that neither of the in-state institutions offered a law school and that such schools were entirely unequal in quality to the University of Maryland. Marshall and Houston expected to lose and intended to appeal to the federal courts. The Maryland Court of Appeals ruled against the state of Maryland and its Attorney General, who represented the University of Maryland, stating, "Compliance with the Constitution cannot be deferred at the will of the state. Whatever system is adopted for legal education must furnish equality of treatment now." While it was a moral victory, the state court's ruling had no authority outside of Maryland.
Chief Counsel for the NAACPAt the age of 32, Marshall won his first U.S. Supreme Court case, Chambers v. Florida, 309 U.S. 227 (1940). That same year, he was appointed Chief Counsel for the NAACP. He argued many other civil rights cases before the Supreme Court, most of them successfully, including Smith v. Allwright, 321 U.S. 649 (1944); Shelley v. Kraemer, 334 U.S. 1 (1948); Sweatt v. Painter, 339 U.S. 629 (1950); and McLaurin v. Oklahoma State Regents, 339 U.S. 637 (1950). His most famous case as a lawyer was Brown v. Board of Education of Topeka, 347 U.S. 483 (1954), the case in which the Supreme Court ruled that "separate but equal" public education, as established by Plessy v. Ferguson, was not applicable to public education because it could never be truly equal. In total, Marshall won 29 out of the 32 cases he argued before the Supreme Court.During the 1950s, Thurgood Marshall developed a friendly relationship with J. Edgar Hoover, the director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. In 1956, for example, he privately praised Hoover's campaign to discredit T.R.M. Howard, a maverick civil rights leader from Mississippi. During a national speaking tour, Howard criticized the FBI's failure to seriously investigate cases such as the 1955 killers of George W. Lee and Emmett Till. In a private letter to Hoover, Marshall "attacked Howard as a 'rugged individualist' who did not speak for the NAACP." Root, Damon (March 20, 2009) A Forgotten Civil Rights Hero, Reason  Two years earlier Howard arranged for Marshall to deliver a well-received speech at a rally of his Regional Council of Negro Leadership in Mound Bayou, Mississippi only days before the Brown decision.  According to historians David T. Beito and Linda Royster Beito, “Marshall’s disdain for Howard was almost visceral. [He] 'disliked Howard’s militant tone and maverick stance' and 'was well aware that Hoover’s attack served to take the heat off the NAACP and provided opportunities for closer collaboration [between the NAACP and the FBI] in civil rights.'" 
Court of Appeals and Solicitor GeneralPresident John F. Kennedy appointed Marshall to the United States Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit in 1961 to a new seat created on May 19, 1961 by 75 Stat. 80. A group of Senators from the South, led by Mississippi's James Eastland, held up his confirmation, so he served for the first several months under a recess appointment. Marshall remained on that court until 1965, when President Lyndon B. Johnson appointed him to be the United States Solicitor General, the first African American to hold the office.  As Solicitor General, he won 14 out of the 19 cases that he argued for the government.
U.S. Supreme Court
On June 13, 1967, President Johnson nominated Marshall to the Supreme Court following the retirement of Justice Tom C. Clark, saying that this was "the right thing to do, the right time to do it, the right man and the right place." Marshall was confirmed as an Associate Justice by a Senate vote of 69–11 on August 30, 1967.  He was the 96th person to hold the position, and the first African American. President Johnson confidently predicted to one biographer, Doris Kearns Goodwin, that a lot of black baby boys would be named "Thurgood" in honor of this choice. Marshall served on the Court for the next twenty-four years, compiling a liberal record that included strong support for Constitutional protection of individual rights, especially the rights of criminal suspects against the government. His most frequent ally on the Court (the pair rarely voted at odds) was Justice William Brennan, who consistently joined him in supporting abortion rights and opposing the death penalty. Brennan and Marshall concluded in Furman v. Georgia that the death penalty was, in all circumstances, unconstitutional, and never accepted the legitimacy of Gregg v. Georgia, which ruled four years later that the death penalty was constitutional in some circumstances. Thereafter, Brennan or Marshall dissented from every denial of certiorari in a capital case and from every decision upholding a sentence of death.   In 1987, Marshall gave a controversial speech on the occasion of the   celebrations of the Constitution of the United States.     Marshall stated,  "the government they devised was defective from the start, requiring several amendments, a civil war, and major social transformations to attain the system of constitutional government and its respect for the freedoms and individual rights, we hold as fundamental today."  In conclusion Marshall stated  "Some may more quietly commemorate the suffering, struggle, and sacrifice that has triumphed over much of what was wrong with the original document, and observe the anniversary with hopes not realized and promises not fulfilled. I plan to celebrate the bicentennial of the Constitution as a living document, including the Bill of Rights and the other amendments protecting individual freedoms and human rights."   Although best remembered for jurisprudence in the fields of civil rights and criminal procedure, Marshall made significant contributions to other areas of the law as well. In Teamsters v. Terry he held that the Seventh Amendment entitled the plaintiff to a jury trial in a suit against a labor union for breach of duty of fair representation. In TSC Industries, Inc. v. Northway, Inc. he articulated a formulation for the standard of materiality in United States securities law that is still applied and used today. In Cottage Savings Association v. Commissioner of Internal Revenue, he weighed in on the income tax consequences of the Savings and Loan crisis, permitting a savings and loan association to deduct a loss from an exchange of mortgage participation interests. In Personnel Administrator MA v. Feeney, Marshall wrote a dissent saying that a law that gave hiring preference to veterans over non-veterans was unconstitutional because of its inequitable impact on women.Among his many law clerks were attorneys who went on to become judges themselves, such as Judge Douglas Ginsburg of the D.C. Circuit Court of Appeals; Judge Ralph Winter of the United States Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit; Supreme Court Justice Elena Kagan; as well as notable law professors Dan Kahan, Cass Sunstein, Eben Moglen, Susan Low Bloch, Martha Minow, Rick Pildes, Paul Gewirtz, and Mark Tushnet (editor of Thurgood Marshall: His Speeches, Writings, Arguments, Opinions and Reminiscences); and law school deans Paul Mahoney of University of Virginia School of Law, and Richard Revesz of New York University School of Law.  See, List of law clerks of the Supreme Court of the United States.Marshall retired from the Supreme Court in 1991, and was reportedly unhappy that it would fall to President George H. W. Bush to name his replacement.     Bush nominated Clarence Thomas to replace Marshall.
Death and legacy
 
Marshall died of heart failure at the National Naval Medical Center in Bethesda, Maryland, at 2:58 pm on January 24, 1993 at the age of 84. He is buried in Arlington National Cemetery.    His second wife and their two sons survived him.Marshall left all of his personal papers and notes to the Library of Congress. The Librarian of Congress, James H. Billington, opened Marshall's papers for immediate use by scholars, journalists and the public, insisting that this was Marshall's intent. The Marshall family and several of his close associates disputed this claim.   The decision to make the documents public was supported by the American Library Association.  A list of the archived manuscripts is available. 
There are numerous memorials to Marshall. One, an eight-foot statue, stands in Lawyers Mall adjacent to the Maryland State House. The statue, dedicated on October 22, 1996, depicts Marshall as a young lawyer and it is placed just a few feet away from where the Old Maryland Supreme Court Building stood; the court where Marshall argued discrimination cases leading up to the Brown decision.  The primary office building for the federal court system, located on Capitol Hill in Washington D.C., is named in honor of Justice Marshall and contains a statue of him in the atrium. In 1976, Texas Southern University renamed their law school after the sitting justice.  In 1980, the University of Maryland School of Law opened a new library which they named the Thurgood Marshall Law Library.  In 2000, the historic Twelfth Street YMCA Building located in the Shaw neighborhood of Washington, D.C. was renamed the Thurgood Marshall Center. The major airport serving Baltimore and the Maryland suburbs of Washington, DC, was renamed the Baltimore-Washington International Thurgood Marshall Airport on October 1, 2005. The 2009 General Convention of the Episcopal Church added Marshall to the church's liturgical calendar of "Holy Women, Holy Men: Celebrating the Saints," designating May 17 as his feast day. The University of California, San Diego renamed its Third College after Thurgood Marshall in 1993.  Marshall Middle School in Olympia, Washington is also named after Thurgood Marshall, as is Thurgood Marshall Academy in Washington, D.C.In 2006 Thurgood, a one-man play written by George Stevens, Jr., premiered at the Westport Country Playhouse, starring James Earl Jones and directed by Leonard Foglia.  Later it opened Broadway at the Booth Theatre on April 30, 2008 starring Laurence Fishburne.  On February 24, 2011, HBO screened a filmed version of the play which Fishburne performed at the John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts. The production was described by the Baltimore Sun as "one of the most frank, informed and searing discussions of race you will ever see on TV.".   On February 16, 2011, a screening of the film was hosted by the White House as part of its celebrations of Black History Month  
Thurgood Marshall AwardThe Legislative Assembly of Puerto Rico instituted  in 1993 the annual Thurgood Marshall Award, given to the top student in civil rights at each of Puerto Rico's four law schools. The awardees are selected by the Commonwealth's Attorney General and includes a $500 monetary award.
Timeline

1908 – Born July 2 at Baltimore, Maryland, United States.
1930 – Graduates with honors from Lincoln University (cum laude).
1934 – Receives law degree from Howard University (magna cum laude) and begins private practice in Baltimore, Maryland.
1934 – Begins to work for Baltimore branch of NAACP.
1935 – Working with Charles Houston, wins first major civil rights case, Murray v. Pearson.
1936 – Becomes assistant special counsel for NAACP in New York.
1940 – Wins Chambers v. Florida, the first of twenty-nine Supreme Court victories.
1943 – Won case for integration of schools in Hillburn, New York.
1944 – Successfully argues Smith v. Allwright, overthrowing the South's "white primary".
1946 – Awarded Spingarn Medal from the NAACP. 
1948 – Wins Shelley v. Kraemer, in which Supreme Court strikes down legality of racially restrictive covenants.
1950 – Wins Supreme Court victories in two graduate-school integration cases, Sweatt v. Painter and McLaurin v. Oklahoma State Regents.
1951 – Visits South Korea and Japan to investigate charges of racism in U.S. armed forces. He reported that the general practice was one of "rigid segregation."
1954 – Wins Brown v. Board of Education of Topeka, landmark case that demolishes legal basis for segregation in America.
1956 – Wins Browder v. Gayle, ending the practice of segregation on buses and ending the Montgomery Bus Boycott.
1957 – Founds and becomes the first president-director counsel of the NAACP Legal Defense and Educational Fund, Inc., a nonprofit law firm separate and independent of the NAACP
1961 – Defends civil rights demonstrators, winning Supreme Court victory in Garner v. Louisiana; nominated to Second Circuit Court of Appeals by President John F. Kennedy.
1961 – Appointed circuit judge, makes 112 rulings, none of them reversed on certiorari by Supreme Court (1961–1965).
1965 – Appointed United States Solicitor General by President Lyndon B. Johnson; wins 14 of the 19 cases he argues for the government (1965–1967).
1967 – Becomes first African American named to U.S. Supreme Court (1967–1991).
1991 – Retires from the Supreme Court.
1992 – Receives the Liberty Medal recognizing his long history of protecting individual rights under the Constitution.
1993 – Dies at age 84 in Bethesda, Maryland, near Washington, D.C.
1993 – Receives Presidential Medal of Freedom, posthumously, from President Bill Clinton.

For more, see Bradley C. S. Watson, "The Jurisprudence of William Joseph Brennan, Jr., and Thurgood Marshall" in Frost, Bryan-Paul and Jeffrey Sikkenga. eds. History of American Political Thought (Lexington: Lexington Books, 2003). ISBN 0-7391-0623-6; ISBN 978-0-7391-0623-5; ISBN 978-0-393-92886-0.
Books authored 

 


See also 

List of Justices of the Supreme Court of the United States
List of law clerks of the Supreme Court of the United States
List of U.S. Supreme Court Justices by time in office
List of United States Chief Justices by time in office
United States Supreme Court cases during the Warren Court
United States Supreme Court cases during the Burger Court
United States Supreme Court cases during the Rehnquist Court
 
Notes 
Further reading 

 
Bland, Randall W. (1993). Private Pressure on Public Law: The Legal Career of Justice Thurgood Marshall 1934–1991. New York: University Press of America. ISBN 0-8191-8736-4
 
 
 
Hodges, Ruth A., Reference Librarian. Justice Thurgood Marshall: A Selected Bibliography,  (Moorland-Spingarn Research Center, Washington, DC, February 1993).
 
 
Mack, Kenneth W., (2012). Representing the Race: The Creation of the Civil Rights Lawyer. Harvard University Press. ISBN 978-0-674-04687-0.
Marshall, Thurgood (1950). "Mr. Justice Murphy and Civil Rights." 48 Michigan Law Review 745.
 
Tushnet, Mark V. (1994). Making Civil Rights Law: Thurgood Marshall and the Supreme Court, 1936–1961. London:  Oxford University Press. ISBN 978-0-19-510468-4;
Tushnet, Mark V. (1997). Making Constitutional Law: Thurgood Marshall and the Supreme Court, 1961–1991.  New York: Oxford University Press. ISBN 0-19-509314-3 pp., 256.
 
 .
White, G. Edward (2007), The American Judicial Tradition: Profiles of Leading American Judges (3rd ed.), Oxford: Oxford University Press, ISBN 978-0-19-513962-4.
Williams, Juan, Thurgood Marshall: American Revolutionary (New York: New York Times, 1998). Promotional site for book ISBN 0-8129-3299-4; ISBN 978-0-8129-3299-7.
 
 
External links 

Ariens, Michael, Thurgood Marshall.
Booknotes interview with Hunter Clark and Michael Davis on Thurgood Marshall: Warrior at the Bar, Rebel on the Bench, January 3, 1993.
Booknotes interview with Williams on Thurgood Marshall: American Revolutionary, October 11, 1998.
Fox, John, Expanding Civil Rights, Biographies of the Robes, Thurgood Marshall. Public Broadcasting Service.
Miscellaneous biographies at Answers.com.
Oyez, official Supreme Court media, Thurgood Marshall.
Supreme Court Historical Society Thurgood Marshall.
 
REMARKS BY THE PRESIDENT IN CEREMONY HONORING MEDAL OF FREEDOM RECIPIENTS – November 30, 1993
Oral History Interview with Thurgood Marshall, from the Lyndon Baines Johnson Library
FBI file on Thurgood Marshall
  
 
 
 
 
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT

























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Aaron Burr
   
 Aaron Burr, Jr. (February 6, 1756 – September 14, 1836) was the third Vice President of the United States under President Thomas Jefferson.After serving as a Continental Army officer in the Revolutionary War, Burr became a successful lawyer and politician. He was elected twice to the New York State Assembly (1784–1785, 1798–1799),    was appointed New York State Attorney General (1789–1791), was chosen as a United States Senator (1791–1797) from the state of New York, and reached the apex of his career as Vice President of the United States (1801–1805).The highlight of Burr's tenure as President of the Senate (one of his few official duties as Vice President) was the Senate's first impeachment trial, of Supreme Court Justice Samuel Chase. In 1804, the last full year of his single term as Vice President, Burr killed his political rival Alexander Hamilton in a duel. Burr was never tried for the illegal duel, and all charges against him were eventually dropped. The death of Hamilton, however, ended Burr's political career. President Jefferson dropped him from the ticket for the 1804 presidential election, and he never held office again.After leaving Washington, Burr traveled west seeking new opportunities, both economic and political. His activities eventually led to his arrest on charges of treason in 1807. Although the subsequent trial resulted in acquittal, Burr's western schemes left him with large debts and few influential friends. In a final quest for grand opportunities, he left the United States for Europe. He remained overseas until 1812, when he returned to the United States to practice law in New York City. There he spent the remainder of his long life in relative obscurity.
Early life
Burr was born in Newark, New Jersey, to the Reverend Aaron Burr, Sr., a Presbyterian minister and second president of the College of New Jersey in Newark (which moved in 1756 to Princeton and later became Princeton University). His mother, Esther Edwards, was the daughter of Jonathan Edwards, the famous Calvinist theologian, making Burr Edwards's grandson. The elder Burrs also had a daughter, Sarah ("Sally"), who married Tapping Reeve, founder of the Litchfield Law School in Litchfield, Connecticut.Aaron Burr's father died in 1757, and his mother the following year, leaving him an orphan at the age of two. Grandfather Edwards and his wife Sarah also died that year; young Aaron and his sister Sally went to live with the William Shippen family in Philadelphia. In 1759, the children's guardianship was assumed by twenty-one-year-old uncle Timothy Edwards. The next year, Edwards married Rhoda Ogden and moved to Elizabeth, New Jersey. Rhoda's younger brothers Aaron and Matthias became the boy's playmates and lifelong friends.At age thirteen, Aaron Burr was admitted to the College of New Jersey in Princeton where he joined the American Whig Society and Cliosophic Society. He received his Bachelor of Arts degree in 1772, but changed his career path two years later and began the study of law with his brother-in-law Reeve. When, in 1775, news reached Litchfield of the clashes with British troops at Lexington and Concord, Burr's studies were put on hold while he went to join the Continental Army.
Military serviceDuring the Revolutionary War, Burr took part in Colonel Benedict Arnold's expedition to Quebec, an arduous trek of over   through the wilderness of what is now Maine. Upon arriving before the city of Quebec, Burr was sent up the Saint Lawrence River to reach General Richard Montgomery, who had taken Montreal, and escorted him to Quebec. Montgomery promoted Burr to captain and made him an aide-de-camp. Burr distinguished himself during the Battle of Quebec, earning him a place on Washington's staff in Manhattan. However, he quit within two weeks, desiring to return to the battlefield.General Israel Putnam took Burr under his wing; by his vigilance in the retreat from lower Manhattan to Harlem, Burr saved an entire brigade (including Alexander Hamilton, who was one of its officers) from capture after the British landing on Manhattan. In a stark departure from common practice, Washington failed to commend Burr's actions in the next day's General Orders (the fastest way to obtain a promotion in rank). Although Burr was already a nationally known hero, he never received a commendation. According to Burr's stepbrother Mathias Ogden, Burr was infuriated by the incident, which may have led to the eventual estrangement between him and Washington.  On becoming a lieutenant colonel in July 1777, Burr assumed virtual leadership of Malcolm's Additional Continental Regiment. There were approximately 300 men under Colonel William Malcolm's nominal command. The regiment successfully fought off many nighttime raids into central New Jersey by British troops sailing over from Manhattan. Later that year, during the harsh winter encampment at Valley Forge, Burr was put in charge of a small contingent guarding "the Gulf", an isolated pass commanding one approach to the camp. Burr imposed discipline there, defeating an attempted mutiny by some of the troops. On June 28, 1778, at the Battle of Monmouth, Burr's regiment was devastated by British artillery, and in the day's terrible heat, Burr suffered heat stroke from which he would never quite recover. In January 1779 Burr, in command of Malcolm's Regiment, was assigned to Westchester County, a region between the British post at Kingsbridge and that of the Americans about   to the north. In this district, part of the larger command of General Alexander McDougall, there was much turbulence and plundering by lawless bands of both patriot and Loyalist sympathizers, and by raiding parties of ill-disciplined soldiers from both armies. Colonel Burr established a thorough patrol system, rigorously enforced martial law, and quickly restored order. He did not stand for any horseplay or reckless behavior. He demanded honesty from his men and when they did not abide by these rules they were punished. One of Burr’s favorites was public shaming in which he tried to embarrass the guilty. When he resigned, he left a description of his “system” in hope that future colonels or generals would continue to enforce these rules. He resigned from the Continental Army in March 1779 due to his continuing bad health and renewed his study of law. Though technically no longer in the service, he remained active in the war: he was assigned by General Washington to perform occasional intelligence missions for Continental generals such as Arthur St. Clair, and on July 5, 1779, he rallied a group of Yale students at New Haven along with Capt. James Hillhouse and the Second Connecticut Governors Foot Guard, in a skirmish with the British at the West River. The British advance was repulsed, forcing them to enter New Haven from Hamden.Despite these activities, Burr was able to finish his studies and was admitted to the bar at Albany in 1782. He began to practice in New York City after the British evacuated the city the following year. The Burrs lived, for the next several years, in a house on Wall Street. 
Marriage and familyIn 1782, Aaron Burr married Theodosia Bartow Prevost, the widow of Jacques Marcus Prevost (see The Hermitage), a British Army officer of Swiss origin, who had died in the West Indies during the Revolutionary War. The Burrs moved to New York City, where his reputation as a brilliant trial lawyer grew. Twelve years later, Mrs. Burr died from stomach cancer. They had one child who survived birth, a daughter named Theodosia, after her mother. Burr believed in equality of the sexes; and he prescribed education for his daughter in the Classics, language, horsemanship and music. Born in 1783, Theodosia became widely known for her education and accomplishments. In 1801, she married Joseph Alston of South Carolina and bore a son, who died of fever at ten years of age. During the winter of 1812-1813, she disappeared with the schooner Patriot off The Carolinas, either murdered by pirates or shipwrecked in a storm.Recently, the Aaron Burr Association acknowledged the possibility that Burr had two illegitimate children—Louisa Charlotte (born 1788) and John Pierre Burr (born 1792)—with his servant Mary Emmons, not wanting to delay pending proof of the claims of Emmons' elderly descendant. Burr was still married to Theodosia then, but most of his time was spent in Albany, serving in the State Assembly.  DNA testing, which might verify these claims, is not possible because there is no male descendant in this line. A historian who has written extensively on Burr stated that the claims were "plausible." 
Politics
Legal and early political careerBurr served in the New York State Assembly from 1784 to 1785, but became seriously involved in politics in 1789, when George Clinton appointed him New York State Attorney General. He was also Commissioner of Revolutionary War Claims in 1791. In 1791, he was elected a U.S. Senator from New York, defeating the incumbent, General Philip Schuyler, and served there until 1797. Although Alexander Hamilton and Burr had long been on good personal terms, often dining with one another (Lomask, vol. 1), Burr's defeat of General Schuyler, Hamilton's father-in-law, probably drove the first major wedge into their friendship.  Nevertheless, their relationship took a decade to reach a status of enmity.   More details of their relationship may be found in the Burr–Hamilton duel article.After being appointed commanding general of U.S. forces by President John Adams in 1798, Washington turned down Burr's application for a brigadier general's commission during the Quasi-War with France.  Washington wrote, "By all that I have known and heard, Colonel Burr is a brave and able officer, but the question is whether he has not equal talents at intrigue." (Lomask vol.1)  John Adams later put this situation in perspective by writing in 1815 that Washington's response was startling given his promotion of Hamilton, "the most restless, impatient, artful, indefatigable, and unprincipled intriguer in the United States, if not in the world, to be second in command under himself, and now [Washington] dreaded an intriguer in a poor brigadier." The Works of John Adams, Second President of the United States By John Adams, Charles Francis Adams, Letter to James Lloyd, 17 Feb 1815, pp. 123–124 Bored with the inactivity of the new U.S. Senate (Lomask vol. 1), Burr ran for and was elected to the New York State Assembly, serving from 1798 through 1799.   It was during this time he cooperated with the Holland Land Company in obtaining a law to permit aliens to hold and convey lands.     During John Adams' term as President, national parties became clearly defined. Burr loosely associated himself with the Democratic-Republicans, though he had moderate Federalist allies, such as Sen. Jonathan Dayton of New Jersey. Burr quickly became a key player in New York politics, more powerful in time than Hamilton, largely because of the Tammany Society, later to become the infamous Tammany Hall, which Burr converted from a social club into a political machine to help Jefferson reach the presidency. In 1799, Burr founded the Bank of the Manhattan Company, which in later years was absorbed into the Chase Manhattan Bank, which in turn became part of JPMorgan Chase.In 1800, New York presidential electors were to be chosen by the state legislature as they had been in 1796 (for John Adams). The State Assembly was controlled by the Federalists going into the April 1800 legislative elections. In the city of New York, assembly members were to be selected on an at-large basis. Burr and Hamilton were the key campaigners for their respective parties. Burr's Republican slate of assemblymen for New York City was elected, gaining control of the legislature and in due course giving New York's electoral votes to Jefferson and helping to win the 1800 presidential election for him. This drove another wedge between Hamilton and Burr. Burr became Vice President during Jefferson's first term (1801–1805).
Vice PresidencyBecause of his influence in New York and opposition to the Hamiltonian Federalists, Burr was asked by Jefferson and Madison to help them in the election of 1800. Burr sponsored a bill through the New York Assembly that established the Manhattan Company, a water utility company whose charter also allowed creation of a bank controlled by Jeffersonians. Another crucial move was Burr's success in securing the election of his slate of greater New York City area Electors, defeating the Federalist slate backed by Alexander Hamilton. This event only served to increase the antagonism between the former friends.Burr is known as the father of modern political campaigning.  He enlisted the help of members of Tammany Hall, a social club, to win the voting for selection of Electoral College delegates. He was then placed on the Democratic-Republican presidential ticket in the 1800 election with Jefferson. At the time, most states' legislatures chose the members of the U.S. Electoral College, and New York was crucial to Jefferson. Though Jefferson did win New York, he and Burr tied for the presidency with 73 electoral votes each.It was well understood that the party intended that Jefferson should be president and Burr vice president, but the responsibility for the final choice belonged to the House of Representatives. The attempts of a powerful faction among the Federalists to secure the election of Burr failed, partly due to opposition by Alexander Hamilton and partly due to Burr himself, who did little to obtain votes in his own favor. He wrote to Jefferson underscoring his promise to be vice president,  and during the voting stalemate in the Congress wrote that he would give it up entirely if Jefferson so demanded.  Ultimately, it took 36 ballots before James A. Bayard, a Delaware Federalist, and several of his Federalist colleagues submitted blank votes to decide the election in Jefferson's favor.Upon confirmation of Jefferson’s election, Burr became Vice President of the United States, but despite his letters and his shunning of any political activity during the balloting (he never left Albany) he was never trusted by Jefferson and was effectively shut out of party matters. Some historians conjecture that the reason for this was Burr's casual regard for politics.  Jefferson was tight-lipped in private about Burr, so his reasons are still not entirely clear.  However, Burr's even-handed fairness and his judicial manner as President of the Senate were praised even by some of his enemies, and he fostered some time-honored traditions regarding that office. Historian Forrest MacDonald credited Burr's judicial manner in presiding over the impeachment trial of Justice Samuel Chase with helping to preserve the principle of judicial independence that was established by Marbury v. Madison in 1803.  It was written by one Senator that Burr had conducted the proceedings with the "impartiality of an angel and the rigor of a devil."Burr's farewell in March 1805 moved some of his harshest critics in the Senate to tears. However, except for short quotes and descriptions of the address, which defended America's system of government, it was never recorded in full.
Duel with Alexander Hamilton  When it became clear that Jefferson would drop Burr from his ticket in the 1804 election, the Vice President ran for the governorship of New York instead. Burr lost the election, and blamed his loss on a personal smear campaign believed to have been orchestrated by his own party rivals, including New York governor George Clinton. Hamilton also opposed Burr, due to his belief that Burr had entertained a Federalist secession movement in New York.  In April, the Albany Register published a letter from Dr. Charles D. Cooper to Philip Schuyler which relayed Hamilton's judgement that Burr was "a dangerous man, and one who ought not be trusted with the reins of government," and claiming to know of "a still more despicable opinion which General Hamilton has expressed of Mr. Burr." Fleming, p.233  In June, Burr sent this letter to Hamilton, seeking an affirmation or disavowal of Cooper's characterization of Hamilton's remarks. Fleming, p.284 Instead Hamilton responded verbosely, in part that Burr should give specifics of Hamilton's remarks, not Cooper's. He said he couldn't answer regarding Cooper's interpretation. A few more letters followed, in which the exchange escalated to Burr's demanding that Hamilton recant or deny any statement disparaging Burr’s honor over the past 15 years, but Hamilton, having already been disgraced by the Maria Reynolds adultery scandal and ever mindful of his own reputation and honor, did not. Burr responded by challenging Hamilton to personal combat under the code duello, the formalized rules of dueling. Hamilton's eldest son, Philip, had died in a duel in 1801.Although still quite common, dueling had been outlawed in New York, and the punishment for conviction of dueling was death. It was illegal in New Jersey as well, but the consequences were less severe. On July 11, 1804, the enemies met outside of Weehawken, New Jersey, and in the duel Hamilton was mortally wounded. The two sides do, however, agree that there was a three-to-four second interval between the first and the second shot, raising difficult questions in evaluating the two camps' versions.   Historian William Weir speculates that Hamilton might have been undone by his own machinations: secretly setting his pistol's trigger to require only a half pound of pressure as opposed to the usual 10 pounds. Burr, Weir contends, most likely had no idea that the gun's trigger pressure could be reset.  Louisiana State University history professors Andrew Burstein and Nancy Isenberg concur in this view. They note that "Hamilton brought the pistols, which had a larger barrel than regular dueling pistols, and a secret hair-trigger, and were therefore much more deadly,"    and conclude that "Hamilton gave himself an unfair advantage in their duel, and got the worst of it anyway." David O. Stewart, in his biography of Burr, American Emperor, notes that the reports of Hamilton's intentionally missing Burr with his shot only began to appear in newspaper reports published in papers friendly to Hamilton in the days after his death. The two shots, witnesses reported, followed one another in close succession, and none of those witnesses could agree as to who fired first. Prior to the duel proper, Hamilton took a good deal of time getting used to the feel and weight of the pistol (which, incidentally, had been used in a duel in which his own 19-year-old son had been killed on the same Weehawken site), as well as putting on his eyeglasses in order to see his opponent more clearly. His seconds placed him so that Burr would have the rising sun behind him, giving Hamilton a better target, though during the duel itself, one witness reported, Hamilton seemed to be hindered by this placement.In any event, Hamilton's shot missed Burr, but Burr's shot was fatal. The bullet entered Hamilton's abdomen above his right hip, piercing Hamilton's liver and spine. Hamilton was evacuated to Manhattan where he lay in the house of a friend, receiving visitors until he died the following day. Burr was charged with multiple crimes, including murder, in New York and New Jersey, but was never tried in either jurisdiction. He fled to South Carolina, where his daughter lived with her family, but soon returned to Philadelphia and then on to Washington to complete his term as Vice President. He avoided New York and New Jersey for a time, but all the charges against him were eventually dropped.
Conspiracy and trial After Burr left the Vice-Presidency at the end of his term in 1805, he journeyed into what was then the West, areas west of the Allegheny Mountains, particularly the Ohio River Valley and the lands acquired in the Louisiana Purchase drumming up support for his plans. Burr had leased 40,000 acres (160 km²) of land (the "Bastrop" lands) along the Ouachita River, in what is now Louisiana, from the Spanish government.His most important contact was General James Wilkinson, Commander-in-Chief of the U.S. Army at New Orleans and Governor of the Louisiana Territory. Others included Harman Blennerhassett, who offered the use of his private island for training and outfitting Burr's expedition. Wilkinson was later proved to be a bad choice. Burr saw war with Spain as a distinct possibility. In case of a war declaration, Andrew Jackson stood ready to help Burr, who would be in position to immediately join in. Burr's expedition of perhaps eighty men carried modest arms for hunting, and no materiel was ever revealed, even when Blennerhassett Island was seized by Ohio militia.  His "conspiracy", he always avowed, was that if he settled there with a large group of (armed) "farmers" and war broke out, he would have an army with which to fight and claim land for himself, thus recouping his fortunes. However, the 1819 Adams-Onís Treaty secured Florida for the United States without a fight, and war in Texas didn't occur until 1836, the year of Burr's death.After a near-incident with Spanish forces at Natchitoches, Wilkinson decided he could best serve his conflicting interests by betraying Burr's plans to President Jefferson and to his Spanish paymasters. Jefferson issued an order for Burr's arrest, declaring him a traitor even before an indictment. Burr read this in a newspaper in the Territory of Orleans on January 10, 1807. Jefferson's warrant put Federal agents on his trail. He turned himself in to the Federal authorities twice. Two judges found his actions legal and released him. Jefferson's warrant, however, followed Burr, who then fled toward Spanish Florida; he was intercepted at Wakefield, in  Mississippi Territory (now in the state of Alabama) on February 19, 1807, and confined to Fort Stoddert after being arrested on charges of treason. Burr was treated well at Fort Stoddert. For example, in the evening of February 20, 1807, Burr appeared at the dinner table, and was introduced to Frances Gaines, the wife of the commandant Edmund P. Gaines and the daughter of Judge Harry Toulmin, the man responsible for the legal arrest of Burr. Mrs. Gaines and Burr played chess that evening and continued this entertainment during his confinement at the fort.Burr's secret correspondence with Anthony Merry and the Marquis of Casa Yrujo, the British and Spanish ministers at Washington, was eventually revealed. It had been to secure money and to conceal his real designs, which were to help Mexico to overthrow Spanish power in the Southwest, and to found a dynasty in what would have become former Mexican territory. This was a misdemeanor, based on the Neutrality Act of 1794 passed to block filibuster expeditions like those questionable enterprises of George Rogers Clark and William Blount. Jefferson, however, sought the highest charges against Burr.In 1807, on a charge of treason, Burr was brought to trial before the United States Circuit Court at Richmond, Virginia. His defense lawyers included Edmund Randolph, John Wickham and Luther Martin. Burr was arraigned four times for treason before a grand jury indicted him. This is surprising, because the only physical evidence presented to the Grand Jury was Wilkinson's so-called letter from Burr, proposing stealing land in the Louisiana Purchase. During the Jury's examination it was discovered that the letter was in Wilkinson's own handwriting – a "copy," he said, because he had "lost" the original. The Grand Jury threw the letter out, and the news made a laughingstock of the General for the rest of the proceedings. The trial, presided over by Chief Justice of the United States John Marshall, began on August 3.Article 3, Section 3 of the United States Constitution requires that treason either be admitted in open court, or proved by an overt act witnessed by two people. Since no two witnesses came forward, Burr was acquitted on September 1, in spite of the full force of the Jefferson administration's political influence thrown against him. In acquitting him, the jury apparently tried to give something like the Scottish verdict of not proven.  Immediately afterward, he was tried on a more appropriate misdemeanor charge, but was again acquitted.The trial was a major test of the Constitution. It was a carefully watched drama (Henry Adams gives a full account in The History of the United States of America (1801-1817)) as Thomas Jefferson wanted a conviction. He challenged the authority of the Supreme Court and its Chief Justice John Marshall – an Adams appointee who clashed with Jefferson over Adams' last-minute judicial appointments. Thomas Jefferson believed that Aaron Burr's treason was obvious, and warranted a conviction. The actual case hinged on whether Aaron Burr was present at certain events at certain times and in certain capacities. Thomas Jefferson used all of his influence to get Marshall to move to conviction, but Marshall was not swayed.Historians Andrew Burstein and Nancy Isenberg write that Burr "was not guilty of treason, nor was he ever convicted, because there was no evidence, not one credible piece of testimony, and the star witness for the prosecution had to admit that he had doctored a letter implicating Burr." 
Later life and death
By this point all of Burr's hopes for a political comeback had been dashed, and he fled America and his creditors  for Europe, where he tried to regain his fortunes. He lived abroad from 1808 to 1812, passing most of his time in England where he occupied a house on Craven Street in London. He became a good friend, even confidant, of the English Utilitarian philosopher, Jeremy Bentham, even living at Bentham's home on occasion. He also spent time in Scotland, Denmark, Sweden, Germany, and France. Ever hopeful, he solicited funding for renewing his plans for a conquest of Mexico, but was rebuffed. He was ordered out of England and Napoleon Bonaparte refused to receive him—although one of his ministers held an interview concerning Burr's aims for Spanish Florida or British possessions in the Caribbean. After returning from Europe, Burr used the surname "Edwards," his mother's maiden name, for a while to avoid creditors. With help from old friends Samuel Swartwout and Matthew L. Davis, Burr was able to return to New York and his law practice. There he lived the remainder of his life in relative peace.In 1833, at age 77, Burr married again, this time to Eliza Jumel, a wealthy widow. Soon, however, she realized her fortune was dwindling due to her husband's land speculation losses.  She separated  from Burr after only four months; the divorce was completed on September 14, 1836, the day of Burr's death. The home of Eliza Jumel and Aaron Burr, the Morris-Jumel Mansion in Manhattan, is now open to the public.
Burr suffered a debilitating stroke in 1834, which rendered him immobile. In 1836, Burr died on Staten Island in the village of Port Richmond. He was buried near his father in Princeton, New Jersey.
CharacterAaron Burr made many friends but also some powerful enemies, and is still perhaps the most controversial of the Founding Fathers of the United States. He was indicted for murder (but not convicted) after the death of Hamilton; arrested and prosecuted for treason by Jefferson (but not convicted). To his friends and family, and often to complete strangers, he was kind and generous. In her Autobiography of Jane Fairfield, the wife of the struggling poet Sumner Lincoln Fairfield relates how their friend Burr saved the lives of her two children, who were left with their grandmother in New York while the parents were in Boston. The grandmother was unable to provide adequate food or heat for the children and was in fear for their very lives. She sought out Burr, as the only one that might be able and willing to help her. Burr "wept and replied, 'Though I am poor and have not a dollar, the children of such a mother shall not suffer while I have a watch.' He hastened on this errand, and quickly returned, having pawned the article for twenty dollars, which he gave to make comfortable my precious babies."  In his later years in New York, he provided money and education for several children, earning their lifelong affection.Burr believed women to be intellectually equal to men, and hung a portrait of Mary Wollstonecraft over his mantel. The Burrs' daughter, Theodosia, was taught dance, music, several languages and learned to shoot from horseback. Until her death at sea in 1813, she remained devoted to her father. Not only did Burr advocate education for women, upon his election to the New York State Legislature, he submitted a bill to allow women to vote.In 1784 as a New York state assemblyman, he unsuccessfully sought to immediately end slavery in that state.  John Quincy Adams (who was a great admirer of Jefferson) said after the former vice president's death, "Burr's life, take it all together, was such as in any country of sound morals his friends would be desirous of burying in quiet oblivion."  This was his own opinion: his father, President John Adams, was an admirer and frequent defender of Burr.  John Adams wrote that Burr "had served in the army, and came out of it with the character of a knight without fear and an able officer." Gordon S. Wood, a leading scholar of the Revolutionary period, holds that it was Burr’s character that put him at odds with the rest of the “founding fathers,” especially Madison, Jefferson, and Hamilton, leading to his personal and political defeats and, ultimately, to his place outside the golden circle of revered revolutionary figures.  Because of his habit of placing self-interest above the good of the whole, those men felt Burr represented a serious threat to the very ideals for which they had fought the Revolution.  Their ideal, as particularly embodied in Washington and Jefferson, was that of “disinterested politics,” a government led by educated gentlemen who would fulfill their duties in a spirit of public virtue and without regard to personal interests or pursuits.  This was the core of an Enlightenment gentleman, and Burr, his political enemies felt, lacked that essential core.  Indeed, it was Hamilton’s belief that Burr’s self-serving nature made him unfit to hold office—especially the presidency.  Jefferson, though one of Hamilton’s bitterest enemies, was at least a man of public virtue.  This belief led Hamilton to launch his unrelenting campaign in the House of Representatives to prevent Burr’s election to the presidency, favoring his erstwhile enemy Jefferson instead.  Later in Burr’s life, Jefferson, in turn, would go so far as to push the boundaries of the Constitution in his attempt—in the charging and trying of Burr for treason—to eliminate Burr. 
LegacyA lasting consequence of Burr's role in the election of 1800 was the Twelfth Amendment to the United States Constitution, which changed the way in which vice presidents were chosen. As was obvious from the 1800 election, the situation could easily arise where the vice-president, as the defeated presidential candidate, could not work well with the president. The Twelfth Amendment required that votes be cast separately for president and vice president.
  
In public and in private, Burr's behavior, even by his political foes, was labelled as considerate and gracious and he was often commended as a great listener. Although much took place in Burr's life, he is remembered by many only for the deadly duel with Hamilton. However, his establishment of guides and rules for the first Senate impeachment trial set a high moral bar for behavior and procedures in that chamber, many of which are followed today. His silence and refusal to engage in defending himself from his political critics either in legislatures or in the press, plus the fact that most of his personal papers disappeared with his daughter's death at sea and with his biographer, Matthew Davis, has left an air of mystery over his reputation.
Burr in literature and popular culture
Burr appears as a character epitomizing worldly sophistication in Harriet Beecher Stowe's 1859 historical romance The Minister's Wooing.Edward Everett Hale's 1863 story The Man Without a Country is about a fictional co-conspirator of Burr's, who is exiled for his crimes."The Aaron Burr Story", a second season (1965) episode of the television series Daniel Boone, starred Leif Erickson as ex-Vice President Aaron Burr attempting to set up an army to take over the western states.  In the show, Burr's attempt to hire one of Daniel Boone's young impressionable friends as a wilderness guide is ultimately thwarted by Boone when a proclamation is published for Burr's arrest for treason against the United States.The historical novel Burr, written in 1973, is the first (in historical chronology) volume in Gore Vidal's Narratives of Empire series."A Friend to Alexander", in James Thurber's My World and Welcome To It, transported the Burr–Hamilton rivalry into the twentieth century.Eudora Welty wrote a story about the romance of Burr's Western expedition, "First Love", which appears in Selected Stories of Eudora Welty (Modern Library 1992).In the comic book The Flash, a 1975 backup story featuring Green Lantern stars Burr.  "The Man of Destiny", written by Dennis O'Neil and drawn by Dick Dillin, reveals that Burr was recruited by aliens to act as a leader for an interplanetary society in chaos. (The alliance cloned Burr, sending the clone back to earth to duel with Hamilton and live out of the rest of "Burr s life on earth).In Michael Kurland's The Whenabouts of Burr (DAW, 1975)  the protagonists chase across various alternate universes, trying to recover the Constitution of the United States, which has been stolen and replaced by an alternate signed by Aaron Burr instead of Alexander Hamilton.In Orson Scott Card's alternate history / fantasy novel Seventh Son (1987), a character states that "... Aaron Burr got to be governor of Suskwahenny, before Daniel Boone shot him dead in ninety-nine."A famous 1993 "Got Milk?" commercial directed by Michael Bay features a historian obsessed with the study of Aaron Burr—he owns the guns and the bullet from the duel. He is called by a radio station and offered a prize if he can name the person who killed Alexander Hamilton in the duel, but he has peanut butter in his mouth and is out of milk, and cannot manage to say "Aaron Burr" clearly enough to be heard before his time runs out. In Alexander C. Irvine's 2002 novel A Scattering of Jades, Burr takes part in a plot to bring an ancient Aztec deity into power, explaining his interest in Mexico.The Lonely Island's "Lazy Sunday" quotes the line "you can call us Aaron Burr from the way we're dropping Hamiltons", referring to the large number of ten dollar bills being spent and the duel between Burr and Alexander Hamilton referring to how Aaron Burr killed or "dropped" him.In the alternate history short story "The War of '07" by Jayge Carr, contained in the collection Alternate Presidents, Burr is elected President in 1800, establishing an alliance with Napoleon Bonaparte and creates a family dictatorship. Upon his death in 1836, he is succeeded by his grandson Aaron Burr Alston, who previously served as his Vice President.
Notes 
References 
 

Adams, John, and Charles Francis Adams. The Works of John Adams, Second President of the United States: With a Life of the Author, Notes and Illustrations. Boston: Little, Brown, 1850. online edition Retrieved October 4, 2008
Burr, Aaron.  Political Correspondence and Public Papers of Aaron Burr. Mary-Jo Kline and Joanne W. Ryan, eds. 2 vol. Princeton University Press, 1983. 1311 pp.
Cheetham, James.  Nine Letters on the Subject of Aaron Burrs Political Defection. Reprint by Kessinger Publishing, 2007.
Cheetham, James. A view of the political conduct of Aaron Burr, esq., vice-president of the United States. (1802)
Clark, Daniel.  Proofs of the Corruption of Gen. James Wilkinson, and of His Connexion With Aaron Burr: A Full Refutation of His Slanderous Allegations in Relation to ... of the Principal Witness Against Him (1809). Reprinted by University Press of the Pacific, 2005.
Davis, Matthew L. Memoirs of Aaron Burr. With Miscellaneous Selections from His Correspondence. 2 Vols. New York: Harper & Bros, 1837. Project Gutenberg: Vol. 1, Vol. 2 Retrieved 12 December 2010
Ellis, Joseph. The Founding Brothers (2000) Alfred A. Knopf. ISBN 0-375-40544-5
Fairfield, Jane Frazee, and Sumner Lincoln Fairfield. The Autobiography of Jane Fairfield; Embracing a Few Select Poems by Sumner Lincoln Fairfield. Boston: Bazin and Ellsworth, 1860. online edition Retrieved September 5, 2007
Fleming, Thomas. Duel: Alexander Hamilton, Aaron Burr, and the Future of America New York: Basic Books, 1999.
Isenberg, Nancy. Fallen Founder: The Life of Aaron Burr New York, 2007.
Lomask, Milton. Aaron Burr. 2 Vols. New York: Farrar, Straus & Giroux, 1979.
Missouri History Museum Archives. Aaron Burr Papers
Pickett, Albert James. "The Arrest of Aaron Burr in Alabama." History of Alabama, and Incidentally of Georgia and Mississippi, from the Earliest Period. Charleston: Walker and James, 1851. online edition Retrieved September 27, 2007
Robertson, David. Reports of the Trials of Colonel Aaron Burr (Late Vice President of the United States) for Treason and for Misdemeanor...Two Volumes (report taken in shorthand) (1808)
Schachner, Nathan, Aaron Burr, A Biography, New York, 1937. online edition
Stewart, David O., "American Emperor:  Aaron Burr's Challenge to Jefferson's America (Simon & Schuster, 2011).
Van Ness, William Peter. An Examination of the Various Charges Exhibited Against Aaron Burr, Vice-President of the United States: and a Development of the Characters and Views of His Political Opponents. (1803) Reprinted by Kessinger Publishing, 2007.
 
 
Further reading 

Abernethy, Thomas Perkins. "Aaron Burr in Mississippi." Journal of Southern History 1949 15 (1): 9–21. ISSN 0022-4642
Adams, Henry, History of the United States, vol. iii. New York, 1890. (For the traditional view of Burr's conspiracy.)
Alexander, Holmes Moss.  Aaron Burr: The Proud Pretender.  1937; Reprinted by Greenwood-Heinemann Publishing, 1973.
 
Burdett, Charles. Margaret Moncrieffe: The First Love Of Aaron Burr. Reprinted by Kessinger Publishing, 2007.
Clark, Alan J., Cipher Code of Dishonor: Aaron Burr, an American Enigma. Bloomington, IN: AuthorHouse, 2005.
Clemens, Jere. (Hon.), The Rivals: A Tale of the Times of Aaron Burr and Alexander Hamilton. (1860) online edition
Cohalan, John P., The Saga of Aaron Burr (1986)
Cote, Richard N., Theodosia - Theodosia Burr Alston: Portrait of a Prodigy. (2002)
Faulkner, Robert K. "John Marshall and the Burr Trial." Journal of American History 1966 53(2): 247–258. ISSN 0021-8723
Fleming, Thomas. Duel: Alexander Hamilton, Aaron Burr, and the Future of America. New York: Basic Books, 1999.
Ford, Worthington Chauncey. "Some Papers of Aaron Burr", in Proceedings of the American Antiquarian Society, April 1919.
Freeman, Joanne B. "Dueling as Politics: Reinterpreting the Burr-Hamilton Duel." William and Mary Quarterly 53(2) (1996): 289–318. ISSN 0043-5597
Harrison, Lowell.  1978.  "The Aaron Burr Conspiracy."  American History I	Illustrated 13:25.
Isenberg, Nancy. Fallen Founder: The Life of Aaron Burr.  New York: Viking, 2007.
Jenkinson, Isaac. Aaron Burr: His Personal and Political Relations with Thomas Jefferson and Alexander Hamilton. (1902)
 
Kennedy, Roger G. Burr, Hamilton, and Jefferson: A Study in Character.  New York: Oxford University Press, 1999.
Künstler, Laurence S. The Unpredictable Mr. Aaron Burr (1974).
Larson, Edward J. A Magnificent Catastrophe: The Tumultuous Election of 1800, America's First Presidential Campaign.  New York: Free Press, 2007.
Lomask, Milton. Aaron Burr. 2 Vols. New York, 1979, 1983.
McCaleb, Walter Flavius, The Aaron Burr Conspiracy: A History Largely from Original and Hitherto Unused Sources, New York, 1903.
McCaleb, Walter Flavius, A New Light on Aaron Burr (date unknown)
Melton, Buckner F., Jr.  Aaron Burr: Conspiracy to Treason. New York: John Wiley, 2002. online edition
Parmet, Herbert S. and Marie B. Hecht; Aaron Burr; Portrait of an Ambitious Man (1967). online edition
Parton, James, The Life and Times of Aaron Burr, Boston and New York, 1898. (2 vols.)
Rogow, Arnold A. A Fatal Friendship: Alexander Hamilton and Aaron Burr (1998).
Rorabaugh, William J. "The Political Duel in the Early Republic: Burr v. Hamilton." Journal of the Early Republic 1995 15(1): 1–23. ISSN 0275-1275
Seton, Anya. My Theodosia (1948).
Slaughter, Thomas P. "Review Essay: Conspiratorial Politics: The Public Life of Aaron Burr."  Conspiratorial Politics.
Stewart, David O. American Emperor:  Aaron Burr's Challenge to Jefferson's America. New York: Simon & Schuster, 2011.
Todd, Charles Burr. The True Aaron Burr: A Biographical Sketch (1902). Reprinted by Kessinger Publishing, 2007.
Vail, Philip. The Great American Rascal: The Turbulent Life of Aaron Burr (1973).
Vidal, Gore, Burr (1973). A fictionalized view of Burr's life.
Wandell, Samuel H. and Meade Minngerode.  Aaron Burr (1925). Reprinted by Kessinger Publishing.
Wells, Colin.  "Aristocracy, Aaron Burr, and the Poetry of Conspiracy." Early American Literature (2004).
Wheelan, Joseph.  Jefferson's Vendetta: The Pursuit of Aaron Burr and the Judiciary. New York: Carroll & Graff, 2005.
 
Wood, Gordon S.  2006 Revolutionary Characters.  New York: Penguin.
 
External links 
 

Did Aaron Burr Really Try to Take Over Half of America?
The Political Graveyard: Edwards family
Photographic tour of Aaron Burr's grave at Princeton Cemetery.
Find-A-Grave profile for Aaron Burr
Harry Toulmin Biography
The Arrest of Aaron Burr in Alabama
The Aaron Burr Association
Letters of Aaron Burr
  Retrieved on 2009-02-26
 

  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT




























 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	James M. Buchanan
 
  
James McGill Buchanan, Jr. (born October 3, 1919) is an American economist known for his work on public choice theory, for which he received the 1986 Nobel Memorial Prize in Economic Sciences. Buchanan's work initiated research on how politicians' self-interest and non-economic forces affect government economic policy. He is a Distinguished Senior Fellow of the Cato Institute and professor at George Mason University.
BiographyBuchanan graduated from Middle Tennessee State Teachers College, now known as Middle Tennessee State University, in 1940.  Buchanan completed his M.S. from the University of Tennessee in 1941. He spent the war years on the staff of Admiral Nimitz in Honolulu, and it is during that time he met and married his wife Anne.Buchanan received his Ph.D. from the University of Chicago in 1948, where he was much influenced by Frank H. Knight. It was also at Chicago that he read for the first time and found enlightening the work of Knut Wicksell.   Photographs of Knight and Wicksell have hung from his office-walls ever since.Buchanan is the founder of a new Virginia school of political economy.  He taught at the University of Virginia, where he founded the Thomas Jefferson Center for the Protection of Free Expression; UCLA; Florida State University; the University of Tennessee; and the Virginia Polytechnic Institute ("Virginia Tech"), where he was affiliated with the Center for the Study of Public Choice (CSPC).  In 1983, he followed CSPC to its new home at George Mason University.    In 2001 Buchanan was honoured with an honorary doctoral degree at Universidad Francisco Marroquín   due his contribution to economic theory.Buchanan's work includes extensive writings on public finance, the public debt, voting, rigorous analysis of the theory of logrolling, macroeconomics, constitutional economics. 
and libertarian theory.
Approach to economic analysisBuchanan's important contribution to constitutionalism is his development of the sub-discipline of constitutional economics. 
According to Buchanan the ethic of constitutionalism is a key for constitutional order and "may be called the idealized Kantian world" where the individual "who is making the ordering, along with substancially all of his fellows, adopts the moral law as a general rule for behaviour".  
Buchanan rejects "any organic conception of the state as superior in wisdom, to the citizens of this state". This philosophical position forms the basis of constitutional economics. Buchanan believes that every constitution is created for at least several generations of citizens. Therefore, it must be able to balance interests of the state, society, and each individual. Buchanan is considered to be a quasi member of the Austrian school of economics.   As Buchanan put it: "I certainly have a great deal of affinity with Austrian economics and I have no objections to being called an Austrian. Hayek and Mises might consider me an Austrian but, surely some of the others would not." 
Buchanan went on to say that: "I didn't become acquainted with Mises until I wrote an article on individual choice and voting in the market in 1954. After I had finished the first draft I went back to see what Mises had said in Human Action. I found out, amazingly, that he had come closer to saying what I was trying to say than anybody else." 
List of publications

The Collected Works of James M. Buchanan by James M. Buchanan, at the Library of Economics and Liberty.  Twenty-volume work, copyrighted but nine of the 20 volumes are free to read and access; fully searchable online. Includes:
A list of Buchanan's Publications from 1949 to 1986 can be found at The Scandinavian Journal Of Economics, 1987, Vol. 89. No. 1, pp. 17–37.

Public Principles of Public Debt: A Defense and Restatement, by James M. Buchanan, at the Library of Economics and Liberty
The Calculus of Consent: Logical Foundations of Constitutional Democracy, by James M. Buchanan and Gordon Tullock, at the Library of Economics and Liberty
Public Finance in Democratic Process: Fiscal Institutions and Individual Choice, by James M. Buchanan, at the Library of Economics and Liberty
The Demand and Supply of Public Goods, by James M. Buchanan, at the Library of Economics and Liberty
Cost and Choice: An Inquiry in Economic Theory, by James M. Buchanan, at the Library of Economics and Liberty
The Limits of Liberty: Between Anarchy and Leviathan, by James M. Buchanan, at the Library of Economics and Liberty
Democracy in Deficit: The Political Legacy of Lord Keynes, by James M. Buchanan and Richard E. Wagner, at the Library of Economics and Liberty
The Power to Tax: Analytical Foundations of a Fiscal Constitution, by Geoffrey Brennan and James M. Buchanan, at the Library of Economics and Liberty
The Reason of Rules: Constitutional Political Economy, by Geoffrey Brennan and James M. Buchanan, at the Library of Economics and Liberty
Complete 20-volume list of The Collected Works of James M. Buchanan by James M. Buchanan, at the publisher, Liberty Fund.
Why I, Too, Am Not a Conservative: The Normative Vision of Classical Liberalism (Cheltenham UK: Edward Elgar, 2005)
Economics from the Outside In: Better than Plowing and Beyond (College Station: Texas A&M Press, 2007)


See also

Gordon Tullock
Public Choice Theory
Samaritan's dilemma
Social contract
The Trap (TV Documentary Series) Buchanan features in "The Trap", a BBC documentary.


Notes 
References

Anthony B. Atkinson, 'James M. Buchanan's Contributions to Economics', The Scandinavian Journal of Economics, 1987, Vol. 89, No. 1, pp. 5–15.
Brennan, G., Kliemt, H., and Tollison, R.D. (eds.)  Method and Morals in Constitutional Economics: Essays in Honor of James M. Buchanan (Berlin:  Springer, 2002).
Buchanan, James M. Better than Plowing and Other Personal Essays (Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 1992)
Kasper, Sherryl. The Revival of Laissez-Faire in American Macroeconomic Theory: A Case Study of Its Pioneers (2002) ch 6
Meadowcroft, John.  James M. Buchanan (London:  Continuum, 2011).
Pittard, Homer. The First Fifty Years (Murfreesboro, TN: Middle Tennessee State College, 1961) pp. 136,173
Reisman, David A.  The Political Economy of James Buchanan (Basingstoke: Macmillan, 1990).



External links

Biography at GMU
YouTube Reflections on the Life and Work of James Buchanan
Biography of James M. Buchanan at the Concise Encyclopedia of Economics
'The Hobbes Problem: From Machiavelli to Buchanan' by Deirdre McCloskey.

 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT




















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Yehudi Menuhin
 


Yehudi Menuhin, Baron Menuhin, OM, KBE (22 April 1916 – 12 March 1999) was an American violinist and conductor who spent most of his performing career in the United Kingdom. He was born to Russian Jewish parents in the United States, but became a citizen of Switzerland in 1970, and of the United Kingdom in 1985. He is often considered to be one of the greatest violinists of the 20th century.
Early life and career
Yehudi Menuhin was born in New York City, United States, to Jewish parents from what is now Belarus.  His sisters were the concert pianist and human rights worker Hephzibah Menuhin and the pianist, painter, and poet Yaltah Menuhin. Through his father Moshe Menuhin, a former rabbinical student and anti-Zionist writer, Menuhin was descended from a distinguished rabbinical dynasty.Menuhin began violin instruction at age four under violinist Sigmund Anker; his parents had wanted Louis Persinger to be his teacher, but Persinger refused. Horthistoria, Three Jewish Violinists and California, 8 September 2005  Menuhin displayed extraordinary talents at an early age. His first solo violin performance was at the age of seven with the San Francisco Symphony in 1923.  Persinger then agreed to take Menuhin as a student.  When the Menuhins went to Paris, Persinger suggested Yehudi go to his own teacher, Eugène Ysaÿe. He did have one lesson with Ysaÿe, but did not like his method or the fact that he was very old.  Instead, he went to the Romanian composer and violinist George Enescu, after which he made several recordings with his sister Hephzibah. He was also a student of Adolf Busch. In 1929 he played in Berlin, under Bruno Walter's baton, three concerti by Bach, Brahms and Beethoven.  In 1932 he recorded Edward Elgar's Violin Concerto in B minor for HMV in London, with the composer himself conducting, and between 1934 and 1936 he made the first integral recording of Johann Sebastian Bach's Sonatas and Partitas for Solo Violin.
World War II musicianYehudi Menuhin performed for Allied soldiers during World War II, and accompanied English composer Benjamin Britten to perform for inmates of Bergen-Belsen concentration camp, after its liberation in April 1945. He returned to Germany in 1947 to perform with the Berlin Philharmonic Orchestra under the baton of conductor Wilhelm Furtwängler as an act of reconciliation, becoming the first Jewish musician to do so following the Holocaust. He said to critics within the Jewish community that he wanted to rehabilitate Germany's music and spirit. After building early success on richly romantic and tonally opulent performances, he experienced considerable physical and artistic difficulties caused by overwork during the war as well as unfocused and unstructured early training (reportedly he said "I watched myself on film and realized that for 30 years I'd been holding the bow wrong").   Careful practice and study combined with meditation and yoga helped him overcome many of these problems. His profound and considered musical interpretations are nearly universally acclaimed. When he finally resumed recording, he was known for practicing by analyzing music phrases one note at a time.He and Louis Kentner (brother-in-law of his wife, Diana) gave the first performance of William Walton's Violin Sonata, at Zürich on 30 September 1949.Menuhin continued to perform to an advanced age, becoming known for profound interpretations of an austere quality, as well as for his explorations of music outside the classical realm.
World interactionsMenuhin credited German-Jewish philosopher Constantin Brunner with providing him with "a theoretical framework within which I could fit the events and experiences of life". In 1952 Menuhin met and befriended the influential yogi B. K. S. Iyengar before he had come to prominence outside India. Menuhin arranged for Iyengar to teach abroad in London, Switzerland, Paris and elsewhere. This was the first time that many Westerners had been exposed to yoga.Following his role as a member of the awards jury at the 1955 Queen Elisabeth Music Competition, Menuhin secured a Rockefeller Foundation grant for the financially strapped Grand Prize winner at the event, Argentine violinist Alberto Lysy. Menuhin made Lysy his first and only personal student, and the two toured extensively throughout the concert halls of Europe. The young protégé later established the International Menuhin Music Academy in Gstaad, in his honor. Menuhin made several recordings with the German conductor Wilhelm Furtwängler, who had been criticized for conducting in Germany during the Nazi era. Menuhin defended Furtwängler, noting that the conductor had helped a number of Jewish musicians to flee Nazi Germany.In 1957, he founded the Menuhin Festival Gstaad in Gstaad, Switzerland. In 1962, he established the Yehudi Menuhin School in Stoke d'Abernon, Surrey. He also established the music program at The Nueva School in Hillsborough, California, sometime around then. In 1965 he received an honorary knighthood from the British monarchy. In the same year, Australian composer Malcolm Williamson wrote a violin concerto for Menuhin. He performed the concerto many times and recorded it at its premiere at the Bath Festival in 1965. Originally known as the Bath Assembly,  the festival was first directed by the impresario Ian Hunter in 1948. After the first year the city tried to run the festival itself, but in 1955 asked Hunter back. In 1959 Hunter invited Yehudi Menuhin to become artistic director of the Festival. Menuhin accepted, and retained the post until 1968. Menuhin also had a long association with Ravi Shankar, which began with their 1966 album West Meets East.  During this time, he commissioned composer Alan Hovhaness to write a concerto for violin, sitar, and orchestra to be performed by himself and Shankar. The resulting work, entitled Shambala (c. 1970), with a fully composed violin part and space for improvisation from the sitarist, is the earliest known work for sitar with western symphony orchestra, predating Shankar’s own sitar concertos, but Menuhin and Shankar never recorded it. Menuhin also worked with famous jazz violinist Stéphane Grappelli in the 1970s on Jalousie, an album of pop music of the 1930s arranged in chamber style.At the Edinburgh Festival in 1957 Menuhin premiered Priaulx Rainier's violin concerto Due Canti e Finale, which he had commissioned Rainier to write. He also commissioned her last work, Wildlife Celebration, which he performed in aid of Gerald Durrell's Wildlife Conservation Trust.In 1983 Menuhin and Robert Masters founded the Yehudi Menuhin International Competition for Young Violinists. Now one of the world's leading competitions for young violinists, many of its prizewinners have gone on to become prominent violinists, including Tasmin Little, Nikolaj Znaider, Ilya Gringolts, Julia Fischer, Daishin Kashimoto and Lara St. John.In 1991 Menuhin was awarded the prestigious Wolf Prize by the Israeli Government. In the Israeli Knesset he gave an acceptance speech in which he criticised Israel's continued occupation of the West Bank:

"This wasteful governing by fear, by contempt for the basic dignities of life, this steady asphyxiation of a dependent people, should be the very last means to be adopted by those who themselves know too well the awful significance, the unforgettable suffering of such an existence. It is unworthy of my great people, the Jews, who have striven to abide by a code of moral rectitude for some 5,000 years, who can create and achieve a society for themselves such as we see around us but can yet deny the sharing of its great qualities and benefits to those dwelling amongst them." 

In 1997 Menuhin and Ian Stoutzker founded the charity Live Music Now, the largest outreach music project in the UK. Live Music Now pays and trains professional musicians to work in the community, bringing the experience to those who rarely get an opportunity to hear or see live music performance.Menuhin's pupils included Nigel Kennedy, Nicola Benedetti, Peter Tanfield and the violists Paul Coletti and Csaba Erdélyi. He owned and played several notable instruments; arguably the most famous of which is the Lord Wilton Guarneri del Gesù (1742).In the 1980s Menuhin wrote and oversaw the creation of a "Music Guides" series of books; each covered a musical instrument, with one on the human voice. Menuhin wrote some, while others were edited by different authors.
Later career taken by Allan Warren, 1976]]Menuhin regularly returned to the San Francisco Bay Area, sometimes performing with the San Francisco Symphony Orchestra. One of the more memorable later performances was of Edward Elgar's Violin Concerto, which Menuhin had recorded with the composer in 1932.On 22 April 1978, along with Stéphane Grappelli, Yehudi played Pick Yourself Up, taken from the Menuhin & Grappelli Play Berlin, Kern, Porter and Rodgers & Hart album as the interval act at the 23rd Eurovision Song Contest for TF1. The performance came direct from the studios of TF1 and not that of the venue (Palais des Congrès), where the contest was being held.Menuhin hosted the PBS telecast of the gala opening concert of the San Francisco Symphony from Davies Symphony Hall in September 1980.During the 1970s, 1980s and 1990s, Menuhin made jazz recordings with Stéphane Grappelli, classical recordings with L. Subramaniam and albums of Eastern music with the sitarist Ravi Shankar.  In 1983 he founded the Yehudi Menuhin International Competition for Young Violinists in Folkestone, Kent.His recording contract with EMI lasted almost 70 years and is the longest in the history of the music industry. He made his first recording at age 13 in November 1929, and his last in 1999, when he was nearly 83 years old. He recorded over 300 works for EMI, both as a violinist and as a conductor. In 2009 EMI released a 51-CD retrospective of Menuhin's recording career, titled Yehudi Menuhin: The Great EMI Recordings.In 1990 Menuhin was the first conductor for the Asian Youth Orchestra which toured around Asia, including Japan, Taiwan, Singapore and Hong Kong with Julian Lloyd Webber and a group of young talented musicians from all over Asia.
Personal life
Yehudi Menuhin was married twice. He married Nola Nicholas, daughter of an Australian industrialist, and sister of Hephzibah Menuhin's first husband Lindsay Nicholas. They had two children, Krov and Zamira (who married pianist Fou Ts'ong). Following their 1947 divorce he married the British ballerina and actress Diana Gould, whose mother was the pianist Evelyn Suart (who had played with artists such as Eugène Ysaÿe and Karel Halíř), and whose stepfather was Admiral Sir Cecil Harcourt. Menuhin and Gould had two sons, Gerard and Jeremy, a pianist. A third child died shortly after birth.The name Yehudi means 'Jew' in Hebrew. In an interview republished in October 2004, he recounted to New Internationalist magazine the story of his name:

Obliged to find an apartment of their own, my parents searched the neighbourhood and chose one within walking distance of the park. Showing them out after they had viewed it, the landlady said: "And you'll be glad to know I don't take Jews." Her mistake made clear to her, the antisemitic landlady was renounced, and another apartment found. But her blunder left its mark. Back on the street my mother made a vow. Her unborn baby would have a label proclaiming his race to the world. He would be called "The Jew." 

Menuhin died in Martin Luther Hospital,  Berlin, Germany, from complications of bronchitis.Soon after his death, the Royal Academy of Music acquired the Yehudi Menuhin Archive, one of the most comprehensive collections ever assembled by an individual musician.
ViolinsMenuhin used a number of famous violins including the Giovanni Bussetto 1680, the Giovanni Grancino 1695, the Guarneri filius Andrea 1703, the Soil Stradivarius, the Prince Khevenhüller 1733 Stradivari, the Guarneri del Gesù 1739, and the Lord Wilton 1742 Guarneri del Gesù.
Awards and honours

Freedom of the City (Edinburgh, Scotland, 1965)
In 1965, while he was still an American citizen, Menuhin was made an honorary Knight Commander of the Order of the British Empire, which entitled him to use the postnominal letters KBE, but not to style himself Sir Yehudi. After Menuhin gained British citizenship in 1985, his knighthood was upgraded to a substantive one, and he became Sir Yehudi Menuhin KBE.
The Jawaharlal Nehru Award for International Understanding (1968). 
The Léonie Sonning Music Prize (Denmark, 1972)
Nominated as president of the Elgar Society (1983)
The Ernst von Siemens Music Prize (1984)
The Kennedy Center Honors (1986)
Appointed a member of the Order of Merit (1987)
His recording of Edward Elgar's Cello Concerto in E minor with Julian Lloyd Webber won the 1987 BRIT Award for Best British Classical Recording (BBC Music Magazine named this recording "the finest version ever recorded").
The Glenn Gould Prize (1990), in recognition of his lifetime of contributions
Ambassador of Goodwill (UNESCO, 1992)
In 1993 Menuhin was made a life peer, as Baron Menuhin of Stoke d'Abernon in the County of Surrey. 
The Konex Decoration (Konex Foundation, Argentina, 1994)
The Otto Hahn Peace Medal in Gold of the United Nations Association of Germany (DGVN) in Berlin (1997)
Honorary Doctorates from 20 universities, including Oxford, Cambridge, St Andrews, Vrije Universiteit Brussel and the University of Bath (1969). 
In the European Parliament in Brussels, the room in which concerts and performances are held is called the "Yehudi Menuhin Space".
Menuhin was honored as "a Freeman" of the cities of Edinburgh, Bath, Reims and Warsaw.
He held the Gold Medals of the cities of Paris, New York and Jerusalem.


Cultural referencesThe catchphrase "Who's Yehoodi?" popular in the 1930s and 1940s was inspired by Menuhin's guest appearance on a radio show, where Jerry Colonna turned "Yehoodi" into a widely recognized slang term for a mysteriously absent person. It eventually lost all of its original connection with Menuhin.Yehudi Menuhin was also 'meant' to appear on The Morecambe and Wise Show but could not do so as he was 'opening at the Argyl Theatre, Birkenhead in Old King Cole. He was replaced by Eric Morecambe in the famous "Grieg's Piano Concerto by Grieg" sketch featuring the conductor André Previn.A picture of Menuhin as a child is sometimes used as part of a Thematic Apperception Test. 
Bibliography

 
 
 
 
 
 
 


Films

1943 – Menuhin was a featured performer in the 1943 film, Stage Door Canteen. Introduced only as "Mr. Menuhin," he performed two violin solos, "Ave Maria" and "Flight of the Bumble Bee" for an audience of servicemen, volunteer hostesses and celebrities from stage and screen.
1979 – The Music of Man (television series)
The Mind of Music


References 
External links

The Official website for Yehudi Menuhin
Yehudi Menuhin International Competition for Young Violinists
Text and pictures from Yehudi Menuhin by french film director Bruno Monsaingeon
Yehudi Menuhin Center Saanen/Gstaad Schweiz
International Menuhin Music Academy
Yehudiana, Reliving the Menuhin Odyssey. A book, by Philip Bailey
International Yehudi Menuhin Foundation
The International Music School Founded by Yehudi Menuhin
Live Music Now – Charity founded by Yehudi Menuhin
PBS Series American Masters Yehudi Menuhin
YouTube-Elgar Performance
From the Sitar to the Guitar – The 1995 concerts featuring Yehudi Menuhin and Ravi Shankar
Youtube Paganini Concerto: Third Movement
Youtube: Paganini's Moto Perpetuo
Yehudi Menuhin playing duos in the parc des Buttes Chaumont, Paris
New biography (Yehudiana, a Menuhin family biography).
Yehudi Menuhin's life in Alma
Yehudi Menuhin interview by Bruce Duffie, January 31, 1987

 
 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT
































 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Jean Claude Eugène Péclet
 
Jean Claude Eugène Péclet (10 February 1793 - 6 December 1857) was a French physicist. He was born in Besançon, France.  Péclet became, in 1812, one of the first students of the École Normale in Paris with Gay-Lussac and Dulong being his professors. In 1816, he was elected professor at the Collège de Marseille and taught physical sciences there until 1827. Being nominated maître de conférences at the École Normale, he returned to Paris. In 1829, he became a professor of physics at the École Centrale des Arts et Manufactures that was being founded by the businessman  Alphonse Lavallée, by Péclet, and by three other scientists, Philippe Benoît, Jean-Baptiste Dumas and Théodore Olivier. 
His salary was then 3000 Francs per year, plus a share of the profits of this private engineering school. 
In 1840, Péclet became inspecteur général de l'instruction publique. The Péclet number is named after him. He was Coriolis's brother-in-law.He died in Paris.
Books by J.C.E. Péclet

Traité de l'éclairage (De Malher et Cie, Paris, 1827)
Traité élémentaire de physique. Tome premier (Hachette, Paris, 1838)
Traité élémentaire de physique. Tome second (Hachette, Paris, 1838)
Traité élémentaire de physique.  Planches (Hachette, Paris, 1838)
Traité de la chaleur considérée dans ses applications. (Masson, Paris, 1861, 3rd edition)
Traité de la chaleur considérée dans ses applications. Tome premier (Masson, Paris, 1878, 4th edition) 
Traité de la chaleur considérée dans ses applications. Tome deuxième (Masson, Paris, 1878, 4th edition) 
Traité de la chaleur considérée dans ses applications. Tome troisième  (Masson, Paris, 1878, 4th edition) 
Traité complet des propriétés, de la préparation et de l'emploi des matières tinctoriales by J. Ch. Leuchs with revisions by J. C. E. Péclet (De Malher et Cie, Paris, 1829)

 
External links

Web site of Ecole Centrale, with a Picture of JCE Peclet

 
DEFAULTSORT






 
 
 
 
 
	Robert Yerkes
 
Robert Mearns Yerkes (May 26, 1876 – February 3, 1956) was an American psychologist, ethologist, and primatologist best known for his work in intelligence testing and in the field of comparative psychology.Yerkes was a pioneer in the study both of human and primate intelligence and of the social behavior of gorillas and chimpanzees.  Along with John D. Dodson, Yerkes developed the Yerkes-Dodson law relating arousal to performance.As time went on, however, Yerkes began to propagate his support for eugenics in the 1910s and 20s. His works are largely considered politically incorrect by modern anthropologists and academics.  He also served on the board of trustees of Science Service, now known as Society for Science & the Public, from 1921-1925.
Education and early careerRobert Yerkes was born in Breadysville, Pennsylvania (near Ivyland, Pennsylvania). Growing up on a farm in rural Pennsylvania, Robert Yerkes wanted to leave the hard life of the rural farmer and become a physician. With the financial help of an uncle, Yerkes attended Ursinus College from 1892 to 1897. Upon graduating he received an offer from Harvard University to do graduate work in Biology. Faced with a choice of Harvard or medical training in Philadelphia, he chose to go to Harvard.At Harvard, Yerkes became interested in animal behavior, so much so that he put off further medical training to study comparative psychology. He earned his Ph.D. in the Psychology Department in 1902.His early career was strongly influenced by the debts Yerkes incurred paying for school. Upon his graduation from Harvard, he took up a position with the school as an instructor and Assistant Professor in Comparative Psychology. He had to supplement his income during the summer for several years by teaching general psychology at Radcliffe College. Another part-time job he took on was being the director of psychological research at the Boston Psychopathic Hospital, Boston, Massachusetts.In 1907, Yerkes published his first book, The Dancing Mouse. Among his friends during this time was future behaviorist John Watson, with whom he exchanged ideas and collaborated. He was also a member of the Wicht Club (1903–1911).
Intelligence testing and EugenicsIn 1917, Yerkes served as president of the American Psychological Association (APA).  Under his urging, the APA began several programs devoted to the war effort in World War I.  As chairman of the Committee on the Psychological Examination of Recruits, he developed the Army's Alpha and Beta Intelligence Tests, the first nonverbal group tests, which were given to over 1 million United States soldiers during the war.The test ultimately concluded that recent immigrants (especially those from Southern and Eastern Europe) scored considerably lower than older waves of immigration (from Northern Europe), and was used as one of the eugenic motivations for harsh immigration restriction.  The results would later be criticized as very clearly only measuring acculturation, as the test scores correlated nearly exactly with the number of years spent living in the US.In his introduction to Carl C. Brigham's A Study of American Intelligence (which helped popularize eugenics in the U.S.), Yerkes warned that "no citizen can afford to ignore the menace of race deterioration." The study was based on the findings of Yerkes and Brigham regarding the alarming results of the Army intelligence tests: nearly half of the white draft (47.3%) was feebleminded,  with blacks and the newer immigrant groups achieving the lowest scores.Although Yerkes claimed that the tests measured native intelligence, and not education or training, this claim is difficult to sustain in the face of the questions themselves: Question 18 of Alpha Test 8 reads: "Velvet Joe appears in advertisements of ... (tooth powder)(dry goods)(tobacco)(soap)." The tests themselves read like a kind of early 1900s Trivial Pursuit. Along with Edward L. Thorndike, Yerkes was a member and Chairman of the Committee on Inheritance of Mental Traits, part of the Eugenics Record Office, which was founded by Charles Benedict Davenport, a former teacher of Yerkes at Harvard. 
National Research CouncilImmediately after World War I, Yerkes worked as a paid officer for the United States National Research Council (NRC) and took the helm of the NRC Committee for Research in Problems of Sex.  The Committee for Research in Problems of Sex helped Yerkes establish close relationships with officers from Rockefeller philanthropic foundations.  These relationships later helped him to solicit substantial funds for his chimpanzee projects.
Primatology pioneerYerkes had a long and storied fascination with the study of chimpanzees.  He had spent time observing chimpanzees in Cuba at Madame Abreu's colony in the early 1920s, and had returned from the trip determined to raise and observe chimps on his own.  He began by purchasing two chimpanzees, Chim and Panzee, from a zoo.  He brought the two chimps home, where they lived in a bedroom and ate with a fork at a miniature table.  Chim was a particular delight for Yerkes, and the summer that chimp and psychologist spent together is memorialized in Almost Human (1924). In 1924, Yerkes was hired as a professor of psychobiology, a field he pioneered, at Yale University. He founded the Yale University Laboratories of Primate Biology in New Haven, followed by his Anthropoid Breeding and Experiment Station in Orange Park, Florida with funds from the Rockefeller Foundation. After his death, the lab was moved to Emory University in Atlanta, Georgia, and is now called the Yerkes National Primate Research Center.  The primate language Yerkish was developed there. Yerkes retired from his position as Director in 1942, where he was replaced by Karl Lashley. Asked how to say his name, he told The Literary Digest it was YER-keez. 
Publications

1907, The Dancing Mouse, A Study in Animal Behavior
1911, Introduction to Psychology
1911, Methods of Studying Vision in Animals (with John B. Watson)
1914, Outline of a Study of the Self
1915, A Point Scale for Measuring Mental Ability (with co-authors)


See also

Great Ape personhood
Yerkes-Dodson law
Yerkish
The mind of an ape


References
Notes 
General references

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


Further reading


 


External links

Emory.edu - 'Innovation and Science:  The History of Yerkes', Yerkes National Primate Research Center
Indiana.edu - 'Robert Mearns Yerkes (1876–1956) American Comparative Psychologist', Indiana University
IPFW.edu - 'Intelligence Tests' (historical overview)
Karoo.net - 'A Nation of Morons' (critique of the Army Alpha Intelligence Test), Stephen Jay Gould
YorkU.ca - 'Autobiography of Robert Mearns Yerkes', Robert Yerkes, York University (1930)
   
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
DEFAULTSORT










 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Anselme Payen
 
Anselme Payen (6 January 1795 – 12 May 1878) was a French chemist known for discovering the enzyme diastase, and the carbohydrate cellulose. Payen was born in Paris. He began studying science with his father when he was 13-year-old, and later studied Chemistry at the École Polytechnique under the chemists Louis Nicolas Vauquelin and Michel Eugène Chevreul.  At the age of 23, Payen became manager of a borax-refining factory, where he developed a process for synthesizing borax from soda and boric acid. Previously, all borax had been imported from the East Indies exclusively by the Dutch. Payen's new method of synthesizing borax allowed him to sell the mineral at one third the going price, and break the Dutch monopoly. Payen also developed processes for refining sugar, along with a way to refine starch and alcohol from potatoes, and a method for determination of nitrogen. Payen invented a decolorimeter, which dealt with the analysis, decolorization, bleaching, and crystallization of sugar.Payen discovered the first enzyme, diastase, in 1833.   He is also known for isolating and naming the carbohydrate cellulose. In 1835, Payen became a professor at École Centrale Paris. He was later elected professor at the Conservatoire National des Arts et Métiers. He died in 1878.The American Chemical Society's Cellulose and Renewable Materials Division has established an annual award in his honor, the Anselme Payen Award.   
References  
DEFAULTSORT




 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Max Reinhardt
  
 Max Reinhardt (September 9, 1873 – October 30, 1943) was an Austrian-born American stage and film actor and director.
BiographyReinhardt was born Maximilian Goldmann, of Jewish ancestry, in Baden bei Wien, Austria-Hungary. From 1902 until the beginning of Nazi rule in 1933, he worked as a director at various theaters in Berlin. From 1905 to 1930 he managed the Deutsches Theater ("German Theatre") in Berlin and, in addition, the Theater in der Josefstadt in Vienna from 1924 to 1933. By employing powerful staging techniques, and harmonising stage design, language, music and choreography, Reinhardt introduced new dimensions into German theatre. The Max Reinhardt Seminar in Vienna, which is arguably the most important German-language acting school, was installed implementing his ideas. Siegfried Jacobsen wrote Max Reinhardt in 1910. In 1920, Reinhardt established the Salzburg Festival with Richard Strauss and Hugo von Hofmannsthal, notably directing an annual production of the morality play Everyman about God sending Death to summon a representative of mankind for judgment. After the Anschluss of Austria to Nazi-governed Germany in 1938, he emigrated first to England, then to the United States, where he had already successfully directed his own play The Miracle in 1924, and a popular stage version of Shakespeare's A Midsummer Night's Dream in 1927. Reinhardt followed that success by directing a film version in 1935 using a mostly different cast, that included James Cagney, Mickey Rooney, Joe E. Brown and Olivia de Havilland, amongst others. Mickey Rooney and Ms. de Havilland had also appeared in Reinhardt's 1934 stage production, which was staged at the Hollywood Bowl. The Nazis banned the film because of the Jewish ancestry of both Reinhardt and Felix Mendelssohn, whose music (arranged by Erich Korngold) was used throughout the film.Reinhardt also opened the Reinhardt School of the Theatre in Hollywood, on Sunset Boulevard. Several notable stars of the day received classical theater training, among them actress Nanette Fabray. In 1940 he became a naturalized citizen of the United States. At that time, he was married to his second wife, actress Helene Thimig.
Max Reinhardt and film
Reinhardt was much more interested in film than most of his contemporaries in theater. He made films as a director and from time to time also as a producer. His first staging for the film was  Sumurûn (1910). After that, Reinhardt founded his own film company. He was chosen to direct the film adaptation Das Mirakel (1912). Controversies around the staging of Mirakel, which was shown in the Vienna Rotunde in 1912, led to Reinhardt's retreat from the project. The author of the play, Reinhardt's friend and confidant Karl Vollmoeller, won the French director Michel-Antoine Carré to finish the shooting.Reinhardt made the films Die Insel der Seligen and Eine venezianische Nacht for the German film producer Paul Davidson, in 1913 and 1914. Both films meant a lot of work for Reinhardt's cameraman Karl Freund, as Reinhardt also demanded special shootings like that of a lagoon in the moonlight.Die Insel der Seligen was praised by the critics above all for Reinhardt's work on the clearness of expression and a vivid play of the features. The film attracted attention through its erotic acting. Its ancient mythical setting included sea gods, nymphs, and fauns, and the actors appeared naked. The part playing in the present fit the strict customs of the time of the late German resp. Austrian monarchy. The actors had to live up to the demands of double roles. Wilhelm Diegelmann and Willy Prager played the bourgeois fathers as well as the sea gods, Ernst Matray a bachelor and a faun, Leopoldine Konstantin the Circe. The shooting for Eine venezianische Nacht by Karl Gustav Vollmoeller took place in Venice. Maria Carmi played the bride, Alfred Abel the young stranger, and Ernst Matray Anselmus and Pipistrello. The shooting was disturbed by a fanatic who incited the attendant Venetians against the German speaking staff.In 1935, Reinhardt directed his first film in the US, A Midsummer Night's Dream. He founded the drama schools Hochschule für Schauspielkunst „Ernst Busch“ in Berlin and the Max Reinhardt Seminar. Many alumni of these schools made their career in film.
DeathReinhardt died in New York City in 1943 and is interred at Westchester Hills Cemetery in Hastings-on-Hudson, Westchester County, New York.His son, Gottfried Reinhardt, was a well-regarded film producer. One of his grandsons (by adoption), Stephen Reinhardt, is a labor lawyer who has served notably on the United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit since his appointment by Jimmy Carter in 1980. Another grandson, Michael Reinhardt is a successful fashion photographer.
Work on Broadway

Sumurun (pantomime) (1912) - leader of the Deutsches Theater of Berlin on a New York tour
The Miracle (1924) - Co-playwright and Director
A Midsummer Night's Dream (revival) (1927) - Producer
Jederman (1927) - Co-producer
Peripherie (1928) - Playwright
Redemption (revival) (1928) - Director
The Eternal Road (1937) - Director
The Merchant of Yonkers (1938), Thornton Wilder's play, later rewritten as "The Matchmaker". 
Sons and Soldiers (1943) - Producer and Director


Films

A Midsummer Night's Dream (1935)
Das Mirakel (1912)


External links 

 
Max Reinhardt Archives and Library at Binghamton University, State University of New York
 
 
A hard-nosed Utopian By Esther Slevogt at signandsight.com
 
Michael Frayn's play Afterlife, based on Reinhardt's life: National Theatre, London (2008) [1]
Literature on Max Reinhardt
 
 
 
DEFAULTSORT














 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Nursultan Nazarbayev
 
Nursultan Abishuly Nazarbayev (   ;    ; born 6 July 1940) is the President of Kazakhstan, having served  since the nation's independence from the Soviet Union in 1991. In April 2011, President Nazarbayev was re-elected to another five-year term receiving 95.54 percent of the vote with 89.9 percent of registered voters participating (up from 76.8 percent in the 2005 presidential election).
Early lifeNazarbayev was born in Chemolgan, a rural town near Almaty, when Kazakhstan was one of the republics of the Soviet Union.  His father was a poor labourer who worked for a wealthy local family until Soviet rule confiscated the family's farmland in the 1930s during Joseph Stalin's collectivization policy.  Following this his father took the family to the mountains to live out a nomadic existence.  His father avoided compulsory military service due to a withered arm he sustained when putting out a fire.  At the end of World War II the family returned to the village of Chemolgan, and Nazarbayev began to pick up the Russian language.  He performed well at school, and was sent to a boarding school in Kaskelen.  After leaving school he took up a one year, government-funded scholarship at the Karaganda Steel Mill in Temirtau.    He also spent time training at a steel plant in Dniprodzerzhynsk, and therefore was away from Temirtau as riots over working conditions enveloped the town.  
By aged 20, he was earning a relatively excellent wage doing "incredibly heavy and dangerous work" in the blast furnace.    He joined the Communist Party in 1962, and quickly became a prominent member of the Young Communist League.  He soon became a full-time worker for the party, and picked up a college education at the Karagandy Polytechnic Institute.    He was appointed secretary of the Communist Party Committee of the Karaganda Metallurgical Kombinat in 1972, and four years later became Second Secretary of the Karaganda Regional Party Committee.  In his role as a bureaucrat, Nazarbayev spent his days dealing with legal papers, solving logistical problems and industrial disputes, as well as meeting workers to solve individual issues.  He later wrote that "the central allocation of capital investment and the distribution of funds" meant that infrastructure was poor, workers were demoralized and overworked, and centrally set targets were unrealistic; he saw the steel plant's problems as a microcosm for the problems for the Soviet Union as a whole. 
Rise to power 
In 1984, Nazarbayev became the Chairman of the Council of Ministers, working under Dinmukhamed Kunayev, the First Secretary of the Communist Party of Kazakhstan.    He served as First Secretary of the Kazakh Communist Party from  1989 to 1991. Nazarbayev criticized Askar Kunayev, head of the Academy of Sciences, at the 16th session of the Communist Party of Kazakhstan in January 1986 for not reforming his department. Dinmukhamed Kunayev, Nazarbayev's boss and Askar's brother, felt deeply angered and betrayed. Kunayev went to Moscow and demanded Nazarbayev's dismissal while Nazarbayev's supporters campaigned for Kunayev's dismissal and Nazarbayev's promotion. Mikhail Gorbachev accepted the resignation of a deflated Kunayev, replacing him with Gennady Kolbin, an ethnic Russian, triggering three days of riots known as the Jeltoqsan.  Nazarbayev replaced Kolbin, who despite his office had little authority in Kazakhstan, on 22 June 1989.  He was Chairman of the Supreme Soviet (head of state) from 22 February to 24 April 1990. Nazarbayev was elected President of Kazakhstan by the Supreme Soviet on 24 April. He supported Russian President Boris Yeltsin against the attempted coup in August 1991 by Soviet hardliners.  The Soviet Union disintegrated following the failed coup, though Nazarbayev was highly concerned with maintaining the close economic ties between Kazakhstan and Russia.  He won the 1991 presidential election on 1 December, winning 91.5% of the vote in an election in which no other candidate ran against him.  On 21 December, he signed the Alma-Ata Protocol, thereby taking Kazakhstan into the Commonwealth of Independent States. 
PresidencyNazarbayev renamed the former State Defense Committees as the Ministry of Defense and appointed Sagadat Nurmagambetov as Defense Minister on 7 May 1992. The Supreme Council, under the leadership of Speaker Serikbolsyn Abdilin, began debating over a draft constitution in June 1992. The constitution created a strong executive branch with limited checks on executive power. Opposition political parties Ezat, Zheltoqsan and the Republican Party, held demonstrations in Almaty from 10–17 June calling for the formation of a coalition government and the resignation of the government of Prime Minister Sergey Tereshchenko and the Supreme Council. Kazakh security personnel forcibly put down the protest on 18 June 1992. The Parliament of Kazakhstan, composed of Communist Party legislators who had yet to stand in an election since the country gained its independence, adopted the constitution on 28 January 1993. An April 1995 referendum extended his term until 2000. He was re-elected in January 1999 and again in December 2005. The Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe criticized the last presidential election as falling short of international democratic standards.  An election requires two or more candidates running in opposition. A single candidate is not an election but a referendum. On 18 May 2007, the Parliament of Kazakhstan approved a constitutional amendment which would allow Nazarbayev to seek re-election as many times as he wishes. This amendment applies specifically and only to Nazarbayev: the original constitution's prescribed maximum of two presidential terms will still apply to all future presidents of Kazakhstan. Nazarbayev appointed Altynbek Sarsenbayev, who at the time served as the Minister of Culture, Information and Concord, the Secretary of the Kazakh Security Council, replacing Marat Tazhin, on 4 May 2001. Tazhin became the Chairman of the National Security Council, replacing Alnur Musayev. Musayev became the head of the Guards' Service of the President. Notwithstanding Kazakhstan's membership in the Organisation of the Islamic Conference (now the Organisation of Islamic Cooperation), under Nazarbayev the country has had good relations with Israel. Diplomatic relations were established in 1992 and President Nazarbayev paid official visits to Israel in 1995 and 2000.  Bilateral trade between the two countries amounted to $724 million in 2005. He initiated the move of the administration from Almaty to Astana.
On 4 December 2005 new Presidential elections were held and President Nazarbayev won by an overwhelming majority of 91.15% (from a total of 6,871,571 eligible participating voters) as reported by the Central Electoral Commission of Kazakhstan, an estimation criticized by the Organization for Security and Co-operation in Europe and other election watchdog organizations. Nazarbayev was sworn in for another seven-year term on 11 January 2006.In 2009, former UK cabinet minister Jonathan Aitken released a biography of the Kazakhstani leader entitled Nazarbayev and the Making of Kazakhstan. The book takes a generally pro-Nazarbayev stance, asserting in the introduction that he is mostly responsible for the success of modern Kazakhstan. December 2011 saw the 2011 Mangystau riots, described by the BBC as the biggest opposition movement of his time in power.    On 16 December 2011 demonstrations in the oil town of Zhanaozen clashed with police on the country's Independence Day. Fifteen people were shot dead by security forces and almost 100 were injured. Protests quickly spread to other cities but then died away. The subsequent trial of demonstrators uncovered mass abuse and torture of detainees. 
Allegations of corruptionIn 2004 Transparency International ranked Kazakhstan 122nd (tied with several other nations) in its listing of 146 countries by level of corruption. Kazakhstan's total score out of 10, with 10 being the best, was 2.2 (any score under 3 indicated "rampant corruption").  President Nazarbayev declared a holy war against corruption and ordered the adoption of "10 steps against corruption"  to fight corruption at all levels of state and society. A few international NGOs have accused the Nazarbayev government of merely paying lip service to anti-corruption efforts. Despite becoming the Organization for Security and Co-operation in Europe chair in 2010, some civil activists inside and outside the country stated little was done to address “human rights abuses” and “widespread corruption”. The Nazarbayev family itself was embroiled in a series of investigations by Western governments into money laundering, bribery, and assassinations. Among these investigations was the so-called Kazakhgate, as the result of which the US Department of Justice did not find the Nazarbayev family guilty and closed the case in August 2010. A former minister in the Nazarbayev government, Zamanbek K. Nurkadilov, said that  Nazarbayev should answer allegations that Kazakh officials had accepted millions of US dollars in bribes from an intermediary for U.S. oil firms in the 1990s. Nazarbayev has been called one of the "ultimate oligarchs" of the post-Soviet central Asia states.    He is believed to have transferred at least $1 billion worth of oil revenues to his private bank accounts in other countries and his family controls many other key enterprises in Kazakhstan. 
Nazarbayev on various issues
Environmental issuesIn his 1998 autobiography, Nazarbayev wrote that "The shrinking of the Aral Sea, because of its scope, is one of the most serious ecological disasters being faced by our planet today. It is not an exaggeration to put it on the same level as the destruction of the Amazon rainforest."  He called on Uzbekistan, Turkmenistan, Tajikistan, Kyrgyzstan, and the wider world to do more to reverse the environmental damage done during the Soviet era. 
Nuclear issuesDuring the Soviet era, over 500 military experiments with weapons of mass destruction were conducted by scientists in the Kazakhstan region, mostly at the Semipalatinsk Test Site, causing radiation sickness and birth defects.  As the influence of the Soviet Union waned, Nazarbayev closed the site.  He later claimed that he had encouraged Olzhas Suleimenov's anti-nuclear movement in Kazakhstan, and was always fully committed to the group's goals.  In what was dubbed 'Project Sapphire', the Kazakhstan and United States government worked closely to dismantle former Soviet weapons stored in the country, with the Americans agreeing to fund over $800 million in transportation and 'compensation' costs. Nazarbayev encouraged the United Nations General Assembly to establish 29 August as the International Day Against Nuclear Tests. In his article he has proposed a new Non-Proliferation Treaty "that would guarantee clear obligations on the part of signatory governments and define real sanctions for those who fail to observe the terms of the agreement."  He signed a treaty authorizing the Central Asian Nuclear Weapon Free Zone on on 8 September 2006.
IranIn a speech given on 15 December 2006 marking the 15th anniversary of Kazakhstan's independence, Nazarbayev stated he wished to join with Iran in support of a single currency for all Central Asian states and intended to push the idea forward with Iran's President Ahmadinejad on an upcoming visit. The Kazakh president, however, also criticized Iran as a terrorism-supporting state. The Kazakh Foreign Ministry however, released a statement on 19 December, saying his remarks were not "what he really meant", and his comments were "mistakes". Kazakhstan dismisses alleged anti-Iran comments from president. Web.archive.org. Retrieved on 2011-02-03. 
Women in politicsIn 2011, Nazarbayev called on his government to provide increased opportunities for women to serve in politics and government. "I instruct the government, together with the Presidential administration and the national commission for women's affairs, the leadership of the Nur Otan Party, to form a concrete plan effective to 2016 for the promotion of women in taking decisions", he said at the first women's congress. 
ReligionPresident Nursultan Nazarbayev has put forward the initiative of holding a forum of world and traditional religions in the capital of Kazakhstan, Astana. Earlier the organizers of similar events were only representatives of leading religions and denominations. Among other similar events aimed at establishing interdenominational dialogue were the meetings of representatives of world religions and denominations held in Assisi, Italy in October 1986 and January 2002.  The first Congress of World and Traditional Religions which gathered in 2003 allowed the leaders of all major religions to develop prospects for mutual cooperation.Nazarbayev espoused anti-religious views during the Soviet era; Ideology and National Identity in Post-Communist Foreign Policies By Rick Fawn, p. 147  he has now exerted effort to highlight his Muslim heritage by performing the Hajj pilgrimage,  and supporting mosque renovations. Under the leadership of Nursultan Nazarbayev, which can be termed enlightened authoritarianism, the Republic of Kazakhstan has enacted some degrees of multiculturalism in order to retain and attract talents from diverse ethnic groups among its citizenry, and even from nations that are developing ties of cooperation with the country, in order to coordinate human resources onto the state-guided path of global market economic participation. This notable principle of the Kazakh leadership has earned it the name "Singapore of the Steppes"[1], referring to the authoritarian capitalist guiding principle initiated by Lee Kuan Yew.
Personal lifeHe is married to the First Lady of Kazakhstan, Sara Alpysqyzy Nazarbayeva, with whom he has three daughters: Dariga, Dinara and Aliya. Dariga was married to Rakhat Aliyev, son of a former minister of healthcare, who served as the First Deputy Foreign Minister and twice as the Kazakh Ambassador to Austria. Dinara is married to Timur Kulibayev, son of a former Minister of Construction, who serves as the First Deputy Chairman of the national holding company Samruk-Kazyna, which manages several state-owned companies and, formerly, as the first Vice President of the state-owned petroleum company KazMunaiGas. Aliya is a businesswoman, who was formerly married to Aidar Akayev, the son of former Kyrgyz President, Askar Akayev; she married, secondly, to Daniyar Khassenov, a Kazakhstani businessman.
Honours
Kazakhstan

Order of the Golden Eagle
Medal "Astana"
Medal "10 Years of the Independence of the Republic of Kazakhstan"
Medal "10th Anniversary of the Armed Forces of the Republic of Kazakhstan"
Medal "10th Anniversary of the Constitution of the Republic of Kazakhstan"
Medal "In Commemoration of the 100th Anniversary of the Railway of Kazakhstan"
Medal "10 Years of the Parliament of the Republic of Kazakhstan"
Medal "50 Years of the Virgin Lands"
Jubilee Medal "60 Years of Victory in the Great Patriotic War 1941-1945"
Medal "10 Years of the City of Astana"
Medal "20 Years of the Independence of the Republic of Kazakhstan"


Soviet Union

Order of the Red Banner of Labour
Order of the Badge of Honour
Medal "For the Development of Virgin Lands"
Jubilee Medal "70 Years of the Armed Forces of the USSR"


Russian Federation

Order of St. Andrew the Apostle the First-Called
Medal "In Commemoration of the 1000th Anniversary of Kazan"
Medal "In Commemoration of the 300th Anniversary of Saint Petersburg"
Medal "In Commemoration of the 850th Anniversary of Moscow"
The Order of Akhmad Kadyrov (Chechnya)


Foreign awards

  : Grand Star of the Decoration of Honour for Services to the Republic of Austria
  : Grand Cordon of the Order of Leopold
  : Grand Order of King Tomislav
  : Grand Cordon of the Order of the Nile
  : Collar of the Order of the Cross of Terra Mariana
  : Commander Grand Cross with Collar of the Order of the White Rose of Finland
  : Commander Grand Cross of the Order of the Lion of Finland
  : Grand Croix of the Légion d'honneur
  : Grand Cross of the Order of the Redeemer
  : Order of Merit of the Republic of Hungary
  : Knight Grand Cross with Collar of the Order of Merit of the Italian Republic
  : Order of the Chrysanthemum
  : 1st Class with Chain of the Order of the Three Stars
 : Grand Cross of the Order of Vytautas the Great (5 May 2000) 
  : Grand Cross of the Order of the Oak Crown
  : Order of the White Eagle
  : Sash of the Order of the Star of Romania
  : Order of St. Andrew
  : Grand Cross (or 1st Class) of the Order of the White Double Cross (2007) 
  : Order of State of Republic of Turkey (2009) 
  : Honorary Knight Grand Cross of the Order of St Michael and St George
  : Order of Liberty (Ukraine)
  : Order of Prince Yaroslav the Wise, 1st Class


See also

Government of Kazakhstan
Politics of Kazakhstan
List of national leaders
Counter-terrorism in Kazakhstan


References

Specific
 

General
 


External links 

Kazakhstan President Official webpage
President Nazarbayev Biography
www.kazakhstanlive.com
Kazakh President demands firing of telecom chief
Brief introduction to relations between China and Kazakhstan
Kazakhstan, Armenia sign agreements to develop relations
Kazakhstan to export 6–7 mln tonnes of grains of this year harvest
Kazakhstan to be top oil producer by 2011: Nazarbayev
Speeches by Kazakhstan President Nazarbayev
President Nazarbayev Biography

 
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
 
   
DEFAULTSORT




































 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Carl Orff
 

Carl Orff (  –  ) was a 20th-century German composer, best known for his cantata Carmina Burana (1937). In addition to his career as a composer, Orff developed an influential approach of music education for children.
Life
Early lifeOrff was born in Munich on July 10, 1895. His family was Bavarian and was active in the Army of the German Empire.Orff started studying the piano at the age of five, and he also took organ and cello lessons. However, he was more interested in composing original music than in studying to be a performer. Orff wrote and staged puppet shows for his family, composing music for piano, violin, zither, and glockenspiel to accompany them. He had a short story published in a children's magazine in 1905 and started to write a book about nature. In his spare time he enjoyed collecting insects.By the time he was a teenager, Orff was writing songs, although he had not studied harmony or composition; his mother helped him set down his first works in musical notation. Orff wrote his own texts and he learned the art of composing, without a teacher, by studying classical masterworks on his own.In 1911, at age 16, some of Orff's music was published.  Many of his youthful works were songs, often settings of German poetry. They fell into the style of Richard Strauss and other German composers of the day, but with hints of what would become Orff's distinctive musical language.In 1911/1912, Orff wrote Zarathustra, Op. 14, an unfinished large work for baritone voice, three male choruses and orchestra, based on a passage from Friedrich Nietzsche's philosophical novel of the same title.   The following year, he composed an opera, Gisei, das Opfer (Gisei, the Sacrifice). Influenced by the French Impressionist composer Claude Debussy, he began to use colorful, unusual combinations of instruments in his orchestration.
World War I
Moser's Musik-Lexikon states that Orff studied at the Munich Academy of Music until 1914. He then served in the German Army during World War I, when he was severely injured and nearly killed when a trench caved in. Afterwards, he held various positions at opera houses in Mannheim and Darmstadt, later returning to Munich to pursue his music studies.
The 1920s
In the mid-1920s, Orff began to formulate a concept he called "elementare Musik", or elemental music, which was based on the unity of the arts symbolized by the ancient Greek Muses and involved tone, dance, poetry, image, design, and theatrical gesture. Like many other composers of the time, he was influenced by the Russian-French émigré Igor Stravinsky. But while others followed the cool, balanced "neoclassic" works of Stravinsky, it was works like his Les noces (The Wedding), a pounding, quasi-folkloric evocation of prehistoric wedding rites, that appealed to Orff. He also began adapting musical works of earlier eras for contemporary theatrical presentation, including Claudio Monteverdi's opera L'Orfeo (1607). Orff's German version, Orpheus, was staged under Orff's direction in 1925 in Mannheim, Germany, using some of the instruments that had been used in the original 1607 performance. The passionately declaimed opera of Monteverdi's era was almost unknown in the 1920s, however, and Orff's production met with reactions ranging from incomprehension to ridicule.In 1924   and Orff founded the Günther School for gymnastics, music, and dance in Munich. Orff was there as the head of a department from 1925 until the end of his life, and he worked with musical beginners. There he developed his theories of music education, having constant contact with children. In 1930, Orff published a manual titled Schulwerk, in which he shares his method of conducting. Before writing Carmina Burana, Orff also edited 17th-century operas. However, these various activities brought Orff very little money.
The Nazi era
Orff's relationship with German fascism and the Nazi Party has been a matter of considerable debate and analysis. His Carmina Burana was hugely popular in Nazi Germany after its premiere in Frankfurt in 1937. Given Orff's previous lack of commercial success, the monetary factor of Carmina Buranas acclaim was significant to him. But the composition, with its unfamiliar rhythms, was also denounced with racist taunts.  He was one of the few German composers under the Nazi regime who responded to the official call to write new incidental music for A Midsummer Night's Dream after the music of Felix Mendelssohn had been banned.  Defenders of Orff note that he had already composed music for this play as early as 1917 and 1927, long before this was a favor for the Nazi regime. Orff was a friend of Kurt Huber, one of the founders of the resistance movement Die Weiße Rose (the White Rose), who was condemned to death by the Volksgerichtshof and executed by the Nazis in 1943. Orff by happenstance called at Huber's house on the day after his arrest. Huber's distraught wife begged Orff to use his influence to help her husband, but Orff declined her request. If his friendship with Huber came out, he told her, he would be "ruined". Huber's wife never saw Orff again. Wracked by guilt, Orff would later write a letter to his late friend Huber, imploring him for forgiveness.     According to Canadian historian Michael H. Kater, Orff claimed at the end of the war to his Allied interrogators that he was a founding member of the White Rose and was released.  However, in Orff's denazification file, which has been discovered by Viennese historian Oliver Rathkolb in 1999, no remark on the White Rose is recorded. Nonetheless, he had a long friendship with German-Jewish musicologist, composer and refugee Erich Katz,  who fled Nazi Germany in 1939.
Following World War II
Following World War II, during his denazification process in Bad Homburg, Orff claimed to Newell Jenkins, an officer in the U.S. Army, and later an orchestra conductor, that he had helped establish the "White Rose" resistance movement in Germany.  There was no evidence for this other than his own word, and other sources dispute his claim. Michael H. Kater made a particularly strong case in his earlier writings that Orff collaborated with Nazi German authorities. Review of "Carl Orff im Dritten Reich" by David B. Dennis, Loyola University Chicago (January 25, 1996)  However, in Composers of the Nazi Era: Eight Portraits (2000) Kater rescinded his earlier accusations to some extent.  Orff's assertion that he had been anti-Nazi during the war was accepted by the American denazification authorities, who changed his previous category of "gray unacceptable" to "gray acceptable", enabling him to continue to compose for public presentation, and to enjoy the royalties that the popularity of Carmina Burana had earned for him. 
  Most of Orff's later works – Antigonae (1949), Oedipus der Tyrann (Oedipus the Tyrant, 1958), Prometheus (1968), and De temporum fine comoedia (Play on the End of Times, 1971) – were based on texts or topics from antiquity. They extend the language of Carmina Burana in interesting ways, but they are expensive to stage and (on Orff's own admission) are not operas in the conventional sense. Live performances of them have been few, even in Germany.
Personal life
Orff was married four times: Alice Solscher (m. 1920, div. 1925), Gertrud Willert (m. 1939, div. 1953), Luise Rinser (m. 1954, div. 1959) and Liselotte Schmitz (m. 1960). His only child Godela, from his first marriage, was born in 1921. She has described her relationship with her father as having been difficult at times. "He had his life and that was that," she tells Tony Palmer in the documentary O Fortuna. 
Death
When Carl Orff died in Munich in 1982 at the age of 86, he had lived through four epochs in the course of his life: the German Empire, the Weimar Republic, Nazi Germany and the post World War II West German Bundesrepublik. Orff was buried in the Baroque church of the beer-brewing Benedictine priory of Andechs, south of Munich. His tombstone bears his name, his dates of birth and death, and the Latin inscription "Summus Finis" (the ultimate goal).
Works
Musical work Orff is most known for Carmina Burana (1936), a "scenic cantata". It is the first of a trilogy that also includes Catulli Carmina and Trionfo di Afrodite. Carmina Burana reflected his interest in medieval German poetry. Together the trilogy is called Trionfi, or "Triumphs". The composer described it as the celebration of the triumph of the human spirit through sexual and holistic balance. The work was based on thirteenth-century poetry found in a manuscript dubbed the Codex latinus monacensis found in the Benedictine monastery of Benediktbeuern in 1803 and written by the Goliards; this collection is also known as Carmina Burana. While "modern" in some of his compositional techniques, Orff was able to capture the spirit of the medieval period in this trilogy, with infectious rhythms and easy tonalities. The medieval poems, written in Latin and an early form of German, are often racy, but without descending into smut. "Fortuna Imperatrix Mundi", commonly known as "O Fortuna", from Carmina Burana is often used to denote primal forces, for example in the Oliver Stone movie The Doors..  The work's association with fascism also led Pier Paolo Pasolini to use the movement "Veris leta facies" to accompany the concluding scenes of torture and murder in his final film Salò, or the 120 Days of Sodom. With the success of Carmina Burana, Orff disowned all of his previous works except for Catulli Carmina and the Entrata (an orchestration of "The Bells" by William Byrd (1539–1623)), which were rewritten until acceptable by Orff. Later on, however, many of these earlier works were released (some even with Orff's approval). As an historical aside, Carmina Burana is probably the most famous piece of music composed and premiered in Nazi Germany. Carmina Burana was in fact so popular that Orff received a commission in Frankfurt to compose incidental music for A Midsummer Night's Dream, which was supposed to replace the banned music by Mendelssohn. After the war, he claimed not to be satisfied with the music and reworked it into the final version that was first performed in 1964.Orff was reluctant to term any of his works simply operas in the traditional sense. His works Der Mond (The Moon, 1939) and Die Kluge (The Wise Woman, 1943), for example, he referred to as "Märchenoper" ("fairytale operas"). Both compositions feature the same "timeless" sound in that they do not employ any of the musical techniques of the period in which they were composed, with the intent that they be difficult to define as belonging to a particular era. Their melodies, rhythms and, with them, text appear in a union of words and music.About his Antigonae (1949), Orff said specifically that it was not an opera, rather a Vertonung, a "musical setting", of the ancient tragedy. The text is an excellent German translation, by Friedrich Hölderlin, of the Sophocles play of the same name. The orchestration relies heavily on the percussion section, and is otherwise fairly simple. It has been labelled by some as minimalistic, which is most adequate in terms of the melodic line. The story of Antigone has a haunting similarity to the history of Sophie Scholl, heroine of the White Rose, and Orff may have been memorializing her in his opera.Orff's last work, De Temporum Fine Comoedia (Play on the End of Times), had its premiere at the Salzburg Festival on August 20, 1973, performed by Herbert von Karajan and the WDR Symphony Orchestra Cologne and Chorus. In this highly personal work, Orff presented a mystery play, in which he summarized his view on the end of time, sung in Greek, German, and Latin.Gassenhauer, which Orff composed with Gunild Keetman, was used as the theme music for Terrence Malick's film Badlands (1973). Hans Zimmer later reworked this music for his True Romance (1993) score.
Pedagogic workIn pedagogical circles he is probably best remembered for his Schulwerk (School Work). Originally a set of pieces composed and published for the Güntherschule (students ranging from 12 to 22),  this title was also used for his books based on radio broadcasts in Bavaria in 1949. These pieces are collectively called Musik für Kinder [Music for Children], and also use the term "Schulwerk". The Music for Children volumes were not designed to be performance pieces for the average child. Many of the parts are challenging for teachers to play. They were designed as examples of pieces that show the use of ostinati, bordun, and appropriate texts for children. Teachers using the volumes are encouraged to simplify the pieces, write original texts for the pieces and modify the instrumentation to adapt to the teacher's classroom situation.Orff's ideas were developed, together with Gunild Keetman, into a very innovative approach to music education for children, known as the Orff Schulwerk. The music is elemental and combines movement, singing, playing, and improvisation.
List of compositions


Lamenti
Orpheus (1924, reworked 1939)
Klage der Ariadne (1925, reworked 1940)
Tanz der Spröden (1925, reworked 1940)



Entrata for orchestra, after "The Bells" by William Byrd (1539–1623) (1928, reworked 1941)



Orff Schulwerk
Musik für Kinder (with Gunild Keetmann) (1930–35, reworked 1950–54)



Trionfi
Carmina Burana (1937)
Catulli Carmina (1943)
Trionfo di Afrodite (1953)



Märchenstücke (Fairy tales)
Der Mond (1939)
Die Kluge (1943)
Ein Sommernachtstraum (1952, reworked 1962)



Bairisches Welttheater (Bavarian world theatre)
Die Bernauerin (1947)
Astutuli (1953)
Comoedia de Christi Resurrectione (1956) – Easter Play
Ludus de Nato Infante Mirificus (1961) – Nativity play



Theatrum Mundi
Antigonae (1949)
Oedipus der Tyrann (1959)
Prometheus (1968)
De Temporum Fine Comoedia (1973, reworked 1977)


References 
External links 
 

Carl Orff Foundation
Orff Center, Munich
Discography
Profile, works, discography, Schott Music
 

 
DEFAULTSORT












 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Rick Wakeman
 Richard Christopher Wakeman (born 18 May 1949) is an English keyboard player, composer and songwriter best known for being the former keyboardist in the progressive rock band Yes. He is also known for his solo albums, contributing to the BBC comedy series Grumpy Old Men and for Rick's Place, his former radio show on Planet Rock that aired until December 2010.Wakeman was born in West London. He purchased his first electronic keyboard at 12 years of age. In 1968, he studied the piano, clarinet, orchestration and modern music at the Royal College of Music before leaving after a year in favour of session music work. He went on to feature on songs by artists including Black Sabbath,  David Bowie, T. Rex, Elton John and Cat Stevens. Wakeman joined the folk group Strawbs in 1969 and played on three of their albums. He first joined Yes in 1971 to replace Tony Kaye, and left the group in 1974 to work on his solo career. He returned in 1976 before leaving with lead vocalist Jon Anderson in 1980. Wakeman was part of the side project Anderson Bruford Wakeman Howe, a group of ex-Yes members formed in 1989, and the eight-member Yes line-up that followed until his third departure in 1992. He returned for two years in 1995 and once more in 2002, where he was part of the band's 35th anniversary tour until its end in 2004.Wakeman began his solo career during his first run with Yes. His perhaps most known records being his first three, The Six Wives of Henry VIII (1973), Journey to the Centre of the Earth (1974) and The Myths and Legends of King Arthur and the Knights of the Round Table (1975). He has produced over 100 solo albums that have sold more than 50 million copies.  In November 2010, Wakeman was awarded the Spirit of Prog award at the annual Marshall Classic Rock Roll of Honour Awards. He is the father of Adam Wakeman and Oliver Wakeman.
Early lifeRick Wakeman was born on 18 May 1949 in the west London suburb of Northolt to Cyril Frank and Mildred Helen Wakeman.     He attended Wood End Infants School in 1954, followed by Drayton Manor Grammar School in 1959.    He started playing the piano at the age of 5 and purchased his first electronic keyboard at the age of 12.    In 1968, Wakeman secured a place at the Royal College of Music, where he studied piano, clarinet, orchestration and modern music. He left a year later in favour of session music work.
Music career

Session work and the Strawbs (1969–1971)Wakeman became an active session musician. In June 1969, he played Mellotron on David Bowie's single "Space Oddity" for a session fee of £9.  He went on to play piano for Bowie's "Life on Mars?", "Changes" and "Oh! You Pretty Things" in April 1971 and "Absolute Beginners" in 1985. He also played the piano on the Cat Stevens' hit "Morning Has Broken". In 1971 he acquired an early Minimoog synthesiser, purchasing it at half price from actor Jack Wild who believed that it was defective because it only played one note at a time.  In 1970 and 1971, Wakeman was part of the folk rock group Strawbs. His first appearance on an album sleeve was on Dragonfly, the group's second studio album released in February 1970. The band held a concert at the Queen Elizabeth Hall in London on 11 July 1970 where Wakeman performed a solo piano piece named "Temparament of Mind". He received a standing ovation for his performance, and the track appeared on the band's live record released that year, Just a Collection of Antiques and Curios.  Wakeman appeared on the front page of Melody Maker soon after, which called him "Tomorrow's Superstar",  and composed the theme music to the television show Ask Aspel.  He remained in the Strawbs for a third album, From the Witchwood, but left the group in mid-1971.
Joining Yes and start of solo career (1971–1975)In 1971, Wakeman joined the progressive rock band Yes, replacing their organist Tony Kaye. His first concert with the group took place in Leicester on 30 September 1971.  He worked on the group's fourth, fifth and sixth studio albums – Fragile (1971), Close to the Edge (1972), and Tales from Topographic Oceans (1973). Wakeman, however, felt Tales from Topographic Oceans was pretentious and – despite its ambition – insubstantial. He disliked performing the album on tour, feeling the length of the songs prevented the band from playing their more popular tracks. Following the tour, as the band began work on what would become Relayer (1974), Wakeman felt further alienated from the group. Disenchanted with the direction in which Yes was going, and already into a successful solo career, he left. Wakeman produced his first three solo albums during his first run with Yes. On 23 January 1973, Wooding, pp. 98–108.  he released The Six Wives of Henry VIII, an instrumental concept album based on his interpretations of the musical characteristics of the wives of Henry VIII, using keyboard instruments. The album was overall well received by critics. TIME magazine named the record one of the best pop albums of 1973.  In October 1975, the album was certified Gold.   

On 18 January 1974, Wakeman performed Journey to the Centre of the Earth, a forty-minute piece based on the Jules Verne novel of the same name, at the Royal Festival Hall in London. Combining rock with an orchestra and choir, the concert was recorded and released on 18 May, where it topped the UK album charts on entry for one week. The record became a multi-million dollar seller in six weeks.  The album was certified Gold in September 1974. In May 1975, Wakeman released The Myths and Legends of King Arthur and the Knights of the Round Table, with the album performed live at the Empire Pool on ice. The show was well received but expensive to produce, consuming much of the income from sales of the album.   The album was also a worldwide success, reaching No.21 in the United States while going Gold (the third time a Wakeman record had achieved this) in Brazil, Japan and Australia.  The album has sold 12 million copies.   In 1975, Wakeman produced the first of two soundtracks for films by Ken Russell, that being Lisztomania; Wakeman would go on to create the soundtrack for Crimes of Passion in 1984. In 1976, Wakeman produced and created the album No Earthly Connection in France.
Rejoining Yes (1976–1980)Wakeman returned to Yes for their 1977 album Going for the One. He remained until their next album, Tormato, a year later. He is reputed to have given the album its name by throwing a tomato at a showing of the art used for the album's cover.    
Anderson Bruford Wakeman Howe and Yes (1989–1992)In 1989, he joined with three fellow ex-Yes members to form Anderson Bruford Wakeman Howe ("ABWH"). After ABWH's first album, some of the completed tracks for a planned second album were merged with tracks from an in-progress Yes album to create the album Union. Wakeman, along with the combined members of both bands then joined to form a Yes supergroup (made up of past and present members of Yes) for the subsequent tour in 1991. When the tour ended a year later, Wakeman left again.
Fourth run with Yes (1995–1997)He then returned in 1996 for the Keys to Ascension albums but left before the band could tour.
Fifth run with Yes and Hampton Court (2002–2009)In 2002, he rejoined Yes and stayed with the band until their 2008 In The Present Tour. Wakeman was advised by doctors that it would be best to not do lengthy touring. Due to this, he left Yes because they said that they will continue lengthy touring, something Wakeman wanted nothing to do with anymore. So, for the group's 40th anniversary tour, Wakeman was replaced by his son, Oliver Wakeman. In 2008, Wakeman toured with a solo show named Rick Wakeman's Grumpy Old Picture Show, featuring an evening of music and stories.In May 2009, Wakeman performed The Six Wives of Henry VIII live at Hampton Court Palace for the first time, for two nights. The performance was recorded and released as The Six Wives of Henry VIII Live at Hampton Court Palace.
Instruments
Although Wakeman is a noted player of the grand piano, electric piano, Hammond organ, Minimoog and many later models of synthesiser, he is well known as a proponent (for a time) of the Mellotron – an analogue electronic musical instrument that uses a bank of pre-recorded magnetic tape strips, each of which is activated by a separate key on its keyboard and lasts approximately 8 seconds. Wakeman featured playing this instrument, to varying degrees, on the David Bowie track "Space Oddity", the Yes albums Fragile, Close to the Edge and Tales From Topographic Oceans, as well as the solo albums The Six Wives of Henry VIII and White Rock. It proved too unwieldy and unreliable for regular touring, and he eventually doused the last Mellotron that he owned in petrol and set fire to it in a field. The Birotron   Undeterred, he worked with David Biro to develop the Birotron, which used the then popular 8-track cassette format rather than tape strips. Because of the advent of digital keyboards at that time, and expensive components used in the instruments' manufacture, the Birotron was never a commercial or technical success. Only 35 Birotrons were produced, and Wakeman eventually threw his across the stage after it broke down mid-concert, an action he now regrets as there are only six remaining examples.  These days, he can be found with more modern instruments such as the Roland Fantom, Korg M3, and the Korg Oasys.
Recent yearsWakeman's track "Arthur" has been used as the theme tune to the BBC's Election Night Coverage since 1979, with the exception of 2001 and 2010. Wakeman's album Fields of Green '97 features the track "Election '97/Arthur" which was used by the BBC for their coverage of the 1997 General Election. The music was revamped for the BBC's 2005 general election night coverage.His TV career was launched in 1982 when he hosted Gastank on Channel 4 in the United Kingdom. The show featured a mix of interviews with 1970s musicians and impromptu performances where the guest artist would join Wakeman and his house band in playing re-arranged versions of their classic songs or entirely new pieces created for the show. Wakeman hosted the ITV comedy show Live at Jongleurs for 8 years.Wakeman is a contributor to the BBC Two show Grumpy Old Men. He has also appeared in a number of episodes of Countdown. He has also appeared on the satirical panel shows Never Mind the Buzzcocks (4 appearances) and Have I Got News For You. Between September 2005 and December 2010, Wakeman presented Rick's Place, a weekly radio show on Planet Rock with David 'Kid' Jensen. Wakeman appeared as himself in "Journey to the Centre of Rick Wakeman", the season two finale of Mitch Benn's Crimes Against Music, a BBC Radio 4 comedy programme. The episode detailed a fictional war between England and Wales in 2009 which only Wakeman could stop. Wakeman provided piano for Benn's 2008 single "Sing Like an Angel", which was released on iTunes. In December 2006, Wakeman was the guest host for an episode of The Personality Test on Radio 4. He also appeared on Top Gear and set a race track lap time of 1'55.26. Wakeman made his debut appearance on Just a Minute on Radio 4 on 7 February 2011. In October 2007, Wakeman commenced a new tour 'Rick Wakeman's Grumpy Old Picture Show', where he accompanies video performers such as Gordon Giltrap and the English Rock Ensemble (Ashley Holt, Lee Pomeroy, Dave Colquhoun and Tony Fernandez). A Freemason, he is a member of Chelsea Lodge No. 3098, the membership of which is made up of entertainers.  In 2009, Wakeman became a Patron of Tech Music Schools.In 2011, Wakeman, alongside Fiaba's drummer Bruno Rubino, has been recording and arranging the debut full-length studio album of the Italian singer Valentina Blanca. In January 2012, Wakeman appeared as part of a group backing Jasper Carrott on BBC  1's The One Jasper Carrott.
Personal lifeOn 28 March 1970, Wakeman married his first wife Rosaline Woolford at twenty years of age  and had two sons, Oliver (b. 26 February 1972) and Adam (b. 11 March 1974). Rick and Rosaline divorced in 1977, and Wakeman married studio secretary Danielle Corminboeuf in January 1980 in the West Indies,  with whom he had one son, Benjamin (b. 1978).  He had a daughter, Jemma Kiera (b.1983), with former Page 3 model Nina Carter  and the two married in 1984 followed by the birth of their son, Oscar (b.1986).  He has had a renewal of his Christian faith, Wakeman, Rick (1995). Say Yes! An Autobiography, Hodder & Stoughton Religious, ISBN 0-340-62151-6 ISBN 978-0340621516  which began around the time of his marriage to Nina Carter.  Nina and Rick divorced in December 2004. Rick Wakeman had a daughter Manda (b. 9 May 1986) with his long-time friend, designer and seamstress Denise Gandrup, whom he first met in 1972. Gandrup designed many of Wakeman's stage outfits, including his famous capes.  In his twenties, Wakeman suffered three heart attacks.  The first occurred after a performance of Journey to the Centre of the Earth at the Crystal Palace Bowl on 27 July 1974.In 1980 he was mis-diagnosed as having rheumatoid arthritis in his hands.  He only found out in 2008 that the pain he was suffering was just due to sudden overwork after a period of lack of keyboard practice. A passionate football fan, Wakeman has supported Brentford F.C. since he was a child, and later on he also became a director of the West London club. After a disagreement with the board , he moved on to Manchester City F.C. but maintained his allegiance to Brentford. He was involved in the ownership of the American soccer club Philadelphia Fury in the late '70s, along with other rock celebrities such as Peter Frampton and Paul Simon.He is a strong supporter of the UK's Conservative Party, and performed a concert in September 2004 for the benefit of the party.  Wakeman has been president of the show business charity The Heritage Foundation. The charity erects blue plaques on the homes and/or work-places of late entertainers and sportspeople. He is also Honorary President of the Classic Rock Society, a UK-based organisation helping to promote classic and progressive rock.
Discography He currently does a lot with Sight and Sounds in Harleston (Norfolk) very own Dave Hoffman. Local Legend in Radio who is making Ricks Career in the celeb limelight possible.
Bibliography

 
 
 


References 

 
 
 


External links

Rick Wakeman's Communication Centre
Rick Wakeman's Official Press Photos
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT

















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Nobuo Uematsu
 
   (born March 21, 1959) is a Japanese video game composer, best known for scoring the majority of titles in the Final Fantasy series. He is considered as one of the most famous and respected composers in the video game community.   Uematsu, a self-taught musician, began playing the piano at the age of eleven or twelve, with Elton John as his biggest influence.Uematsu joined Square (later Square Enix) in 1986, where he met Final Fantasy creator Hironobu Sakaguchi. They have worked together on many video game titles, most notably the games in the Final Fantasy series. After nearly 20 years in the company, he left Square Enix in 2004 to found his own company called Smile Please, and the music production company Dog Ear Records. He has since composed music as a freelancer for video games primarily developed by Square Enix and Sakaguchi's development studio Mistwalker.Soundtracks and arranged albums of Uematsu's game scores have been released. Pieces from his video game works have been performed in Final Fantasy concerts. He has worked with Grammy Award-winning conductor Arnie Roth on several of these concerts. From 2002 to 2010, he was in a rock band with colleagues Kenichiro Fukui and Tsuyoshi Sekito called The Black Mages, in which he played electronic organ and other keyboards. The band played arranged rock versions of Uematsu's Final Fantasy compositions. He has since performed with the band Earthbound Papas.
Biography
Early lifeNobuo Uematsu was born in Kōchi, Kōchi Prefecture, Japan.    A self-taught musician, he began to play the piano when he was eleven or twelve years old,  and he did not take any formal piano lessons.  He has an older sister who also played the piano.  After graduating from Kanagawa University, Uematsu played the keyboard in several amateur bands and composed music for television commercials.    When Uematsu was working at a music rental shop in Tokyo, a Square employee asked if he would be interested in creating music for some of the titles they were working on. Although he agreed, Uematsu considered it a side job, and he did not think it would become a full-time career. He said it was a way to make some money on the side, while also keeping his part-time job at the music rental shop.   
Career with Square and The Black MagesThe first game Uematsu composed for Square was Genesis in 1985. While working at Square, he met Hironobu Sakaguchi, who asked him if he wanted to create music for some of his games, which Uematsu agreed to.  From 1986 to 1987, he created music for a number of games which did not achieve any success, including eroge titles like Alpha.  In 1987, Uematsu and Sakaguchi collaborated on what was originally to be Sakaguchi's last contribution for Square, Final Fantasy, a game that turned out to be a huge success.   Final Fantasy s popularity sparked Uematsu's career in video game music, and he would go on to compose music for over 30 titles, most prominently the subsequent games in the Final Fantasy series. He scored the first installment in the SaGa series, The Final Fantasy Legend, in 1989. For the second and fifth games in the series, Final Fantasy Legend II (1990) and Romancing SaGa 2 (1993), he was assisted by Kenji Ito.  Uematsu signed on to finish the soundtrack for the critically acclaimed 1995 title Chrono Trigger after the game's composer, Yasunori Mitsuda, contracted peptic ulcers.  In 1996, he co-composed the soundtrack to Front Mission: Gun Hazard and created the entire score for DynamiTracer. He also created music for three of the games in the Hanjuku Hero series. Outside video games, he has composed the main theme for the 2000 animated film Ah! My Goddess: The Movie and co-composed the anime Final Fantasy Unlimited (2001) with Final Fantasy orchestrator Shirō Hamaguchi. He also inspired the Ten Plants concept albums, and released a solo album in 1994, entitled Phantasmagoria. Feeling gradually more dissatisfied and uninspired, Uematsu requested the assistance of composers Masashi Hamauzu and Junya Nakano for the score to Final Fantasy X in 2001. This marked the first time that Uematsu did not compose an entire main-series Final Fantasy soundtrack. For Final Fantasy XI from 2002, he was joined by Naoshi Mizuta, who composed the majority of the soundtrack, and Kumi Tanioka; Uematsu was responsible for only eleven tracks.  In 2003, he assisted Hitoshi Sakimoto in scoring Final Fantasy Tactics Advance by providing the main theme. In 2002, fellow Square colleagues Kenichiro Fukui and Tsuyoshi Sekito asked Uematsu to join them in forming a rock band that focused on reinterpreting and expanding on Uematsu's compositions. He declined their offer at first because he was too busy with work; however, after agreeing to perform with Fukui and Sekito in a live performance as a keyboardist, he decided to join them in making a band.   Another employee at Square, Mr. Matsushita, chose the name The Black Mages for their band.  In 2003, Keiji Kawamori, Arata Hanyuda, and Michio Okamiya also joined the band.  The Black Mages have released three studio albums, and have appeared at several concerts to promote their albums.
Current freelancer careerUematsu left Square Enix in 2004 and formed his own company called Smile Please;  he also created the music production company Dog Ear Records in 2006.  The reason for Uematsu's departure was that the company moved their office from Meguro to Shinjuku, Tokyo, and he was not comfortable with the new location.  Also, he cites the fact that he had reached an age where he should gradually take his life into his own hands.  He does, however, continue to compose music as a freelancer for Square Enix. In 2005, Uematsu and several members of The Black Mages created the score for the CGI film Final Fantasy VII Advent Children. Uematsu composed only the main theme for Final Fantasy XII (2006);  he was originally offered the job of creating the full score, but Sakimoto was eventually assigned as the main composer instead.  Uematsu was also initially going to create the theme song for Final Fantasy XIII (2010). However, after being assigned the task of creating the entire score of Final Fantasy XIV, Uematsu decided to hand the job over to the main Final Fantasy XIII composer, Hamauzu. Uematsu also works closely with Sakaguchi's development studio Mistwalker, and has composed the games in the Blue Dragon series, Lost Odyssey (2007), and Away Shuffle Dungeon (2008); he was also the composer of the cancelled game Cry On.   He recently composed the music for another Mistwalker title The Last Story (2011).He scored the PlayStation Portable title Anata o Yurusanai in 2007 and the arcade game Lord of Vermillion in 2008. Uematsu created the main theme for the multi-composer game Super Smash Bros. Brawl in 2008.  He composed the music for the 2009 anime Guin Saga; this marked the first time he provided a full score for an animated series.  He recently worked on Sakura Note for the Nintendo DS and is currently working on another DS project for Level 5 and Brownie Brown called Fantasy Life. In 2012 "Aerith's Theme", written by Uematsu for Final Fantasy VII, was voted into the number 16 position in the annual Classic FM (UK) "Hall of Fame" top 300 chart.   It was the first time that a piece of music written for a video game had appeared in the chart.
Personal lifeUematsu currently resides in Tokyo, Japan with his wife, Reiko, whom he met during college, and their Beagle, Pao. They have a summer cabin in Yamanakako, Yamanashi.  In his spare time, he enjoys watching professional wrestling, drinking beer  and bicycling. Uematsu has said he originally wanted to become a professional wrestler,  mentioning it was a career dream when he was younger. 
ConcertsUematsu's video game compositions have been performed in numerous concerts, and various Final Fantasy concerts have also been held. Outside Japan, Uematsu's Final Fantasy music was performed live for the first time at the first event of the 2003 Symphonic Game Music Concert in Leipzig, Germany.  Other events of the Symphonic Game Music Concerts featuring Final Fantasy music were held in 2004, 2006, and 2007.  The concert in 2004 featured a world premiere of Those Who Fight from Final Fantasy VII. Japanese pianist Seiji Honda was invited to perform the arrangement together with the orchestra.  Another world premiere was "Dancing Mad" from Final Fantasy VI, performed by orchestra, choir, and pipe organ.  The event in 2007 included "Distant Worlds" from Final Fantasy XI, performed by Japanese opera soprano Izumi Masuda. A series of successful concert performances were held in Japan, including a Final Fantasy concert series titled Tour de Japon. The first stateside concert, Dear Friends - Music from Final Fantasy, debuted on May 10, 2004 at the Walt Disney Concert Hall in Los Angeles, California, and was performed by the Los Angeles Philharmonic orchestra and the Los Angeles Master Chorale. It was conducted by Fort Worth Symphony Orchestra director Miguel Harth-Bedoya.  Due to a positive reception, a concert series for North America followed.  On May 16, 2005, a follow-up concert called More Friends: Music from Final Fantasy was performed in Los Angeles at the Gibson Amphitheatre; the concert was conducted by Grammy Award-winning Arnie Roth. Uematsu also made a guest appearance at A Night in Fantasia 2004 performed by the Eminence Symphony Orchestra's debut concert in October 2004 which coincided with his last day as a staff at Square Enix. Uematsu's Final Fantasy music was presented in the concert Voices - Music from Final Fantasy, which took place on February 18, 2006 at the Pacifico Yokohama convention center. Star guests included Emiko Shiratori, Rikki, Izumi Masuda, and Angela Aki. The concert focused on the songs from the Final Fantasy series and was conducted by Arnie Roth.  Uematsu and several of his fellow composers were in attendance at the world premiere of Play! A Video Game Symphony in Chicago, Illinois on May 27, 2006;  he composed the opening fanfare for the concert.  He also attended the European debut in Stockholm, Sweden on June 14, 2006,  the performance in Toronto, Canada on September 30, 2006,  and in Florence, Italy, on October 10, 2007. The world tour Distant Worlds: Music from Final Fantasy was held in Stockholm, and was performed by the Royal Stockholm Philharmonic Orchestra and conducted by Arnie Roth on December 4, 2007.  The second concert of the tour was held at the Rosemont Theatre near Chicago on March 1, 2008.  The tour has continued, with a recent concert in Houston, Texas on July 24, 2010.
Music from Final Fantasy made up one fourth of the music in the Symphonic Fantasies concerts in Cologne in September 2009 which were produced by the creators of the Symphonic Game Music Concert series and conducted by Arnie Roth.In February 2010, it was announced that Uematsu would appear at Anime Boston, one of the largest anime conventions on the East Coast.Uematsu did not only show up at Anime Boston, he made a surprise appearance and played with the Video Game Orchestra for the track One Winged Angel. On top of this, he made a short visit to the prestigious Berklee College of Music for a brief Q & A session at the request of VGO founder and Berklee alumni Shota Nakama.
Musical style and influencesThe style of Uematsu's compositions is diverse, ranging from stately classical symphonic pieces and heavy metal to New Age and hyper-percussive techno-electronica. For example, in Lost Odyssey, the score ranges from classical orchestral arrangements to contemporary jazz and techno tracks.  Uematsu has stated that he is a big fan of Celtic and Irish music, and some of his work contains elements from these musical styles.  Uematsu's Final Fantasy scores vary from upbeat, to dark and angry, to melancholic in nature. For instance, the music of Final Fantasy VIII is dark and gloomy, while the soundtrack to Final Fantasy IX is more carefree and upbeat.  His Final Fantasy music has been described as being able to convey the true emotion of a scene; an example is "Aerith's Theme" from Final Fantasy VII.  In an interview with the Nichi Bei Times, Uematsu said "I don't really self-consciously compose music for Japan or for the world, but I do think there is something in my more melancholy pieces that has a distinctly Japanese quality."  He has been named one of the "Innovators" in Time Magazine s "Time 100: The Next Wave — Music" feature.  He has also been called the "John Williams of the video game world"  and been credited for "increasing the appreciation and awareness" of video game music. A lot of Uematsu's musical influences come from the United Kingdom and the United States.    He cites Elton John as his biggest musical influence, and he has stated that he wanted to be like him.  Other major inspirations include The Beatles, Emerson, Lake & Palmer,  Simon & Garfunkel, and progressive rock bands.  In the classical genre, he cites Pyotr Ilyich Tchaikovsky as a great influence.  Uematsu has said that 1970s bands, such as Pink Floyd and King Crimson, had an impact on his Final Fantasy compositions.  The intro to the piece "One-Winged Angel" from Final Fantasy VII was inspired by the Jimi Hendrix song "Purple Haze"; the lyrics were taken from the medieval poetry on which Carl Orff based his cantata Carmina Burana, specifically the songs "Estuans Interius", "O Fortuna", "Veni, Veni, Venias" and "Ave Formosissima".  In turn, Nobuo Uematsu has had a major influence on video game music and beyond the video games industry as well. For example, "Liberi Fatali" from Final Fantasy VIII was played during the 2004 Summer Olympics in Athens during the women's synchronized swimming event.   From the same game, "Eyes on Me", featuring Chinese pop singer Faye Wong, sold a record 400,000 copies and was the first song from a video game to win an award at the Japan Gold Disc Awards,    where it won "Song of the Year (International)" in 2000.  In a July 2010 interview, Uematsu revealed, "Rather than getting inspiration from listening to other music, I get inspiration while I'm walking my dog." 
Discography

Video games 
Year  Title  Role  Co-composer 
1985  Genesis  Composition/arrangement   
1986  Cruise Chaser Blassty  Composition/arrangement   
Alpha  Composition/arrangement   
King's Knight  Composition/arrangement   
Suishō no Dragon  Composition/arrangement   
1987  3-D WorldRunner  Composition/arrangement   
Apple Town Story  Composition/arrangement   
Aliens  Composition/arrangement   
Cleopatra no Mahou  Composition   
Rad Racer  Composition/arrangement   
JJ  Composition/arrangement   
Nakayama Miho no Tokimeki High School  Composition/arrangement   
Final Fantasy  Composition/arrangement   
1988  Hanjuku Hero  Composition/arrangement   
Final Fantasy II  Composition/arrangement   
1989  Square's Tom Sawyer  Composition/arrangement   
The Final Fantasy Legend  Composition/arrangement   
1990  Final Fantasy III  Composition/arrangement   
Final Fantasy Legend II  Composition/arrangement  Kenji Ito 
1991  Final Fantasy IV  Composition/arrangement   
1992  Final Fantasy V  Composition/arrangement   
1993  Romancing SaGa 2  Composition/arrangement  Kenji Ito 
1994  Final Fantasy VI  Composition/arrangement   
1995  Chrono Trigger  Composition/arrangement  Yasunori Mitsuda and Noriko Matsueda 
1996  Front Mission: Gun Hazard  Composition/arrangement  Yasunori Mitsuda, Masashi Hamauzu, and Junya Nakano 
DynamiTracer  Composition/arrangement   
1997  Final Fantasy VII  Composition/arrangement   
1999  Final Fantasy VIII  Composition/arrangement   
2000  Final Fantasy IX  Composition/arrangement   
2001  Final Fantasy X  Composition/arrangement  Masashi Hamauzu and Junya Nakano 
2002  Final Fantasy XI  Composition/arrangement  Naoshi Mizuta and Kumi Tanioka 
2003  Final Fantasy Tactics Advance  Composition  Hitoshi Sakimoto, Kaori Ohkoshi, and Ayako Saso 
Hanjuku Hero Tai 3D  Composition/arrangement   
2005  Hanjuku Hero 4: 7-Jin no Hanjuku Hero  Composition  Kenji Ito 
Egg Monster Hero  Composition   
2006  Final Fantasy XII  Composition (1 song) Hitoshi Sakimoto, several others 
Blue Dragon  Composition   
2007  Anata o Yurusanai  Composition  Kenji Ito 
Crisis Core: Final Fantasy VII  Composition   
Lost Odyssey  Composition   
2008  Super Smash Bros. Brawl  Composition (1 song) several others 
Lord of Vermilion  Composition   
Blue Dragon Plus  Composition   
Away Shuffle Dungeon  Composition   
Cry On (canceled)  Composition   
2009  Sakura Note  Composition   
SaGa 2 Hihō Densetsu: Goddess of Destiny  Composition  Kenji Ito, Yasuhiko Akanishi 
Kurulin Fusion  Musical Director   
2010  Lord of Vermilion II  Composition (1 song)  Hitoshi Sakimoto 
Final Fantasy XIV  Composition   
Lord of Arcana  Composition Kenichiro Fukui, Satoshi Henmi 
2011  The Last Story  Composition   
UnchainBlades ReXX  Composition (1 song)  Tsutomu Narita 
Fantasy Life  Composition/arrangement   
Other works 
Year  Title  Role  Co-composer 
1994  Phantasmagoria  Composition   
1998  Ten Plants  Composition  many others 
1999  Ten Plants 2 Children Songs  Composition  many others 
2000  Ah! My Goddess: The Movie  Composition  Shiro Hamaguchi 
Final Fantasy IX Original Soundtrack PLUS  Composition   
2001  Final Fantasy: Unlimited  Composition  Shiro Hamaguchi and Akifumi Tada 
2003  The Black Mages  Composition   
2004  The Black Mages II: The Skies Above  Composition   
2005  Final Fantasy VII Advent Children  Composition  Keiji Kawamori, Kenichiro Fukui, and Tsuyoshi Sekito 
2007  Blue Dragon (Anime)  Composition   
2008  The Black Mages III: Darkness and Starlight  Composition   
Blue Dragon: Tenkai no Shichi Ryuu  Composition  
2009  Guin Saga  Composition   
2010  Nobuo Uematsu's 10 Short Stories  Composition   
2011  Earthbound Papas: Octave Theory  Composition   
2011  Play For Japan: The Album  Composition  Akira Yamaoka, Woody Jackson, Bear McCreary, Yasunori Mitsuda, and others 

References 
External links 

 
Nobuo Uematsu's official website  
 
Video of 2004 Womens Synchronized Swimming using Liberi Fatali 
Synconation's Review of an Nobuo Uematsu concert performance in Atlanta in 2011

  
 
DEFAULTSORT









 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Leopold II of Belgium
 
Leopold II ( ,  ) (9 April 1835 – 17 December 1909) was the King of the Belgians, and is chiefly remembered for the founding and brutal exploitation of the Congo Free State. Born in Brussels the second (but eldest surviving) son of Leopold I and  , he succeeded his father to the throne on 17 December 1865 and remained king until his death.Leopold was the founder and sole owner of the Congo Free State, a private project undertaken on his own behalf. He used Henry Morton Stanley to help him lay claim to the Congo, an area now known as the Democratic Republic of the Congo. At the Berlin Conference of 1884-1885, the colonial nations of Europe committed the Congo Free State to improving the lives of the native inhabitants. From the beginning, however, Leopold essentially ignored these conditions and ran the Congo using a mercenary force, for his personal gain. Leopold extracted a fortune from the Congo, initially by the collection of ivory, and after a rise in the price of rubber in the 1890s, by forcing the population to collect sap from rubber plants. Villages were required to meet quotas on rubber collections, and individuals' hands were cut off if they didn't meet the requirements. His regime was responsible for the death of an estimated 2 to 15 million Congolese. This became one of the most infamous international scandals of the early 20th century, and Leopold was ultimately forced to relinquish control of it to the government of Belgium.
Biography
Early lifeLeopold was born in Brussels on April 9, 1835. He was the second child of the reigning Belgian monarch, Leopold I, and his second wife, Louise, the daughter of King Louis Philippe of France. His elder brother had died a few months after his birth in 1834, and thus Leopold was heir to the throne. When he was 9 years old, Leopold received the title of Duke of Brabant.
Early political careerLeopold's public career began in 1855, when he became a member of the Belgian Senate. That same year Leopold began to urge Belgium's acquisition of colonies. In 1853 he married Marie Henriette, daughter of the Austrian archduke Joseph, in Brussels on August 22, 1853. Four children were born of this marriage; three were daughters, and the only son, Leopold, died when he was 9 years old.
Reign
In 1865 Leopold became king. His reign was marked by a number of major political developments. The Liberals governed Belgium from 1857 to 1880 and during their final year in power legislated the Frère-Orban Law of 1879. This law created free, secular, compulsory primary schools supported by the state and withdrew all state support from Roman Catholic primary schools. In 1880 the Catholic Party obtained a parliamentary majority and 4 years later restored state support to Catholic schools. In 1885 various socialist and social democratic groups drew together and formed the Labour Party. Increasing social unrest and the rise of the Labour Party forced the adoption of universal male suffrage in 1893. In Belgian domestic politics, Leopold emphasized military defense as the basis of neutrality, but he was unable to obtain a universal conscription law until on his death bed.
Obtaining the Congo Free State
 
Leopold fervently believed that overseas colonies were the key to a country's greatness, and he worked tirelessly to acquire colonial territory for Belgium. Neither the Belgian people nor the Belgian government was interested , however, and Leopold eventually began trying to acquire a colony in his private capacity as an ordinary citizen. The Belgian government lent him money for this venture.In 1866, Leopold instructed the Belgian ambassador in Madrid to speak to Queen Isabella II  of Spain about ceding the Philippines to Belgium. However, knowing the situation fully, the ambassador did nothing. Leopold quickly replaced the ambassador with a more sympathetic individual to carry out his plan.    In 1868, when Isabella II was deposed as Queen of Spain, Leopold tried to take advantage in his plan to acquire the Philippines. But without funds, he did not get far. Leopold then devised a plan to make the Philippines be independent and ruled by a Belgian. This didn't work either, so he shifted his colonization plans to Africa.    After a number of unsuccessful schemes for colonies in Africa or Asia, in 1876 Leopold organized a private holding company disguised as an international scientific and philanthropic association, which he called the International African Society, or the International Association for the Exploration and Civilization of the Congo. In 1878, under the auspices of the holding company, he hired the famous explorer Henry Stanley to establish a colony in the Congo region.  Much diplomatic maneuvering resulted in the Berlin Conference of 1884-1885 regarding African affairs, at which representatives of fourteen European countries and the United States recognized Leopold as sovereign of most of the area to which he and Stanley had laid claim. On 5 February 1885, the Congo Free State was established under Leopold II's personal rule, an area 76 times larger than Belgium, which Leopold was free to control through his private army, the Force Publique.
Exploitation and atrocities
Leopold then amassed a huge personal fortune by exploiting the Congo. The first economic focus of the colony was ivory, but this did not yield the expected levels of revenue.  When the global demand for rubber exploded, attention shifted to the labor-intensive collection of sap from rubber plants. Abandoning the promises of the Berlin Conference in the late 1890s, the Free State government restricted foreign access and extorted forced labor from the natives. The abuses suffered, especially in the rubber industry included the effective enslavement of the native population, beatings, widespread killing, and frequent mutilation when the production quotas were not met. Missionary John Harris of Baringa, for example, was so shocked by what he had come across that he wrote to Leopold's chief agent in the Congo saying: "I have just returned from a journey inland to the village of Insongo Mboyo. The abject misery and utter abandon is positively indescribable. I was so moved, Your Excellency, by the people's stories that I took the liberty of promising them that in future you will only kill them for crimes they commit."   Estimates of the death toll range from two million to fifteen million.    Determining precisely how many people died is next to impossible as accurate records were not kept. Louis and Stengers state that population figures at the start of Leopold's control are only "wild guesses", while E.D. Morel's attempt and others at coming to a figure for population losses were "but figments of the imagination". Adam Hochschild devotes a chapter of his book, King Leopold's Ghost, to the problem of estimating the death toll. He cites several recent lines of investigation, by anthropologist Jan Vansina and others, examining local sources from police records, religious records, oral traditions, genealogies, personal diaries, and "many others", which generally agree with the assessment of the 1919 Belgian government commission: roughly half the population perished during the Free State period. Since the first official census by the Belgian authorities in 1924 put the population at about 10 million, that implies a rough estimate of 10 million dead. Smallpox and sleeping sickness also devastated the disrupted population.  By 1896 the sleeping sickness had killed up to 5,000 Africans in the village of Lukolela on the Congo River. The mortality figures were collected through the efforts of Roger Casement, who found, for example, only 600 survivors of the disease in Lukolela in 1903. 
Criticism of his ruleReports of outrageous exploitation and widespread human rights abuses led to international outcry in the early 1900s leading to a widespread war of words. The campaign to examine Leopold's regime, led by British diplomat Roger Casement and former shipping clerk E. D. Morel under the auspices of the Congo Reform Association, became the first mass human rights movement.   Supporters included American writer Mark Twain, who wrote a stinging political satire entitled King Leopold's Soliloquy, in which the King supposedly argues that bringing Christianity to the country outweighs a little starvation.  Rubber gatherers were tortured, maimed and slaughtered until the turn of the century, when the Western world forced Brussels to call a halt. Leopold's rule was subject to severe criticism, especially from British sources. Arthur Conan Doyle also criticised the 'rubber regime' in his 1908 work The Crime of the Congo, written to aid the work of the Congo Reform Association. Doyle contrasted Leopold's rule to the British rule of Nigeria, arguing decency required that those who ruled primitive peoples to be concerned first with their uplift, not how much could be extracted from them. It should be noted that, as Hochschild describes in King Leopold's Ghost, many of Leopold's policies were adopted from Dutch practices in the East Indies, and similar methods were employed to some degree by Germany, France and Portugal where natural rubber occurred in their colonies.
Relinquishment of the CongoCriticism from both Social Catholics and the Labor party caused the Belgian parliament to compel the King to cede the Congo Free State to Belgium in 1908. The Congo Free State was transformed into a Belgian colony known as the Belgian Congo under parliamentary control. It later became, successively, the Republic of the Congo, Zaire (under Mobutu Sese Seko), and currently the Democratic Republic of the Congo or DRC, not to be confused with Republic of the Congo formerly owned by France. 
Attempted AssassinationOn 15 November 1902, Italian anarchist Gennaro Rubino attempted to assassinate Leopold, who was riding in a royal cortege from a ceremony in memory of his recently-deceased wife, Marie Henriette. After Leopold's carriage passed, Rubino fired three shots at the King; the shots missed Leopold and Rubino was immediately arrested.
DeathOn December 17, 1909, Leopold II died at Laeken, and the Belgian crown passed to Albert, the son of Leopold's brother, Philip, Count of Flanders. He was interred in the royal vault at the Church of Our Lady of Laeken in Brussels.
Family
Leopold II was the brother of Empress Carlota of Mexico and first cousin of Queen Victoria of the United Kingdom. He had four children with Queen Marie-Henriette:

Louise-Marie Amélie, born in Brussels on 18 February 1858, and died at Wiesbaden on 1 March 1924. She married Prince Philipp of Saxe-Coburg and Gotha.
Léopold Ferdinand Elie Victor Albert Marie, Count of Hainaut (as eldest son of the heir apparent), later Duke of Brabant (as heir apparent), born at Laeken/Laken on 12 June 1859, and died at Laken on 22 January 1869, from pneumonia, after falling into a pond.
Stéphanie Clotilde Louise Herminie Marie Charlotte, born at Laken on 11 May 1864, and died at the Archabbey of Pannonhalma in Győr-Moson-Sopron, Hungary, on 23 August 1945. She married (1) Crown Prince Rudolf of Austria and then (2) Elemér Edmund Graf Lónyay de Nagy-Lónya et Vásáros-Namény (created, in 1917, Prince Lónyay de Nagy-Lónya et Vásáros-Namény).
Clémentine, born at Laken on 30 July 1872, and died at Nice on 8 March 1955. She married Prince Napoléon Victor Jérôme Frédéric Bonaparte (1862–1926), head of the Bonaparte family.

Leopold II was also the father of two illegitimate sons through Caroline Lacroix, later adopted in 1910 by Lacroix's second husband, Antoine Durrieux: 

Lucien Philippe Marie Antoine (9 February 1906 – 1984), duke of Tervuren 
Philippe Henri Marie François (16 October 1907 – 21 August 1914), count of Ravenstein 


LegacyThough unpopular at the end of his reign—his funeral cortege was booed—Leopold II is remembered today by many Belgians as the "Builder King" (Koning-Bouwer in Dutch, le Roi-Bâtisseur in French) because he commissioned a great number of buildings and urban projects, mainly in Brussels, Ostend and Antwerp . These buildings include the Royal Glasshouses in the grounds of the Palace at Laken, the Japanese Tower, the Chinese Pavilion, the Musée du Congo (now called the Royal Museum for Central Africa), and their surrounding park in Tervuren, the Cinquantenaire in Brussels, and the 1895-1905 Antwerpen-Centraal railway station.  He also built an important country estate in Saint-Jean-Cap-Ferrat on the French Riviera, including the Villa des Cèdres, which is now a botanical garden.  These were all built using the profits from the Congo. In 1900, he created the Royal Trust, by which means he donated most of his property to the Belgian nation.Leopold II is still a controversial figure in the Democratic Republic of Congo. His statue in the capital, Kinshasa, was removed after independence. Congolese culture minister Christoph Muzungu decided to reinstate the statue in 2005, pointing out the sense of liberating progress that had marked the beginning of the Free State and arguing that people should see the positive aspects of the king as well as the negative; but just hours after the six-metre (20 ft) statue was erected in the middle of a roundabout near Kinshasa's central station, it was taken down again without explanation. The Congo continues, however, to use a variation of the Free State flag, which it adopted after dropping the name and flag of Zaire.After the King transferred his private colony to Belgium, there was, as Adam Hochschild puts it in King Leopold's Ghost, a "Great Forgetting" .  Hochschild records that, on his visit to the colonial Royal Museum for Central Africa in the 1990s, there was no mention of the atrocities committed in the Congo Free State, despite the museum's large collection of colonial objects .  Another example of this "Great Forgetting" may be found on the boardwalk of Blankenberge, a popular coastal resort, where a monument shows a colonialist bringing "civilization" to the black child at his feet . On the beach in Oostend is a 1931 sculptural monument to Leopold II, showing Leopold and grateful Ostend fishermen and Congolese. The inscription accompanying the Congolese group mentions The gratitude of the Congolese to Leopold II for having liberated them from slavery under the Arabs. In 2004, an activist group cut off the hand of the leftmost Congolese bronze figure, in protest against the Congo atrocities.  
Trivia

Leopold II was selected as a main motif for the recent 12.50 euro Leopold II commemorative coin minted in 2007.  The obverse shows his portrait facing right.
Leopold II also engaged in a religious ceremony with Blanche Zélia Joséphine Delacroix, also known as Caroline Lacroix, a prostitute, on 14 December 1909, with no validity under Belgian law, at the Pavilion of Palms, Royal Palace of Laken, in Brussels, five days before his death.  The priest of Laeken Cooreman performed the ceremony.  "Le Petit Gotha" 
He was the 973rd Knight of the Order of the Golden Fleece in Austria, the 748th Knight of the Order of the Garter in 1866 and the 69th and 321st Grand Cross of the Order of the Tower and Sword.

 
See also

Kings of Belgium family tree
Crown Council of Belgium
Émile Banning
The Congo Free State Propaganda War
 
Image:Léopold II Bruxelles.JPG|Leopold II horseback riding statue, Regent place, Brussels.
Image:Leopold II gent.jpg|Leopold II with the coat of arms of the Belgian Congo in Ghent, Belgium.
 
Ancestry 
  
 
References 
Bibliography

Ascherson, Neal: The King Incorporated, Allen & Unwin, 1963. ISBN 1-86207-290-6 (1999 Granta edition).
Hochschild, Adam: King Leopold’s Ghost: A Story of Greed, Terror, and Heroism in Colonial Africa, Mariner Books, 1998. ISBN 0-330-49233-0.
Petringa, Maria: Brazza, A Life for Africa, 2006. ISBN 978-1-4259-1198-0
Wm. Roger Louis and Jean Stengers: E.D. Morel's History of the Congo Reform Movement, Clarendon Press Oxford, 1968.
Ó Síocháin, Séamas and Michael O’Sullivan, eds: The Eyes of Another Race: Roger Casement's Congo Report and 1903 Diary. University College Dublin Press, 2004. ISBN 1-900621-99-1.
Ó Síocháin, Séamas: Roger Casement: Imperialist, Rebel, Revolutionary. Dublin: Lilliput Press, 2008.


External links 
 

Official biography from the Belgian Royal Family website
"The Political Economy of Power" Interview with political scientist Bruce Bueno de Mesquita, with an extended discussion of Leopold II halfway through
Interview with King Leopold II Publishers' Press, 1906
Mass crimes against humanity in the Congo Free State
Congo: White king, red rubber, black death  A 2003 documentary by Peter Bate on Leopold II and the Congo

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
 
  
 
  
DEFAULTSORT












 





 



 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Franc Miklošič
 

Fran Miklošič (also known in German as  ) (20 November 1813 – 7 March 1891) was a Slovene philologist.
BiographyMiklošič was born in the small village of Radomerščak near the Lower Styrian town of Ljutomer, then part of the Austrian Empire.He graduated from the University of Graz as a doctor of philosophy, and was for a time professor of philosophy there. In 1838 he went to the University of Vienna, where he received the degree of doctor of law. During his studies, he became influenced by the works of the Slovenian philologist and linguist Jernej Kopitar. He abandoned law, devoting most of his later life to the study of Slavic languages. In 1844, he obtained a post at the Imperial Library of Vienna, where he remained to 1862. In 1844, he published a  review of Franz Bopp's book Comparative Grammar, which attracted attention from the Viennese academic circles. This publication then launched a long series of works, in which Miklošič showed an immense erudition. His works led to a revolutiony change in the study of Slavic languages.In 1849 Miklošič was appointed to the newly created chair of Slavic philology at the University of Vienna, and he occupied it until 1886. He became a member of the Academy of Vienna, which appointed him secretary of its historical and philosophical section, a member of the council of public instruction and of the upper house, and correspondent of the French Academy of Inscription. His numerous writings deal not only with the Slavic languages, but also with Romanian, Aromanian, Albanian, Greek, and Romani. 
Political engagement
In the Spring of Nations of 1848, Miklošič, who was 35 at the time, actively engaged in the Slovene national movement. He was the chairman of the political association, called Slovenija (Slovenia) organized by Slovene students that studied in Graz and Vienna. Together with Matija Majar and Lovro Toman, he was among the authors who elaborated the political demand for a United Slovenia. After the failure of the revolutionary requests, he again turned to an exclusively academic activity.
Selected bibliography


Lexicon linguae slovenicae veteris dialecti, 1850 (1862-65 als Lexicon Palaeoslovenico-graeco-latinum)
Vergleichende Grammatik der slaw. Sprachen, 4 Bde., 1852–75
Vergleichende Formenlehre der slavischen Sprachen, 582 pages, 1856, mainly consisting of the 3rd book of Vergleichende Grammatik, and for which he was awarded the Volney prize
Monumenta Serbica Spectantia Historiam Serbiae, Bosniae, Ragusii, 1858 (Hg.)
"Die Bildung der slavischen Personennamen", 1860
Etymolog. Wörterbuch der slaw. Sprachen, 1886
Über die Mundarten und Wanderungen der Zigeuner Europas, 12 Tle., 1872-80.


References 
Further reading

Franz Miklosich (Lemma by Katja Sturm-Schnabl, p. 186-193) in: Marija Mitrović, Die Geschichte der slowenischen Literatur von den Anfängen bis zur Gegenwart. Aus dem Serbokroatischen übersetzt, redaktionell bearbeitet und mit ausgewählten Lemmata und Anmerkungen ergänzt von Katja Sturm-Schnabl. Klagenfurt/Celovec – Ljubljana/Laibach – Wien/Dunaj 2001. 617 p. (Mohorjeva-Hermagoras), ISBN 978-3-85013-834-5 (  Lukan (Hg.): Franz Miklosich (Miklošič): neue Studien und Materialien anläßlich seines 100. Todestages. Wien 1991 (= Österreichische Osthefte: Sonderheft 33).
Katja Sturm-Schnabl, Der Briefwechsel Franz Miklosich's mit den Südslaven = Korespondenca Frana Miklošiča z Južnimi Slovani, Obzorja, Maribor 1991, XXIV, 855 S., ISBN 86-377-0565-0.
Katja Sturm-Schnabl, Franz Miklosich als Wegbegleiter bei der Entstehung der ukrainischen Schriftsprache. In: Juliane Besters-Dilger, Michael Moser, Stefan Simonek (Hg.), Sprache und Literatur der Ukraine zwischen Ost und West – Мова та література України між сходом і заходом. Bern; Berlin; Bruxelles; Frankfurt am Main; New York; Oxford; Wien: Lang 2000,195 – 209.
Katja Sturm-Schnabl, Franz Miklosich – ein „Europäer“ im 19. Jahrhundert. Short version   Sturm-Schnabl, Fran Miklošič, An Early Visionary of European Integration in Philological Studies. The Difficult Path Towards the Acceptance of the Concept of Diversity and Plurality.   Sturm-Schnabl, Aktualnost Miklošičevega znanstvenega dela in misli. In: Jezikovni zapiski . Glasilo inštituta zs slovenski jezik Frana Ramovša ZRC SAZU 10/2(2004)19 – 46.


See also 

Austroslavism
Culture of Slovenia

 
  
DEFAULTSORT
















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Stephen Crane
 
 
Stephen Crane (November 1, 1871 – June 5, 1900) was an American novelist, short story writer, poet and journalist.  Prolific throughout his short life, he wrote notable works in the Realist tradition as well as early examples of American Naturalism and Impressionism.  He is recognized by modern critics as one of the most innovative writers of his generation.The eighth surviving child of Methodist Protestant parents, Crane began writing at the age of four and had published several articles by the age of 16.  Having little interest in university studies, he left school in 1891 and began work as a reporter and writer.  Crane's first novel was the 1893 Bowery tale Maggie: A Girl of the Streets, which critics generally consider the first work of American literary Naturalism.  He won international acclaim for his 1895 Civil War novel The Red Badge of Courage, which he wrote without any battle experience.In 1896, Crane endured a highly publicized scandal after acting as witness for a suspected prostitute.  Late that year he accepted an offer to cover the Spanish-American War as a war correspondent.  As he waited in Jacksonville, Florida for passage to Cuba, he met Cora Taylor, the madam of a brothel, with whom he would have a lasting relationship.  While en route to Cuba, Crane's ship sank off the coast of Florida, leaving him adrift for several days in a dinghy.  His ordeal was later described in "The Open Boat".  During the final years of his life, he covered conflicts in Greece and lived in England with Cora, where he befriended writers such as Joseph Conrad and H. G. Wells.  Plagued by financial difficulties and ill health, Crane died of tuberculosis in a Black Forest sanatorium at the age of 28.At the time of his death, Crane had become an important figure in American literature.  He was nearly forgotten, however, until two decades later when critics revived interest in his life and work.  Stylistically, Crane's writing is characterized by vivid intensity, distinctive dialects, and irony.  Common themes involve fear, spiritual crises and social isolation.  Although recognized primarily for The Red Badge of Courage, which has become an American classic, Crane is also known for short stories such as "The Open Boat", "The Blue Hotel", "The Bride Comes to Yellow Sky", and The Monster.  His writing made a deep impression on 20th century writers, most prominent among them Ernest Hemingway, and is thought to have inspired the Modernists and the Imagists.
Biography
Early yearsStephen Crane was born November 1, 1871, in Newark, New Jersey, to Reverend Jonathan Townley Crane, a minister in the Methodist Episcopal church, and Mary Helen Peck Crane, a clergyman's daughter.  He was the fourteenth and last child born to the couple; the 45 year old Helen Crane had lost her four previous children, who each died within one year of birth.  Nicknamed "Stevie" by the family, he joined eight surviving brothers and sisters—Mary Helen, George Peck, Jonathan Townley, William Howe, Agnes Elizabeth, Edmund Byran, Wilbur Fiske, and Luther. Davis, p. 10 The Cranes were descended from Jaspar Crane, a founder of New Haven Colony, who had traveled there from England in 1639.   Stephen was named for a supposed founder of Elizabethtown, New Jersey, who had, according to family tradition, come from England or Wales as early as 1665,  as well as his great-great grandfather Stephen Crane (1709–1780), a Revolutionary War patriot who served as New Jersey delegate to the First Continental Congress in Philadelphia.   Crane would later write that his father, Dr. Crane, "was a great, fine, simple mind" who had written numerous tracts on theology.   Although his mother was a popular spokeswoman for the Woman's Christian Temperance Union and a highly religious woman, Crane did not believe that "she was as narrow as most of her friends or family."   The young Stephen was raised primarily by his sister Agnes, who was 15 years his senior. Wertheim (1994), p. 1  The family moved to Port Jervis, New York in 1876, where Dr. Crane became the pastor of Drew Methodist Church, a position that he retained until his death. As a child, Stephen was often sickly and afflicted by constant colds.   When the boy was almost two, his father wrote in his diary that his youngest son became "so sick that we are anxious about him."  Despite his fragile nature, Crane was a precocious child who taught himself to read before the age of four.  His first known inquiry, recorded by his father, dealt with writing; at the age of three, while imitating his brother Townley's writing, he asked his mother, "how do you spell O?"  In December 1879, Crane wrote a poem about wanting a dog for Christmas. Entitled "I'd Rather Have –", it is his first surviving poem.  Stephen was not regularly enrolled in school until January 1880,  but he had no difficulty in completing two grades in six weeks. Recalling this feat, he wrote that it "sounds like the lie of a fond mother at a teaparty, but I do remember that I got ahead very fast and that father was very pleased with me." Dr. Crane died on February 16, 1880, at the age of 60; Stephen was eight years old. Some 1,400 people mourned Dr. Crane at his funeral, more than double the size of his congregation.  After her husband's death, Mrs. Crane moved to Roseville, near Newark, leaving Stephen in the care of his brother Edmund, with whom the young boy lived with cousins in Sussex County. He then lived with his brother William, a lawyer, in Port Jervis for several years, until he and his sister Helen moved to Asbury Park to be with their brother Townley and his wife, Fannie. Townley was a professional journalist; he headed the Long Branch department of both the New York Tribune and the Associated Press and also served as editor of the Asbury Park Shore Press. Agnes took a position at Asbury Park's intermediate school and moved in with Helen to care for the young Stephen.  Within a couple of years, several more losses struck the Crane family. First, Townley's wife died of Bright's disease in November 1883 after the deaths of the couple's two young children. Agnes then became ill and died on June 10, 1884, of cerebrospinal meningitis at the age of 28. 
SchoolingCrane wrote his first known story, "Uncle Jake and the Bell Handle", when he was 14 years old.  In the fall of 1885, he enrolled at Pennington Seminary, a ministry-focused coeducational boarding school   north of Trenton,  where his father had been principal from 1849 to 1858.  Soon after her youngest son left for school, Mrs. Crane began suffering what the Asbury Park Shore Press reported as "a temporary aberration of the mind."  She had apparently recovered by early 1886, but later that year a fourth death in six years occurred in Stephen's immediate family when the 23-year-old Luther died after falling in front of an oncoming train while working as a flagman for the Erie Railroad. 
After two years, Crane left Pennington for Claverack College, a quasi-military school. He would later look back on his time at Claverack as "the happiest period of my life although I was not aware of it."  A classmate remembered him as a highly literate but erratic student, lucky to pass examinations in math and science, and yet "far in advance of his fellow students in his knowledge of History and Literature", his favorite subjects. Davis, p. 24  Furthermore, while he held an impressive record on the drill field and baseball diamond, he did not excel in the classroom.  Not having a middle name like the other students, he took to signing his name "Stephen T. Crane" in order "to win recognition as a regular fellow".  Crane was seen as friendly, but also moody and rebellious. He sometimes skipped class in order to play baseball, a game in which he starred as catcher,  although he was also greatly interested in the school's military training program. He rose rapidly in the ranks of the student battalion.  One classmate described him as "indeed physically attractive without being handsome", but he was aloof, reserved and not generally popular at Claverack.   Although academically weak, Crane's experience at Claverack gave some much-needed background (and presumably provided some anecdotes from the Civil War veterans on the staff) that would prove useful when he came to write The Red Badge of Courage. In the summer of 1888, Crane became his brother Townley's assistant at a New Jersey shore news bureau, working there every summer until 1892.  Crane's first signed publication was an article on the explorer Henry M. Stanley's famous quest to find the English missionary David Livingstone in Africa.  It appeared in the February 1890 Claverack College Vidette.   Within a few months, however, Crane was persuaded by his family to forgo a military career and transfer to Lafayette College in Easton, Pennsylvania, in order to pursue a mining engineering degree.   He registered at Lafayette on September 12 and promptly became involved in extracurricular activities; he took up baseball once more and joined the largest fraternity, Delta Upsilon, and two rival groups: the Washington Literary Society and the Franklin Literary Society.   Crane infrequently attended classes and ended the semester with grades for four of the seven courses he had taken.   After only one semester, Crane transferred to Syracuse University where he enrolled as a non-degree candidate in the College of Liberal Arts.  He roomed in the Delta Upsilon fraternity house and joined the baseball team.  Attending merely one class (English Literature) during the middle trimester, he remained in residence while taking no courses in the third trimester. Putting more emphasis on his writing, Crane began to experiment with tone and style while trying out different subjects.   A fictional story of his called "Great Bugs of Onondaga" ran simultaneously in the Syracuse Daily Standard and the New York Tribune.   Declaring college "a waste of time", Crane decided to become a full-time writer and reporter.  He attended a Delta Upsilon chapter meeting on June 12, 1891, but shortly afterwards left college for good. 
Full-time writerIn the summer of 1891, Crane often camped with friends in the nearby area of Sullivan County, New York, where his brother Edmund owned a house.  This area would become the setting for several short stories that would be posthumously published under the title Stephen Crane: Sullivan County Tales and Sketches.   Crane showed two of these works to Tribune editor Willis Fletcher Johnson, a friend of the family, who accepted them for the publication.  "Hunting Wild Dogs" and "The Last of the Mohicans" were the first of fourteen unsigned Sullivan County sketches and tales that would appear in the Tribune between February and July 1892.  Crane also showed Johnson an early draft of his first novel, Maggie: A Girl of the Streets.   Later that summer, Crane met and befriended author Hamlin Garland, who had been lecturing locally on American literature and the expressive arts; on August 17 he gave a talk on novelist William Dean Howells, which Crane wrote up for the Tribune.   Garland became a mentor for and champion of the young writer, whose intellectual honesty impressed him.  Their relationship suffered in later years, however, because Garland disapproved of Crane's alleged immorality. Stephen moved into his brother Edmund's house in Lake View, a suburb of Paterson, New Jersey, in the fall of 1891.  From here, he made frequent trips into New York City, writing and reporting particularly on its impoverished tenement districts. Davis, p. 42  Crane focused particularly on the Bowery, a small and once prosperous neighborhood in the southern part of Manhattan.  After the Civil War, however, Bowery shops and mansions had given way to saloons, dance halls, brothels and flophouses, all of which Crane frequented, later saying he did so for research purposes.  He was attracted to the human nature found in the slums, considering it "open and plain, with nothing hidden".   Believing nothing honest and unsentimentalized had been written about the Bowery, Crane became determined to do so himself; this would become the setting of his first novel.   On December 7, 1891, Crane's mother died at the age of 64, and the 20-year-old appointed Edmund as his guardian.Despite being frail, undernourished and suffering from a hacking cough, which did not prevent him from smoking cigarettes, in the spring of 1892 Crane began a romance with Lily Brandon Munroe, a married woman who was estranged from her husband. Davis, p. 47   Although Munroe would later say Crane "was not a handsome man", she nonetheless admired his "remarkable almond-shaped gray eyes."   He begged her to elope with him, but her family opposed the match because Crane lacked money and prospects, and she declined.   Their last meeting likely occurred in April 1898 when he again asked her to run away with him and she again refused. 

"Such an assemblage of the spraddle-legged men of the middle class, whose hands were bent and shoulders stooped from delving and constructing, had never appeared to an Asbury Park summer crowd, and the latter was vaguely amused." 
— Stephen Crane, account of the JOUAM parade as it appeared in the Tribune  Between July 2 and September 11, 1892, Crane published at least ten news reports on Asbury Park affairs.  Although a Tribune colleague stated that Crane "was not highly distinguished above any other boy of twenty who had gained a reputation for saying and writing bright things,"  that summer his reporting took on a more skeptical, hypocrisy-deflating tone.   A storm of controversy erupted over a report he wrote on the Junior Order of United American Mechanics' American Day Parade, entitled "Parades and Entertainments".  Published on August 21, the report juxtaposes the "bronzed, slope-shouldered, uncouth" marching men "begrimed with dust" and the spectators dressed in "summer gowns, lace parasols, tennis trousers, straw hats and indifferent smiles".   Believing they were being ridiculed, some JOUAM marchers were outraged and wrote to the editor.  That the owner of the Tribune, Whitelaw Reid, was that year's Republican vice-presidential candidate likely made the matter especially sensitive.  Although Townley wrote a piece for the Asbury Park Daily Press in his brother's defense, the Tribune quickly apologized to its readers, calling the piece "a bit of random correspondence, passed inadvertently by the copy editor".   Hamlin Garland and biographer John Barry attested that Crane told them he had been dismissed by the Tribune, although Willis Fletcher Johnson later denied this.  The paper would not publish any of Crane's work after 1892. 
Life in New York
Crane struggled to make a living as a free-lance writer, contributing sketches and feature articles to various New York newspapers.  In October 1892, he moved into a rooming house in Manhattan inhabited by a group of medical students.    Maggie: A Girl of the Streets, which is about a girl who "blossoms in a mud-puddle" and becomes a tragic victim of circumstance, was expanded or entirely rewritten during this time.   In the winter of 1893, Crane took the manuscript of Maggie to Richard Watson Gilder, who rejected it for publication in The Century Magazine.  Crane decided to publish it privately, with money he had inherited from his mother.  The novel was published in late February or early March 1893 by a small printing shop that usually printed medical books and religious tracts.  The typewritten title page for the Library of Congress copyright application read simply: "A Girl of the Streets, / A Story of New York. / —By—/Stephen Crane."  The name "Maggie" was added to the title later.   Crane used the pseudonym "Johnston Smith" for the novel's initial publication, later telling friend and artist Corwin Knapp Linson that the nom de plume was the "commonest name I could think of.  I had an editor friend named Johnson, and put in the "t", and no one could find me in the mob of Smiths."   Hamlin Garland reviewed the work in the June 1893 issue of the Arena, calling it "the most truthful and unhackneyed study of the slums I have yet read, fragment though it is."   Despite this early praise, Crane became depressed and destitute from having spent $869 for 1,100 copies of a novel that did not sell; he ended up giving a hundred copies away.  He would later remember "how I looked forward to publication and pictured the sensation I thought it would make.  It fell flat.  Nobody seemed to notice it or care for it... Poor Maggie! She was one of my first loves." In March 1893, Crane spent hours lounging in Linson's studio while having his portrait painted.  He became fascinated with issues of the Century that were largely devoted to famous battles and military leaders from the Civil War.   Frustrated with the dryly written stories, Crane stated, "I wonder that some of those fellows don't tell how they felt in those scraps.  They spout enough of what they did, but they're as emotionless as rocks."   Crane returned to these magazines during subsequent visits to Linson's studio, and eventually the idea of writing a war novel overtook him.  He would later state that he "had been unconsciously working the detail of the story out through most of his boyhood" and had imagined "war stories ever since he was out of knickerbockers."   This novel would ultimately become The Red Badge of Courage.

"A river, amber-tinted in the shadow of its banks, purled at the army's feet; and at night, when the stream had become of a sorrowful blackness, one could see across it the red, eyelike gleam of hostile camp-fires set in the low brows of distant hills." 
— Stephen Crane, The Red Badge of Courage  From the beginning, Crane wished to show what it felt like to be in a war by writing "a psychological portrayal of fear." Davis, p. 65   Conceiving his story from the point of view of a young private who is at first filled with boyish dreams of the glory of war and then quickly becomes disillusioned by war's reality, Crane borrowed the private's surname, "Fleming", from his sister-in-law's maiden name.  He would later relate that the first paragraphs came to him with "every word in place, every comma, every period fixed."   Working mostly nights, he wrote from around midnight until four or five in the morning.  Because he could not afford a typewriter, he wrote carefully in ink on legal-sized paper, seldom crossing through or interlining a word.  If he did change something, he would rewrite the whole page. While working on his second novel, Crane remained prolific, concentrating on publishing stories to stave off poverty; "An Experiment in Misery", based on Crane's experiences in the Bowery, was printed by the New York Press.  He also wrote five or six poems a day. Davis, p. 82   In early 1894, he showed some of his poems, or "lines" as he called them, to Hamlin Garland, who said he read "some thirty in all" with "growing wonder."   Although Garland and William Dean Howells encouraged him to submit his poetry for publication, Crane's free verse was too unconventional for most.  After brief wrangling between poet and publisher, Copeland & Day accepted Crane's first book of poems, The Black Riders and Other Lines, although it would not be published until after The Red Badge of Courage.  He received a 10 percent royalty, and the publisher assured him that the book would be in a form "more severely classic than any book ever yet issued in America." In the spring of 1894, Crane offered the finished manuscript of The Red Badge of Courage to McClure's Magazine, which had become the foremost magazine for Civil War literature.  While McClure's delayed giving him an answer on his novel, they offered him an assignment writing about the Pennsylvania coal mines.   "In the Depths of a Coal Mine", a story with pictures by Linson, was syndicated by McClure's in a number of newspapers, heavily edited.  Crane was reportedly disgusted by the cuts, asking Linson: "Why the hell did they send me up there then? Do they want the public to think the coal mines gilded ball-rooms with the miners eating ice-cream in boiled shirt-fronts?" After discovering that McClure's could not afford to pay him, Crane took his war novel to Irving Bacheller of the Bacheller-Johnson Newspaper Syndicate, which agreed to publish The Red Badge of Courage in serial form. Between the third and the ninth of December 1894, The Red Badge of Courage began appearing in some half-dozen newspapers in the United States.  Although it was greatly cut for syndication, Bacheller attested to its causing a stir, saying "its quality [was] immediately felt and recognized."  The lead editorial in the Philadelphia Press of December 7 said that Crane "is a new name now and unknown, but everybody will be talking about him if he goes on as he has begun". 
Travels and fame
At the end of January 1895, Crane left on what he called "a very long and circuitous newspaper trip" to the west.   While writing feature articles for the Bacheller syndicate, he traveled to Saint Louis, Missouri, Nebraska, New Orleans, Galveston, Texas and then Mexico City.   Irving Bacheller would later state that he "sent Crane to Mexico for new color",  which the author found in the form of Mexican slum life.  Whereas he found the lower class in New York pitiful, he was impressed by the "superiority" of the Mexican peasants' contentment and "even refuse[d] to pity them."   Returning to New York five months later, Crane joined the Lantern (alternately spelled "Lanthom" or "Lanthorne") Club organized by a group of young writers and journalists. Wertheim (1994), p. 132   The Club, located on the roof of an old house on William Street near the Brooklyn Bridge, served as a drinking establishment of sorts and was made to look like a ship's cabin.   There Crane ate one good meal a day, although friends were troubled by his "constant smoking, too much coffee, lack of food and poor teeth", as Nelson Greene put it.   Living in near-poverty and greatly anticipating the publication of his books, Crane began work on two more novels: The Third Violet and George's Mother.The Black Riders was published by Copeland & Day shortly before his return to New York in May, but it received mostly criticism if not abuse for the poems' unconventional style and use of free verse.  A piece in the Bookman called Crane "the Aubrey Beardsley of poetry"  and a commentator from the Chicago Daily Inter-Ocean stated that "there is not a line of poetry from the opening to the closing page.  Whitman's Leaves of Grass were luminous in comparison.  Poetic lunacy would be a better name for the book."   In June, the New York Tribune dismissed the book as "so much trash."   Crane, however, was pleased that the book was "making some stir". In sharp contrast to the reception for Crane's poetry, The Red Badge of Courage was welcomed with great acclaim after its publication by Appleton in September 1895.  For the next four months the book was in the top six on various bestseller lists around the country.   It arrived on the literary scene "like a flash of lightning out of a clear winter sky", according to H. L. Mencken, who was about 15 at the time. Davis, p. 129   The novel also became popular in England; Joseph Conrad, a future friend of Crane, wrote that the novel "detonated... with the impact and force of a twelve-inch shell charged with a very high explosive."   Appleton published two, possibly three, printings in 1895 and as many as eleven more in 1896.   Although some critics considered the work overly graphic and profane, it was widely heralded for its realistic portrayal of war and unique writing style.  The Detroit Free Press declared that The Red Badge would give readers "so vivid a picture of the emotions and the horrors of the battlefield that you will pray your eyes may never look upon the reality." Wanting to capitalize on the success of The Red Badge, McClure Syndicate offered Crane a contract to write a series on Civil War battlefields.  Because it was a wish of his to "visit the battlefield—which I was to describe—at the time of year when it was fought", Crane agreed to take the assignment.  Visiting battlefields in Northern Virginia, including Fredericksburg, he would later produce five more Civil War tales: "Three Miraculous Soldiers", "The Veteran", "An Indiana Campaign", "An Episode of War" and The Little Regiment. 
ScandalAt the age of 24, Crane, who was reveling in his success, became involved in a highly publicized case involving a suspected prostitute named Dora Clark.  At 2 A.M.  on September 16, 1896 he escorted two chorus girls and Clark from New York City's Broadway Garden, a popular resort where he had interviewed the women for a series he was writing.   As Crane saw one woman safely to a streetcar, a plainclothes policeman named Charles Becker arrested the other two for solicitation; Crane was threatened with arrest while attempting to interfere.  One of the women was released after Crane confirmed her erroneous claim that she was his wife, but Clark was charged and taken to the precinct.  Against the advice of the arresting sergeant, Crane made a statement confirming Dora Clark's innocence, stating that "I only know that while with me she acted respectably, and that the policeman's charge was false."   On the basis of Crane's testimony, Clark was discharged.  The media seized upon the story; news spread to Philadelphia, Boston and beyond, with papers focusing on Crane's bravery and courage.   The Stephen Crane story, as it became known, soon became a source for ridicule, however; the Chicago Dispatch in particular quipped that "Stephen Crane is respectfully informed that association with women in scarlet is not necessarily a 'Red Badge of Courage' ". A couple of weeks after her trial, Clark pressed charges of false arrest against the officer who had arrested her.  The next day, the officer physically attacked Clark in the presence of witnesses for having brought charges against him.  Crane, who initially went briefly to Philadelphia to escape the pressure of publicity, returned to New York to give testimony at Becker's trial despite advice given to him from Theodore Roosevelt, who was Police Commissioner at the time and a new acquaintance of Crane.   The defense targeted Crane: police raided his apartment and interviewed people who knew him, attempting to find incriminating evidence in order to lessen the impact of his testimony.   A vigorous cross-examination took place that sought to portray Crane as a man of dubious morals; while the prosecution proved that he frequented brothels, Crane claimed this was merely for research purposes.   After the trial ended on October 16, the arresting officer was exonerated, but Crane's reputation was ruined. 
Cora Taylor and the Commodore shipwreck

"None of them knew the color of the sky. Their eyes glanced level, and were fastened upon the waves that swept toward them. These waves were of the hue of slate, save for the tops, which were of foaming white, and all of the men knew the colors of the sea." 
— Stephen Crane, "The Open Boat"  Given $700 in Spanish gold by the Bacheller-Johnson syndicate to work as a war correspondent in Cuba, Crane left New York on November 27 on a train bound for Jacksonville, Florida.   Upon arrival in Jacksonville, he registered at the St. James Hotel under the alias of Samuel Carleton to maintain anonymity while seeking passage to Cuba.   While waiting for a boat, he toured the city and visited the local brothels.  Within days he met 31-year-old Cora Taylor, proprietor of the downtown bawdy house Hotel de Dream.  Born into a respectable Boston family,  Taylor (whose legal name was Cora Ethel Stewart) had already had two brief marriages; her first husband, Vinton Murphy, divorced her on grounds of adultery.  In 1889, she had married Captain Donald William Stewart, whom she left in 1892 for another man.   By the time Crane arrived, Taylor had been in Jacksonville for two years.  She lived a bohemian lifestyle but was also a well-known and respected local figure.  The two spent much time together while Crane awaited his departure.  He was finally cleared to leave for the Cuban port of Cienfuegos on New Year's Eve aboard the  . 
The ship sailed from Jacksonville with 27 or 28 men and a cargo of supplies and ammunition for the Cuban rebels.   On the St. Johns River and less than   from Jacksonville, Commodore struck a sandbar in a dense fog and damaged its hull.  Although towed off the sandbar the following day, it was again beached in Mayport and again damaged.   A leak began in the boiler room that evening and as a result of malfunctioning water pumps, the ship came to a standstill about   from Mosquito Inlet.  As the ship took on more water, Crane described the engine room as resembling "a scene at this time taken from the middle kitchen of hades."   Commodore s lifeboats were lowered in the early hours of the morning on January 2, 1897 and the ship ultimately sank at 7 a.m.  Crane was one of the last to leave the ship in a   dinghy.  In an ordeal that he would recount in the short story "The Open Boat", Crane and three other men (including the ship's Captain) floundered off the coast of Florida for a day and a half before attempting to land the dinghy at Daytona Beach.  The small boat, however, overturned in the surf, forcing the exhausted men to swim to shore; one of them died.   Having lost the gold given to him for his journey, Crane wired Cora Taylor for help.  She traveled to Daytona and returned to Jacksonville with Crane the next day, only four days after he had left on the Commodore. The disaster was widely reported on the front pages of newspapers across the country.  Rumors that the ship had been sabotaged were widely circulated but never substantiated.   Portrayed favorably and heroically by the press, Crane emerged from the ordeal with his reputation enhanced, if not restored, after the battering he received during the Dora Clark affair.  Meanwhile, Crane's affair with Taylor quickly blossomed.
Greco-Turkish WarDespite contentment in Jacksonville and the need for rest after his ordeal, Crane became restless.  He left Jacksonville on January 11 for New York City, where he applied for a passport to Cuba, Mexico and the West Indies.  Spending three weeks in New York, he completed "The Open Boat" and periodically visited Port Jervis.   By this time, however, blockades had formed along the Florida coast, and Crane concluded that he would never be able to travel to Cuba. "The Open Boat" was sold to Scribner's for $300 in early March.   Determined to work as a war correspondent, Crane signed on with William Randolph Hearst's New York Journal to cover the impending Greco-Turkish conflict.  He brought along Taylor, who had sold the Hotel de Dream in order to follow him. 
On March 20, they sailed first to England, where Crane was warmly received.  They arrived in Athens in early April; between April 17 (when Turkey declared war on Greece) and April 22, Crane wrote his first published report of the war, "An Impression of the 'Concert' ".   When he left for Epirus in the northwest, Taylor remained in Athens, where she became the Greek war's first woman war correspondent.  She wrote under the pseudonym "Imogene Carter" for the New York Journal, a job that Crane had secured for her.   They wrote frequently, traveling throughout the country separately and together.  The first large battle that Crane witnessed was the Turks' assault on General Constantine Smolenski's Greek forces at Velestino.  Crane wrote, "It is a great thing to survey the army of the enemy.  Just where and how it takes hold upon the heart is difficult of description."   During this battle, Crane encountered "a fat waddling puppy" that he immediately claimed, dubbing it "Velestino, the Journal dog".   An armistice was signed between Greece and Turkey on May 20, ending the 30-day war; Crane and Taylor left Greece for England, taking two Greek brothers as servants and Velestino the dog with them. 
England and Spanish-American WarAfter staying in Limpsfield, Surrey, for a few days, Crane and Taylor settled in Ravensbrook, a plain brick villa in Oxted.   Referring to themselves as Mr. and Mrs. Crane, the couple lived openly in England.  Crane, however, chose to conceal the relationship from his friends and family in the United States.   Admired in England, Crane thought himself attacked back home: "There seem so many of them in America who want to kill, bury and forget me purely out of unkindness and envy and—my unworthiness, if you choose", he wrote.   Velestino the dog sickened and died soon after their arrival in England, on August 1.  Crane, who had a great love for dogs,  wrote an emotional letter to a friend an hour after the dog's death, stating that "for eleven days we fought death for him, thinking nothing of anything but his life." Berryman, p. 188   The Limpsfield-Oxted area was home to members of the socialist Fabian Society and therefore a magnet for writers like Edmund Gosse, Ford Madox Ford and Edward Garnett.  Crane also met the Polish-born novelist Joseph Conrad in October 1897, with whom he would have what Crane called a "warm and endless friendship". Davis, p. 245 Although Crane was confident among peers, strong negative reviews of the recently-published The Third Violet were causing his literary reputation to dwindle.  Reviewers were also highly critical of Crane's war letters, deeming them self-centered.   Although The Red Badge of Courage had by this time gone through fourteen printings in the United States and six in England, Crane was running out of money.  To survive financially, he worked at a feverish pitch, writing prolifically for both the English and the American markets.   He wrote in quick succession stories such as The Monster, "The Bride Comes to Yellow Sky", "Death and the Child" and "The Blue Hotel".   Crane began to attach price tags to his new works of fiction, hoping that "The Bride", for example, would fetch $175.   As 1897 ended, however, Crane's money crisis worsened.   Amy Leslie, a reporter from Chicago and a former lover of his, sued him for $550.   The New York Times reported that Leslie gave him $800 in November 1896 but that he had only repaid her a quarter of the sum.   In February, he was summoned to answer Leslie's claim. The claim, however, was apparently settled out of court, because no record of adjudication exists.   Meanwhile, Crane felt "heavy with troubles" and "chased to the wall" by expenses.   He confided to his agent that he was $2,000 in debt but that he would "beat it" with more literary output. Soon after the   exploded in Havana Harbor on February 15, 1898, under suspicious circumstances, Crane was then offered a £60 advance by Blackwood's Magazine for articles "from the seat of war in the event of a war breaking out" between the United States and Spain.   His health was failing, and it is believed that signs of his pulmonary tuberculosis, which he may have contracted in childhood,  became apparent.   With almost no money coming in from his finished stories, Crane accepted the assignment and left Oxted for New York.   Taylor and the rest of the household stayed behind to fend off local creditors.  Crane applied for a passport and left New York for Key West two days before Congress declared war.  While the war idled, however, he interviewed people and produced occasional copy.   In early June, he observed establishment of an American base in Cuba when Marines seized Guantanamo Bay.   He then went ashore with the Marines, planning "to gather impressions and write them as the spirit moved."   Although he would write honestly about his fear in battle, others observed his calmness and composure.  He would later recall "this prolonged tragedy of the night" in the war tale "Marines Signaling Under Fire at Guantanamo".   After showing a willingness to serve during fighting at Cuzco, Cuba, by carrying messages to company commanders, Crane was officially cited for his "material aid during the action". He continued to report upon various battles and the worsening military conditions and praised Theodore Roosevelt's Rough Riders despite past tensions with the Commissioner.  In early July, however, Crane was sent to the United States for medical treatment for a high fever.   He was diagnosed with yellow fever, then malaria.   Upon arrival in Old Point Comfort, Virginia, he spent a few weeks resting in a hotel.  Although Crane had filed more than twenty dispatches in the three months he had covered the war, the Worlds business manager believed that the paper had not received its money's worth and fired him.   In retaliation, Crane signed with Hearst's New York Journal with the wish to return to Cuba.  He traveled first to Puerto Rico and then to Havana.  In September, rumors began to spread that Crane, who was working anonymously, had either been killed or had simply disappeared.   He nonetheless sporadically sent out dispatches and stories; he wrote about the mood in Havana, the crowded city sidewalks, and other various topics, but he was soon desperate for money again.  Taylor, left alone in England, was also penniless.  She became frantic with worry over her lover's whereabouts; they were not in direct communication until the end of the year.   Crane finally left Havana and arrived in England on January 11, 1899.
DeathRent on Ravensbrook had not been paid for a year.  Upon returning to England, Crane secured a solicitor to act as guarantor for their debts, after which Crane and Taylor relocated to Brede Place.   This manor in Sussex, which dated to the 14th century and had neither electricity nor indoor plumbing,  was offered to them by friends at a modest rent.   The relocation appeared to give hope to Crane, but his money problems continued.  Deciding that he could no longer afford to write for American publications, he concentrated on publishing in English magazines. Crane pushed himself to write feverishly during the first months at Brede; he told his publisher that he was "doing more work now than I have at any other period in my life".   His health worsened, and by the fall of 1899 he was asking friends about health resorts.   The Monster and Other Stories was in production and War Is Kind, his second collection of poems, was published in the United States in May.  None of his books after The Red Badge of Courage had sold well, however, and he bought a typewriter to spur output.  Active Service, a novella based on Crane's correspondence experience, was published in October to mixed reviews.  The New York Times reviewer in particular questioned "whether the author of 'Active Service' himself really sees anything remarkable in his newspapery hero." 
In December, the couple held an elaborate Christmas party at Brede, attended by Joseph Conrad, Henry James, H. G. Wells and other friends, that spanned several days.   On December 29, Crane suffered a severe hemorrhage of the lungs.  In January 1900 he had recovered sufficiently to work on a new novel, The O'Ruddy, completing 25 of the 33 chapters.  Although plans were made for him to travel as a correspondent to Gibraltar to write sketches from Saint Helena, the site of a Boer prison,  at the end of March and in early April he suffered two more massive hemorrhages.   Taylor took over most of Crane's correspondence while he was ill, writing to friends for monetary aid.  The couple planned to travel on the continent, but Conrad, upon visiting Crane for the last time, remarked that his friend's "wasted face was enough to tell me that it was the most forlorn of all hopes." On May 28, the couple arrived at Badenweiler, Germany, a health spa on the edge of the Black Forest.  Despite his weakened condition, Crane continued to dictate fragmentary episodes for the completion of The O'Ruddy.   He died on June 5, 1900, at the age of 28.  In his will he left everything to Taylor,  who took his body to New York for burial.  Crane was interred in the Evergreen Cemetery in what is now Hillside, New Jersey. 
Fiction and poetry
Style and techniqueStephen Crane's fiction is typically categorized as representative of Naturalism, Realism, Impressionism or a mixture of the three.  Critic Sergio Perosa, for example, wrote in his essay "Stephen Crane fra naturalismo e impressionismo" that the work presents a "symbiosis" of Naturalistic ideals and Impressionistic methods.   When asked whether or not he would write an autobiography in 1896, Crane responded that he "dare not say that I am honest.  I merely say that I am as nearly honest as a weak mental machinery will allow."   Similarities between the stylistic techniques in Crane's writing and Impressionist painting—including the use of color and chiaroscuro—are often cited to support the theory that Crane was not only an Impressionist but also influenced by the movement itself.   H. G. Wells remarked upon "the great influence of the studio" on Crane's work, quoting a passage from The Red Badge of Courage as an example: "At nightfall the column broke into regimental pieces, and the fragments went into the fields to camp. Tents sprang up like strange plants. Camp fires, like red, peculiar blossoms, dotted the night.... From this little distance the many fires, with the black forms of men passing to and fro before the crimson rays, made weird and satanic effects."   Although no direct evidence exists that Crane formulated a precise theory of his craft, he vehemently rejected sentimentality, asserting that "a story should be logical in its action and faithful to character.  Truth to life itself was the only test, the greatest artists were the simplest, and simple because they were true." 
Poet and biographer John Berryman suggested that there were three basic variations, or "norms", of Crane's narrative style.   The first, being "flexible, swift, abrupt and nervous", is best exemplified in The Red Badge of Courage, while the second ("supple majesty") is believed to relate to "The Open Boat", and the third ("much more closed, circumstantial and 'normal' in feeling and syntax') to later works such as The Monster.  Crane's work, however, cannot be determined by style solely on chronology.  Not only does his fiction not take place in any particular region with similar characters, but it varies from serious in tone to reportorial writing and light fiction.   Crane's writing, both fiction and nonfiction, is consistently driven by immediacy and is at once concentrated, vivid and intense.   The novels and short stories contain poetic characteristics such as shorthand prose, suggestibility, shifts in perspective and ellipses between and within sentences.   Similarly, omission plays a large part in Crane's work; the names of his protagonists are not commonly used and sometimes they are not named at all. Crane was often criticized by early reviewers for his frequent incorporation of everyday speech into dialogue, mimicking the regional accents of his characters with colloquial stylization.   This is apparent in his first novel, in which Crane ignored the romantic, sentimental approach of slum fiction; he instead concentrated on the cruelness and sordidness of poverty, using the brashness of the Bowery's crude dialect and profanity, which is used lavishly.   The distinct dialect that his Bowery characters use is apparent when the title character admonishes her brother at the beginning of the text, saying: "Yeh knows it puts mudder out when yes comes home half dead, an' it's like we'll all get a poundin'." 
Major themesCrane's work is often thematically driven by Naturalistic and Realistic concerns, including ideals versus realities, spiritual crises and fear.  These themes are particularly evident in Crane's first three novels, Maggie: A Girl of the Streets, The Red Badge of Courage and George's Mother.   The three main characters search for a way to make their dreams come true, but ultimately suffer from crises of identity.  Crane was fascinated by war and death, as well as fire, disfigurement, fear and courage, all of which inspired him to write many works based on these concepts.  In The Red Badge of Courage, the main character both longs for the heroics of battle but ultimately fears it, demonstrating the dichotomy of courage and cowardice. He experiences the threat of death, misery and a loss of self. Extreme isolation from society and community is also apparent in Crane's work.  During the most intense battle scenes in The Red Badge of Courage, for example, the story's focus is predominately "on the inner responses of a self unaware of others".   In "The Open Boat", "An Experiment in Misery" and other short stories, Crane uses experiments with light, motion and color to express different degrees of epistemological uncertainty.   Similar to other Naturalistic works, Crane scrutinizes the position of man, who has been isolated not only from society, but also from God and nature.  "The Open Boat", for example, distances itself from the old Romantic optimism and affirmation of man's place in the world by concentrating on the characters' isolation. 
NovelsBeginning with the publication of Maggie: A Girl of the Streets in 1893, Crane was recognized by critics mainly as a novelist.  Maggie was initially rejected by numerous publishers because of its atypical and true-to-life depictions of class warfare, which clashed with the common, sentimental tales of that time.  Rather than focusing on those that make up the very rich or middle class, the novel's characters are lower-class denizens of New York's Bowery.   The chief character, Maggie, descends into prostitution after being led astray by her lover.  Although the novel's plot is simple, its dramatic mood, quick pace and portrayal of Bowery life have made it memorable.  Maggie is not merely an account of slum life as it is also meant as a representation of eternal symbols.  In his first draft, Crane did not give his characters proper names.  Instead, they were identified as epithets:  Maggie, for example, was the girl who "blossomed in a mud-puddle" and Pete, her seducer, was a "knight".   The novel is dominated by bitter irony and anger as well as destructive morality and treacherous sentiment.  Critics would later call the novel "the first dark flower of American Naturalism" for its distinctive elements of naturalistic fiction. 
Written thirty years after the end of the Civil War and before Crane had any experience of battle, The Red Badge of Courage was innovative stylistically as well as psychologically.  Often described as a war novel, it focuses less on battle and more on the main character's psyche and his reactions and responses in a wartime situation.   It is believed that Crane based the fictional battle in the novel on that of Chancellorsville; he may also have interviewed veterans of the 124th New York Volunteer Infantry Regiment, commonly known as the Orange Blossoms, in Port Jervis, New York.   Told in a third-person limited point of view, it reflects the private experience of Henry Fleming, a young soldier who flees from combat, rather than upon the external world.  The Red Badge of Courage is notable in its vivid descriptions and well-cadenced prose, both of which help create suspense within the story.   Similarly, by substituting epithets for characters' names ("the youth", "the tattered soldier"), Crane injects an allegorical quality into his work, making his characters point to a specific characteristic of man.   Like Crane's first novel, The Red Badge of Courage has a heavily ironic tone which increases in severity as the novel progresses.  The title of the work itself is ironic; Henry wishes "that he, too, had a wound, a red badge of courage", echoing a wish to have been wounded in battle.  The wound he does receive (from the rifle butt of a fleeing Union soldier), however, is not a badge of courage but a badge of shame. There is a strong connection in the novel between humankind and nature, a frequent and prominent concern in Crane's fiction and poetry throughout his career.  Whereas contemporary writers (Ralph Waldo Emerson, Nathaniel Hawthorne, Henry David Thoreau) focused on a sympathetic bond on the two elements, Crane wrote from the perspective that human consciousness distanced humans from nature.  In The Red Badge of Courage, this distance is paired with a great number of references to animals, and men with animalistic characteristics: people "howl", "squawk", "growl", or "snarl".  Since the resurgence of Crane's popularity in the 1920s, The Red Badge of Courage has been deemed a major American text.  The novel has been anthologized numerous times, including in Ernest Hemingway's 1942 collection Men at War: The Best War Stories of All Time.  In the introduction, Hemingway wrote that the novel "is one of the finest books of our literature, and I include it entire because it is all as much of a piece as a great poem is." Crane's later novels have not received as much critical recognition, however.  After the success of The Red Badge of Courage, Crane chose to write another tale set in the Bowery.  George's Mother is less allegorical and more personal than his two previous novels, and it focuses on the conflict between a church-going, temperance-adhering woman (thought to be based on Crane's own mother) and her single remaining offspring, who is a naive dreamer.   Critical response to the novel was mixed.  The Third Violet, a romance that was written quickly after the publication of The Red Badge of Courage, is typically considered as Crane's attempt to appeal to popular audiences.   Crane considered it a "quiet little story", and although it contained autobiographical details, the characters have been deemed inauthentic and stereotypical.   Crane's second to last novel, Active Service, revolves around the Greco-Turkish War of 1897, with which the author was familiar.  Although noted for its satirical take on the melodramatic and highly passionate works that were popular of the nineteenth century, the novel was not successful.  It is generally accepted by critics that Crane's work suffered at this point due to the speed which he wrote in order to meet high expenses.   His last novel, a suspenseful and picaresque work entitled The O'Ruddy, was finished posthumously by Robert Barr and published in 1903. 
Short fictionCrane wrote many different types of fictional pieces while indiscriminately applying to them terms such as "story", "tale" and "sketch".  For this reason, critics have found clear-cut classification of Crane's work problematic.  While "The Open Boat" and "The Bride Comes to Yellow Sky" are often considered short stories, others are variously identified. 
In an 1896 interview with Herbert P. Williams, a  reporter for the Boston Herald, Crane stated that he did "not find that short stories are utterly different in character from other fiction.  It seems to me that short stories are the easiest things we write."   During his brief literary career, he wrote more than a hundred short stories and fictional sketches.  Crane's early fiction stemmed from camping expeditions in his teen years; these stories would eventually become known as The Sullivan County Tales and Sketches.   He considered these "sketches", which are mostly humorous and not of the same caliber of work as his later fiction, to be "articles of many kinds" in that they are part fiction and part journalism.  The subject matter for these stories and others varied extensively.  His early New York City sketches and Bowery tales accurately described the results of industrialization, immigration and the growth of cities and their slums.  His collection of six short stories, The Little Regiment, covered familiar ground with the American Civil War, a subject that made him famous with The Red Badge of Courage.   Although similar to Crane's famous novel, The Little Regiment lacks vigor and originality.  Realizing the limitations of these tales, Crane wrote: "I have invented the sum of my invention with regard to war and this story keeps me in internal despair." The Open Boat and Other Tales of Adventure (1898) contains thirteen short stories that deal with three periods in Crane's life: his Asbury Park boyhood, his trip to the West and Mexico in 1895 and his Cuban adventure in 1897.   This collection was well received and included several of his most critically successful works.  His 1899 collection, The Monster and Other Stories, was similarly well received.  Two posthumously published collections, however, were not as successful.  August 1900 saw the publication of The Whilomville Stories, which consists of thirteen stories that Crane wrote during the last year of his life.  The work deals almost exclusively with boyhood, and the stories are drawn from events occurring in Port Jervis, where Crane lived from the age of seven to twelve.   Focusing on small-town America, the stories tend toward sentimentality, but remain perceptive of the lives of children.  Wounds in the Rain, published in September 1900,  contains fictional tales based on Crane's reports for the World and the Journal during the Spanish-American War.  These stories, which Crane wrote while desperately ill, include "The Price of the Harness" and "The Lone Charge of William B. Perkins" and are dramatic, ironic and sometimes humorous. Despite his prolific output, the majority of scholarly attention to Crane's short fiction has centered on four specific stories: "The Open Boat", "The Blue Hotel", "The Bride Comes to Yellow Sky", and The Monster.   H. G. Wells considered "The Open Boat" to be "beyond all question, the crown of all his work", and it is one of the most frequently discussed works in Crane's canon. 
Poetry

Many red devils ran from my heart And out upon the page. They were so tiny The pen could mash them. And many struggled in the ink. It was strange To write in this red muck Of things from my heart. 
— Stephen Crane  Crane's poems, which he preferred to call "lines", are typically not given as much scholarly attention as his fiction; no anthology contained Crane's verse until 1926.   Although it is not certain when Crane began to write poetry seriously, he once stated that his overall poetic aim was "to give my ideas of life as a whole, so far as I know it". Bergon, p. 25   The poetic style used in both of his books of poetry, The Black Riders and Other Lines and War is Kind, was unconventional for the time in that it was written in free verse without rhyme, meter, or even titles for individual works.  They are typically short in length and although several poems, such as "Do not weep, maiden, for war is kind", use stanzas and refrains, most do not.   Crane also differed from his peers and poets of later generations in that his work contains allegory, dialectic and narrative situations. Critic Ruth Miller claimed that Crane wrote "an intellectual poetry rather than a poetry that evokes feeling, a poetry that stimulates the mind rather than arouses the heart".   In the most complexly organized poems, the significance of the states of mind or feelings is ambiguous, but Crane's poems tend to affirm certain elemental attitudes, beliefs, opinions and stances toward God, man and the universe.   The Black Riders in particular is essentially a dramatic concept and the poems provide continuity within the dramatic structure.  There is also a dramatic interplay in which there is frequently a major voice reporting an incident seen ("In the desert / I saw a creature, naked, bestial") or experienced ("A learned man came to me once").  The second voice or additional voices represent a point of view which is revealed to be inferior; when these clash, a dominant attitude emerges. 
Legacy
In four years, Stephen Crane published five novels, two volumes of poetry, three short story collections, two books of war stories, and numerous works of short fiction and reporting.   Today, however, he is mainly remembered for The Red Badge of Courage, which is heralded as an American classic.  The novel has been adapted several times for the screen, including a successful 1951 film by John Huston.   By the time of his death, Crane had become one of the best known writers of his generation.  His eccentric lifestyle, frequent newspaper reporting, association with other famous authors, and self-expatriation made him somewhat of an international celebrity.   Although most stories about his life tended toward the romantic, rumors about his alleged drug use and alcoholism persisted long after his death. By the early 1920s, however, Crane and his work were nearly forgotten.  It was not until Thomas Beer published his biography in 1923, which was followed by editor Wilson Follett's The Work of Stephen Crane (1925–1927), that Crane's writing came to the attention of a scholarly audience.   Crane's reputation was then enhanced by faithful support from friends such as Joseph Conrad, H. G. Wells and Ford Maddox Ford, all of whom either published recollections or commented upon their time with Crane.  John Berryman's 1950 biography of Crane further established him as an important American author.  Since 1951 there has been a steady outpouring of articles, monographs and reprints in Crane scholarship. Today, Crane is considered one of the most innovative writers of the 1890s. Benfey, p. 3  His peers, including Conrad and James, as well as later writers such as Robert Frost, Ezra Pound and Willa Cather, hailed Crane as one of the finest creative spirits of his time.   His work was described by Wells as "the first expression of the opening mind of a new period, or, at least, the early emphatic phase of a new initiative." Knapp, p. 1   Wells also went farther in saying that "beyond dispute", Crane was "the best writer of our generation, and his untimely death was an irreparable loss to our literature."   Conrad wrote that Crane was an "artist" and "a seer with a gift for rendering the significant on the surface of things and with an incomparable insight into primitive emotions".   Crane's work has proved inspirational for future writers; not only have scholars drawn similarities between Hemingway's A Farewell to Arms and The Red Badge of Courage,  but Crane's fiction is thought to have been an important inspiration for Hemingway and his fellow Modernists.   In 1936, Hemingway wrote in The Green Hills of Africa that "The good writers are Henry James, Stephen Crane, and Mark Twain.  That's not the order they're good in.  There is no order for good writers."   Crane's poetry is thought to have been a precursor to the Imagist movement,  and his short fiction has also left an impression on American literature; "The Open Boat", "The Blue Hotel", The Monster and "The Bride Comes to Yellow Sky" are generally considered by critics to be examples of Crane's best work. Several institutions and places have endeavored to keep Crane's legacy alive.  Badenweiler and the house where he died became something of a tourist attraction for its fleeting association with the American author; Alexander Woollcott attested to the fact that, long after Crane's death, tourists would be directed to the room where he died.   Columbia University Rare Book and Manuscript Library has a collection of Crane and Taylor's personal correspondence dating from 1895 to 1908.   Near his brother's Sullivan County home in New York, where Crane stayed shortly with his brother Edmund, a pond is named after him.   The Stephen Crane House in Asbury Park, New Jersey, where the author lived with his family for nine years, serves as a museum dedicated to his life and work. 
Selected list of works 

Maggie: A Girl of the Streets (1893)
The Red Badge of Courage (1895)
The Black Riders and Other Lines (1895)
George's Mother (1896)
The Open Boat and Other Tales of Adventure (1898)
War is Kind (1899)
Active Service (1899)
The Monster and Other Stories (1899)
Wounds in the Rain (1900)
The O'Ruddy (1903)


References 
Bibliography
Primary sources

Crane, Stephen. 1972. The Complete Poems of Stephen Crane. Ed. Joseph Katz. Ithaca: Cornell University Press. ISBN 0-8014-9130-4.
Crane, Stephen. 1993. The Open Boat and Other Stories. New York: Courier Dover Publications. ISBN 0-486-27547-7.
Crane, Stephen. 1917. The Red Badge of Courage. New York: D. Appleton & Company.


Secondary sources

Bassan, Maurice. 1967. "Introduction". Stephen Crane: A Collection of Critical Essays. Englewood Cliffs, N.J.: Prentice-Hall, Inc.
Beer, Thomas. 1972. Stephen Crane: A Study in American Letters. New York: Knopf. ISBN 0-374-90519-3.
Benfey, Christopher. 1992. The Double Life of Stephen Crane. New York: Knopf. ISBN 0-394-56864-8.
Bergon, Frank. 1975. Stephen Crane's Artistry. New York: Columbia University Press. ISBN 0-231-03905-0.
Berryman, John. 1962. Stephen Crane. New York: Meridian.
Bloom, Harold. 1996. Stephen Crane's The Red Badge of Courage. New York: Chelsea House Publishers. ISBN 978-0-585-25371-8.
Bloom, Harold. 2002. Stephen Crane. New York: Chelsea House Publishers. ISBN 0-7910-6345-3.
Cazemajou, Jean. 1969. Stephen Crane. Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press. ISBN 0-8166-0526-2.
Conrad, Joseph. 1967. "His War Book". Stephen Crane: A Collection of Critical Essays. Ed. Maurice Bassan. Englewood Cliffs, N.J.: Prentice-Hall, Inc.
Davis, Linda H. 1998. Badge of Courage: The Life of Stephen Crane. New York: Mifflin. ISBN 0-89919-934-8.
Gibson, Donald B. 1988. The Red Badge of Courage: Redefining the Hero. Boston: Twayne Publishers. ISBN 0-8057-7961-2.
Gibson, Donald B. 1968. The Fiction of Stephen Crane. Carbondale: Southern Illinois University Press.
Gullason, Thomas A. 1961. "Thematic Patterns in Stephen Crane's Early Novels". Nineteenth-Century Fiction, Vol. 16, No. 1. Berkeley: University of California Press.
Hoffman, Daniel. 1967. "Crane and Poetic Tradition". Stephen Crane: A Collection of Critical Essays. Ed. Maurice Bassan. Englewood Cliffs, N.J.: Prentice-Hall, Inc.
Katz, Joseph. 1972. "Introduction". The Complete Poems of Stephen Crane.  Ithaca, N.Y: Cornell University Press. ISBN 0-8014-9130-4.
Knapp, Bettina L. 1987. Stephen Crane. New York: Ungar Publishing Co.
Kwiat, Joseph J. 1987. "Stephen Crane, Literary-Reporter: Commonplace Experience and Artistic Transcendence". Journal of Modern Literature, Vol. 8, No. 1. Bloomington, Indiana: Indiana University Press.
Linson, Corwin K. 1958. My Stephen Crane. Syracuse: Syracuse University Press.
Nagel, James. 1980. Stephen Crane and Literary Impressionism. University Park: Pennsylvania State University Press. ISBN 0-271-00267-0.
Robertson, Michael. 1997. Stephen Crane, Journalism, and the Making of Modern American Literature. New York: Columbia University Press. ISBN 0-231-10969-5.
Rogers, Rodney O. 1969. "Stephen Crane and Impressionism". Nineteenth-Century Fiction, Vol. 24, No. 3. Berkeley: University of California Press.
Schaefer, Michael W. 1996. A Reader's Guide to the Short Stories of Stephen Crane. New York: G.K. Hall & Co. ISBN 0-8161-7285-4.
Shulman, Robert. 1978. "Community, Perception, and the Development of Stephen Crane: From The Red Badge to 'The Open Boat'". American Literature, Vol. 50, No. 3. Duke, N.C.: Duke University Press.
Sorrentino, Paul. 2006. Student Companion to Stephen Crane. Westport, Conn.: Greenwood Press. ISBN 0-313-33104-9.
Stallman, R. W. 1968. Stephen Crane: A Biography. New York: Braziller, Inc.
Wells, H. G. 1900. Stephen Crane. From an English Standpoint. New York: North American Review Publishing Company.
Weatherford, Richard M. 1997. "Introduction". Stephen Crane: The Critical Heritage. New York: Routledge. ISBN 0-415-15936-9.
Wertheim, Stanley. 1997. A Stephen Crane Encyclopedia. Westport, Connecticut: Greenwood Press. ISBN 0-313-29692-8.
Wertheim, Stanley and Paul Sorrentino. 1994. The Crane Log: A Documentary Life of Stephen Crane, 1871-1900. New York: G. K. Hall & Co.. ISBN 0-8161-7292-7.
Wolford, Chester L. 1989. Stephen Crane: A Study of the Short Fiction. Boston: Twayne Publishers. ISBN 0-8057-8315-6.


External links 
 
 

Works by Stephen Crane at Internet Archive
 
 
The Red Badge of Courage Site
The Stephen Crane Society

    
DEFAULTSORT















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Stephen Baxter
 
 Stephen Baxter (born 13 November 1957 in Liverpool, England)  is a prolific British hard science fiction author. He has degrees in mathematics and engineering.
Writing styleStrongly influenced by SF pioneer H. G. Wells, Baxter has been a distinguished Vice-President of the international H. G. Wells Society since 2006. His fiction falls into three main categories, each with a different basis, style and tone.Baxter's "Future History"  mode is based on research into hard science. It encompasses the monumental Xeelee Sequence, which as of July 2009 is composed of seven novels (including the Destiny's Children series), plus four novellas and 46 short pieces, all of which fit into a single timeline stretching from the Big Bang singularity of the past to his Timelike Infinity singularity of the future.    These stories begin in the present day and end when the Milky Way galaxy collides with Andromeda five billion years in the future.  The central narrative is that of Humanity rising and evolving to become the second most powerful race in the universe, next to the god-like Xeelee. Character development tends to take second place to the depiction of advanced theories and ideas, such as the true nature of the Great Attractor, naked singularities and the great battle between Baryonic and Dark Matter lifeforms. The Manifold Trilogy is another example of Baxter's future history mode, even more conceptual than the Xeelee sequence – each novel is focused on a potential explanation of the Fermi Paradox. The two-part disaster series Flood and Ark (followed by two additional stories, "Earth II" and "Earth III" in Asimov's Science Fiction) also fits into this category, where catastrophic events unfold in the near future and Humanity must adapt to survive in three radically different planetary environments. Baxter has signed a contract for two new books due in 2013 and 2014, titled Proxima and Ultima, both of which are names of planets.    They appear likely to continue the stories of Earth II (Proxima) and Earth III (Ultima), even further in the future.A second category in Baxter's work is based on readings in evolutionary biology and human/animal behavior. Elements of this appear in his future histories (especially later works like the Destiny's Children series and Flood/Ark), but here it is the focus. The major work in this category is Evolution, which imagines the evolution of humanity in the Earth's past and future. The Mammoth Trilogy, written for young adults, shares similar themes and concerns as it explores the present, past, and future of a small herd of mammoths found surviving on an island in the Arctic Ocean.A third category of Baxter's fiction is alternate history, based on research into history. These stories are more human, with characters portrayed with greater depth and care. This includes his NASA Trilogy, which incorporates a great deal of research into NASA and its history, and the Time's Tapestry series, which features science-fictional interventions into our past from an alternate-history future. The novel Anti-Ice is an earlier example of Baxter's blending of alternate history with science fiction. His 2010 novel Stone Spring is the first in an alternate prehistory series, the Northland Trilogy, which begins ten thousand years ago in the Stone Age, to be followed by books set in the Bronze Age and the Iron Age. Third and final novel in the Northland Trilogy, Iron Winter was released on 16 August 2012 by Gollancz.  Another category, outside of the main body of Baxter's independent work, is sequels to science-fiction classics. His first novel to achieve wide recognition (winning three literary awards) was The Time Ships, an authorised sequel to H.G. Wells' The Time Machine. The Time Odyssey series, a trilogy co-authored with Arthur C. Clarke, is connected to Clarke's four Space Odyssey novels. Baxter has also published a novel based on a synopsis written by Clarke, The Light of Other Days.In February 2007, Baxter was announced as the author of what was to be the 100th story for Big Finish Productions' Doctor Who audio series. Earthstorm was originally scheduled to be released in late September 2007, but was delayed indefinitely, according to a May 2007 announcement on the company's website. Baxter's Doctor Who novel, The Wheel of Ice, was published in August 2012. In 2009, Baxter became a judge for the Sidewise Award for Alternate History, the first former winner among the panel.   Baxter has also written non-fiction essays and columns for such publications as Critical Wave and the British SF Association's Matrix.In 2010 it was announced that he would be working on a new series, "The Long Earth", with Terry Pratchett.   
Literary awards 

Award Name Year For book Short stories printed in 
BSFA Award SF Novel 1995    The Time Ships   
Sidewise Award for Best Short Form Alternate History 1995 Brigantia's Angels Traces 
John W. Campbell Award 1996    The Time Ships   
Philip K. Dick Award 1996  The Time Ships   
Sidewise Award for Best Long Form Alternate History 1996 Voyage   
BSFA Award Short Fiction 1997 War Birds Phase Space 
SF Chronicle Award Best Novelette 1998 Moon Six Traces 
Analog Award Best Short Story 1998 Moon-Calf Phase Space 
Philip K. Dick Award 1999    Vacuum Diagrams   
Analog Award Best Short Story 2000 Sheena 5 Phase Space 
Locus Poll Award Best Novelette 2000 Huddle Phase Space 
Asimov's Readers' Poll Novelette 2001 On the Orion Line Resplendent 
BSFA Award Non-Fiction 2001 Omegatropic   
Analog Award Best Short Story 2002 The Hunters of Pangaea Evolution & The Hunters of Pangaea 
BSFA Award Short Fiction 2004 Mayflower II Resplendent 
Baxter's story Last Contact was nominated for the 2008 Hugo Award for best short story.[1]
BibliographyAll ISBNs are for the first edition.
Xeelee Sequence

Title Year ISBN Notes 
Raft 1991 ISBN 0-246-13706-1 Arthur C. Clarke Award nominee, 1992    
Timelike Infinity 1992 ISBN 0-00-224016-5   
Flux 1993 ISBN 0-00-224025-4   
Ring 1993 ISBN 0-00-224026-2   
Vacuum Diagrams 1997 ISBN 0-00-225425-5 Philip K. Dick Award winner, 1999 
Short story collection. 
Reality Dust 2000 ISBN 1-902880-10-2
ISBN 1-902880-11-0 Novella (first published by PS Publishing as trade paperback and hardcover; both limited; later collected in Resplendent) 
Riding the Rock 2002 ISBN 1-902880-60-9
ISBN 1-902880-59-5 Novella (first published by PS Publishing as trade paperback and hardcover; both limited; later collected in Resplendent) 
Mayflower II 2004 ISBN 1-904619-16-9
ISBN 1-904619-17-7 Novella (first published by PS Publishing as trade paperback and hardcover; both limited; later collected in Resplendent) 
Starfall 2009 ISBN 978-1-906301-59-0
ISBN 978-1-906301-60-6 Novella (published by PS Publishing as hardcover and jacketed hardcover; both limited) 
Gravity Dreams 2011 ISBN 978-1-848631-89-2
ISBN 978-1-848631-90-8 (signed edition) Novella (published by PS Publishing as hardcover and signed hardcover; both limited) 

Destiny's Children

Title Year ISBN Notes 
Coalescent 2003 ISBN 0-345-45786-2 Arthur C. Clarke Award nominee, 2004    
Exultant 2004 ISBN 0-345-45788-9   
Transcendent 2005 ISBN 0-345-45792-7 John W. Campbell Memorial Award nominee, 2006    
Resplendent 2006 ISBN 0-575-07896-0 Short story collection. 

NASA Trilogy

Title Year ISBN Notes 
Voyage 1996 ISBN 0-00-648037-3 Arthur C. Clarke Award nominee, 1997    
Titan 1997 ISBN 0-06-105713-4 Arthur C. Clarke Award nominee, 1998    
Moonseed 1998 ISBN 0-06-105903-X   

The Web SeriesBaxter contributed two books to this series for young adults. See The Web (series)
Manifold Trilogy

Title Year ISBN Notes 
Manifold: Time 1999 ISBN 0-345-43076-X Arthur C. Clarke Award nominee, 2000    
Manifold: Space 2000 ISBN 0-345-43077-8   
Manifold: Origin 2001 ISBN 0-345-43079-4   
Phase Space 2002 ISBN 0-00-651185-6 Short story collection. 

Mammoth Trilogy

Title Year ISBN Notes 
Silverhair 1999 ISBN 0-06-105132-2 Young adult 
Longtusk 1999 ISBN 0-380-81898-1 Young adult 
Icebones 2001 ISBN 0-380-81899-X Young adult 
Behemoth 2004 ISBN 0-575-07604-6 Omnibus edition of the Mammoth Trilogy 

A Time Odyssey (Co-authored with Arthur C. Clarke)

Title Year ISBN Notes 
Time's Eye 2003 ISBN 0-345-45248-8   
Sunstorm 2005 ISBN 0-345-45250-X   
Firstborn 2007 ISBN 978-0-345-49157-2   

Time's Tapestry

Title Year ISBN Notes 
Emperor 2006 ISBN 0-575-07432-9   
Conqueror 2007 ISBN 0-575-07673-9   
Navigator 2007 ISBN 978-0-441-01559-7   
Weaver 2008 ISBN 978-0-575-08204-5   

Flood/Ark

Title Year ISBN Notes 
Flood 2008 ISBN 978-0-575-08058-4 British Science Fiction Association Award nominee, 2008    
Ark 2009 ISBN 978-0-575-08057-7   

Northland Trilogy

Title Year ISBN Notes 
Stone Spring 2010 ISBN 978-0-575-08919-8   
Bronze Summer 2011 ISBN 978-0-575-08923-5   
Iron Winter 2012 ISBN 978-0-575-08928-0   

Unrelated novels

Title Year ISBN Notes 
Anti-Ice 1993 ISBN 0-06-105421-6 Alternate History 
The Time Ships 1995 ISBN 0-06-105648-0 BSFA Award winner, 1995;  John W. Campbell Award winner, 1996;  Philip K. Dick Award winner, 1996;  Hugo, Locus, Clarke, and British Fantasy Awards nominee, 1996 
Alternate History. An authorised sequel to H. G. Wells's The Time Machine 
The Light of Other Days 2000 ISBN 0-312-87199-6 Co-authored with Arthur C. Clarke. 
Evolution 2003 ISBN 0-345-45783-8   
The H-Bomb Girl 2007 ISBN 0-571-23279-5 Young adult 
Doctor Who: The Wheel of Ice 2012 ISBN 978-1-445-89803-2 Doctor Who novel 
The Long Earth 2012 ISBN 978-0-857-52009-8 Co-authored with Terry Pratchett. 

Unrelated collections

Title Year ISBN Notes 
Traces 1998 ISBN 0-00-649814-0 Short story collection. 
The Hunters of Pangaea 2004 ISBN 1-886778-49-3 18 stories and five essays on science and science fiction. 

Short fiction

Title Year First published in Reprinted in 
Formidable caress 2009 Analog 129/12 (Dec 2009) The Best Science Fiction and Fantasy of the Year : Volume Four, ed. Jonathan Strahan (Night Shade Books, 2010) 
Return to Titan 2010 Godlike Machines, Jonathan Strahan, ed.   "Return to Titan" includes characters from the Poole family of the Xeelee series.    

Non-fiction

Title Year ISBN Notes 
Deep Future 2001 ISBN 1-85798-844-2 Science based examination of possible human futures. 
Omegatropic 2001 ISBN 0-9540788-1-0 Mainly science fiction criticism. 
Revolutions in the Earth   Ages in Chaos 2003  (UK)    2004  (United States)  ISBN 0-297-82975-0   ISBN 0-7653-1238-7 James Hutton and the True Age of the World      James Hutton and the Discovery of Deep Time 
The Science of Avatar  2011 ISBN 0-297-86343-6 Examines the concepts used in the 2009 film Avatar. 

Personal life
Baxter was born  13 November 1957 in Liverpool, England and studied mathematics at Cambridge University, obtained a doctorate in engineering at Southampton University, and received an MBA from Henley Management College. Baxter taught maths, physics, and information technology before becoming a full-time author in 1995. He is also a chartered engineer and fellow of the British Interplanetary Society. 
References 
External links 
 

Stephen Baxter's official website
 
The Manifold (an unofficial but up-to-date fan site)
- The Manifold Message Boards (where fans of Mr. Baxter can interact and discuss his work)
 
Stephen Baxter's online fiction at Free Speculative Fiction Online
Stephen Baxter Yahoo! Groups (fan discussion group)
Stephen Baxter Fantastic Fiction
Stephen Baxter Book Reviews on The SF Site
Interview with Stephen Baxter on The SF Site
Stephen Baxter Infinity Plus Profile
Stephen Baxter talking about The Long Earth with Sir Terry Pratchett, Royal Institution video, 21 June 2012

 
  
DEFAULTSORT









 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Wilhelm Canaris
 
 Wilhelm Franz Canaris (1 January 1887 – 9 April 1945) was a German admiral, head of the Abwehr, the German military intelligence service, from 1935 to 1944 and a member of the German Resistance.
Early life and World War ICanaris was born in Aplerbeck (now a part of Dortmund) in Westphalia, the son of wealthy industrialist Carl Canaris and his wife Auguste (née Popp). Until 1938 Canaris believed that his family was related to the Greek admiral, freedom fighter and politician Constantine Kanaris, which influenced his decision to join the navy. While on a visit to Corfu he was given a portrait of the Greek hero, which he always kept in his office. In 1938, however, research showed that his family was of Northern Italian descent, originally called Canarisi, and had lived in Germany since the 17th century. 
 
  His grandfather had converted from Catholicism to Lutheranism.In 1905, aged seventeen, Canaris joined the German Imperial Navy and by the outbreak of World War I was serving on board the SMS Dresden as an intelligence officer. This cruiser was the only ship that managed to evade the British Fleet for a prolonged period during the Battle of the Falkland Islands in December 1914, largely due to his excellent deception tactics. Whilst anchored in Cumberland Bay, Robinson Crusoe Island, the Dresden was trapped and forced to scuttle after fighting a battle there with the British. Most of the crew became prisoners in Chile in March 1915, but Canaris escaped in August 1915, using his fluency in Spanish; with the aid of some German merchants he returned to Germany in October 1917 via, among other countries, Great Britain.He was then given intelligence work and sent to Spain, where he survived a British assassination attempt. Returning to active service, he ended the war as a celebrated U-boat commander from late 1917 in the Mediterranean, credited with eighteen sinkings. He spoke English fluently (as well as four other foreign languages) and as a naval officer of the old school, he respected Great Britain's Royal Navy despite the rivalry between the two nations.During the German Revolution of 1918–1919, Canaris helped organise the formation of vigilante forces in order to suppress the revolutionary movements. He was also a member of the military court that tried (and mostly acquitted) those involved in the assassination of Karl Liebknecht and Rosa Luxemburg. He was appointed to the adjutancy of defence minister Gustav Noske. In 1919, Canaris married Erika Waag, also the child of an industrialist. They had two daughters, Eva and Brigitte.
Interwar yearsCanaris remained in the military after the war, first as a member of the Freikorps and then as part of the Reichsmarine. He was promoted rapidly, becoming a Captain in 1931, the Executive Officer of the cruiser Berlin and then the Commanding Officer of the battleship Schlesien. At this time, he became involved in intelligence work again. He made a series of contacts with high-ranking German officers, politicians and industrialists for the purpose of creating order in German politics. During his Freikorps period, he was on intimate terms with the people such as Horst von Pflugk-Harttung who were accused of political assassinations of leaders of the left, and was even accused himself, although later acquitted, of being involved in the assassinations and other crimes (such as his alleged involvement in Rosa Luxembourg's "trial"). During the 1930–33 period, Canaris was following a course quite parallel to the one followed by the future Nazi Party leaders although never a party member himself. Indirectly, though, he promoted the forces that later became part of the Nazi power structure .After Adolf Hitler's rise to power in 1933, Canaris was made head of the Abwehr, Germany's official military intelligence agency, on 1 January 1935. Later that year, he was promoted Rear Admiral. During the period 1935–36, he made contacts in Spain to organise a German spy network there, due to his excellent Spanish. He was the moving force behind the decision that sided Germany with Francisco Franco during the Spanish Civil War, despite Hitler's initial hesitation to get involved in such an adventure .In 1937 he was still a supporter of Hitler, considering him to be the only solution against communism and a hope for the national revival of Germany . By 1938, however, he had realised that Hitler's policies and plans would lead Germany to disaster and secretly began to work against the régime. His personal style as a gentleman was incompatible with the thuggish behaviour of most of the Nazi Party members. A letter from a Spanish contact of his has been preserved and unambiguously confirms his opposition to the Nazi regime .He tried to hinder Hitler's attempts to absorb Czechoslovakia and he also advised Franco not to permit German passage through Spain for the purposes of capturing Gibraltar. Arguments used by Franco to counter Hitler's demands for German access to Spanish territory were influenced directly by Canaris, who met with a number of his top advisors. 
 
   Additionally, a significant sum of money had been deposited by the British in Swiss accounts for Franco and his generals to maintain their neutrality. 
 
 
Munich AgreementHe also became involved in two abortive plots to depose Hitler, first in 1938 and again in 1939.  During the 1938 crisis over Czechoslovakia that culminated in the Munich Agreement, Canaris was together with the army chief of staff, General Ludwig Beck and the Foreign Office’s state secretary Ernst von Weizsäcker, a leader of the "anti-war" group in the German government, which was determined to avoid a war in 1938 that it felt Germany would lose.This group was not necessarily committed to the overthrow of the regime, but was loosely allied to another, more radical group, the "anti-Nazi" faction centered around Colonel Hans Oster and Hans Bernd Gisevius, which wanted to use the crisis as an excuse for executing a putsch to overthrow the Nazi regime. His most audacious attempt was in planning, with Ewald von Kleist-Schmenzin, to capture and eliminate Hitler and the entire Nazi party before the invasion of Czechoslovakia. At this particular moment, von Kleist visited Britain secretly and discussed the situation with British MI6 and some high-ranking politicians. There, the name of Canaris became widely known as the executive hand of von Kleist in the event of an anti-Nazi plot. The high-ranking German military leaders believed that if Hitler invaded Czechoslovakia, or any other country, then Britain would declare war on Germany. MI6 was of the same opinion.  The British declaration of war would have given the General Staff, in their belief, both the pretext and support for an overthrow of Hitler. 
 
 The British reaction, however, to Hitler's demands on the Sudetenland was more cautious. At a meeting with Hitler in Munich, British Prime Minister Neville Chamberlain, (1869 – November 1940), and French Prime Minister Édouard Daladier chose diplomacy over war. Munich was a severe disappointment for Kleist and Canaris. It gave Hitler's international reputation an important boost for two reasons: one, he was able to play the part of a man of reason and compromise; and two, he could boast that his predictions that Great Britain and France would not respond with war had proven to be correct. There are claims that Canaris, who was extremely shocked by this 'dishonest and stupid decision' (his own words), decided to be cautious and wait for a better time to act against Hitler.In January 1939, Canaris manufactured the "Dutch War Scare", which gripped the British government. By 23 January 1939 the British government received information to the effect that Germany intended to invade the Netherlands in February 1939 with the aim of using Dutch air-fields to launch strategic bombing offensive intended to achieve a "knock-out" blow against Britain by razing British cities to the ground.  All this information was false, and it was intended by Canaris to achieve a change in British foreign policy.  In this, Canaris was successful, and the "Dutch War Scare" played a major role in causing Chamberlain to make the "continental commitment" (i.e. sending a large British ground force to the defence of France) in February 1939. Nevertheless, it appears likely  that MI6 maintained contact with Canaris even after the Munich Agreement signed on 30 September 1938.  When Winston Churchill came to power after the resignation of Chamberlain in May 1940, Canaris' hopes were renewed, given the new Prime Minister's strong position against Hitler.
World War IIIn the meantime, Reinhard Heydrich, previously a naval cadet who had served under Canaris and was at the time the Sicherheitsdienst (SD) leader, despite being his protégé, friend and neighbour, became his rival. Presumably, the Canaris posting in Abwehr had the secret approval of the dynamic Heydrich, who preferred him to his predecessor, Commander Pfatz, who was not in line with the Nazi party members. Heydrich wanted a controllable Abwehr and was keeping a close eye on Canaris. Canaris appeared outwardly to side with his friend Heydrich, but only in order to give Abwehr a chance to grow and become a considerable force. In Bassett's account,  Canaris was deeply frustrated by a briefing from Hitler before the attack on Poland. During the briefing, he was informed about a series of exterminations that had been ordered and which Canaris was required to take notes on. These notes, the book confirms, were sent to MI6. After the outbreak of war between Germany and Poland, in September 1939, Canaris visited the front and witnessed examples of the war crimes committed by the SS Einsatzgruppen. Among these were the burning of the synagogue in Będzin, where the town's Jewish residents were burned to death. He also received reports from Abwehr agents about many other incidents of mass murder throughout Poland. Canaris kept detailed records of these atrocities in his personal diary which he entrusted to Werner Schrader, one of his subordinates and fellow resistance member .After hearing reports of and witnessing massacres in Poland, Canaris on 12 September 1939 travelled to Hitler's headquarters train, at the time in Upper Silesia, to register his objection to the atrocities; prior to reaching Hitler he encountered General Wilhelm Keitel whom he informed: "I have information that mass executions are being planned in Poland, and that members of the Polish nobility and the Roman Catholic bishops and priests have been singled out for extermination."  Keitel admonished Canaris to go no further with his protest as the detailed plan of atrocities came directly from Hitler, himself. Shocked by these incidents, Canaris began working more actively, at increasing risk, to overthrow Hitler's régime, although he cooperated with the SD to create a decoy. This made it possible for him to pose as a trusted man for some time. He was promoted to full Admiral in January 1940. With his subordinate Erwin Lahousen, he formed a circle of like-minded Wehrmacht officers, many of whom would be executed or forced to commit suicide after the failure of the 20 July Plot.
At an officers conference in Berlin, December 1941, Canaris is quoted as saying "Abwehr has nothing to do with persecution of Jews....no concern of ours, we hold ourselves aloof from it" (MI6 Sub-section Vf files NA HW 1/327).
It has been speculated that there was contact with British intelligence during this time, despite the war between the two countries. It is thought that during the invasion of Russia, Canaris received a detailed report of all the enemy positions that was known only to the British. The head of MI6, Stewart Menzies, who shared Canaris’s strong anti-communist beliefs, praised Canaris’s courage and bravery at the end of the war. Reinhard Heydrich and Heinrich Himmler investigated in detail the sources of Canaris's information on Operation Barbarossa, arriving at the conclusion that there had indeed been contact between him and the British. After 1942, Canaris visited Spain frequently and was probably in contact with British agents from Gibraltar. In 1943, while in occupied France, Canaris is said to have made contact with British agents: he was conducted blindfolded to the Convent of the Nuns of the Passion of our Blessed Lord, 127 Rue de la Santé, where he met the local head of the British Intelligence Services, code name "Jade Amicol", in reality Colonel Claude Olivier. Canaris wanted to know the terms for peace if Germany got rid of Hitler. Churchill's reply, sent to him two weeks later, was simple: "Unconditional surrender". During Heydrich's posting in Prague, a serious incident put him and Canaris in open conflict. A Czech agent — Paul Thümmel — was arrested by Heydrich, but Canaris intervened to save him, claiming he was a double agent actually working for Abwehr . Heydrich suspected that Thümmel was actually Canaris's MI6 contact . Heydrich requested that Canaris put the Abwehr under SD and SS control. Canaris appeared to retreat and handled the situation diplomatically, but there was no immediate effect on the Abwehr for the time being. In fact, Canaris had established another two links with MI6 — one via Zurich, and the other via Spain and Gibraltar. It is also possible that Vatican contacts provided a third route to his British counterparts.Canaris also intervened to save a number of victims of Nazi persecution, including saving Jews, some by getting them to Spain.  Many such people were given token training as Abwehr "agents" and then issued papers allowing them to leave Germany. One notable person he is said to have assisted was the then Lubavitcher Rebbe in Warsaw, Rabbi Yosef Yitzchok Schneersohn.  This has led Chabad Lubavitch to campaign for his recognition as a Righteous Gentile by the Yad VaShem holocaust memorial. The assassination of Reinhard Heydrich in Prague, organized by MI6, was done in part to preserve Canaris in his important position.  
Foiling Hitler's plot to kidnap Pope Pius XIIColonel Wessel von Freytag-Loringhoven's son Niki, testifying in Munich in 1972 and in recent revelations, reports that Canaris was involved in the foiling of Hitler's plot to kidnap Pope Pius XII. MORE PROOF OF HITLER'S PLAN TO KILL PIUS XII: Son of German Intelligence Officer Comes Forward, Zenit News June 16, 2009  Italian newspaper reveals details behind Hitler’s plan to kill Pius XII CBCP News June 17, 2009  Colonel Freytag-Loringhoven was a subordinate of Canaris, and his son, Niki von Freytag-Loringhoven, reported that within days of the arrest of Benito Mussolini as ordered by King Victor Emmanuel III, the Führer commanded  the Reichssicherheitshauptamt (the Third Reich’s Security Headquarters) to retaliate against the Italians via the kidnapping or murder of Pius XII and King Victor Emmanuel. In 2009 the colonel’s son, Niki Freytag Loringhoven, then 72, came forward to reveal new details about the plan, reporting that on 29 and 30 July 1943 his father and Erwin von Lahousen, who were employed in the section of German intelligence dealing mainly with sabotage,  attended a meeting in Venice where Canaris informed the Italian General, Cesare Amè, of the plot.     General Amè relayed the news which allowed the plot to be foiled.  The Italian paper, Avvenire, maintains that the younger Freytag von Loringhoven’s accounts comport with the Von Lahousen’s Nuremberg war crimes trials deposition. 
Downfall and execution
The evidence that he was playing a double game grew, and at the insistence of Heinrich Himmler, who had suspected him for a long time, Hitler dismissed Canaris from the Abwehr in February 1944, replacing him with Walter Schellenberg and merging most of the Abwehr with the Sicherheitsdienst (SD). Some weeks later, Canaris was put under house arrest, preventing him from taking part directly in the 20 July Plot, 1944,  to assassinate Hitler.However, just after the Stalingrad disaster, Canaris had already planned a 'coup' against the entire Nazi regime in which many Nazi officials would be accused for known crimes, while Hitler would be arrested as an insane person based on his exposure to poison gas in World War I, then imprisoned for life. After the 20 July Plot, Canaris's long-time rival, SS leader Heinrich Himmler discovered that one of the officers involved in the plot, a friend of Canaris who had committed suicide, had kept the plot details in a metal box. The investigations also revealed that a number of other assassination plots (possibly another 10 or 15) had been activated but had failed and were covered up at the last minute. Most people who participated in these plots were people Canaris knew well. In the aftermath of the attempt on Hitler's life, the Gestapo found no direct evidence tying Canaris to the plot, but his close association to many of the conspirators that were arrested was enough to seal his fate.Himmler kept Canaris alive for some time because he planned to use him secretly as a future contact with the British in order to come to an agreement to end the war with himself as the leader of Germany. Hitler also wanted to keep him alive in order to get the names of additional conspirators. When Himmler's plan failed to materialize, he received the approval of Hitler to send Canaris to an SS drumhead court-martial presided over by Otto Thorbeck with Walter Huppenkothen as prosecutor that sentenced him to death.Together with his deputy General Hans Oster, military jurist General Karl Sack, theologian Rev. Dietrich Bonhoeffer and Ludwig Gehre, Canaris was humiliated before witnesses and then executed on 9 April 1945, in the Flossenbürg concentration camp, just weeks before the end of the war. He was led to the gallows barefoot and naked. Just before his execution he tapped out a message in Morse code, which was heard by another prisoner, claiming he acted for the good of Germany and denying he was a traitor. At the time of his execution, Canaris had been decorated with the Iron Cross First and Second Class, the Silver German Cross, the Cross of Honour and the Wehrmacht Twelve and Twenty-Five Year Long-Service Ribbons.Erwin von Lahousen and Hans Bernd Gisevius, two of Canaris' main subordinates, survived the war and testified during the Nuremberg Trials about Canaris' courage in opposing Hitler. Lahousen recalled a conversation between Canaris and General Wilhelm Keitel in which Canaris warned Keitel that the German military would be held responsible for the atrocities in Poland. Keitel responded that they had been ordered by Hitler. Keitel, who also survived the war, was found guilty of war crimes at Nuremberg and hanged.
Popular culture

The 1954 movie Canaris is based on his biography. 
In the 1961 novel, 'Es muss nicht immer Kaviar sein' by German author Johannes Mario Simmel Canaris is the primary benefactor of agent Thomas Lieven during his time as German Agent in World War II. The novel is claimed by the author to be authentic.
In the 1968 Soviet film The End of Saturn, Canaris was portrayed by actor Bruno Freindlich.
In the 1970 Colin Forbes novel The Heights of Zervos, Canaris is mentioned along with the Abwehr.
In the 1976 film The Eagle Has Landed, Canaris was played by actor Anthony Quayle.
In the Frederick Forsyth novel The Odessa File, set in the mid-1960s, the hero infiltrates the organisation of former SS members by claiming to have commanded, as a 19-year-old sergeant, the firing squad which executed Canaris. This is not in fact how Canaris was executed, which was by hanging.
In the 1980 Brian Garfield novel The Paladin, Canaris is visited by an agent acting for Churchill. It is apparent that in this book, Canaris is acting as a knowing conduit for British misinformation.
In the 1996 Daniel Silva novel The Unlikely Spy, Canaris is the head of the Abwehr who initiated the infiltration of SHAEF to discover its invasion plans of Normandy.
In the Phillip Kerr novel Hitler's Peace, Canaris attempts to have Hitler poisoned during a secret appearance at the 1943 Tehran Conference.
In the 2001 Mike Whicker novel Invitation to Valhalla, Canaris is the head of Abwehr who sends a female spy to America.


References 
Further reading

Bodyguard of Lies, by Anthony Cave Brown, 1975.
C: The Secret Life of Sir Stewart Graham Menzies, Spymaster to Winston Churchill, by Anthony Cave Brown, 1987, Macmillan Publishing, New York, ISBN 0-02-517390-1.
Hitlers Krieger, by Guido Knopp, 2000, Goldman Verlag, ISBN 3-442-15045-0.
“The German Military Opposition before the Second World War” by Klaus-Jürgen Müller pages 61–75 from The Fascist Challenge and the Policy of Appeasement edited by Wolfgang Mommsen & Lothar Lettenacke, George Allen & Unwin: London, United Kingdom, 1983, ISBN 0-04-940068-1.
"The Structure and Nature of the National Conservative Opposition in Germany up to 1940"  by Klaus-Jürgen Müller pages 133-178 from Aspects of the Third Reich edited by H.W. Koch, Macmillan: London, United Kingdom, ISBN 0-333-35272-6.
Hitler's Spy Chief: The Wilhelm Canaris Mystery, by Richard Bassett, 2005, Cassell, London, ISBN 0-304-36718-4.
The Unseen War in Europe, by John H. Waller, 1996, Random House, New York, ISBN 0-679-44826-8
Hitler's Spy Chief: The Wilhelm Canaris Betrayal: the Intelligence Campaign Against Adolf Hitler by Richard Bassett 2012 ISBN 978-1605983707


External links 
 

Canaris.dk, a website devoted to Canaris.
Admiral Wilhelm Canaris at jewishvirtuallibrary.org.
 
 
  
 
DEFAULTSORT

 


























  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Henry IV of France
 
 
 
 
 
Henry IV (13 December 1553 – 14 May 1610), Henri-Quatre ( ), was King of Navarre (as Henry III) from 1572 to 1610 and King of France from 1589 to 1610. He was the first monarch of the Bourbon branch of the Capetian dynasty in France.Baptised Catholic, he converted to Protestantism along with his mother Jeanne d'Albret, Queen of Navarre. He inherited the throne of Navarre, in 1572, on the death of his mother. As a Huguenot, Henry was involved in the Wars of Religion; he barely escaped the St. Bartholomew's Day massacre and later led Protestant forces against the French Royal Army.As a prince du sang by his father, Antoine de Bourbon, he was also the natural heir to the throne of France. On the death of the childless Henry III, he ascended the throne of France in 1589, but had to abjure his Calvinist faith. However, his coronation was followed by a four-year war against the Catholic League to establish his legitimacy.One of the most popular French kings, both during and after his reign, Henry showed great care for the welfare of his subjects and, as a politique, displayed an unusual religious tolerance for the time. He notably enacted the Edict of Nantes, in 1598, which guaranteed religious liberties to the Protestants, thereby effectively ending the civil war. He was assassinated by François Ravaillac, a fanatical Catholic. 
Early Life
Childhood and AdolescenceHenri de Bourbon was born in Pau, the capital of the French province of Béarn.  His parents were Queen Jeanne III and King Antoine of Navarre.  Although baptised as a Roman Catholic, Henry was raised as a Protestant by his mother; Jeanne declared Calvinism the religion of Navarre. As a teenager, Henry joined the Huguenot forces in the French Wars of Religion. On June 9, 1572, upon Jeanne's death, he became King Henry III of Navarre. 
First marriage and Saint Bartholomew’s Day MassacreIt had been arranged, before Jeanne's death, that Henry would marry Margaret of Valois, daughter of Henry II and Catherine de' Medici. The wedding took place in Paris on 18 August 1572  on the parvis of Notre Dame Cathedral. On 24 August, the Saint Bartholomew's Day Massacre began in Paris and several thousand Protestants who had come to Paris for Henry's wedding were killed, as well as thousands more throughout the country in the days that followed. Henry narrowly escaped death thanks to the help of his wife and promised to convert to Catholicism. He was made to live at the court of France, but escaped in early 1576; on 5 February of that year, he formally abjured Catholicism at Tours and rejoined the Protestant forces in the military conflict . 
Wars of Religion
Henry of Navarre became the legal heir to the French throne in 1584 upon the death of Francis, Duke of Alençon, brother and heir to the Catholic King Henry III, who had succeeded Charles IX in 1574. Because Henry of Navarre was the next senior agnatic descendant of King Louis IX, King Henry III had no choice but to recognise him as the legitimate successor.  Salic law disinherited the king's sisters and all others who could claim descent by the distaff line. However, since Henry of Navarre was a Huguenot, this set off the War of the Three Henries phase of the French Wars of Religion. The third Henry, the Duke of Guise, pushed for complete suppression of the Huguenots, and had much support among Catholic loyalists. This set off a series of campaigns and counter-campaigns culminating in the battle of Coutras.  In December 1588, Henry III had Henry I of Guise murdered,  along with his brother, Louis Cardinal de Guise.  This increased the tension further and Henry III was assassinated shortly thereafter by a fanatic monk. 

Upon the death of Henry III on 2 August 1589, Henry of Navarre nominally became king of France. But the Catholic League, strengthened by support from outside, especially from Spain, was strong enough to force him to the south. He had to set about winning his kingdom by military conquest, aided by money and troops sent by Elizabeth I of England. Henry's Catholic uncle, Charles, Cardinal de Bourbon, was proclaimed king by the League, but the Cardinal himself was Henry's prisoner.  Henry was victorious at Ivry and Arques, but failed to take Paris after laying siege to the city in 1590. After the death of the old Cardinal in 1590, the League could not agree on a new candidate. While some supported various Guise candidates, the strongest candidate was probably Isabella Clara Eugenia, the daughter of Philip II of Spain, whose mother Elisabeth had been the eldest daughter of Henry II of France.  The prominence of her candidacy hurt the League, which became suspect as agents of the foreign Spanish. Nevertheless Henry remained unable to take control of Paris.
"Paris is well worth a Mass"On 25 July 1593, with the encouragement of the great love of his life, Gabrielle d'Estrées, Henry permanently renounced Protestantism, thus earning the resentment of the Huguenots and of his former ally, Queen Elizabeth I of England. He was said to have declared that Paris vaut bien une messe ("Paris is well worth a Mass"),    though there is some doubt whether he said this himself or the statement was attributed to him by his contemporaries.   His entrance into the Roman Catholic Church secured for him the allegiance of the vast majority of his subjects and he was crowned King of France at the Cathedral of Chartres on 27 February 1594. In 1598, however, he declared the Edict of Nantes, which gave circumscribed toleration to the Huguenots.  
Second marriageHenry's first marriage was not a happy one, and the couple remained childless. Henry and Margaret had separated even before Henry had succeeded to the throne in August 1589, and Margaret lived for many years in the château of Usson in Auvergne. After Henry became king of France, it was of the utmost importance that he provide an heir to the crown in order to avoid the problem of a disputed succession. Henry himself favoured the idea of obtaining an annulment of his marriage to Margaret, and taking as a bride Gabrielle d'Estrées, who had already borne him three children. Henry's councilors strongly opposed this idea, but the matter was resolved unexpectedly by Gabrielle's sudden death in the early hours of 10 April 1599, after she had given birth to a premature stillborn son. His marriage to Margaret was annulled in 1599, and he then married Marie de' Medici in 1600.For the royal entry of Marie into Papal Avignon, 19 November 1600, the Jesuit scholars bestowed on Henry the title of the Hercule Gaulois ("Gallic Hercules", illustration), justifying the extravagant flattery with a genealogy that traced the origin of the House of Navarre to a nephew of Hercules' son Hispalus. 
Achievements of his reign
During his reign, Henry IV worked through his faithful right-hand man, the minister Maximilien de Béthune, duc de Sully (1560–1641), to regularise state finance, promote agriculture, drain swamps to create productive crop lands, undertake many public works, and encourage education, as with the creation of the Collège Royal Henri-le-Grand in La Flèche (today Prytanée Militaire de la Flèche). He and Sully protected forests from further devastation, built a new system of tree-lined highways, and constructed new bridges and canals. He had a 1200 m canal built in the park at the royal Château at Fontainebleau (which can be fished today), and ordered the planting of pines, elms, and fruit trees.The king renewed Paris as a great city, with the Pont Neuf,   which still stands today, constructed over the Seine river to connect the Right and Left Banks of the city. Henry IV also had the Place Royale built (since 1800 known as Place des Vosges), and added the Grande Galerie to the Louvre. More than 400 metres long and thirty-five metres wide, this huge addition was built along the bank of the Seine River, and at the time was the longest edifice of its kind in the world. King Henry IV, a promoter of the arts by all classes of people, invited hundreds of artists and craftsmen to live and work on the building's lower floors. This tradition continued for another two hundred years, until Emperor Napoleon I banned it. The art and architecture of his reign have since become known as the "Henry IV style".King Henry's vision extended beyond France, and he financed several expeditions of Pierre Dugua, Sieur de Monts, and Samuel de Champlain to North America that saw France lay claim to Canada. 
International relations under Henry IV
The reign of Henry IV saw the continuation of the rivalry between France and the Habsburgs of Spain and the Holy Roman Empire for the mastery of Western Europe, which would only be resolved after the end of the Thirty Years' War.
Spain and ItalyDuring Henry's struggle for the crown, Spain had been the principal backer of the Catholic League, trying to thwart Henry. A Spanish army from the Spanish Netherlands, under Alexander Farnese, intervened in 1590 against Henry and foiled his siege of Paris. Another Spanish army helped the nobles opposing Henry to win the Battle of Craon against his troops in 1592.After Henry's coronation, the war continued as an official tug-of-war between the French and Spanish states, until terminated by the Peace of Vervins in 1598.This enabled Henry to turn his attention to Savoy, fighting a war against this duchy, that was ended by the Treaty of Lyon in 1601, which effected territorial exchanges between France and the Duchy of Savoy.
GermanyIn 1609 Henry's intervention helped to settle diplomatically the War of the Jülich succession.It was widely believed that in 1610 Henry was preparing for a war against the Holy Roman Empire.  However, the preparations were terminated by his assassination and the subsequent rapprochement with Spain under the regency of Marie de' Medici.
Ottoman Empire
Even before Henry's accession to the French throne, the French Huguenots were in contact with the Moriscos in plans against Habsburg Spain in the 1570s.  Around 1575, plans were made for a combined attack of Aragonese Moriscos and Huguenots from Béarn under Henri de Navarre against Spanish Aragon, in agreement with the king of Algiers and the Ottoman Empire, but these projects foundered with the arrival of John of Austria in Aragon and the disarmament of the Moriscos. The Moriscos of Spain: their conversion and expulsion by Henry Charles Lea p. 281 –     In 1576, a three-pronged fleet from Constantinople was planned to disembark between Murcia and Valencia while the French Huguenots would invade from the north and the Moriscos accomplish their uprising, but the Ottoman fleet failed to arrive. After his crowning, Henry IV continued the policy of Franco-Ottoman alliance and received an embassy from Mehmed III in 1601.   In 1604, a "Peace Treaty and Capitulation" was signed between Henry IV and the Ottoman Sultan Ahmet I, giving numerous advantages to France in the Ottoman Empire. Randall Lesaffer, Peace treaties and international law in European history p.343 In 1606–7, Henry IV sent Arnoult de Lisle as Ambassador to Morocco, in order to obtain the observance of past friendship treaties. An embassy was sent to Tunisia in 1608, led by Savary de Brêves. 
Far-East Asia 
During the reign of Henry IV, various enterprises were set up to develop trade to faraway lands. In December 1600, a company was formed through the association of Saint-Malo, Laval and Vitré to trade with the Moluccas and Japan. Asia in the Making of Europe, Volume III: A Century of Advance. Book 1 by Donald F. Lach pp. 93–94    Two ships, the Croissant and the Corbin, were sent around the Cape in May 1601. One was wrecked in the Maldives, leading to the adventure of François Pyrard de Laval, who managed to return to France in 1611.     The second ship, onboard which was François Martin de Vitré, reached Ceylon and traded with Aceh in Sumatra, but was captured by the Dutch on the return leg at Cape Finisterre.   François Martin de Vitré was the first Frenchman to write an account of travels to the Far East in 1604, at the request of Henry IV, and from that time numerous accounts on Asia would be published.   From 1604 to 1609, following the return of François Martin de Vitré, Henry IV of France developed a strong enthusiasm for travel to Asia and attempted to set up a French East India Company on the model of England and the Netherlands.   A history of modern India, 1480–1950 by Claude Markovits p.144: The account of the experiences of François Martin de Vitré "incited
the king to create a company in the image of that of the United Provinces"  On 1 June 1604, he issued letters patent to Dieppe merchants to form the Dieppe Company, giving them exclusive rights to Asian trade for 15 years. No ships were sent, however, until 1616.  In 1609, another adventurer, Pierre-Olivier Malherbe, returned from a circumnavigation and informed Henry IV of his adventures.  He had visited China and in India had an encounter with Akbar. 
Character
Henry IV proved to be a man of vision and courage. Instead of waging costly wars to suppress opposing nobles, Henry simply paid them off. As king, he adopted policies and undertook projects to improve the lives of all subjects, which made him one of the country's most popular rulers ever.A declaration often attributed to him is: This statement epitomizes the peace and relative prosperity Henry brought to France after decades of religious war, and demonstrates how well he understood the plight of the French worker or peasant farmer. This real concern for the living conditions of the 'lowly' population – who in the final analysis provided the economic basis on which the power of the king and the great nobles rested – was perhaps without parallel among the Kings of France. It also made Henry IV extremely popular with the population.Henry's forthright manner, physical courage and military successes also contrasted dramatically with the sickly, effete languor of the last tubercular Valois kings, as evinced by his blunt assertion that he ruled with "weapon in hand and arse in the saddle" (on a le bras armé et le cul sur la selle). He was also a great womanizer, fathering many children by a number of his mistresses.
NicknamesHenry was nicknamed Henry the Great (Henri le Grand), and in France is also called le bon roi Henri ("the good king Henry") or le vert galant ("The Green Gallant").   In English he is most often referred to as Henry of Navarre.
Assassination

Although he was a man of kindness, compassion and good humor, and was much loved by his people, Henry was the subject of attempts on his life by Pierre Barrière in August 1593  and Jean Châtel in December 1594. King Henry IV was ultimately assassinated in Paris on 14 May 1610 by a Catholic fanatic, François Ravaillac, who stabbed the king to death in Rue de la Ferronnerie, while his coach's progress was stopped by traffic congestion for the Queen's coronation ceremony,   as depicted in the engraving by Gaspar Bouttats. Hercule de Rohan, duc de Montbazon was with him when he was killed; Montbazon himself was wounded but survived. Henry was buried at the Saint Denis Basilica.His widow, Marie de' Medici, served as regent for their 9-year-old son, Louis XIII, until 1617. 
Legacy
The reign of Henry IV had a lasting impact on the French people for generations afterwards. A statue of him was built in his honor at the Pont Neuf in 1614, only four years after his death. Although this statue—as well as those of all the other French kings—was torn down during the French Revolution, it was the first to be rebuilt, in 1818, and it stands today on the Pont Neuf. A cult surrounding the personality of Henry IV emerged during the Restoration. The restored Bourbons were keen to play down the contested  reigns of Louis XV and Louis XVI and instead emphasised the reign of the benevolent Henry IV. The song "Vive Henri IV" ("Long Live Henry IV") was popular during the Restoration.  In addition, when Princess Caroline of Naples and Sicily (a descendant of his) gave birth to a male heir to the throne of France, seven months after the assassination of her husband Charles Ferdinand, duc de Berry by a Republican fanatic, the boy was conspicuously named Henri, in reference to his forefather Henry IV. The boy was also baptised in the traditional way of Béarn/Navarre, with a spoon of Jurançon wine and some garlic, as had been done when Henry IV was baptised in Pau (although this custom had not been followed by any later Bourbon king).Henry IV's popularity continued, when the first edition (in French) of his biography, Histoire du Roy Henry le Grand, was published in Amsterdam in 1661. It was written by Hardouin de Péréfixe de Beaumont, successively Bishop of Rhodez and Archbishop of Paris, primarily for the edification of Louis XIV, grandson of Henry IV. A translation into English was made by James Dauncey for another grandson, King Charles II of England. An English edition came of this, published at London two years later in 1663. Numerous French editions have been published. However, only one more (with disputable accuracy) English edition was published, before 1896, when a new translation was published.He also gave his name to the Henry IV style of architecture, which he patronised.

Missing head 
File:[1]|Mummified Head
 
The head of his embalmed body was lost after revolutionaries ransacked the Basilica of St Denis and desecrated his grave in 1793.    An embalmed head, reputed to be that of Henry IV, was passed among private collectors until French journalist Stephane Gabet followed leads to track down the head to the attic of a retired tax collector, Jacques Bellanger, in January 2010. According to Gabet, a couple purchased the head at a Paris auction in the early 1900s, and Bellanger bought it from the sister in 1955.  In 2010, a multidisciplinary team led by Philippe Charlier, a forensic medical examiner at Raymond Poincaré University Hospital in Garches, confirmed that it was the lost head of Henry IV, using a combination of anthropological, paleopathological, radiological, and forensic techniques.     The head had a light brown colour and excellent preservation.  A lesion just above the nostril, a hole in the right earlobe indicating a long-term use of an earring, and a healed facial wound, which Henry IV would have received from a previous assassination attempt by Jean Châtel in 1594, were among the identifying factors.   Radiocarbon dating gave a date of between 1450 and 1650, which fits the year of Henry IV's death, 1610.  The team was not able to recover uncontaminated mitochondrial DNA sequences from the head, so no comparison was possible with other remains from the king and his female-line relatives.  Bellanger donated the king's head to Louis Alphonse, Duke of Anjou,    the king's senior descendant. Anjou had decided to reinter the head in the Cathedral Basilica of Saint Denis after a national Mass and funeral in 2011.  
Genealogy Henry IV was the son of Antoine de Bourbon, Duke of Vendôme and Queen Jeanne III of Navarre. He was born in the Château de Pau, Pyrénées-Atlantiques, in the southwest of France (former province of Béarn). Henry's mother was the daughter of Marguerite de Navarre, a sister of King Francis I of France, making him a second cousin of Kings Francis II, Charles IX and Henry III. It was to his father, however, a ninth-generation descendant of King Louis IX, that Henry owed his succession to the throne of France: in application of the Salic Law, which disregarded all female lines, Henry was the senior descendant of the senior-surviving legitimate male line of the Capetian dynasty. Upon the death of Henry III of France, who had no son to succeed him, the crown passed to Henry IV. The new king, however, had to fight for some years to be recognised as the legitimate king of France by the Catholics, who were opposed to his Protestant faith.
Ancestors 
 Ancestors of Henry IV of France 
 
 
   
  
Marriages and legitimate children 
On 18 August 1572, Henry married his second cousin Margaret of Valois; their childless marriage was annulled in 1599. His subsequent marriage to Marie de' Medici on 17 December 1600 produced six children:

Name Birth Death Notes 
Louis XIII, King of France 27 September 1601 14 May 1643 Married Anne of Austria in 1615. 
Elisabeth, Queen of Spain 22 November 1602 6 October 1644 Married Philip IV, King of Spain, in 1615. 
Christine Marie, Duchess of Savoy 12 February 1606 27 December 1663 Married Victor Amadeus I, Duke of Savoy, in 1619. 
Nicolas Henri, Duke of Orléans 16 April 1607 17 November 1611 . 
Gaston, Duke of Orléans 25 April 1608 2 February 1660 Married (1) Marie de Bourbon, Duchess of Montpensier, in 1626. Married (2) Marguerite of Lorraine in 1632. 
Henrietta Maria, Queen of England, Queen of Scots and Queen of Ireland 25 November 1609 10 September 1669 Married Charles I, King of England, King of Scots and King of Ireland, in 1625. 

Notes 
References 

  Vol. 2 (copies 1 & 2) at Google Books.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


Further reading

Non-fiction
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Fiction
 

George Chapman (1559?–1634), The Conspiracy and Tragedy of Charles, Duke of Byron (1608), éd. John Margeson (Manchester: Manchester University press, 1988).
Alexandre Dumas, La Reine Margot (Queen Margot) (1845)
Heinrich Mann,   (1935);   (1938)  
M. de Rozoy,   (1774).  
 
External links 

Henri IV – An unfinished reign Official website published by the French Ministry of Culture
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
|-
 
 
  
 
 
 
 
DEFAULTSORT

































 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Helen Atkinson-Wood
 Helen Atkinson-Wood (born 14 March 1955) is an English actress and comedian born in Cheadle Hulme, Stockport, Cheshire. Atkinson-Wood studied fine art at the Ruskin School, Oxford University, where she performed with Rowan Atkinson. She also performed at the Edinburgh Fringe Festival, where she met Ben Elton. 
BiographyAtkinson-Wood was a regular presenter of Central Television's controversial O.T.T. and had a cameo in the 1984 Young Ones episode "Nasty".  She is well known for her role as Mrs Miggins in Blackadder the Third (co-written by Ben Elton and Richard Curtis). She was the only woman on comedy programme Radio Active, where she played Anna Daptor and other roles, and participated in the televisual equivalent of Radio Active, KYTV. She also appeared in the final episode of Joking Apart as a morning television presenter. In 2007, she guest-starred in the Doctor Who audio play I.D.. She played the role of Sybil Ramkin in a BBC radio adaptation of Guards! Guards! by Terry Pratchett.She has been a regular presenter for the Channel 4 series Collector's Lot. She has made guest appearances on programmes such as Call My Bluff. She was a guest in episode 9 of the C series of QI, answering a question deemed impossible by host Stephen Fry by correctly naming a chemical reaction equation as an explosion in custard, earning 200 points. Craig Ferguson wrote in his book American on Purpose that he and Helen Atkinson-Wood were in a romantic relationship that lasted five years. He acknowledges that she changed his life "beyond recognition" by improving his health and his career. 
References 
External links

 

  
DEFAULTSORT






 
	Desmond Llewelyn
 Desmond Wilkinson Llewelyn (12 September 1914 – 19 December 1999) was a Welsh actor, famous for playing Q in 17 of the James Bond films between 1963 and 1999. GRO Register of Births: DEC 1914 11a 490 NEWPORT M. - Desmond W. Llewelyn, mmn = Wilkinson  GRO Register of Deaths: JUN 2000 A70E 247 EASTBOURNE - Desmond Wilkinson Llewelyn, DoB = 12 September 1914, aged 85   
Biography
Early lifeLlewelyn was born in Newport, Wales, the son of Mia (née Wilkinson) and Ivor Llewelyn,  who was a coal mining engineer. He originally wanted to be a minister, but during his education at Radley College, he worked as a stagehand in the school's productions and occasionally picked up small roles. His son Justin followed him to Radley, and was also a leading light of the school's stage productions.He was brought up in Blan-y-Pant house situated on Bettws Lane, Bettws.  The house is now used as a care home for the elderly.
World War IIThe outbreak of World War II in September 1939 halted his acting career; Llewelyn was commissioned as a second lieutenant in the British army, serving with the Royal Welch Fusiliers. In 1940, he was captured by the German army in France, and was held as a POW in Colditz Castle for five years.
Bond careerLlewelyn was chosen for the role of Q because of his work with director Terence Young in the 1950 war film They Were Not Divided, in which he played a tank gunner. Beginning with From Russia with Love in 1963, Llewelyn appeared as Q, the quartermaster of the MI6 gadget lab (also known as Q branch), in almost every Bond film until his death (17), only missing from Live and Let Die in 1973.In the 1977 film The Spy Who Loved Me, as 'Q' was delivering the underwater Lotus, Major Anya Anasova/Agent XXX (Barbara Bach) greets 'Q' as "Major Boothroyd".  'Q' does have a name, "Major Geoffrey Boothroyd".
His last appearance as Q prior to his death was in The World Is Not Enough in 1999. During his briefing of 007 in the film, Q introduces John Cleese's character, R, as his heir presumptive, and the film alludes to Q's retirement—which Bond, after seeing Q, expresses his hope that it will not be any time soon. Q's response is to admonish Bond to "always have an escape plan", after which he lowers himself through the floor of his lab. Llewelyn had stated not long before his death that he had no plans to retire and that he would continue playing Q "as long as the producers want me and the Almighty doesn't." In the 2002 film Die Another Day, John Cleese's character is the head of Q branch, having inherited the title of quartermaster from his predecessor. In all, Llewelyn appeared in 17 Bond films, more than any other actor, and worked with the first five James Bond actors. He also portrayed Q in a 1967 EON-produced made-for-television documentary entitled "Welcome to Japan, Mr. Bond", which was included in the 2006 special edition DVD release of You Only Live Twice.
Other workAlthough one of British cinema's most recognisable characters and an important and long-standing element in the 'Bond' franchise, 'Q' did not make Desmond Llewelyn rich—the actor was merely paid 'by the day' for his few hours of work on-set, and did not share in the money made by the films. Nevertheless, because Llewelyn was considered one of the franchise's major institutions and he was immensely popular among Bond fans, Llewelyn starred in several commercials, most recently to promote the video games GoldenEye 007 and Tomorrow Never Dies.Llewelyn made a brief appearance in 'Little Mother' an episode of The Adventures of Robin Hood. He also appeared in other films such as the Ealing comedy The Lavender Hill Mob (1951) and the 1981 PBS production of Dr. Jekyll and Mr. Hyde, and he had a small role in the musical Chitty Chitty Bang Bang (1968) which was itself based on a children's book by Bond author Ian Fleming. In 1961 he made an uncredited cameo who appears early on as one of the Marques’s servants in the Hammer Film Productions of The Curse of the Werewolf. He also acted on stage with Laurence Olivier and Vivien Leigh (appearing as an extra in Olivier's 1948 film Hamlet) and appeared as Geoffrey Maddocks ('The Colonel') in the British television series Follyfoot from 1971 to 1973. The Bond film Live and Let Die was filmed during the third series of Follyfoot and Llewellyn was written out of the series for three episodes to appear in the film. However, the Bond producers ultimately decided to leave the character out of the film anyway, much to Llewellyn's annoyance. 
Personal lifeContrary to his gadget-expert character in the Bond films, Llewelyn always maintained that he was totally lost in the world of technology, a trait that also plagued his successor, John Cleese.
DeathAged 85, Llewelyn was in a fatal car accident on 19 December 1999, as he was returning home from a book signing event. Driving alone, his Renault Megane collided head-on with a Fiat Bravo driven by a 35-year-old man on the A27 near the village of Berwick, East Sussex. Despite attention from a doctor called to scene and transfer by helicopter to Eastbourne District General Hospital he died shortly thereafter. The other driver was seriously injured.  An inquest recorded a verdict of accidental death, as Llewelyn had crashed into the Fiat head-on whilst trying to overtake another car. Roger Moore, who starred with Llewelyn in six Bond movies, spoke at his funeral. His widow, Pamela Mary Llewelyn, died in East Sussex in 2001, aged 85. 
Selected filmography

Ask a Policeman (1939) (uncredited)
Hamlet (1948) (uncredited)
Knights of the Round Table (1953) (uncredited)
A Night to Remember (1958) (uncredited)
Sword of Sherwood Forest (1960)
Gorgo  (1961) (uncredited)
The Curse of the Werewolf (1961) (uncredited)
Silent Playground (1963)
From Russia with Love (1963)
Goldfinger (1964)
Thunderball (1965)
You Only Live Twice (1967)
Chitty Chitty Bang Bang (1968)
On Her Majesty's Secret Service (1969)
Diamonds Are Forever (1971)
The Man with the Golden Gun (1974)
The Spy Who Loved Me (1977)
Moonraker (1979)
The Golden Lady (1979)
For Your Eyes Only (1981)
Octopussy (1983)
A View to a Kill (1985)
The Living Daylights (1987)
Prisoner of Rio (1988)
Licence to Kill (1989)
Merlin (1992)
GoldenEye (1995)
Tomorrow Never Dies (1997)
The World Is Not Enough (1999)


References 
External links 
 

Obituary at Salon.com
Desmond Llewelyn fan page
 
 
The Follyfoot forum

   
DEFAULTSORT











 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Fritz Walter
 
 
Friedrich "Fritz" Walter (31 October 1920 – 17 June 2002) was a German footballer. In his time with the German national team, he won 61 caps and scored 33 goals.
Life and career

Early club careerWalter was exposed to football early with his parents working at the 1. FC Kaiserslautern club restaurant. By 1928 he had joined the Kaiserslautern youth academy, and he made his first team debut at 17, continuing an association with the club that would be his only professional club.         International pro teams had repeatedly offered him hefty sums, but with support from his wife always declined in order to stay at home, to play for his home town, the national team and "Chef" (German for "boss") Herberger.
International debutWalter debuted with the German national team in 1940 under Sepp Herberger, and scored a hat-trick against Romania. 
WarWalter was drafted into the armed forces in 1942, however, the end of the war found 24 year old Fritz in a Prisoner of War camp in Máramarossziget in which he played with Hungarian and Slovakian guards. When the Soviets arrived they in general took all German prisoners back to a Gulag in Soviet Union where life expectancy was about five years. Fortunately, one of the Hungarian prison guards had seen Fritz playing for Germany, and told them that Fritz was not German but Austrian.
Return to GermanyUpon his return in 1945, Walter, who by now suffered from malaria, again played for Kaiserslautern, leading them to German championships in 1951 and 1953. Sepp Herberger recalled him to the national team in 1951, and he was named captain. He was captain of the West German team that won their first World Cup in 1954. Ironically, given the intervention of the Hungarian guards during the war, that win came over Hungary. He and his brother, Ottmar Walter, became the first brothers to play in a World Cup winning team. But in 1956, after the crackdown by the Soviets of the Hungarian Uprising, the soccer team were caught away from home, and for two years, Fritz managed their games and provided the financial backing and in small measure, paid them back for having saved his life. Walter received his last cap during the semi-final against Sweden in the 1958 World Cup, suffering an injury which ended his international career, and retired from football in 1959.
Later life and legacyThe home stadium of FC Kaiserslautern was renamed the Fritz-Walter-Stadion in 1985.Fritz Walter was named an honorary captain of the German football squad in 1958.  The other four are Uwe Seeler, Franz Beckenbauer, Lothar Matthäus and Bettina Wiegmann.Walter died in 2002 aged 81.    It was his dream to see the World Cup 2006 in "his" town Kaiserslautern as the town had not been selected in the smaller tournament of 1974, but it was denied with his death. But on the fourth year anniversary of his death on June 17, 2006, the United States played Italy in Kaiserslautern and a minute of silence was observed in his memory. Today people may visit the "Fritz Walter Haus" in the town of Enkenbach-Alsenborn approx. 20 km east of Kaiserslautern (first exit from Kaiserslautern on Bundesautobahn 6 direction Mannheim).   In November 2003, to celebrate UEFA's 50th anniversary, the German Football Association selected him as its Golden Player of the past 50 years (from 1954 to 2003). [1]During the eighties and nineties, there was another successful Bundesliga striker called "Fritz Walter", who mainly played for VfB Stuttgart. Although he had no relationship to the great Kaiserslautern captain, sports fans jokingly called him "Fritz Walter junior".
Honours

Club


1. FC Kaiserslautern

:

German football championship: 1950-51, 1952–53


Country


Germany

:

FIFA World Cup: 1954


Individual

UEFA German Golden Player: 2003   


Personal lifeWalter's wife of five decades was Italia Walter, a woman from Italy.It was popular knowledge in Germany that Walter appeared to play better the worse the weather was, and so now the term "Fritz Walter's weather" is used to describe rainy weather conditions, often rendered with odd local dialect grammar "of Fritz, his weather". This is because he, as many other soldiers, had contracted malaria during the war, thus rendering him unable to stand the heat of the sun. The 1954 World Cup final was played in "Fritz Walter's weather" conditions.On 6 October 1956 Walter scored a spectacular goal in Leipzig in front of 100,000 East Germans during a friendly against Wismut Aue, when he hit the ball back-heel while diving forward. [2]
References 
External links

Fritz Walter - Obituary - The Independent
UEFA - Germany's Golden Player
DFB Statistics of Fritz Walter

 
 
 
  
 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Thomas Dilworth
The Reverend Mr. Thomas Dilworth (died 1780) was an English cleric and author of a widely-used schoolbook, both in Great Britain and America, A New Guide to the English Tongue.  Noah Webster as a boy studied Dilworth's book, and was inspired partly by it to create his own spelling book on completely different principles, using pictures and stories of interest to children. By some accounts Dilworth was one of the few schoolbooks used by Abraham Lincoln. Published in 1761, by 1773, it was in its thirty-sixth edition. The last American edition was published in 1827 in New Haven, Connecticut. The full-page frontispiece portrait of the author was well-known to generations of doodling school children and is mentioned in Dickens; in Sketches by Boz. Chapter X there is a humorous description of rowers'  togs on the Thames:

They approach in full aquatic costume, with round blue jackets, striped shirts, and caps of all sizes and patterns, from the velvet skull-cap of French manufacture, to the easy head-dress familiar to the students of the old spelling-books, as having, on the authority of the portrait, formed part of the costume of the Reverend Mr. Dilworth.
The other front matter provides an extensive preface, a dedication to the Anglican schools of Great Britain and Ireland, recommendations from educators and a full-page poetic encomium to Dilworth by J. Duick:What thanks, my friend, should to thy care be given
Which makes the paths to science smooth and even. 
Henceforth our youth who tread thy flowery way,
Shall ne'er from rules of proper diction stray;
No more their speech with barbarous terms be filled
No more their pens a crop of nonsense yield.Dilworth's book  plays the part of a paragon in the poem "The Rising Village" by Oliver Goldsmith about the influences of  improper education in a Nova Scotia community.Dilworth also wrote other schoolbooks on arithmetic and bookkeeping.
External links

  "Dilworth's 'Great Scholastic Fame'"
  "Sketches by Boz: The River"
  "Dilworth's Speller at Google Books"


Bibliography

New Guide to the English Tongue, facsim. 1978 of 1793 ed. ISBN 0-8201-1322-0 
New Guide to the English Tongue, 1761 12mo."
Book-Keeper's Assistant 8vo.
The Schoolmaster's Assistant, Being a Compendium of Arithmetic both Practical and Theoretical 12mo.
Arithmetic 12mo.
Compendium of Arithmetic 1752 12mo.
Critical Dictionary of English Literature... S. A. Allibone, Lippincott, Philadelphia. 1871 (U. Mich. Making of America collection)
What Jefferson and Lincoln Read by Douglas L. Wilson. The Atlantic, Jan 1991 v267 n1 p51(10)

 
DEFAULTSORT


	Tony Robinson
 
 
 
 
Tony Robinson (born 15 August 1946) is an English actor, comedian, amateur historian, TV presenter and political activist. He is known for playing Baldrick in the BBC television series Blackadder and for hosting Channel 4 programmes such as Time Team and The Worst Jobs in History. Robinson is a member of the Labour Party and has served on its National Executive Committee. He has also written sixteen children's books.
Early lifeBorn in Homerton in the London Borough of Hackney, London, Robinson attended the independent Woodford Green Preparatory School followed by Wanstead High School in what is now the London Borough of Redbridge. He performed in his first professional acting role at the age of 12, as a member of Fagin's gang in the original production of the musical Oliver!, including a stint as the Artful Dodger when the boy playing the role didn't turn up.    Over the next five years, he appeared in a number of West End shows, in film and on television.At school, Robinson passed four O-Levels (English Language, English Literature, History and Geography) and went on to study for A-Levels. However, he did not complete his A-Levels and decided to study at a drama school instead. 
CareerToo young to attend the Royal Academy of Dramatic Art, Robinson instead studied at the Central School of Speech and Drama. After leaving, he spent four years in repertory theatre Chichester Festival Theatre programme 1976  most notably at the Leeds Playhouse.He won an Arts Council bursary to work as a director at the Midland Arts Centre, Birmingham and founded the Avon Touring Company, a Bristol-based community theatre company, with writer David Illingworth.  He played a small role as student doctor Grace in the 1972-73 series of Doctor In Charge.He appeared in the 1974-75 season at Chichester Festival Theatre, as Angel Chicago in the nativity musical Follow The Star. In the 1975 season, he appeared as Hovstad in Henrik Ibsen's Enemy of the People. In 1976, he appeared as Feste in Twelfth Night, and as Majorin in Monsieur Perrichon's Travels. In 1972 he starred in the children's educational programme Sam on Boffs' Island and was later a presenter on Play Away.  He also appeared in the award-winning Horizon documentary Joey, and in the title role in the BBC production of The Miracle of Brother Humphrey. He also had a minor part in the film Brannigan starring John Wayne. He was also one of the Who Dares Wins team in the Channel 4 comedy/satirical show in the early/mid-1980s.
Blackadder period (1983–1989)Robinson came to prominence in 1983 for his role in the British historical sitcom Blackadder, as Edmund Blackadder's dogsbody Baldrick. In the first series, broadcast as The Black Adder, he was quite astute, while his master was an idiot. Later series (Blackadder II, Blackadder the Third, Blackadder Goes Forth) moved the duo through history and switched the relationship: the Edmund Blackadder of Blackadder II was a brilliant schemer, whereas Baldrick had devolved into a buffoon whose catchphrase was "I have a cunning plan" (which he rarely had).In addition to his acting on Blackadder, he also wrote and narrated several Jackanory-style children's programmes, encouraged by Richard Curtis.    Programmes in this style included Tales From Fat Tulip's Garden (continued in Fat Tulip Too), Odysseus: The Greatest Hero of Them All (a retelling of the Iliad and the Odyssey), and Blood and Honey (tales from the Old Testament, filmed on location).
After Blackadder (1989 – present)After Blackadder, Robinson became the narrator and one of the lead actors for the British animated series Nellie the Elephant, based on a song of the same name. The series ran from 1989 to 1991 and was shown on Children's ITV.He also provided voice-over to the Free-ranger Chicken cartoon short, an English child-scripted arts-funded production in 1989. Robinson also presented the early-Saturday evening series Stay Tooned for BBC 1, which featured a selection of classic Warner Brothers and MGM cartoons. In 1989 he created the children's comedy TV series Maid Marian and her Merry Men, a loose retelling of the legend of Robin Hood in which he appeared as the Sheriff of Nottingham. Four series were broadcast on BBC1 during 1989–94. In 1990 he appeared in Series 8, Episode 2 of Bergerac - "My Name’s Sergeant Bergerac".
In 1994, Robinson began presenting Time Team, a TV programme devoted to archaeological investigations limited to three days (the outcome is never guaranteed, varying from spectacular to disappointing). In 2005, Exeter University conferred an Honorary Doctorate on Robinson, and Honorary Professorships on principal presenter Mick Aston and producer Tim Taylor, to reflect its great appreciation for what Time Team has done for the public understanding of archaeology in the UK.  In the 2011 episode Hitler's Island Fortress, Robinson described himself as an amateur archaeologist.Also in 1994, Robinson played a minor part in an episode called "One Flew Over the Parents Nest" in the TV series Minder, he played a character called "Willie the Weed". Robinson was drafted to present other history-based shows on Channel 4, including The Worst Jobs in History, researching and re-enacting some of the more horrible jobs of the past millennium. He also took this show on tour around the country along with an autobiographical question and answer session. This first series was followed by The Worst Christmas Jobs in History in December 2005 and then a second series of The Worst Jobs in History on Channel 4 in April 2006.In 1999, Robinson returned to star in a one-off Blackadder short film to celebrate the millennium, entitled Blackadder: Back & Forth. This short film was shown in the Millennium Dome throughout 2000 and was later aired on BBC One in 2002.Robinson also contributed the voiceover for the TV series Airline in its set of new series from 1999 focusing on the daily routine of EasyJet staff at a selection of airports. The show was made for ITV and is often repeated today on Sky Real Lives, Sky 1, Sky 2, Sky 3 (now Pick TV) & ITV2. He worked as the narrator for six of the remaining nine series until 2006 when the series ended. Tony Robinson's Cunning Night Out, a largely improvised stage show, followed in early 2005 and included a mix of the many themes from his career for which Robinson is famous. He also edited and presented The Real Da Vinci Code, a documentary for Channel 4's Weird World series which countered the claims made by Dan Brown in his novel The Da Vinci Code.In addition to telling his own stories, Robinson narrated the abridged audio book versions of Terry Pratchett's Discworld novels. Nigel Planer, Celia Imrie and Stephen Briggs narrated the unabridged versions. He also provided the voicing for several characters in the videogame Discworld. He followed on this Discworld work by playing a role in the live action television dramatisation of Hogfather, broadcast on Sky over the Christmas season in 2006.Robinson also presented Classic FM's Friendly Guide to Classical Music which aired on a Sunday at 4 pm. The whole 16-episode series was repeated on 26 December 2006. He revealed on the BBC Radio 2 feature "Tracks of My Years" that his favourite songs are: "I Can Help" by Billy Swan, "Bleeding Love" by Leona Lewis, "Chasing Cars" by Snow Patrol, "Beautiful" by Christina Aguilera, "Unfinished Sympathy" by Massive Attack, "Tangled Up In Blue" by Bob Dylan, "Shoulda Woulda Coulda" by Beverley Knight, "This Woman's Work" by Maxwell, "He's So Fine" by The Chiffons and "Falling Slowly" by The Frames.In 2007, Robinson narrated television advertisements for Honda, in the humorous style of Tales From Fat Tulip's Garden. The advertisements feature plastic cars with expressive faces (similar to Thomas the Tank Engine). He has also done voiceovers for laundry product Vanish as of 2007. In the spring of 2007 Robinson visited thirty towns in Britain and Ireland with his one-man show, A Cunning Night Out. The show was released on DVD.With Channel 4 Robinson presented Tony Robinson's Crime and Punishment and Catastrophe and Man on Earth focusing on humanity's struggle with climate change in the past 200,000 years. Tony Robinson and the Paranormal was first broadcast on Channel 4 in December 2008. In this series, Robinson investigates paranormal phenomena combining the fields of archaeology, parapsychology, history and spiritualism to investigate paranormal evidence.In July 2009, he appeared in the light-hearted BBC1 series Hotel Babylon as sly hit-man named Arthur Barnes. The character is knocked unconscious by a flying bottle expertly lobbed by the female hotel manager during a showdown in the lobby.    In February 2010 Robinson, described as the 'stunt Pratchett', read the main part of Terry Pratchett's BBC Richard Dimbleby Lecture.From 1 September 2010, Robinson hosted a new series on National Geographic Channel called Birth of Britain which was repeated on Channel 4 beginning in January 2011.  Tony Robinson Explores Australia was first broadcast in the first half of 2012. Filmed in High Definition, the series roughly follows a chronology from the earliest sightings of Terra Australis Incognita through to the present with each era defined by a theme rather than equal blocks of time. From 10 September 2012, Robinson hosted a new series on History Channel Australia called "Tony Robinson's Time Walks". The series uncovers stories that shaped the character of various cities and suburbs around Australia, including Fremantle, Melbourne, Hobart, Woolloomooloo, Bendigo, Newcastle, Carlton, Brisbane, St Kilda and Adelaide. During October 2012, it was announced that Time Team would be cancelled after nearly 20 years on television. Tara Conlan from The Guardian called the show "television history". When talking about the successful run of the show, Tony Robinson said "Not many performers are given the privilege of featuring in two iconic TV series – but I've been lucky." It is said that the show is being cancelled due to dwindling viewing figures. [1] 
Politics and personal lifeRobinson and his former wife Mary Shepherd were active in Bristol Labour politics from the early 1980s.From 1996 to 2000, he was vice-president of the actors' union Equity, helping with a huge restructuring programme which turned a £500,000 deficit into a small surplus.    He continues to work within Equity. In 2000 he was elected to the Labour Party's National Executive Committee, a position he held to 2004. He was also active in the "Make Poverty History" campaign during early 2005, in the lead-up to the G8 summit in Scotland, and is the patron for UK-based charity Street Child Africa.In March 2011, Robinson participated in the 'March for the Alternative' protests in Central London, which opposed the Conservative led Coalition UK Government's spending cuts programme. In 2006 he appeared in Tony Robinson: Me and My Mum, a documentary surrounding Robinson's decision to find a nursing home for his mother, and the difficulty he had with doing so. The documentary showed his mother's death in the home. It also featured stories from other families in similar situations. It appeared as part of Channel 4's short season of programmes entitled The Trouble With Old People.He previously supported the football clubs Tottenham Hotspur and Stoke City, but now supports Championship side Bristol City.  He also follows Spanish Liga BBVA side Valencia, often spending his holidays in the country. He is honorary president of the Young Archaeologists' Club of the Council for British Archaeology.  Robinson has shown his support for the Burma Campaign UK, an NGO that aims to highlight human rights violations in Burma under the State Peace and Development Council.He is a big fan of the rock band Genesis and provided sleeve notes for the reissue of the album The Lamb Lies Down on Broadway as part of the Genesis 1970–1975 box set. In late 2009 he was invited to be guest speaker at the Pride of Craegmoor Awards, where he gave a speech about his time with his mother and finding a care home. He then went on to give the prizes to Craegmoor's Shining Star and Leading Light.Robinson married Louise Hobbs on 24 June 2011. 
Awards

1999: Honorary Master of Arts from the University of Bristol for his services to drama and archaeology.
2002: Honorary Master of Arts by the University of East London. 
2005: Honorary doctorate from the Open University for his contribution to the educational or cultural well-being of society 
2005: Honorary Doctor of Laws from the University of Exeter for his active involvement in politics. 
2006: Honorary doctorate from Oxford Brookes University. 
2008 James Joyce Award from the Literary and Historical Society of UCD.
2011 Honorary doctorate by University of Chester. 


Selected filmography

Brannigan (1975) – Messenger
Blackadder (1983–1989, 1999) – Baldrick
The Young Ones (1984–Episode entitled "Bambi") – Dr. Not-The-Nine-O'clock-News
Maid Marian and her Merry Men (1989–1994) – Sheriff of Nottingham & creator/writer
The Neverending Story III (1994) – Engywook (male gnome)
Blood and Honey (1991) – Presenter (Storyteller)
My Wonderful Life (1997–1999) – Alan
Faeries (1999) – Broom (voice)
Minder (One Flew Over the Parents Nest, Series 10, Episode 4)(1994) - Willie the Weed List of Minder episodes
Time Team (1994–present) – Presenter
Romans (documentary) (2003) – Presenter
Britain's Real Monarch (2004) – Presenter
Spider-Plant Man (2005) - Robin
Codex (2006–present) – Presenter
Terry Pratchett's Hogfather (2006) – Vernon Crumley
The Doomsday Code (documentary) (2008) – Presenter
Catastrophe (2008) – Presenter
Big Top (2009)
Airline (UK TV series) – Narrator
Hotel Babylon – Arthur – Series 4, Episode 3(2009)
Jam TV (2009) – Himself, Episode 5
Man on Earth (2009) – Presenter
Codex (2011–present) – Presenter (Tuesday Morning Channel 4 and 4 HD)
Tony Robinson's Time Walks (2012–present) - Presenter (The History Channel on Foxtel)


References 
External links

 
Tony Robinson presents the Birth of Britain on National Geographic Channel – starts 1 September 2010
"Tony Robinson's cunning plan" – BBC News article dated Friday 26 May 2000
Tony Robinson – Interviews in Sherwood
"The Worst Children's Jobs in History" Interview about book (November 2005)
"Time Team" – Television series.

 
 
 
DEFAULTSORT
















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Ian Fleming
 
 
 Ian Lancaster Fleming (28 May 1908 – 12 August 1964) was an English author, journalist and naval intelligence officer, best known for his James Bond series of spy novels. Fleming came from a wealthy family connected to the merchant bank Robert Fleming & Co., and his father was the Member of Parliament for Henley from 1910 until his death on the Western Front in 1917. Educated at Eton, Sandhurst and the universities of Munich and Geneva, Fleming moved through a number of jobs before he started writing.While working in British naval intelligence during the Second World War, Fleming was involved in the planning stages of Operation Mincemeat and Operation Golden Eye. He was also involved in the planning and oversight of two intelligence units, 30 Assault Unit and T-Force. His wartime service and his career as a journalist provided much of the background, detail and depth of the James Bond novels.  Fleming wrote his first Bond novel, Casino Royale, in 1952.  It was a success, with three print runs being commissioned to cope with the demand.  Eleven Bond novels and two short-story collections followed between 1953 and 1966. The novels revolved around James Bond, an officer in the Secret Intelligence Service, commonly known as MI6. Bond was also known by his code number, 007, and was a commander in the Royal Naval Reserve.  The Bond stories rank among the best-selling series of fictional books of all time, having sold over 100 million copies worldwide. Fleming also wrote the children's story Chitty-Chitty-Bang-Bang and two works of non-fiction. In 2008, The Times ranked Fleming fourteenth on its list of "The 50 greatest British writers since 1945".He was married to Ann Charteris, who was divorced from the second Viscount Rothermere as a result of her affair with Fleming. Fleming and Charteris had a son, Caspar. Fleming was a heavy smoker and drinker who suffered from heart disease; he died in 1964, aged 56, from a heart attack. Two of his James Bond books were published posthumously, and a further five authors have since produced Bond novels. Fleming's creation has appeared in film twenty-four times, portrayed by seven actors.
 
Biography
Birth and family
Ian Fleming was born on 28 May 1908, at 27 Green Street in the wealthy London district of Mayfair.   His mother was Evelyn St Croix Rose, and his father was Valentine Fleming, the Member of Parliament for Henley from 1910.  Fleming was the grandson of the Scottish financier Robert Fleming, who founded the Scottish American Investment Trust and the merchant bank Robert Fleming & Co.   In 1914, with the start of World War I, Valentine joined "C" Squadron, Queen's Own Oxfordshire Hussars, and rose to the rank of major.  He was killed by German shelling on the Western Front on 20 May 1917; Winston Churchill wrote an obituary that appeared in The Times.  Because the family owned an estate at Arnisdale, Valentine's death was commemorated on the Glenelg War Memorial. Fleming's elder brother Peter (1907–1971) became a travel writer and married actress Celia Johnson.  Peter served with the Grenadier Guards during the Second World War, was later commissioned under Colin Gubbins to help establish the Auxiliary Units, and became involved in behind-the-lines operations in Norway and Greece during the war.  Fleming also had two younger brothers, Michael (1913–1940) and Richard (1911–1977), and a younger maternal half-sister born out of wedlock, cellist Amaryllis Fleming (1925–1999), whose father was the artist Augustus John.  Amaryllis was conceived during a long-term affair between John and Evelyn Fleming that started in 1923, some six years after the death of Valentine Fleming. 
Education and early lifeIn 1914 Fleming attended Durnford School, a preparatory school on the Isle of Purbeck in Dorset.   He did not enjoy his time at Durnford; his life included unpalatable food, physical hardship and bullying. 

In 1921 Fleming enrolled at Eton College. Although not a high achiever academically, he excelled at athletics and held the title of Victor Ludorum for two years between 1925 and 1927.  He also edited a school magazine, The Wyvern.  His lifestyle at Eton brought him into conflict with his housemaster, E. V. Slater, who disapproved of Fleming's attitude, his hair oil, his ownership of a car and his relations with women.  Slater persuaded Fleming's mother to remove him from Eton a term early for a crammer course to gain entry to the Royal Military College at Sandhurst.  He spent less than a year there, leaving in 1927 without gaining a commission, after contracting gonorrhea. In 1927, to prepare Fleming for possible entry into the Foreign Office,  his mother sent him to the Tennerhof in Kitzbühel, Austria, a small private school run by the Adlerian disciple and former British spy Ernan Forbes Dennis and his novelist wife, Phyllis Bottome.  After improving his language skills there, he studied briefly at Munich University and the University of Geneva.  While in Geneva, Fleming began a romance with Monique Panchaud de Bottomes and the couple were briefly engaged in 1931.  His mother disapproved and made him break off the relationship.  He applied for entry to the Foreign Office, but failed the examinations. His mother again intervened in his affairs, lobbying Sir Roderick Jones, head of Reuters News Agency. In October 1931 he was given a position as a sub-editor and journalist for Reuters.  In 1933 Fleming spent time in Moscow, where he covered the Stalinist show trial of six engineers from the British company Metropolitan-Vickers.  While there he applied for an interview with Soviet premier Joseph Stalin, and was amazed to receive a personally signed note apologising for not being able to attend. Fleming bowed to family pressure in October 1933, and went into banking with a position at the financiers Cull & Co.  In 1935, he moved to Rowe and Pitman on Bishopsgate as a stockbroker.  Fleming was unsuccessful in both roles.   Early in 1939, Fleming began an affair with Ann O'Neill (née Charteris), who was married to Baron O'Neill;  she was also having an affair with Esmond Harmsworth, the heir to Lord Rothermere, owner of the Daily Mail. 
Second World WarIn May 1939 Fleming was recruited by Rear Admiral John Godfrey, Director of Naval Intelligence of the Royal Navy, to become his personal assistant. He joined the organisation full time in August 1939,  with the codename "17F",  and worked out of Room 39 at The Admiralty.  Fleming's biographer, Andrew Lycett, notes that Fleming had "no obvious qualifications" for the role.  As part of his appointment, Fleming was commissioned into the Royal Naval Volunteer Reserve in July 1939,  initially as lieutenant,  but promoted to commander a few months later. Fleming proved invaluable as Godfrey's personal assistant and excelled in administration.  Godfrey was known as an abrasive character who made a number of enemies within government circles. He frequently used Fleming as a liaison with other sections of the government's wartime administration, such as the Secret Intelligence Service, the Political Warfare Executive, the Special Operations Executive (SOE), the Joint Intelligence Committee and the Prime Minister's staff. Soon after the start of the war, on 29 September 1939, Godfrey circulated a memorandum that was largely written by Fleming. It was called the Trout Memo and compared the deception of an enemy in wartime to fly fishing.  The memo contained a number of schemes to be considered for use against the Axis powers to lure U-boats and German surface ships towards minefields.  Number 28 on the list was an idea to plant misleading papers on a corpse that would be found by the enemy; this suggestion formed the basis of Operation Mincemeat, the successful 1943 plan to conceal the intended invasion of Italy from North Africa.  The recommendation was titled: "A Suggestion (not a very nice one)",  and continued: "The following suggestion is used in a book by Basil Thomson: a corpse dressed as an airman, with despatches in his pockets, could be dropped on the coast, supposedly from a parachute that has failed. I understand there is no difficulty in obtaining corpses at the Naval Hospital, but, of course, it would have to be a fresh one." In 1940, Fleming and Godfrey contacted Kenneth Mason, Professor of Geography at Oxford University, about the preparation of reports on the geography of countries involved in military operations. These reports were the precursors of the Naval Intelligence Division Geographical Handbook Series produced between 1941 and 1946. Operation Ruthless, a plan aimed at obtaining details of the Enigma codes used by the German Navy, was instigated by a memo written by Fleming to Godfrey on 12 September 1940. The idea was to "obtain" a German bomber, man it with a German-speaking crew dressed in Luftwaffe uniforms, and crash it into the English channel. The crew would then attack their German rescuers and bring their boat and Enigma machine back to England.  Much to the annoyance of Alan Turing and Peter Twinn at Bletchley Park, the mission was never carried out. According to Fleming's niece, Lucy, an official at the Royal Air Force pointed out that if they were to drop a downed Heinkel bomber in the English Channel, it would probably sink rather quickly. Fleming also worked with Colonel "Wild Bill" Donovan, President Franklin D. Roosevelt's special representative on intelligence co-operation between London and Washington.  In May 1941 Fleming accompanied Godfrey to the United States, where he assisted in writing a blueprint for the Office of the Coordinator of Information, the department which turned into the Office of Strategic Services and eventually became the CIA. In 1941–42 Admiral Godfrey put Fleming in charge of Operation Golden Eye, a plan to maintain an intelligence framework in Spain in the event of a German takeover of the territory.  Fleming's plan involved maintaining communication with Gibraltar and launching sabotage operations against the Nazis.  In 1941, Fleming liaised with Donovan over American involvement in a measure intended to ensure that the Germans did not dominate the seaways. 
30 Assault UnitIn 1942 Fleming formed a unit of commandos, known as No. 30 Commando or 30 Assault Unit (30AU), composed of specialist intelligence troops.  30AU's job was to be near the front line of an advance—sometimes in front of it—to seize enemy documents from previously targeted headquarters.  The unit was based on a German group headed by Otto Skorzeny, who had undertaken similar activities in the Battle of Crete in May 1941.  The German unit was thought by Fleming to be "one of the most outstanding innovations in German intelligence". Fleming did not fight in the field with the unit, but selected targets and directed operations from the rear.  On its formation the unit was only thirty strong, but it grew to five times that size.  The unit was filled with men from other commando units, and trained in unarmed combat, safe-cracking and lock-picking at the SOE facilities.  In late 1942 Captain (later Rear-Admiral) Edmund Rushbrooke replaced Godfrey as head of the Naval Intelligence Division, and Fleming's influence in the organisation declined, although he retained control over 30AU.  Fleming was unpopular with the unit's members,  who disliked his referring to them as his "Red Indians". Before the Normandy landings, most of 30AU's operations were in the Mediterranean, although it secretly participated in the Dieppe Raid in a failed pinch raid for an Enigma machine and related materials.  Because of its successes in Sicily and Italy, 30AU became greatly trusted by naval intelligence.   In March 1944, Fleming oversaw the distribution of intelligence to Royal Navy units in preparation for Operation Overlord  and followed the unit into Germany after it located, in Tambach Castle, the German naval archives from 1870.  Fleming visited 30AU in the field during and after Operation Overlord, especially following an attack on Cherbourg for which he was concerned that the unit had been incorrectly used as a regular commando force rather than an intelligence-gathering unit. This wasted the men's specialist skills, risked their safety on operations that did not justify the use of such skilled operatives, and threatened the vital gathering of intelligence. Afterwards, the management of these units was revised.  Fleming was replaced as head of 30AU on 6 June 1944,  but maintained some involvement.  In December 1944 he was posted on an intelligence fact-finding trip to the Far East on behalf of the Director of Naval Intelligence.  Much of the trip was spent identifying opportunities for 30AU in the Pacific,  although the unit ultimately saw little action because of the Japanese surrender. 
T-ForceThe success of 30AU led to the August 1944 decision to establish a "Target Force", which became known as T-Force. The official memorandum, held at The National Archives in London, described the unit's primary role: "T-Force = Target Force, to guard and secure documents, persons, equipment, with combat and Intelligence personnel, after capture of large towns, ports etc. in liberated and enemy territory." Fleming sat on the committee that selected the targets for the T-Force unit, and listed them in the "Black Books" that were issued to the unit's officers.  The infantry component of T-Force was in part made up of the 5th Battalion, King's Regiment, which supported the Second Army.  It was responsible for securing targets of interest for the British military, including nuclear laboratories, gas research centres and individual rocket scientists. The unit's most notable discoveries came during the advance on the German port of Kiel, in the research centre for German engines used in the V-2 rocket, Messerschmitt Me 163 fighters and high-speed U-boats.  Fleming would later use elements of the activities of T-Force in his writing, particularly in his 1955 Bond novel Moonraker. In 1942 Fleming attended an Anglo-American intelligence summit in Jamaica and, despite the constant heavy rain during his visit, he decided to live on the island once the war was over.  His friend Ivar Bryce helped find a plot of land in Saint Mary Parish where, in 1945, Fleming had a house built, which he named Goldeneye.  The name of the house and estate where he wrote his novels has many possible sources. Fleming himself mentioned both his wartime Operation Golden Eye  and Carson McCullers' 1941 novel Reflections in a Golden Eye, which described the use of British naval bases in the Caribbean by the American navy. 
Post-warUpon Fleming's demobilisation in May 1945, he became the Foreign Manager in the Kemsley newspaper group, which at the time owned The Sunday Times. In this role he oversaw the paper's worldwide network of correspondents.  His contract allowed him to take three months holiday every winter in Jamaica.  Fleming worked full-time for the paper until December 1959,  but continued to write articles and attend the Tuesday weekly meetings until at least 1961.  After Ann Charteris' first husband died in the war, she expected to marry Fleming, but he decided to remain a bachelor.  On 28 June 1945, she married the second Viscount Rothermere.  Nevertheless, Charteris continued her affair with Fleming, travelling to Jamaica to see him under the pretext of visiting his friend and neighbour Noël Coward. In 1948 she gave birth to Fleming's daughter, Mary, who was stillborn. Rothermere divorced Charteris in 1951 because of her relationship with Fleming,  and the couple married on 24 March 1952 in Jamaica.  Both Fleming and Ann had affairs during their marriage, she, most notably, with Hugh Gaitskell, the Leader of the Labour Party and Leader of the Opposition.  Fleming had a long-term affair in Jamaica with one of his neighbours, Blanche Blackwell, mother of Chris Blackwell of Island Records. 
1950s 
Fleming had first mentioned to friends during the war that he wanted to write a spy novel,  an ambition he achieved within two months with Casino Royale.  He started writing the book at Goldeneye on 17 February 1952, gaining inspiration from his own experiences and imagination. He claimed afterwards that he wrote the novel to distract himself from his forthcoming wedding to the pregnant Charteris,  and called the work his "dreadful oafish opus".  Clare Blanchard, a former girlfriend, advised him not to publish it, or at least to write it under a pseudonym. During Casino Royale's final draft stages, Fleming allowed his friend William Plomer to see a copy, who remarked "so far as I can see the element of suspense is completely absent".  Despite this, Plomer thought the book had sufficient promise and sent a copy to the publishing house Jonathan Cape. At first, they were unenthusiastic about the novel, but Fleming's brother Peter, whose books they managed, persuaded them to publish it.  On 13 April 1953 Casino Royale was released in the UK in hardcover, priced at 10s, 6d,  with a cover designed by Fleming.  It was a success and three print runs were needed to cope with the demand.   The novel centred on the exploits of James Bond, an officer in the Secret Intelligence Service, commonly known as MI6. Bond was also known by his code number, 007, and was a commander in the Royal Naval Reserve. Fleming took the name for his character from that of the American ornithologist James Bond, an expert on Caribbean birds and author of the definitive field guide Birds of the West Indies. Fleming, himself a keen birdwatcher, had a copy of Bond's guide, and later told the ornithologist's wife, "It struck me that this brief, unromantic, Anglo-Saxon and yet very masculine name was just what I needed, and so a second James Bond was born".  In a 1962 interview in The New Yorker, he further explained: "When I wrote the first one in 1953, I wanted Bond to be an extremely dull, uninteresting man to whom things happened; I wanted him to be a blunt instrument ... when I was casting around for a name for my protagonist I thought by God, (James Bond) is the dullest name I ever heard." 

Fleming based his creation on a number of individuals he met during his time in the Naval Intelligence Division, and admitted that Bond "was a compound of all the secret agents and commando types I met during the war".  Amongst those types were his brother Peter, whom he worshipped,  and who had been involved in behind-the-lines operations in Norway and Greece during the war.  Fleming envisaged that Bond would resemble the composer, singer and actor Hoagy Carmichael, although   others, such as author and historian Ben Macintyre, identify aspects of Fleming's own looks in his description of Bond.  General references in the novels describe Bond as having "dark, rather cruel good looks". Fleming also modelled aspects of Bond on Conrad O'Brien-ffrench, a spy whom Fleming had met whilst skiing in Kitzbühel in the 1930s, Patrick Dalzel-Job, who served with distinction in 30AU during the war, and Bill "Biffy" Dunderdale, station head of MI6 in Paris, who wore cufflinks and handmade suits and was chauffeured around Paris in a Rolls-Royce.   Sir Fitzroy MacLean was another possible model for Bond, based on his wartime work behind enemy lines in the Balkans, as was the MI6 double agent Dušan Popov.  Fleming also endowed Bond with many of his own traits, including the same golf handicap, his taste for scrambled eggs, his love of gambling, and use of the same brand of toiletries.  After the publication of Casino Royale, Fleming used his annual holiday at his house in Jamaica to write another Bond story.  Twelve Bond novels and two short-story collections were published between 1953 and 1966, the last two (The Man with the Golden Gun and Octopussy and The Living Daylights) posthumously.  Much of the background to the stories came from Fleming's previous work in the Naval Intelligence Division or from events he knew of from the Cold War.  The plot of From Russia, with Love uses a fictional Soviet Spektor decoding machine as a lure to trap Bond; the Spektor had its roots in the wartime German Enigma machine.  The novel's plot device of spies on the Orient Express was based on the story of Eugene Karp, a US naval attaché and intelligence agent based in Budapest who took the Orient Express from Budapest to Paris in February 1950, carrying a number of papers about blown US spy networks in the Eastern Bloc. Soviet assassins already on the train drugged the conductor, and Karp's body was found shortly afterwards in a railway tunnel south of Salzburg. Many of the names used in the Bond works came from people Fleming knew: Scaramanga, the principal villain in The Man with the Golden Gun, was named after a fellow Eton schoolboy with whom Fleming fought;  Goldfinger, from the eponymous novel, was named after British architect Ernő Goldfinger, whose work Fleming abhorred;  Sir Hugo Drax, the protagonist of Moonraker, was named after his acquaintance Admiral Sir Reginald Aylmer Ranfurly Plunkett-Ernle-Erle-Drax;  Drax's assistant, Krebs, bears the same name as Hitler's last Chief of Staff;  and one of the homosexual villains from Diamonds Are Forever, "Boofy" Kidd, was named after one of Fleming's close friends—and a relative of his wife—Arthur Gore, 8th Earl of Arran, known as Boofy to his friends. Fleming's first work of non-fiction, The Diamond Smugglers, was published in 1957 and was partly based on background research for his fourth Bond novel, Diamonds Are Forever.  Much of the material had appeared in The Sunday Times and was based on Fleming's interviews with John Collard, a member of the International Diamond Security Organisation who had previously worked in MI5.  The book received mixed reviews in the UK and US. For the first five books (Casino Royale, Live and Let Die, Moonraker, Diamonds Are Forever and From Russia, with Love) Fleming received broadly positive reviews.  That began to change in March 1958 when Bernard Bergonzi, in the journal Twentieth Century, attacked Fleming's work as containing "a strongly marked streak of voyeurism and sado-masochism"  and wrote that the books showed "the total lack of any ethical frame of reference".  The article compared Fleming unfavourably with John Buchan and Raymond Chandler on both moral and literary criteria.  A month later, Dr. No was published, and Fleming received harsh criticism from a number of reviewers who, in the words of Ben Macintyre, "rounded on Fleming, almost as a pack".  The most strongly worded of the critiques came from Paul Johnson of the New Statesman, who opened his review, "Sex, Snobbery and Sadism", with: "I have just finished what is, without doubt, the nastiest book I have ever read".  Johnson went on to say that "by the time I was a third of the way through, I had to suppress a strong impulse to throw the thing away".  Although Johnson recognised that in Bond there "was a social phenomenon of some importance",  this was seen as a negative element, as the phenomenon concerned "three basic ingredients in Dr No,  all unhealthy, all thoroughly English: the sadism of a schoolboy bully, the mechanical, two-dimensional sex-longings of a frustrated adolescent, and the crude, snob-cravings of a suburban adult."  Johnson saw no positives in Dr. No, and said, "Mr Fleming has no literary skill, the construction of the book is chaotic, and entire incidents and situations are inserted, and then forgotten, in a haphazard manner." Fleming's biographer, Andrew Lycett, noted that Fleming "went into a personal and creative decline" after marital problems and the attacks on his work.  Goldfinger had been written before the publication of Dr. No; the next book Fleming produced after the criticism was For Your Eyes Only, a collection of short stories derived from outlines written for a television series which did not come to fruition.  Lycett noted that, as Fleming was writing the television scripts and the short story collection, "Ian's mood of weariness and self-doubt was beginning to affect his writing", which can be seen in Bond's thoughts. 
1960sIn 1960 Fleming was commissioned by the Kuwait Oil Company to write a book on the country and its oil industry. The Kuwaiti Government disapproved of the typescript, State of Excitement: Impressions of Kuwait, and it was never published. According to Fleming: "The Oil Company expressed approval of the book but felt it their duty to submit the typescript to members of the Kuwait Government for their approval. The Sheikhs concerned found unpalatable certain mild comments and criticisms and particularly the passages referring to the adventurous past of the country which now wishes to be 'civilised' in every respect and forget its romantic origins." Fleming followed the disappointment of For Your Eyes Only with Thunderball, the novelization of a film script on which he had worked with others. The work had started in 1958 when Fleming's friend Ivar Bryce introduced him to a young Irish writer and director, Kevin McClory, and the three, together with Fleming and Bryce's friend Ernest Cuneo, worked on a script.  In October McClory introduced experienced screenwriter Jack Whittingham to the newly formed team,  and by December 1959 McClory and Whittingham sent Fleming a script.  Fleming had been having second thoughts on McClory's involvement and, in January 1960, explained his intention of delivering the screenplay to MCA, with a recommendation from him and Bryce that McClory act as producer.  He additionally told McClory that if MCA rejected the film because of McClory's involvement, then McClory should either sell himself to MCA, back out of the deal, or file a suit in court. Working at Goldeneye between January and March 1960, Fleming wrote the novel Thunderball, based on the screenplay written by himself, Whittingham and McClory.  In March 1961 McClory read an advance copy, and he and Whittingham immediately petitioned the High Court in London for an injunction to stop publication.  After two court actions, the second in November 1961,  Fleming offered McClory a deal, settling out of court. McClory gained the literary and film rights for the screenplay, while Fleming was given the rights to the novel, provided it was acknowledged as "based on a screen treatment by Kevin McClory, Jack Whittingham and the Author". Fleming's books had always sold well, but in 1961 sales increased dramatically. On 17 March 1961, four years after its publication and three years after the heavy criticism of Dr. No, an article in Life Magazine listed From Russia, with Love as one of US President John F. Kennedy's ten favourite books.  Kennedy and Fleming had previously met in Washington.  This accolade and the associated publicity led to a surge in sales that made Fleming the biggest-selling crime writer in the US.   Fleming considered From Russia, with Love to be his best novel, although he admitted, "the great thing is that each one of the books seems to have been a favourite with one or other section of the public and none has yet been completely damned." In April 1961, shortly before the second court case on Thunderball,  Fleming suffered a heart attack during a regular weekly meeting at The Sunday Times.  While he was convalescing, one of his friends, Duff Dunbar, gave him a copy of Beatrix Potter's The Tale of Squirrel Nutkin and suggested that he take the time to write up the bedtime story that Fleming used to tell to his son Caspar each evening.  Fleming attacked the project with gusto and wrote to his publisher, Michael Howard of Jonathan Cape, joking that "There is not a moment, even on the edge of the tomb, when I am not slaving for you".  The result was Fleming's only children's novel, Chitty-Chitty-Bang-Bang, which was published in October 1964, two months after his death. In June 1961 Fleming sold a six-month option on the film rights to his published and future James Bond novels and short stories to Harry Saltzman.  Saltzman formed the production vehicle Eon Productions along with  Albert R. "Cubby" Broccoli, and after an extensive search, they hired Sean Connery on a five-film deal, beginning with Dr. No (1962).   Connery's depiction of Bond  affected the literary character; in You Only Live Twice, the first book written after Dr. No was released, Fleming gave Bond a sense of humour and Scottish antecedents that were not present in the previous stories. Fleming's second non-fiction book was published in November 1963: Thrilling Cities,  a reprint of a series of Sunday Times articles based on Fleming's impressions of a number of world cities  in trips taken during 1959 and 1960.  Approached in 1964 by producer Norman Felton to write a spy series for television, Fleming provided a number of ideas, including the names of characters Napoleon Solo and April Dancer, for the series The Man from U.N.C.L.E.  However, Fleming withdrew from the project following a request from Eon Productions, who were keen to avoid any legal problems that might occur if the project overlapped with the Bond films. In January 1964 Fleming went to Goldeneye for what proved to be his last holiday and wrote the first draft of The Man with the Golden Gun.  He was dissatisfied with it and wrote to William Plomer, the copy editor of his novels, asking for it to be rewritten.  Fleming became increasingly unhappy with the book and considered rewriting it, but was dissuaded by Plomer, who considered it viable for publication. 
Death
Fleming was a heavy smoker and drinker throughout his adult life, and suffered from heart disease.  In 1961, aged 53, he suffered a heart attack and struggled to recuperate.  On 11 August 1964, whilst staying at a hotel in Canterbury, Fleming walked to the Royal St George's Golf Club for lunch and later dined at his hotel with friends. The day had been tiring for him, and he collapsed with another heart attack shortly after the meal.  Fleming died in the early morning of 12 August 1964—his son Caspar's twelfth birthday.   His last recorded words were an apology to the ambulance drivers for having inconvenienced them,  saying "I am sorry to trouble you chaps. I don't know how you get along so fast with the traffic on the roads these days."  Fleming was buried in the churchyard of Sevenhampton village, near Swindon. Fleming's last two books, The Man with the Golden Gun and Octopussy and The Living Daylights, were published posthumously.  The Man with the Golden Gun was published eight months after Fleming's death and had not been through the full editing process by Fleming.  As a result the novel was thought by publishing company Jonathan Cape, to be thin and "feeble".  The publishers had passed the manuscript to Kingsley Amis to read on holiday, although they did not use his suggestions.  Fleming's biographer Henry Chandler noted that the novel "received polite and rather sad reviews, recognising that the book had effectively been left half-finished, and as such did not represent Fleming at the top of his game."  The final Bond book, containing two short stories, Octopussy and The Living Daylights, was published in Britain on 23 June 1966.  In October 1975, Fleming's son Caspar, aged 23, committed suicide by drug overdose  and was buried with his father.  Fleming's widow, Ann, died in 1981 and was buried with her husband and son. 
WritingAuthor Raymond Benson, who later wrote a series of Bond novels, noted that Fleming's books fall into two distinct periods along stylistic lines. Those books written between 1953 and 1960 tend to concentrate on "mood, character development, and plot advancement",  while those released between 1961 and 1966 incorporate more detail and imagery. Benson argues that Fleming had become "a master storyteller" by the time he wrote Thunderball in 1961. Jeremy Black divides the series based on the villains Fleming created, a division supported by fellow academic Christoph Linder.  Thus the early books from Casino Royale to For Your Eyes Only are classed as "Cold War stories", with SMERSH as the protagonists,  followed by Blofeld and SPECTRE as Bond's opponents in the three novels Thunderball, On Her Majesty's Secret Service and You Only Live Twice, after the thawing of East–West relations.   Black and Linder both classify the remaining books—The Man with the Golden Gun, Octopussy and The Living Daylights and The Spy Who Loved Me—as "the later Fleming stories". 
Style and techniqueFleming said of his work, "while thrillers may not be Literature with a capital L, it is possible to write what I can best describe as 'thrillers designed to be read as literature .  He named Raymond Chandler, Dashiell Hammett, Eric Ambler and Graham Greene as influences.  William Cook in the New Statesman considered James Bond to be "the culmination of an important but much-maligned tradition in English literature. As a boy, Fleming devoured the Bulldog Drummond tales of Lieutenant Colonel Herman Cyril McNeile (aka "Sapper") and the Richard Hannay stories of John Buchan. His genius was to repackage these antiquated adventures to fit the fashion of postwar Britain ... In Bond, he created a Bulldog Drummond for the jet age."  Umberto Eco considered Mickey Spillane to have been another major influence. In May 1963, Fleming wrote a piece for Books and Bookmen magazine in which he described his approach to writing Bond books: "I write for about three hours in the morning ... and I do another hour's work between six and seven in the evening. I never correct anything and I never go back to see what I have written ... By following my formula, you write 2,000 words a day."  Benson identified what he described as the "Fleming Sweep", the use of "hooks" at the end of chapters to heighten tension and pull the reader into the next.  The hooks combine with what Anthony Burgess calls "a heightened journalistic style"  to produce "a speed of narrative, which hustles the reader past each danger point of mockery". Umberto Eco analysed Fleming's works from a Structuralist point of view,  and identified a series of oppositions within the storylines that provide structure and narrative, including:
 
 

Bond—M
Bond—Villain
Villain—Woman
Woman—Bond
Free World—Soviet Union
Great Britain—Non-Anglo-Saxon Countries
Duty—Sacrifice
 

Cupidity—Ideals
Love—Death
Chance—Planning
Luxury—Discomfort
Excess—Moderation
Perversion—Innocence
Loyalty—Dishonour 
 Eco also noted that the Bond villains tend to come from Central Europe or from Slavic or Mediterranean countries and have a mixed heritage and "complex and obscure origins".  Eco found that the villains were generally asexual or homosexual, inventive, organisationally astute, and wealthy.  Jeremy Black observed the same point: "Fleming did not use class enemies for his villains instead relying on physical distortion or ethnic identity ... Furthermore, in Britain foreign villains used foreign servants and employees ... This racism reflected not only a pronounced theme of interwar adventure writing, such as the novels of Buchan, but also widespread literary culture".  Writer Louise Welsh found that the novel Live and Let Die "taps into the paranoia that some sectors of white society were feeling" as the civil rights movements challenged prejudice and inequality. Fleming used well-known brand names and everyday details to support a sense of realism.  Kingsley Amis called this "the Fleming effect",  describing it as "the imaginative use of information, whereby the pervading fantastic nature of Bond's world ... [is] bolted down to some sort of reality, or at least counter-balanced." 
Major themes
Britain's position in the worldThe Bond books were written in post-war Britain, when the country was still an imperial power.  As the series progressed, the British Empire was in decline; journalist William Cook observed that "Bond pandered to Britain's inflated and increasingly insecure self-image, flattering us with the fantasy that Britannia could still punch above her weight."  This decline of British power was referred to in a number of the novels; in From Russia, with Love, it manifested itself in Bond's conversations with Darko Kerim, when Bond admits that in England, "we don't show teeth any more—only gums."   The theme is strongest in one of the later books of the series, the 1964 novel You Only Live Twice, in conversations between Bond and the head of Japan's secret intelligence service, Tiger Tanaka.  Fleming was acutely aware of the loss of British prestige in the 1950s and early 60s, particularly during the Indonesia–Malaysia confrontation, when he had Tanaka accuse Britain of throwing away the empire "with both hands".   Jeremy Black points to the defections of four members of MI6 to the Soviet Union as having a major impact on how Britain was viewed in US intelligence circles.  The last of the defections was that of Kim Philby in January 1963,  while Fleming was still writing the first draft of You Only Live Twice.  The briefing between Bond and M is the first time in the twelve books that Fleming acknowledges the defections.  Black contends that the conversation between M and Bond allows Fleming to discuss the decline of Britain, with the defections and the Profumo Affair of 1963 as a backdrop.  Two of the defections had taken place shortly before Fleming wrote Casino Royale,  and Fleming's biographer Andrew Lycett observes that the book can be seen as the writer's "attempt to reflect the disturbing moral ambiguity of a post-war world that could produce traitors like Burgess and Maclean." By the end of the series, in the 1965 novel, The Man with the Golden Gun, Black notes that an independent inquiry was undertaken by the Jamaican judiciary, while the CIA and MI6 were recorded as acting "under the closest liaison and direction of the Jamaican CID": this was the new world of a non-colonial, independent Jamaica, further underlining the decline of the British Empire.  The decline was also reflected in Bond's use of US equipment and personnel in a number of novels.  Uncertain and shifting geopolitics led Fleming to replace the Russian organisation SMERSH with the international terrorist group SPECTRE in Thunderball, permitting "evil unconstrained by ideology".  Black argues that SPECTRE provides a measure of continuity to the remaining stories in the series. 
Effects of the warA theme throughout the series was the effect of the Second World War.  The Times journalist Ben Macintyre considers that Bond was "the ideal antidote to Britain's postwar austerity, rationing and the looming premonition of lost power",  at a time when coal and many items of food were still rationed.  Fleming often used the war as a signal to establish "good" or "evil" in characters:   in For Your Eyes Only, the villain, Hammerstein, is a former Gestapo officer, while the sympathetic Royal Canadian Mounted Police officer, Colonel Johns, served with the British under Montgomery in the Eighth Army.  Similarly, in Moonraker, Drax (Graf Hugo von der Drache) is a "megalomaniac German Nazi who masquerades as an English gentleman",  and his assistant, Krebbs, bears the same name as Hitler's last Chief of Staff.  In this, Fleming "exploits another British cultural antipathy of the 1950s. Germans, in the wake of the Second World War, made another easy and obvious target for bad press."  As the series progressed, the threat of a re-emergent Germany was overtaken by concerns about the Cold War, and the novels changed their focus accordingly. 
ComradeshipPeriodically in the series, the topic of comradeship or friendship arises, with a male ally who works with Bond on his mission.  Raymond Benson believes that the relationships Bond has with his allies "add another dimension to Bond's character, and ultimately, to the thematic continuity of the novels".  In Live and Let Die, agents Quarrel and Leiter represent the importance of male friends and allies, seen especially in  Bond's response to the shark attack on Leiter; Benson observes that "the loyalty Bond feels towards his friends is as strong as his commitment to his job".  In Dr. No, Quarrel is "an indispensable ally".  Benson sees no evidence of discrimination in their relationship  and notes Bond's genuine remorse and sadness at Quarrel's death. 
The "traitor within"From the opening novel in the series, the theme of treachery was strong. Bond's target in Casino Royale, Le Chiffre, was the paymaster of a French communist trade union, and the overtones of a fifth column struck a chord with the largely British readership, as Communist influence in the trade unions had been an issue in the press and parliament,  especially after the defections of Burgess and Maclean in 1951.  The "traitor within" theme continued in Live and Let Die and Moonraker. 
Good versus evilRaymond Benson considered the most obvious theme of the series to be good versus evil.  This crystallised in Goldfinger with the Saint George motif, which is stated explicitly in the book:  "Bond sighed wearily. Once more into the breach, dear friend! This time it really was St George and the dragon. And St George had better get a move on and do something".  Jeremy Black notes that the image of the "latter-day St. George, ... [is] an English, rather than British image." 
Anglo-American relationsThe Bond novels also dealt with the question of Anglo-American relations, reflecting the central role of the US in the defence of the West.  In the aftermath of the Second World War, tensions surfaced between a British government trying to retain its empire and the American desire for a capitalist new world order, but Fleming did not focus on this directly, instead creating "an impression of the normality of British imperial rule and action".  Author and journalist Christopher Hitchens observed that "the central paradox of the classic Bond stories is that, although superficially devoted to the Anglo-American war against communism, they are full of contempt and resentment for America and Americans".  Although Fleming was aware of this tension between the two countries, he did not focus on it strongly.  Kingsley Amis, in his exploration of Bond in The James Bond Dossier, pointed out that "Leiter, such a nonentity as a piece of characterization ... he, the American, takes orders from Bond, the Britisher, and that Bond is constantly doing better than he". For three of the novels, Goldfinger, Live and Let Die and Dr. No, it is Bond the British agent who has to sort out what turns out to be an American problem,  and Jeremy Black points out that although it is American assets that are under threat in Dr. No, a British agent and a British warship, HMS Narvick, are sent with British soldiers to the island at the end of the novel to settle the matter.  Fleming became increasingly jaundiced about America, and his comments in the penultimate novel You Only Live Twice reflect this;  Bond's responses to Tanaka's comments reflect the declining relationship between Britain and America—in sharp contrast to the warm, co-operative relationship between Bond and Leiter in the earlier books. 
Legacy
After Fleming's death, his literary executors periodically hired other authors to continue the James Bond novels. Between 1957 and 1964, Fleming worked intermittently with the author Geoffrey Jenkins on a Bond story idea. After Fleming's death, Jenkins was commissioned by Bond publishers Glidrose Productions to write a Bond novel, Per Fine Ounce, but it was never published.  Starting with Kingsley Amis' Colonel Sun, under the pseudonym "Robert Markham" in 1968,  several authors have been commissioned to write Bond novels, including Sebastian Faulks, who was asked by Ian Fleming Publications to write a new Bond novel in observance of what would have been Fleming's 100th birthday in 2008. During his lifetime Fleming sold thirty million books; double that number were sold in the two years following his death.  In 2008 The Times ranked Fleming fourteenth on its list of "The 50 greatest British writers since 1945".  In 2002 Ian Fleming Publications announced the launch of the CWA Ian Fleming Steel Dagger award, presented by the Crime Writers' Association to the best thriller, adventure or spy novel originally published in the UK. The Eon Productions series of Bond films, which started in 1962 with Dr. No, continued after Fleming's death. Along with two non-Eon produced films, there have been twenty-three Eon films, with the most recent, Skyfall, released in October 2012.  The Eon Productions series has grossed $4,910,000,000 (over $12,360,000,000 when adjusted for inflation) worldwide, making it the second highest grossing film series, behind Harry Potter. The influence of Bond in the cinema and in literature is evident in films and books as diverse as the Austin Powers series,  Carry on Spying  and the Jason Bourne character.  In 2011 Fleming became the first English-language writer to have an international airport named after him: Ian Fleming International Airport, near Oracabessa, Jamaica, was officially opened on 12 January 2011 by Jamaican Prime Minister Bruce Golding and Fleming's niece, Lucy. 
Works 
 
 

Casino Royale (1953) 
Live and Let Die (1954)
Moonraker (1955) 
Diamonds Are Forever (1956)
From Russia, with Love (1957)
The Diamond Smugglers (1957) 
Dr. No (1958)
Goldfinger (1959)
 

For Your Eyes Only (1960) 
Thunderball (1961) 
The Spy Who Loved Me (1962) 
On Her Majesty's Secret Service (1963)
Thrilling Cities (1963) 
You Only Live Twice (1964)
Chitty-Chitty-Bang-Bang (1964) 
The Man with the Golden Gun (1965) 
Octopussy and The Living Daylights (1966) 
 
Biographical films

Goldeneye: The Secret Life of Ian Fleming, 1989. A television film starring Charles Dance as Fleming. The film focuses on Fleming's life during the Second World War, his love life and the writing of James Bond. 
Spymaker: The Secret Life of Ian Fleming, 1990. A television film starring Jason Connery (son of Sean) as Fleming. 
Ian Fleming: Bondmaker, 2005. A television drama-documentary, first broadcast on BBC in on 28 August 2005. Ben Daniels portrayed Fleming. 
Ian Fleming: Where Bond Began, 2008. Television documentary about the life of Ian Fleming, broadcast 19 October 2008 by the BBC. Presented by former Bond girl, Joanna Lumley. 
The film Age of Heroes is based on the exploits of 30 Commando; James D'Arcy played Fleming. 


See also

Outline of James Bond


Notes and references
Notes References 
Bibliography
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
External links 

Ian Fleming Official website of Ian Fleming & Ian Fleming Publications Limited.
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
  
 
DEFAULTSORT





















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Oliver Goldsmith
 
 
 Oliver Goldsmith (10 November 1730 – 4 April 1774) was an Anglo-Irish writer and poet, who is best known for his novel The Vicar of Wakefield (1766), his pastoral poem The Deserted Village (1770), and his plays The Good-Natur'd Man (1768) and She Stoops to Conquer (1771, first performed in 1773). He also wrote An History of the Earth and Animated Nature. He is thought to have written the classic children's tale The History of Little Goody Two-Shoes, the source of the phrase "goody two-shoes".
BiographyGoldsmith's birth date and year are not known with certainty. According to the Library of Congress authority file, he told a biographer that he was born on 10 November 1728.
The location of his birthplace is also uncertain.  He was born either in the townland of Pallas, near Ballymahon, County Longford, Ireland, where his father was the Anglican curate of the parish of Forgney, or at the residence of his maternal grandparents, at the Smith Hill House in the diocese of Elphin, County Roscommon where his grandfather Oliver Jones was a clergyman and master of the Elphin diocesan school. When he was two years old, Goldsmith's father was appointed the rector of the parish of "Kilkenny West" in County Westmeath. The family moved to the parsonage at Lissoy, between Athlone and Ballymahon, and continued to live there until his father's death in 1747.In 1744 Goldsmith went up to Trinity College, Dublin. His tutor was Theaker Wilder. Neglecting his studies in theology and law, he fell to the bottom of his class. He was graduated in 1749 as a Bachelor of Arts, but without the discipline or distinction that might have gained him entry to a profession in the church or the law; his education seemed to have given him mainly a taste for fine clothes, playing cards, singing Irish airs and playing the flute. He lived for a short time with his mother, tried various professions without success, studied medicine desultorily at the University of Edinburgh and the University of Leiden, and set out on a walking tour of Flanders, France, Switzerland and Northern Italy, living by his wits (busking with his flute).
 
He settled in London in 1756, where he briefly held various jobs, including an apothecary's assistant and an usher of a school. Perennially in debt and addicted to gambling, Goldsmith produced a massive output as a hack writer for the publishers of London, but his few painstaking works earned him the company of Samuel Johnson, with whom he was a founding member of "The Club". The combination of his literary work and his dissolute lifestyle led Horace Walpole to give him the epithet inspired idiot. During this period he used the pseudonym "James Willington" (the name of a fellow student at Trinity) to publish his 1758 translation of the autobiography of the Huguenot Jean Marteilhe.Goldsmith was described by contemporaries as prone to envy, a congenial but impetuous and disorganised personality who once planned to emigrate to America but failed because he missed his ship.His premature death in 1774 may have been partly due to his own misdiagnosis of his kidney infection. Goldsmith was buried in Temple Church. The inscription reads; "HERE LIES/OLIVER GOLDSMITH". There is a monument to him in the center of Ballymahon, also in Westminster Abbey with an epitaph written by Samuel Johnson. 
WorksSee The Vicar of Wakefield, The Good-Natur'd Man, and She Stoops to Conquer.
The Citizen of the WorldIn 1760 Goldsmith began to publish a series of letters in the Public Ledger under the title The Citizen of the World.  Purportedly written by a Chinese traveler in England named Lien Chi, they used this fictional outsider's perspective to comment ironically and at times moralistically on British society and manners.  It was inspired by the earlier essay series Persian Letters by Charles de Secondat, Baron de Montesquieu.
The HermitGoldsmith wrote this romantic ballad of precisely 160 lines in 1765. The hero and heroine are Edwin, a youth without wealth or power, and Angelina, the daughter of a lord "beside the Tyne." Angelina spurns many wooers, but refuses to make plain her love for young Edwin. "Quite dejected with my scorn," Edwin disappears and becomes a hermit. One day, Angelina turns up at his cell in boy's clothes and, not recognizing him, tells him her story. Edwin then reveals his true identity, and the lovers never part again. The poem is notable for its interesting portrayal of a hermit, who is fond of the natural world and his wilderness solitude but maintains a gentle, sympathetic demeanor toward other people. In keeping with eremitical tradition, however, Edwin the Hermit claims to "spurn the [opposite] sex." This poem appears under the title of "A Ballad" sung by the character of Mr. Burchell in Chapter 8 of Goldsmith's novel, The Vicar of Wakefield.
The Deserted VillageIn the 1760s Goldsmith witnessed the demolition of an ancient village and destruction of its farms to clear land to become a wealthy man's garden. Rowley, 1978, page 132  His poem The Deserted Village, published in 1770, expresses a fear that the destruction of villages and the conversion of land from productive agriculture to ornamental landscape gardens would ruin the peasantry. The Deserted Village gave the demolished village the pseudonym "Sweet Auburn" and Goldsmith did not disclose the real village on which he based it. However, he did indicate it was about   from London and it is widely believed to have been Nuneham Courtenay in Oxfordshire, which Simon Harcourt, 1st Earl Harcourt had demolished and moved   away to make the park for his newly built Nuneham House. A single line from The Deserted Village is inscribed on the plinth of a statue of Queen Victoria and Prince Albert in Saxon Dress   The words on the plinth are 'ALLURED TO BRIGHTER WORLDS, AND LED THE WAY' from ll.163 -176 of the poem: 

'...Thus to relieve the wretched was his pride, / And e'en his failings lean'd to Virtue's side; / But in his duty prompt at every call, / He watch'd and wept, he pray'd and felt, for all. / And, as a bird each fond endearment tries / To tempt its new-fledg'd offspring to the skies, / He tried each art, reprov'd each dull delay, / ALLURED TO BRIGHTER WORLDS, AND LED THE WAY.' (caps. added, as in the inscription).

In Ireland the village described in the poem is thought to be Glasson village, nr Athlone. Signage around the village points out the association with Oliver Goldsmith. The village is also described as the "village of the roses" since in the poem Glasson appears as Sweet Auburn which locally means 'Roses'. Glasson was famous  in the 1800s for its rose bloom and the local landlord, Robert Temple is said to have walked the village giving prizes for the best presented houses.In popular culture, the poem's first line "Sweet Auburn, Loveliest village of the plain" is the basis for the term "Auburn Plainsman/Plainsmen" which is used to refer to an Auburn University student and is also the source for the name of the University student Newspaper, The Auburn Plainsman.
Other worksThe ironic poem, An Elegy on the Death of a Mad Dog was published in 1766.Goldsmith is also thought to have written the classic children's tale The History of Little Goody Two-Shoes.
Memorials concerning Oliver Goldsmith
Goldsmith lived in Kingsbury, now in London between 1771–1774 and the Oliver Goldsmith Primary School and Goldsmith Lane there are named after him.In the play Marx In Soho by Howard Zinn, Marx makes a reference to Goldsmiths' poem, The Deserted Village. A statue of him by JH Foley stands at the Front Arch of Trinity College, Dublin (see image).His name has been given to a new lecture theatre and student accommodation on the Trinity College campus: Goldsmith Hall.Somerset Maugham used the last line from An Elegy On The Death Of A Mad Dog in his novel The Painted Veil (1925). The character Walter Fane's last words are The dog it was that died.Auburn, Alabama, and Auburn University were named for the first line in Goldsmith's poem: "Sweet Auburn, loveliest village of the plain." Auburn is still referred to as the 'loveliest village on the plain.'There is a statue in Ballymahon County Longford.London Underground locomotive number 16 (used on the Metropolitan line of the London Underground until 1962) was named Oliver Goldsmith. Longford based band Goldsmith are named after the famous writer.Athlone Institute of Technology library is named the Goldsmith Library
Notes 
References

Austin Dobson, Henry (Editor) The Complete Poetical Works of Oliver Goldsmith, ISBN 1-58827-277-X
Campbell, Gordon (ed.), Oliver Goldsmith (Everyman's Poetry Series), ISBN 0-460-87827-1
Connellan, J.A., Oliver Goldsmith of Elphin, Published for the Goldsmith Society (1935)
Forster, John, The life and times of Oliver Goldsmith, Published by: Ward, Lock and Co (London, New York, 1848)
Goldsmith, Oliver, The Vicar of Wakefield, ISBN 0-19-283940-3
Goldsmith, Oliver, She Stoops to Conquer, ISBN 0-486-26867-5
Irving, Washington, Life of Oliver Goldsmith, ISBN 1-58963-236-2
Prior, James, Life of Goldsmith, two volumes (London: John Murray, 1837) at Google Books
Rousseau, George (1974), Goldsmith: The Critical Heritage (London: Routledge and Kegan Paul, 1974). ISBN 0-7100-7720-3
 


External links 
 
 

 
Essays by Oliver Goldsmith at Quotidiana.org
The Deserted Village
UNCG American Publishers' Trade Bindings: The Deserted Village
Oliver Goldsmith: A Biography by Washington Irving from Project Gutenberg
Goldsmith (English Men of Letters series) by William Black  from Project Gutenberg
An Essay on the Theatre; or, A Comparison Between Laughing and Sentimental Comedy
Goldsmith Hall – student accommodation and lecture theatre, Trinity College, Dublin.
Information on Goldsmith
Oliver Goldsmith Resource
Works by Oliver Goldsmith in e-book version
The Goldsmith International Literary Festival Info on the Festival held annually in Goldsmith's Home County
Poems and essays, Oliver Goldsmith, 1839, (William Smith, London)
 

 
 
DEFAULTSORT














 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	W. C. Handy
 
 
William Christopher Handy (November 16, 1873 – March 28, 1958) was a blues composer and musician.  He was widely known as the "Father of the Blues".Handy remains among the most influential of American songwriters. Though he was one of many musicians who played the distinctively American form of music known as the blues, he is credited with giving it its contemporary form. While Handy was not the first to publish music in the blues form, he took the blues from a regional music style with a limited audience to one of the dominant national forces in American music.Handy was an educated musician who used folk material in his compositions.  He was scrupulous in documenting the sources of his works, which frequently combined stylistic influences from several performers.  He loved this folk musical form and brought his own transforming touch to it.
Early life
Handy was born in Florence, Alabama.  His father was the pastor of a small church in Guntersville, another small town in northeast central Alabama. Handy wrote in his 1941 autobiography, Father of the Blues, that he was born in the log cabin built by his grandfather William Wise Handy, who became an African Methodist Episcopal (AME) minister after emancipation. The log cabin of Handy's birth has been saved and preserved in downtown Florence.Growing up he apprenticed in carpentry, shoemaking and plastering.  Handy was a deeply religious man, whose influences in his musical style were found in the church music he sang and played as a youth, and in the natural world. He later cited the sounds of nature, such as "whippoorwills, bats and hoot owls and their outlandish noises", the sounds of Cypress Creek washing on the fringes of the woodland, and "the music of every songbird and all the symphonies of their unpremeditated art" as inspiration.    Handy's father believed that musical instruments were tools of the devil.   Without his parents permission, Handy bought his first guitar, which he had seen in a local shop window and secretly saved for by picking berries, nuts and making lye soap.  Upon seeing the guitar, his father asked him, "What possessed you to bring a sinful thing like that into our Christian home?"  Ordering Handy to "Take it back where it came from", his father quickly enrolled him in organ lessons. Handy's days as an organ student were short lived, and he moved on to learn the cornet.  Handy joined a local band as a teenager, but he kept this fact a secret from his parents. He purchased a cornet from a fellow band member and spent every free minute practicing it.
Musical developmentHe worked on a "shovel brigade" at the McNabb furnace, and described the music made by the workers as they beat shovels, altering the tone while thrusting and withdrawing the metal part against the iron buggies to pass the time while waiting for the overfilled furnace to digest its ore. "With a dozen men participating, the effect was sometimes remarkable...It was better to us than the music of a martial drum corps, and our rhythms were far more complicated."  He wrote, "Southern Negroes sang about everything...They accompany themselves on anything from which they can extract a musical sound or rhythmical effect..." He would later reflect that, "In this way, and from these materials, they set the mood for what we now call blues". Handy, Father (1941), p. 74  In September 1892, Handy traveled to Birmingham to take a teaching exam, which he passed easily, and gained a teaching job in the city.  Learning that it paid poorly, he  quit the position and found industrial work at a pipe works plant in nearby Bessemer.During his off-time, he organized a small string orchestra and taught musicians how to read notes. Later, Handy organized the Lauzetta Quartet. When the group read about the upcoming World's Fair in Chicago, they decided to attend. To pay their way, group members performed at odd jobs along the way.  They arrived in Chicago only to learn that the World's Fair had been postponed for a year. Next they headed to St. Louis but found working conditions very bad.  After the quartet disbanded, Handy went to Evansville, Indiana, where he helped introduce the blues. He played cornet in the Chicago World's Fair in 1893.  In Evansville, Handy joined a successful band that performed throughout the neighboring cities and states. His musical endeavors were varied: he sang first tenor in a minstrel show, worked as a band director, choral director, cornetist and trumpeter. At age 23, Handy became band master of Mahara's Colored Minstrels.  In their three-year tour, they traveled to Chicago, throughout Texas and Oklahoma, through Tennessee, Georgia and Florida, and on to Cuba.  Handy earned a salary of $6 per week. Returning from Cuba, the band traveled north through Alabama, and stopped to perform in Huntsville. Weary of life on the road, he and his wife Elizabeth decided to stay with relatives in his nearby hometown of Florence.
Marriage and familyIn 1896 while performing at a barbecue in Henderson, Kentucky, Handy met Elizabeth Price.  They married shortly afterward on July 19, 1896. She had Lucille, the first of their six children, on June 29, 1900 after they had settled in Florence, Alabama, his hometown. Henderson's W.C. Handy Blues & Barbecue Festival is held annually in June.
Teaching music
Around that time, William Hooper Councill, President of Alabama Agricultural and Mechanical College for Negroes (AAMC) (today named Alabama Agricultural and Mechanical University) in Normal, Alabama, recruited Handy to teach music at the college. Handy became a faculty member in September 1900 and taught through much of 1902. His enthusiasm for the distinctive style of uniquely American music, then often considered inferior to European classical music, was part of his development. He was disheartened to discover that the college emphasized teaching European music considered to be "classical". Handy felt he was underpaid and could make more money touring with a minstrel group.
Studying the bluesIn 1902 Handy traveled throughout Mississippi, where he listened to the various black popular musical styles. The state was mostly rural, and music was part of the culture, especially of the Mississippi Delta cotton plantation areas. Musicians usually played the guitar, banjo and to a much lesser extent, the piano.  Handy's remarkable memory enabled him to recall and transcribe the music heard in his travels. After a dispute with AAMC President Councill, Handy resigned his teaching position to rejoin the Mahara Minstrels and tour the Midwest and Pacific Northwest. In 1903 he became the director of a black band organized by the Knights of Pythias, located in Clarksdale, Mississippi. Handy and his family lived there for six years.  In 1903 while waiting for a train in Tutwiler in the Mississippi Delta, Handy had the following experience: 
 "A lean loose-jointed Negro had commenced plunking a guitar beside me while I slept... As he played, he pressed a knife on the strings of the guitar in a manner popularized by Hawaiian guitarists who used steel bars....The singer repeated the line three times, accompanying himself on the guitar with the weirdest music I had ever heard."   About 1905 while playing a dance in Cleveland, Mississippi, Handy was given a note asking for “our native music”.  He played an old-time Southern melody, but was asked if a local colored band could play a few numbers. Three young men with a battered guitar, mandolin, and a worn-out bass took the stage. W. C. Handy, Arna Wendell Bontemps, Father of the Blues: An Autobiography,  Da Capo Press, 1991, pp. 76,77 
 
 “They struck up one of those over and over strains that seem to have no beginning and certainly no ending at all. The strumming attained a disturbing monotony, but on and on it went, a kind of stuff associated with [sugar] cane rows and levee camps. Thump-thump-thump went their feet on the floor. It was not really annoying or unpleasant. Perhaps “haunting” is the better word.”   Handy noted square dancing by Mississippi blacks with "one of their own calling the figures, and crooning all of his calls in the key of G."  He remembered this when deciding on the key for "St Louis Blues".
 "It was the memory of that old gent who called figures for the Kentucky breakdown—the one who everlastingly pitched his tones in the key of G and moaned the calls like a presiding elder preaching at a revival meeting. Ah, there was my key – I'd do the song in G."   In describing "blind singers and footloose bards" around Clarksdale, Handy wrote, "[S]urrounded by crowds of country folks, they would pour their hearts out in song ... They earned their living by selling their own songs – "ballets," as they called them—and I'm ready to say in their behalf that seldom did their creations lack imagination." 
Transition: popularity, fame and businessIn 1909 Handy and his band moved to Memphis, Tennessee, where they started playing at clubs on Beale Street. The genesis of his "Memphis Blues" was as a campaign tune written for Edward Crump, a successful Memphis mayoral candidate in 1909 (and future "boss"). Handy later rewrote the tune and changed its name from "Mr. Crump" to "Memphis Blues." 
The 1912 publication of his "Memphis Blues" sheet music introduced his style of 12-bar blues; it was credited as the inspiration for the foxtrot dance step by Vernon and Irene Castle, a New York–based dance team. Some consider it to be the first blues song. Handy sold the rights to the song for US$100.  By 1914, when Handy was 40, he had established his musical style, his popularity increased significantly, and he composed prolifically. Handy wrote about using folk songs: 
 "The primitive southern Negro, as he sang, was sure to bear down on the third and seventh tone of the scale, slurring between major and minor. Whether in the cotton field of the Delta or on the Levee up St. Louis way, it was always the same. Till then, however, I had never heard this slur used by a more sophisticated Negro, or by any white man. I tried to convey this effect... by introducing flat thirds and sevenths (now called blue notes) into my song, although its prevailing key was major..., and I carried this device into my melody as well... This was a distinct departure, but as it turned out, it touched the spot." Handy, Father (1941), p. 99   
 "The three-line structure I employed in my lyric was suggested by a song I heard Phil Jones sing in Evansville ... While I took the three-line stanza as a model for my lyric, I found its repetition too monotonous ... Consequently I adopted the style of making a statement, repeating the statement in the second line, and then telling in the third line why the statement was made."    Regarding the "three-chord basic harmonic structure" of the blues, Handy wrote the "(tonic, subdominant, dominant seventh) was that already used by Negro roustabouts, honky-tonk piano players, wanderers and others of the underprivileged but undaunted class".   He noted,  "In the folk blues the singer fills up occasional gaps with words like 'Oh, lawdy' or 'Oh, baby' and the like. This meant that in writing a melody to be sung in the blues manner one would have to provide gaps or waits."  Writing about the first time "St Louis Blues" was played (1914), Handy said, 
 "The one-step and other dances had been done to the tempo of Memphis Blues ... When St Louis Blues was written the tango was in vogue. I tricked the dancers by arranging a tango introduction, breaking abruptly into a low-down blues. My eyes swept the floor anxiously, then suddenly I saw lightning strike. The dancers seemed electrified. Something within them came suddenly to life. An instinct that wanted so much to live, to fling its arms to spread joy, took them by the heels."  His published musical works were groundbreaking because of his ethnicity, and he was among the first blacks to achieve economic success because of publishing. In 1912, Handy met Harry H. Pace at the Solvent Savings Bank in Memphis. Pace was valedictorian of his graduating class at Atlanta University and student of W. E. B. Du Bois. By the time of their meeting, Pace had already demonstrated a strong understanding of business.  He  earned his reputation by recreating failing businesses. Handy liked him, and Pace later became manager of Pace and Handy Sheet Music. 
While in New York City, Handy wrote: 
 "I was under the impression that these Negro musicians would jump at the chance to patronize one of their own publishers. They didn't... The Negro musicians simply played the hits of the day...They followed the parade. Many white bands and orchestra leaders, on the other hand, were on the alert for novelties. They were therefore the ones most ready to introduce our numbers." But, "Negro vaudeville artists...wanted songs that would not conflict with white acts on the bill. The result was that these performers became our most effective pluggers."  In 1917, he and his publishing business moved to New York City, where he had offices in the Gaiety Theatre office building in Times Square. Ken Bloom, Broadway: An Encyclopedia, Routledge; 2nd edition (2003) ISBN 0-415-93704-3  By the end of that year, his most successful songs: "Memphis Blues", "Beale Street Blues", and "Saint Louis Blues", had been published.  That year the Original Dixieland Jazz Band, a white New Orleans jazz ensemble, had recorded the first jazz record, introducing the style to a wide segment of the American public. Handy initially had little fondness for this new "jazz", but bands dove into his repertoire with enthusiasm, making many of them jazz standards.Handy encouraged performers such as Al Bernard, "a young white man" with a "soft Southern accent" who "could sing all my Blues". Handy sent Bernard to Thomas Edison to be recorded, which resulted in "an impressive series of successes for the young artist, successes in which we proudly shared." Handy also published the original "Shake Rattle and Roll" and "Saxophone Blues", both written by Bernard. "Two young white ladies from Selma, Alabama (Madelyn Sheppard and Annelu Burns) contributed the songs "Pickaninny Rose" and "O Saroo", with the music published by Handy's company. These numbers, plus our blues, gave us a reputation as publishers of Negro music."  

Expecting to make only "another hundred or so" on a third recording of his "Yellow Dog Blues" (originally titled "Yellow Dog Rag" 
), Handy signed a deal with the Victor company. The Joe Smith   recording of this song in 1919 became the best-selling recording of Handy's music to date. 
 Handy tried to interest black women singers in his music, but initially was unsuccessful. In 1920 Perry Bradford persuaded Mamie Smith to record two of his non-blues songs, published by Handy, accompanied by a white band: "That Thing Called Love" and "You Can't Keep a Good Man Down". When Bradford's "Crazy Blues" became a hit as recorded by Smith, African-American blues singers became increasingly popular. Handy found his business began to decrease because of the competition. In 1920 Pace amicably dissolved his long-standing partnership with Handy, with whom he also collaborated as lyricist. As Handy wrote: "To add to my woes, my partner withdrew from the business. He disagreed with some of my business methods, but no harsh words were involved. He simply chose this time to sever connection with our firm in order that he might organize Pace Phonograph Company, issuing Black Swan Records and making a serious bid for the Negro market. . . . With Pace went a large number of our employees. . . . Still more confusion and anguish grew out of the fact that people did not generally know that I had no stake in the Black Swan Record Company." Although Handy's partnership with Pace was dissolved, he continued to operate the publishing company as a family-owned business.  He published works of other black composers as well as his own, which included more than 150 sacred compositions and folk song arrangements and about 60 blues compositions.  In the 1920s, he founded the Handy Record Company in New York City. Bessie Smith's January 14, 1925, Columbia Records recording of "Saint Louis Blues" with Louis Armstrong is considered by many to be one of the finest recordings of the 1920s.  So successful was Handy's "Saint Louis Blues" that in 1929, he and director Kenneth W. Adams collaborated on a RCA motion picture project of the same name, which was to be shown before the main attraction. Handy suggested blues singer Bessie Smith have the starring role, since she had gained widespread popularity with that tune. The picture was shot in June and was shown in movie houses throughout the United States from 1929 to 1932. In 1926 Handy authored and edited a work entitled Blues: An Anthology—Complete Words and Music of 53 Great Songs.  It is probably the first work that attempted to record, analyze and describe the blues as an integral part of the U.S. South and the history of the United States. The genre of the blues was a hallmark of American society and culture in the 1920s and 1930s. So great was its influence, and so much was it recognized as Handy's hallmark, that author F. Scott Fitzgerald wrote in his novel The Great Gatsby that "All night the saxophones wailed the hopeless comment of the "Beale Street Blues" while a hundred pairs of golden and silver slippers shuffled the shining dust. At the gray tea hour there were always rooms that throbbed incessantly with this low, sweet fever, while fresh faces drifted here and there like rose petals blown by the sad horns around the floor."
Later life
 Following publication of his autobiography, Handy published a book on African-American musicians entitled Unsung Americans Sing (1944).  He wrote a total of five books:

Blues: An Anthology: Complete Words and Music of 53 Great Songs
Book of Negro Spirituals
Father of the Blues: An Autobiography
Unsung Americans Sing
Negro Authors and Composers of the United States

During this time, he lived on Strivers' Row in Harlem.  He became blind following an accidental fall from a subway platform in 1943.  After the death of his first wife, he remarried in 1954, when he was eighty. His new bride was his secretary, the former Irma Louise Logan, whom he frequently said had become his eyes.In 1955, Handy suffered a stroke, following which he began to use a wheelchair. More than eight hundred attended his 84th birthday party at the Waldorf-Astoria Hotel.  
On March 28, 1958 he died of bronchial pneumonia at Sydenham Hospital in New York City.  Over 25,000 people attended his funeral in Harlem's Abyssinian Baptist Church. Over 150,000 people gathered in the streets near the church to pay their respects.  He was buried in the Woodlawn Cemetery in Bronx, New York.
CompositionsHandy's songs do not always follow the classic 12-bar pattern, often having 8- or 16-bar bridges between 12-bar verses. 

"Memphis Blues", written 1909, published 1912. Although usually subtitled "Boss Crump", it is a distinct song from Handy's campaign satire, "Boss Crump don't 'low no easy riders around here", which was based on the good-time song "Mamma Don't Allow It."
"Yellow Dog Blues" (1912), "Your easy rider's gone where the Southern cross the Yellow Dog."  The reference is to the crossing at Moorhead, Mississippi, of the Southern Railway and the local Yazoo and Mississippi Valley Railroad, called the Yellow Dog. By Handy's telling locals assigned the words "Yellow Dog" to the letters Y.D.(for Yazoo Delta) on the freight trains that they saw. Father of the Blues: An Autobiography
By W. C. Handy, Arna Wendell Bontemps
Contributor Abbe Niles
Published by Da Capo Press, 1991
page 267.
ISBN 0-306-80421-2, ISBN 978-0-306-80421-2
 

"Saint Louis Blues" (1914), "the jazzman's Hamlet."
"Loveless Love", based in part on the classic, "Careless Love".  Possibly the first song to complain of modern synthetics, "with milkless milk and silkless silk, we're growing used to soulless soul."
"Aunt Hagar's Blues", the biblical Hagar, handmaiden to Abraham and Sarah, was considered the "mother" of the African Americans.
"Beale Street Blues" (1916), written as a farewell to the old Beale Street of Memphis (actually called Beale Avenue until the song changed the name); but Beale Street did not go away and is considered the "home of the blues" to this day. B.B. King was known as the "Beale Street Blues Boy" and Elvis Presley watched and learned from Ike Turner there.
"Long Gone John (From Bowling Green)", tribute to a famous bank robber.
"Chantez-Les-Bas (Sing 'Em Low)", tribute to the Creole culture of New Orleans.
"Atlanta Blues", includes the song known as "Make Me a Pallet on your Floor" as its chorus.
"Ole Miss Rag" (1917), a ragtime composition, recorded by Handy's Orchestra of Memphis. 


Performances and honors
 

On April 27, 1928, he performed a program of jazz, blues, plantation songs, work songs, piano solos, spirituals and a Negro rhapsody in Carnegie Hall.
In 1938 he performed at the National Folk Festival in Washington, DC, his first national performance on a desegregated stage.
He performed at the Chicago World's Fair in 1933 and 1934 and the New York World's Fair in 1939 and 1940.
In 1940, NBC broadcast an all-Handy program as part of its weekly series The Chamber Music Society of Lower Basin Street. His songs were performed by Dinah Shore and by the composer himself.
Louis Armstrong Plays W.C. Handy (1954)
He is referenced in Prof. Harold Hill's lead-in to the song Seventy-Six Trombones in Meredith Willson's 1957 musical The Music Man.
In 1958, a movie about his life - appropriately entitled St. Louis Blues - was released starring legendary African-American musicians Nat "King" Cole (in the main role), Pearl Bailey, Mahalia Jackson, Cab Calloway, Ella Fitzgerald, and Eartha Kitt. It was released the year of Handy's death.


On May 17, 1969, the United States Postal Service issued a commemorative stamp in his honor.
Inducted in the National Academy of Popular Music Songwriters Hall of Fame in 1970.
He was inducted into the Nashville Songwriters Hall of Fame in 1983.
He is referenced in Joni Mitchell's 1975 song Furry Sings the Blues.
He is referenced in Marc Cohn's 1991 song Walking in Memphis, covered by Lonestar, Cher, and other artists.     "...Touched down in the land of the Delta Blues, in the middle of the pouring rain. W.C. Handy, won't you look down over me?"
He received a Grammy Trustees Award for his lifetime achievements in 1993.
He was inducted into the Alabama Jazz Hall of Fame in 1985, and was a 1993 Inductee into the Alabama Music Hall of Fame, with the Lifework Award for Performing Achievement.
Citing 2003 as "the centennial anniversary of when W.C. Handy composed the first Blues music..." the United States Senate in 2002 passed a resolution declaring the year beginning February 1, 2003 as the "Year of the Blues."
Each November 16, Handy's birthday is celebrated with free music, birthday cake and free admission to the W.C. Handy Museum in Florence, Alabama. The hand-hewn log cabin made by his grandfather is his birthplace and museum.
An autographed 1937 photo from W.C. Handy to Anton Lada of Lada's Louisiana Orchestra sold for $850 in 2006.


Awards, festivals and memorials

The Blues Music Award, widely recognized as the most prestigious award for blues artists was known as the W. C. Handy Award until the name change in 2006.
The W. C. Handy Music Festival is held annually in Florence, Alabama and the greater Shoals area. The festival has evolved into a 10-day long celebration that includes a parade, various artists at restaurants and venues around town, and larger music events at Wilson Park in downtown Florence. The park features a statue of Handy and is close to his birthplace and museum. Previous festivals have featured jazz and blues legends including Jimmy Smith, Ramsey Lewis, Dizzy Gillespie, Bobby Blue Bland, Diane Schuur, Billy Taylor, Dianne Reeves and Charlie Byrd, Ellis Marsalis and Take 6. The festival also features a roster of annual regulars, called the W. C. Handy Jazz All-Stars. 
W. C. Handy Park is a city park located on Beale Street in Memphis, Tennessee. The park contains a life-sized bronze statue of Handy.
The W.C. Handy Blues & Barbeque Festival is a week-long musical event that features blues and Zydeco bands from across the U.S and is held every June on the banks of the Ohio River in downtown Henderson, Kentucky.


In 1979, New York City joined the list of institutions and municipalities to honor Handy by naming one block of West 52nd Street in Manhattan "W.C. Handy Place".


See also

St. Louis Blues (1958 film)


References


Father of the Blues: An Autobiography. by W.C. Handy, edited by Arna Bontemps: foreword by Abbe Niles. Da Capo paperback, New York; Macmillan, (1941) ISBN 0-306-80421-2.
 
External links 
 
 
Listen

Handy's Memphis Blues Band 1922 performance of "Saint Louis Blues": audio on redhotjazz.com
Bessie Smith sings the "Saint Louis Blues", accompanied by Louis Armstrong and Fred Longshaw, 1925: audio on redhotjazz.com


Read

W.C. Handy website at the University of North Alabama
Official Site of the Annual W.C. Handy Music Festival in Florence, Alabama
W.C. Handy's 1993 Lifework Award for Performing Achievement; Induction into the Alabama Music Hall of Fame
The Blues Foundation's W.C. Handy Blues Awards
Book excerpt on Handy by Tom Morgan
Year of the Blues Official website
 

Rare American Sheet Music Collection at Duke University, shows musical content of published sheet music
United States Library of Congress African-American Sheet Music Collection, 1850-1920 (from Brown University), a searchable database; shows copies of original works
 
Interview with W.C. Handy by folklorist
 
Sheet music for "Joe Turner Blues", Memphis: Pace & Handy, 1915. From Alabama Sheet Music Collection.
Sheet music for "Saint Louis Blues", New York: Handy Bros., 1914. From Alabama Sheet Music Collection.
Sheet music for "The Memphis Blues: A Southern Rag", New York: Theron C. Bennett Co., 1913. From Alabama Sheet Music Collection.

  
DEFAULTSORT



















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	John Mathieson (computer scientist)
 
 
John Mathieson is a Computer Science graduate who initially worked for Sinclair Research before going on to found Flare with fellow ex-Sinclair colleagues Martin Brennan and Ben Cheese.After working at Flare on the Flare 1 and its development into the Konix Multisystem, he went on to work for Atari developing the Atari Jaguar with Martin Brennan.  John moved to California and worked on the Jaguar 2 which never saw the light of day. He led the development of the ill-fated NUON media processor at VM Labs. He moved to work for NVIDIA at the end of 2001.
External links

  - List of VM Labs team with picture of John

 
DEFAULTSORT



 
	Hervé Villechaize
 
 Hervé Jean-Pierre Villechaize (April 23 1943 – September 4 1993) was a French actor who achieved worldwide recognition for his role as Mr. Roarke's assistant, Tattoo, in the television series Fantasy Island (1978–1984). He was also well known for playing the evil henchman Nick Nack in the James Bond film The Man with the Golden Gun, and was an acclaimed painter.
Early lifeVillechaize suffered from proportionate (as opposed to disproportionate) dwarfism likely due to an endocrine disorder, despite his surgeon father's attempts to cure the disease in several institutions. In later years, he insisted on being called a midget, rather than "little person".Villechaize was born in Paris to English-born Evelyn (Recchionni) and raised there by her and his stepfather André Villechaize, a French surgeon who adopted him. He also had Filipino ancestry.  Villechaize was bullied at school for his condition and found solace in painting. After studying art at Beaux-Arts college, he left for the USA in 1964. He settled in a Bohemian section in New York, taught himself English by watching television, and continued his career as an artist, painter and photographer. He began acting in Off Broadway productions, including The Young Master Dante by Werner Liepolt and a play by Sam Shepard, and also did some photo shoot modeling for National Lampoon, before moving on to film.
CareerHis first movie appearance was in Chappaqua in 1966, which was followed by several films including Christopher Speeth's and Werner Liepolt's Malatesta's Carnival of Blood,  Crazy Joe, Oliver Stone's first film, Seizure, The Gang That Couldn't Shoot Straight, and 1982's The Forbidden Zone. He was asked to play a part in the film Dune, which had originally begun pre-production in 1971; however, the project was cancelled. His big break was getting cast in The Man with the Golden Gun in 1974, by which time he had become so poor he was living out of his car in Los Angeles. Prior to being signed up by Bond producer Albert R. Broccoli, he made ends meet by working as a rat catcher's assistant near his South Central home. From what his co-actor Christopher Lee saw, The Man with the Golden Gun filming was possibly the happiest time of Hervé's life: Lee likened it to honey in the sandwich between an insecure past and an uncertain future. In addition to being an actor, Villechaize became an active member of a movement in 1970s and 1980s California to deal with child abuse and neglect, often going to crime scenes himself to help comfort abuse victims. Villechaize's former co-workers recalled that despite his stature, he would often confront and chastise espousal and child abusers when he arrived at crime scenes. In the 1970s, on Sesame Street, Villechaize performed Oscar the Grouch as a pair of legs peeping out from a trash can, for scenes which required the Grouch to be mobile. These appearances began in the second season and included the 1978 Hawaii episodes. Though popular with the public, Villechaize proved a difficult actor on Fantasy Island, where he continually propositioned women and quarrelled with the producers. He was eventually fired after demanding a salary on par with that of co-star Ricardo Montalbán. The show's popularity waned after this move, and it was soon cancelled. He starred in the 1980 cult classic movie Forbidden Zone.  He also appeared as himself, parodying his Fantasy Island role, in Airplane II: The Sequel and episodes of Diff'rent Strokes and Taxi.In the eighties, he became largely popular in Spain due to his impersonations of the former Prime Minister of the Government, Felipe González, in the TV show Viaje con nosotros ("Travel with us") with showman Javier Gurruchaga.He made his final appearance in a cameo as himself in an episode of The Ben Stiller Show.
Personal life and deathAs a consequence of his health problems and troubles in his professional career, Villechaize began to abuse alcohol and suffered from clinical depression in the last few years of his life, which led to erratic and sometimes violent behavior, including an incident in which he allegedly held his agent at gunpoint in a booth at a restaurant in Los Angeles. In the early morning hours of September 4, 1993, Villechaize shot himself at his home. He was found by his longtime girlfriend, Kathy Self, and rushed to the Medical Center at North Hollywood, California. He died later that day as a result of his injuries. Villechaize left a suicide note saying he was despondent over longtime health problems. Ten years earlier, Haywood Nelson, star of What's Happening!!, had interviewed him about his many suicide attempts for a program entitled That Teen Show, which included messages directed at depressed and suicide-prone teenagers. Villechaize said then that he had learned to love life.  At the time of his suicide, Cartoon Network was in negotiations for him to co-star in Space Ghost Coast to Coast, which was in pre-production at the time. Villechaize would have voiced Space Ghost's sidekick on the show. 
References 
External links

 
NNDB Biography
New York Times obituary

 
 
DEFAULTSORT
















 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
	Curtly Ambrose
 
 Curtly Elconn Lynwall Ambrose (born 21 September 1963) is a former cricketer from Antigua who played 98 Test matches for the West Indies. A fast bowler, he took 405 Test wickets at an average of 20.99 and topped the ICC Player Rankings for much of his career to be rated the best bowler in the world. His great height—he was 6 feet 7 inches (2.01 m) tall—allowed him to make the ball bounce unusually high after he delivered it; allied to his pace and accuracy, it made him a difficult bowler for batsmen to face. A man of few words during his career, he was notoriously reluctant to speak to journalists. He was chosen as one of the Wisden Cricketers of the Year in 1992; after he retired he was entered into the International Cricket Council Hall of Fame and selected as one of West Indies all-time XI by a panel of experts.Born in Swetes, Antigua, Ambrose came to cricket at a relatively late age, having preferred basketball in his youth, but quickly made an impression as a fast bowler. Progressing through regional and national teams, he was first chosen for the West Indies in 1988. He was almost immediately successful and remained in the team until his retirement in 2000. On many occasions, his bowling was responsible for the West Indies winning matches which seemed lost, particularly in association with Courtney Walsh. Against Australia in 1993, he took seven wickets while conceding a single run; in 1994 he was largely responsible for bowling England out for 46 runs, taking six for 24 (six wickets for 24 runs).Ambrose's bowling method relied on accuracy and conceding few runs; several of his best performances came when he took wickets in quick succession to devastate the opposition. He was particularly successful against leading batsmen and when the team depended on him. From 1995, Ambrose was increasingly affected by injury, and several times critics claimed that he was no longer effective. However, he continued to take wickets regularly up until his retirement, although he was sometimes less effective in the early matches of a series. In his final years, the West Indies team was in decline and often relied heavily on himself and Walsh; both men often bowled with little support from the other bowlers. Following his retirement, Ambrose has pursued a career in music as the bass guitarist in a reggae band.
Early life and careerAmbrose was born in Swetes, Antigua on 21 September 1963,    the fourth of seven children born to a carpenter from the village.    The family had no background in cricket,  but his mother was a fan,    and Ambrose played in his youth, primarily as a batsman. At school, he performed well academically, particularly in mathematics and French, and became an apprentice carpenter upon leaving at the age of 17.   He briefly considered emigrating to America.    At the time, his favourite sport was basketball, although he occasionally umpired cricket matches. Ambrose was not particularly tall until he reached his late teens, when he grew several inches to reach a height of  . Around this time, his mother encouraged him to become more involved in cricket.  Success as a fast bowler in a softball cricket match persuaded Ambrose to play in some club matches at the age of 20. He quickly attracted the attention of coaches and progressed to the St John's cricket team.  Selected in the Leeward Islands competition, he took seven for 67 (seven wickets for 67 runs) for Antigua against St Kitts. Lawrence and Goble, p. 12.  He made his first-class debut for the Leeward Islands in 1985–86 and took four wickets in the game,  but failed to retain his place the following year.   A local scholarship provided funding for him to play in English club cricket for Chester Boughton Hall in the Liverpool league during 1986.   The following year, he returned to England to play for Heywood Cricket Club in the Central Lancashire League, for whom he took 115 wickets in the season; the experiences helped to improve his bowling technique. When he returned to Antigua, Ambrose was determined to regain his place in the Leeward Islands team and practised hard.  He was selected and, in the absence of leading bowlers Winston Benjamin and Eldine Baptiste with the West Indies team, became the main attacking bowler in the side.  He was no-balled for throwing in the first match, which Wisden Cricketers' Almanack later attributed to confusion caused by his attribute of flicking his wrist prior to releasing the ball to impart extra pace, and there were no subsequent doubts about the legality of his bowling action.  Retaining his place when the international bowlers returned, he took 35 wickets—including 12 in a match against Guyana, of which nine were bowled—in five matches in the competition to set a new record for most wickets in a season.   Wisden's report on the West Indian season said his performance was "dominant", although few had heard of him previously. Identifying his yorker as his most effective delivery, it noted that he "never lost his pace, his accuracy, or his thirst for wickets". 
International bowler
Debut and first yearsWhen Pakistan toured the West Indies in 1988, Ambrose played in the One Day International (ODI) series, taking the place of the recently retired Joel Garner.  Ambrose made his debut during the first match, on 12 March 1988 in Kingston, Jamaica. He took wickets with his third and ninth deliveries and ended the innings with four for 39 from 10 overs. In the second match, he took four for 35 and followed with another two wickets in the third game. West Indies won those first three matches to take the series, and Ambrose did not play in the fourth or fifth matches.  In the Test series which followed, Ambrose was less effective. In the first Test, he took two for 121 as West Indies lost at home for the first time in 10 years.  Wisden noted that his debut was "unimpressive", but that he improved in the subsequent matches.  He finished the series with seven wickets at an average of over 50 runs per wicket.  Later that year, Ambrose was chosen to tour England. After appearing in early tour games, he was chosen for the first two ODIs, taking three wickets in total, but was omitted from the third.  In the Test series, he played in all five matches to take 22 wickets at an average of 20.22; his best figures of four for 58 came in the fourth Test, in which he took seven wickets and was named man of the match.  Writing in Wisden, commentator Tony Cozier described Ambrose as "a ready-made replacement for Garner"; the amount of bounce he generated after the ball pitched "made him a constant menace". In 1988–89, West Indies took part in a ODI tournament in Sharjah. Ambrose took 8 wickets,    and was man of the match with four for 29 when West Indies defeated Pakistan in the final.  From there, West Indies entered a tour of Australia in which Ambrose was a dominant figure. The West Indies won the first three Test matches, using controversial short-pitched bowling tactics. Ambrose's height made him difficult to play as he once more made the ball bounce more than other bowlers. Writing in Wisden, John Woodcock noted: "As in England, earlier in 1988, Ambrose's bowling was a telling factor ... [His] advance compensated for something of a decline in [Malcolm] Marshall's effectiveness". Woodcock (1990), pp. 960–61.  In the first Test, he took seven wickets; in the second, he took five wickets in a Test innings for the first time with five for 72, and finished with eight in the game; and in the third, he took six wickets.    His performances earned him man of the match award in the first and third games,  and ended the series with 26 wickets at an average of 21.46. He was West Indies leading wicket-taker and headed the team bowling averages. His team won the series 3–1.  In the ODI tournament that took place during the tour, West Indies defeated Australia in the final;  Ambrose took 21 wickets in the series and twice took five wickets in an innings.  However, he was less successful later in 1989 when India toured the West Indies. Suffering from fatigue and illness,  he took just five wickets in the four-Test series at an average of 54.60.   
County cricketer and success against EnglandNorthamptonshire County Cricket Club signed Ambrose to play for the team in 1988, but owing to his commitments to the touring West Indies team that year, his debut for the county came in 1989.  He took a wicket with his first delivery for the club, but was not particularly successful in the first part of the season, although he settled down later and took 28 first-class wickets at 28.39 for Northamptonshire in nine games. Early in 1990, England toured the West Indies and played four Tests—a fifth was abandoned owing to rain. The visiting team dominated the first part of the series but West Indies eventually won 2–1. Lee (1991), pp. 967–70.  Ambrose was unfit for the first Test, which West Indies lost, and the first four ODIs, but returned to take four for 18 in a ODI organised to replace the rained-off second Test.  After a drawn third Test, West Indies won the fourth game. The home captain, Viv Richards, set England 356 to win, but after losing early wickets, the English batsmen entered the last hour of the game with five wickets still to fall.  Ambrose took the new ball and removed the last five batsmen for 18 runs in 46 deliveries,  four of them leg before wicket. He finished with figures of eight for 45, ten wickets in the match, and West Indies levelled the series with a 164-run win. Ambrose was man of the match. Lee (1991), pp. 984–85.  He took six wickets in the final match,  to finish the series with 20 wickets at 15.35, finishing top of the West Indies' averages. Ambrose, along with the other home bowlers, was described by Alan Lee in Wisden as an "awesome handful in the latter part of the series", and described his match-winning spell in the fourth Test as "unforgettable".  Ambrose's other appearances for West Indies in 1989–90 were all in ODIs, although he did take more than two wickets in any innings except in the match against England.   He also took 22 first-class wickets for the Leeward Islands,  and when he returned to England to play for Northamptonshire, took 58 first-class wickets in generally good conditions for batting to top the club's bowling averages.  In one-day cricket for the county, he took 13 wickets while conceding an average of just 2.53 runs per over.   
Leading bowler in the world
Wisden cricketer of the yearWest Indies toured Pakistan in late 1990, and Ambrose topped the team's bowling averages in a three-match series which was drawn 1–1. He took 14 wickets at 17.07,  but was overshadowed slightly by the performances of Ian Bishop.  He played the first two ODIs, but missed the third after Pakistan had already won the series, and his best figures in the Tests came in the final match when he took five for 35.  Then, when Australia toured West Indies from February 1991, Ambrose took 18 wickets in the five Tests at an average of 27.38. West Indies won the series 2–1, and Ambrose was fourth in the averages,  but Tony Cozier observed in Wisden that the whole West Indies attack was dependable. Cozier (1992), p. 1,043.  Ambrose made an impression batting as part of a West Indian lower batting order which repeatedly added crucial runs during the series. He took part in two important partnerships to help his team recover from a difficult situation,  and in the third match, he scored his only half-century in Tests.  He also took 20 wickets for Leeward Islands. West Indies' next matches were in England. The Test series was drawn 2–2 and Ambrose was the team's leading wicket-taker with 28 (averaging 20.00); he also came top of the bowling averages.  He had a particular impact on Graeme Hick, who was appearing in Test cricket for the first time, dismissing him six times in seven innings with short-pitched bowling. Accurate bowling was important in the series, played on a series of slow-paced pitches; according to Scyld Berry, writing in Wisden, "Since the 1988 tour, Ambrose had improved his control to the point where a batsman had to play almost every ball—and not with a scoring stroke, either". Berry (1992), p. 294.  Berry suggests that West Indies may have won the series had Viv Richards used a different tactical approach with Ambrose's bowling. The bowler was not fully fit in the final Test, which may have affected the outcome. Berry also describes "Ambrose's rise to the status of a giant—with the mannerism of celebrating each wicket by whirling his arms upwards, like a flock of doves taking to the air."  Ambrose twice took five wickets in an innings—his best figures were six for 52 in the first Test, when he twice took wickets with consecutive deliveries.   Ambrose was named man-of the-match in the third Test and adjudged West Indies man-of-the-series.  For his performances, Ambrose was named one of Wisden's Cricketers of the Year. The citation remarked on his consistency and stated: "Ambrose has the ability to exert a debilitating psychological influence which so often precipitates a cluster of wickets after the initial breach has been made ... Moreover, he was arguably the essential difference between the two sides in what proved to be a zestful series."  The West Indies wicket-keeper, Jeff Dujon, said: ""He is mature beyond his years, has pace, accuracy, heart and determination, plus, importantly, real pride in economical figures." 
During the 1991–92 season, West Indies played mainly one-day cricket, taking part in tournaments in Sharjah—  where Ambrose took seven wickets, including an analysis of five for 53—  and Australia,  and took part in the World Cup in Australia and New Zealand. In this tournament, Ambrose took seven wickets in seven games at an average of 33.57 and never took more than two wickets in a match. However, he was the seventh most economical bowler among those who played more than one game.  West Indies finished sixth in the qualifying table and failed to reach the semi-finals.  Ambrose returned home to play twice for the Leeward Islands in January 1992.  In April 1992, South Africa toured West Indies for the first time,  and played their first Test match for 22 years.    Ambrose played in all three ODIs, all of which were won by West Indies.  The Test match was the first time West Indies bowled under a new playing regulation which permitted only one bouncer per over; this seemed to affect the home bowlers, Dean (1993), p. 1,039–40.  but Ambrose took two for 47 from 36 overs.  South Africa began the final day of the match requiring 79 runs to win with just two batsmen out, but Ambrose and Courtney Walsh took the last eight wickets for 26 runs to bowl West Indies to a 52-run win.  On a difficult pitch for batting, the ball bounced unevenly, and both bowlers concentrated on accuracy.  Ambrose took six for 34 in the second innings, and was named joint man of the match; in just over 60 overs, he took eight for 81 in the match.  However, returning to play for Northamptonshire, he was less effective. Hampered by a knee injury, which necessitated surgery after the English season, and suffering from many dropped catches, he took 50 first-class wickets at an average of 26.14, but his performance compared unfavourably with other bowlers on the team. He was more effective in the NatWest Trophy, a one-day competition that Northamptonshire won that season, in which he conceded fewer than two runs per over across five games. 
Second tour of AustraliaThe West Indies toured Australia in 1992–93, recovering from losing the second Test to win the final two matches and take the series 2–1. The team also won the the annual World Series Cup. In the first three Tests, Ambrose was hampered by pitches which did not suit his bowling and was often unlucky when he bowled, Cozier (1994), pp. 1,044–47.  although he took five for 66 in the first Test.  In the final two matches, he took 19 wickets.  In the fourth match he took ten wickets, including six for 74 in the first innings; in the second innings, he took three wickets in 19 deliveries as West Indies won the match by one run. According to Wisden, the captains of both teams, Richie Richardson and Allan Border, "paid tribute to the man who made the result possible: Ambrose consolidated his reputation as the world's leading bowler".  Then on the first day of the decisive final Test, Ambrose took seven wickets at the cost of one run from 32 deliveries and finished with figures of seven for 25. Wisden described it as "one of Test cricket's most devastating spells". Cozier (1994), pp. 1,059–60.  West Indies won by an innings and Ambrose was named man of the series,  having taken 33 wickets to equal the record in a Australia-West Indies Test series. He topped the West Indies bowling averages with an average of 16.42.  In Wisden, Tony Cozier described Ambrose's performance as "instrumental in winning [the series]" and his bowling as "flawless".  In the one-day tournament, Ambrose took 18 wickets at 13.38.  He took eight wickets in the two-match final—both games were won by the West Indies.  In the first final, he took five for 32, driven to bowl with more hostility when the Australian batsman Dean Jones asked him to remove his white wristbands while bowling. He followed up with three for 26 in the second match to be named player of the finals.  He took a further seven wickets in a ODI tournament in South Africa, and three ODI wickets in a drawn home series against Pakistan.   In the Test series, won 2–0 by West Indies, Ambrose took nine wickets at 23.11 to be fifth in the team bowling averages. The Wisden report suggested that he was suffering from fatigue after his team's busy schedule, but although not at his best, Ambrose continued to take important wickets.    For Northamptonshire in 1993, Ambrose was second in the team first-class bowling averages with 59 wickets at 20.45. Having developed a slower ball, and using the yorker more sparingly,    Ambrose took five wickets in three games as West Indies won a ODI tournament in Sharjah in late October and November 1993.   The team competed in another tournament, this time in India, later that November. They finished as runners-up, and Ambrose took four wickets in five matches.   Immediately following this, West Indies toured Sri Lanka to play three ODIs and a Test, a rain-ruined match in which Ambrose took three wickets. 
More success against England
When he returned to the West Indies, Ambrose took 19 first-class wickets for the Leeward Islands at an average of 11.68,  in his first appearances for the islands in two years,  but as England arrived to tour West Indies, he complained of fatigue and there were rumours that he planned to retire.    But he played in three times in the five-match ODI series to take two wickets, and took a further two wickets in the first Test, which West Indies won.  Lee (1995), pp. 995–1,001.  In Wisden, Alan Lee described his performances at this time as "lethargic",  and in the Guardian, Paul Allott wrote that he bowled "like a shadow" owing to the effects of continuous cricket.  England made a good start to the second Test, and Ambrose was again ineffective, but he recovered later in the innings,  and ended the match with eight wickets;  according to Lee, he "struck the critical blows of the match in the first innings.  In the third Test, played in Trinidad, he took five for 60 in England's first innings, but after the visiting team built a substantial lead, West Indies were bowled out to leave England a target of 194 to win. With an hour left on the fourth evening for England to bat, Ambrose took six wickets to leave England 40 for eight at the close of play; the next morning, they were bowled out for 46 and Ambrose had figures of six for 24 in the innings and match figures of 11 for 84. Lee (1995), pp. 1,005–06.  Ambrose was named man of the match. Lee described the collapse as "staggering", and judged Ambrose bowling to be "of the highest calibre". He continued: "He delivered one of the most devastating spells of even his career."  Allott called it "the definitive spell of fast bowling".  Ambrose took four wickets in the fourth Test, but West Indies lost the match, their first defeat in Barbados for 59 years, and Ambrose was fined £1,000 by the match referee for knocking down his stumps in frustration when he was the last man out.  He took one more wicket in the drawn final Test to finish the series with 26 wickets and top the West Indian bowling averages.   Writing in Wisden, Lee summarised Ambrose's performances: "Ambrose was magnificent. He was deservedly named man of the series, not only for taking 26 wickets at an average of 19.96 apiece and winning the Trinidad Test single-handed, but for the more profound truth that West Indies now look to him whenever they need wickets ... [He] carried the attack alone". Ambrose returned to play for Northamptonshire in 1994, but arrived later than scheduled. Claiming that he needed a rest,    he missed his scheduled flight and arrived four days late.    His absence may have contributed to Northamptonshire's elimination in the preliminary round of the Benson and Hedges Cup.  At the time, members of the county were unhappy with the level of Ambrose's performances for the team;  the committee fined him, and he expressed contrition.  During the remainder of the season, he bowled extremely effectively to take 77 first-class wickets, the most for the club in 18 years, at an average of 14.45 to top the national bowling averages. According to Andrew Radd in Wisden, the club were mollified by his success, but he wrote: "Rarely in Northamptonshire's history have the performances and the personality of one cricketer dominated a season to the extent that Curtly Ambrose did in 1994."  Ambrose missed the final match of the season with a shoulder problem. 
Apparent decline
Shoulder injuryAmbrose's shoulder injury, caused by his bowling workload,    caused him to miss the West Indies' tour of India in the last three months of 1994.  Although he returned to join the tour of New Zealand in early 1995, he did not reach his full bowling pace; he took one wicket in the ODI series and five in the two Test matches.   He remained in the team when Australia toured the Caribbean later in 1995; the West Indies lost the Test series 2–1, their first defeat in a Test series since 1980.  After taking two wickets in four ODIs,  Ambrose took 13 wickets at 19.84 in the four-Test series to lead the West Indian averages.  He took nine of these wickets in Trinidad during the third Test, when West Indies levelled the series having lost the first Test (the second was drawn).  Bowling on a pitch that was extremely difficult for batting, and which both teams considered to be unsatisfactory, Ambrose took nine for 65 in the match and was named man of the match. During the game, Ambrose had to be pulled away from a verbal confrontation with Steve Waugh by the captain, Richardson.  But outside of this match, the Australian team judged his bowling to have declined in pace following his shoulder injury, and that he lacked the variety to adapt to a different role.  The West Indies' cricket manager, former Test bowler Andy Roberts, publicly claimed during the series that several of his team possessed "attitude problems", and complained that the fast bowlers would not follow his advice. During the tour of England which followed, Ambrose did not take a wicket in the three-match ODI series; according to journalist Simon Barnes, both Ambrose and the team lacked confidence following their defeat by Australia; he lacked rhythm and displayed signs of frustration and unhappiness.  He was more effective in the Test series, and according to Tony Cozier in Wisden, "was always captable of a spell of incisive, quality bowling". Cozier (1996), p. 343.  But he was affected by injury throughout the six-match series; he withdrew injured from the third Test having bowled fewer than eight overs and missed the fifth Test completely.  Other bowlers in the team overshadowed Ambrose, and it was not until the final Test that he reached his most effective form in taking five for 96 in the first innings and seven wickets in the match.  Lee, Alan, in Cozier (1996), pp. 380–82.  Waving to the crowd as he left the field on the final day with an injury, Ambrose seemed to indicate that he would not tour England again.   He ended the series third in the bowling averages with 21 wickets at 24.09.  But according to Cozier, the senior players in the team caused problems for the management, and when the players returned home, Ambrose and three other members of the team were fined 10 per cent of their tour fee—in Ambrose's case, the fine was for "general failings of behaviour and attitude",  and setting a bad example to younger team-mates. Along with other senior players, Ambrose was rested from West Indies' next tour, a ODI tournament in October 1995,  but he returned to play in a three-team ODI tournament in Australia in December and January.  However, affected by the refusal of Brian Lara to tour following after being fined for his behaviour during the tour of England, the team failed to qualify for the final.  Ambrose took ten wickets in the tournament, and took three wickets in consecutive innings; in the latter game, he was man of the match.  West Indies were more successful in the World Cup in India, Pakistan and Sri Lanka which began in February. They reached the semi-finals, losing to Australia. Lee (1997), p. 1,018.  Ambrose was man of the match with three for 28 in his team's opening match,  and took ten wickets at 17.00 in the competition. He conceded an average of just three runs per over over the tournament, the second best among those who played in more than two games.  In March, Ambrose played in a home series against New Zealand. In the five match ODI series, 10 wickets at 17.60, including four for 36 in the opening game.   He took eight wickets in the two-Test series at an average of 20.50, leading the team averages,  and took five for 68 in the second match.  During the English cricket season, he returned to Northamptonshire and took 43 wickets in nine games to lead the national bowling averages, but he missed several matches with recurring injuries and his contract was not renewed for the following year. He was replaced by the much younger Mohammad Akram as overseas player. 
Team in declineFollowing Australia's victory in 1994–95, when West Indies toured Australia in 1996–97 the series was heavily publicised as a re-match. However, the visiting team were often ineffective, continuing a trend of decline, and depended heavily on their senior players, one of whom was Ambrose. He began the series poorly, continuing a pattern established in several preceding series, and critics suggested that he was no longer effective. Baum, p. 1,063–64.  After taking only three wickets in the first two Tests, both of which were lost by West Indies,  Ambrose told his team-mates that he would take ten wickets in the third. On a difficult pitch for batting, he managed to take nine in the match, including three in the first hour of the game, despite struggling with a hamstring injury. West Indies won, and Ambrose was named man of the match,  but he missed the fourth Test with an injury. Writing in Wisden, Greg Baum suggested that Ambrose absence possibly affected the outcome of the series; Australia won easily to ensure they won the series.  Ambrose returned for the final match, and on another difficult batting pitch, took five for 43 on the first day. West Indies won and Ambrose was again man of the match.  He led the West Indies bowling averages with 19 wickets at 23.36,  but had been the driving factor in West Indies' two wins.  Ambrose also played in a ODI tournament during the tour of Australia, taking nine wickets at 27.33.  Later in the season, between March and May 1997, India toured West Indies; Ambrose took ten wickets at 30.10 in the Test series, including five for 87 in the second Test, but was no longer the home team's most effective bowler.   Then in June, Sri Lanka played a two-Test series, won 1–0 by West Indies. In the first, Ambrose took five for 37 in the first innings, and eight wickets in the game, to be named man of the match. This included his 300th wicket in Test matches; he was the 12th bowler, and fourth West Indian, to reach this landmark.  Ambrose also played five ODIs during the West Indies home season, taking nine wickets. West Indies' loss of form continued in late 1997 when they lost every international match during their tour of Pakistan. Mohammed, pp. 1,094–95.  Ambrose played in two out of West Indies' three matches in a ODI tournament, taking one wicket,  but his performance in taking one wicket in the two Test matches he played—he missed the third match with injury—prompted Fazeer Mohammed, writing in Wisden, to describe Ambrose as "a shadow of his former self".  Any danger that Ambrose may have retired after this series was forestalled when Brian Lara was appointed West Indies captain and immediately spoke to Ambrose and Walsh to ask them to continue in the team.  When England toured the West Indies between January and April 1998,  he took 30 wickets at 14.26 to top the bowling averages for the series.  Many of the pitches during the tour were poor for batting, but Ambrose was very effective, particularly in the second, third and fourth Tests. In addition, he dismissed Michael Atherton, the England captain, six times in the series. Scyld Berry wrote in Wisden that Ambrose was "back to something near his peak form ... [He] defied every prediction that he was finished after his tour of Pakistan."  In the second Test, Ambrose took eight wickets; he conceded only 23 runs from 26 overs in the first innings and bowled a spell of five wickets for 16 runs from 47 deliveries in the second to complete figures of five for 52.  Having won the second match, West Indies lost the third, but according to Matthew Engel, "Ambrose's abiding power was the most constant feature of a fluctuating match". Engel, Matthew in Berry (1999), pp. 1,037–38.  His eight wickets in the game, including five for 25 in the first innings, took him past fifty Test wickets in Trinidad.  He followed up with six wickets in West Indies victory in the fourth Test, taking four for 38 in the final innings. Tony Cozier wrote that Ambrose "thundered in, arms and knees pumping like pistons, to generate all of his old pace."  Following the Test series, which West Indies won 3–1, Ambrose played in the first three matches of the ODI series,  and took three wickets. 
Final years of careerAmbrose and Walsh missed the Mini World Cup ODI tournament in October 1998,  in Ambrose's case following damage to his house caused by Hurricane Georges.  They returned to the team for West Indies' first ever tour of South Africa, and Ambrose took 13 wickets in the series at an average of 23.76, but West Indies lost every game of the five-match series.  In the first Test match, Ambrose and Walsh bowled effectively but lacked support from the other members of the attack.  In the second Test, the pair again lacked support, but bowled well. The visiting team generally bowled too many bouncers to be effective, but Ambrose took eight wickets in the game, including six for 51 in the second innings.  He was ineffective in the third Test,  and despite bowling what Geoffrey Dean in Wisden called a "superb opening spell", could not prevent South Africa building up a large total against an attack lacking two other main bowlers.  Ambrose pulled out of the attack himself later in the innings with a back injury,  and did not bowl in the second innings. Dean, pp. 1,168–69.  He missed the final Test with a hamstring injury.  He was fit to play in the first six games of a seven-match ODI series, won 6–1 by South Africa, and took six wickets.   In March 1999,  West Indies then faced Australia in a home series, and contrary to expectations, West Indies drew the series 2–2. The outcome of the series was decided by a small group of players, including Ambrose, whom Mike Coward described in Wisden as "five of the most distinguished cricketers of all time".  Ambrose took 19 wickets at 22.26, second to Walsh in the averages.  His best figures came in the fourth and final Test, when he took five for 94 in the first innings and eight wickets in the match,  but in the third match, although he only took four wickets in total, Coward described Ambrose as "rampant" and wrote that Steve Waugh, who scored 199, had to survive "some extraordinary pace bowling from Ambrose".  He played four of the ODIs which followed in April, taking three wickets.  The following month, Ambrose took part in the 1999 World Cup in England, and he was the second most economical bowler in the tournament in conceding an average 2.35 runs per over while taking seven wickets at 13.42.  West Indies went out in the group stages, and Matthew Engel suggested that the bowlers were tired and judged the team "outright failures". Following the World Cup, the West Indian selectors chose to rest Ambrose, along with Walsh, from alternate ODI tournaments. Ambrose consequently missed two ODI series, but in October 1999 he played two ODIs in a series against Bangladesh in Dhaka and three in a tournament in Sharjah.   In the latter competition, Ambrose conceded five runs from ten overs against Sri Lanka, the second most economical bowling figures from a full allocation of 10 overs in all ODIs.  However, in all five matches, he took just one wicket,  and he injured his elbow in Sharjah which forced him to miss West Indies' tour of New Zealand which began in December.  Ambrose recovered in time to play for the Leeward Island in domestic cricket, taking 31 wickets at 12.03 in seven first-class games.  When Zimbabwe toured the West Indies, he returned to the West Indies team to be named man of the match in the first Test—Zimbabwe were bowled out for 63 when chasing 99 runs to win.  He took a wicket in the second and final Test,  and four wickets in six matches during a three-way ODI series also involving Zimbabwe and Pakistan.  These were his final ODIs; in 176 matches, he took 225 wickets at an average of 24.12 and conceding 3.48 runs per over.  Pakistan subsequently played a three-Test series against West Indies; in his last home series, Ambrose took 11 wickets at 19.90 to head the West Indian bowling averages. Before his next series, a five-match series in England, Ambrose announced that he would retire after the final Test,  although the president of the West Indies Cricket Board unavailingly tried to persuade him to continue for a little longer.   West Indies lost the series 3–1, Tony Cozier, reviewing the series, suggested that only Ambrose and Walsh of the West Indian team emerged from the series with any credit. The other bowlers were ineffective, and Ambrose publicly commented during the series on the lack of support that he and Walsh received.  He was second in the averages to Walsh with 17 wickets at 18.64.  After taking just one wicket in the first Test, although Martin Johnson, in Wisden, suggested he bowled very well,  Ambrose took five wickets in the second Test but was again unlucky as the batsmen were beaten by many deliveries that he bowled.  After this match, Ambrose returned to the West Indies having been rested from a ODI tournament involving England and Zimbabwe.   He took four wickets in the first innings of both the third and fourth Tests,  passing 400 wickets in the latter match.  After he took three wickets in his final Test match, the crowd gave him a standing ovation and the England players formed a guard-of-honour when he came out to bat. Atherton, p. 29.   In 98 Test matches, he took 405 wickets at an average of 20.99;  according to Mike Selvey, in Swetes,  his mother rang a bell each time he took a Test wicket. Having retired from cricket, Ambrose has concentrated on music, playing with several bands.   He played bass guitar with the reggae band Big Bad Dread and the Baldhead; one fellow band member was his former team-mate Richie Richardson. 
Style and techniqueMike Selvey wrote in The Guardian in 1991 that Ambrose had "the sort of easy, repetitive, no-sweat action which is the key to unyielding accuracy. There is no respite and all his other qualities are byproducts."  At his peak, Ambrose did not rely on pronounced swing or seam movement of the ball. Instead, he repeatedly bowled into the same areas of the pitch and the height from which he delivered the ball made him extremely difficult to face. The ball bounced sharply after pitching, sometimes deviating slightly from a straight line after pitching on the seam, and frequently took the edge of the batsman's bat to be caught behind the wicket.    His 1992 citation as Wisden Cricketer of the Year states that he had "outright pace and he generates a disconcerting, steepling bounce from fuller-length deliveries ... His height and a slender, sinewy wrist contribute greatly to the final velocity [of the ball], the wrist snapping forward at the instant of release to impart extra thrust".  Writing in 2001 following Ambrose's retirement, Michael Atherton, whom Ambrose dismissed more often than any other batsman, said: "At his best, there is no doubt that [Ambrose] moved beyond the fine line that separates the great from the very good. Quality bowlers essentially need two of three things: pace, movement and accuracy. Ambrose had all three." Ambrose's height, and the accuracy with which he bowled, made it difficult for batsmen to play forward to the ball; instead they were forced to play with their weight going back. His accuracy meant that he was effective if the pitch favoured batsmen.    He bowled an effective yorker,  and unlike other fast bowlers, used short-pitched deliveries sparingly,    although he could bowl a hostile bouncer,  and concentrated on bowling a full length aimed at the wickets.  Ambrose rarely engaged in verbal sparring with batsmen, although in later years he occasionally inspected the pitch in an area close to the batsman before an innings began and rubbed his hands to suggest that he would enjoy bowling there.  He always aimed to concede as few runs as possible when bowling, and frequently berated himself when he offered an easy delivery from which to score.  Atherton, p. 31.  Following his dismissal of a batsman, Ambrose often celebrated by pumping the air with his fists.   With Courtney Walsh, Ambrose developed a reputation for performing at his best when his team seemed likely to lose,  and he often took wickets in clusters which devastated the opposition.  In addition, he was often most effective against the leading batsmen on a team; he was also capable of exploiting vulnerabilities in the techniques of other batsmen.   As of 2012, Ambrose's 405 Test wickets place him 11th on the list of leading Test wicket-takers.  Of those who have taken over 200 Test wickets, Ambrose has the third best bowling average behind Malcolm Marshall and Joel Garner,   and has the eighth best economy rate; he rises to third if only those who have taken over 250 wickets are included.   For much of his career, Ambrose was rated the world's best bowler in the ICC player rankings, first reaching the top in 1991; he rarely dropped below second and was ranked in the top 10 from 1989 until the end of his career.  His highest rating of 912 in the rankings, which he achieved in 1994, is the equal sixth best rating of all time.  In 2010, Ambrose was chosen by a panel of writers and experts as a member of ESPNcricinfo's "All-Time XI" for West Indies.  The following year, he was inducted into the International Cricket Council Hall of Fame.  During his playing days, Ambrose had a reputation for reticence,  and rarely spoke to journalists or the opposition.  His response to a request for an interview in 1991—"Curtly talks to no-one"—    became associated with him throughout his career,  but he was more willing to talk to journalists after he retired. 
Notes 
References 
Bibliography

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
  
DEFAULTSORT















 
 
 
 
 
